The Jewel
on the

Mountaintop
The European Southern Observatory
through Fifty Years

Claus Madsen

The Jewel on the Mountaintop
Fifty Years of the European Southern Observatory

Claus Madsen

Acknowledgement:
As a title, The Jewel on the Mountaintop is derived from a speech by
Swiss Ambassador J­ ean-Pierre Keusch at the inauguration of the 3.5-metre
New Technology Telescope (NTT) on 6 February 1990. The NTT was,
in many ways, a precursor to the Very Large Telescope, which — staying
with the metaphor — constitutes the true jewel on the mountaintop.

Cover Photo:
Dawn at P
­ aranal — the first rays of the Sun are reflected by the
­telescope enclosures at ­Paranal. (Photo: Gerd Hüdepohl)

ADRIAAN BLAAUW

In Memoriam

Table of Contents
Author’s Preface

9

Prologue

15

The Hinge: The VLT

15

Part I: Catching Up
Chapter I-1 ∙ The Oldest Science
Chapter I-2 ∙ Returning from the Abyss
Chapter I-3 ∙ A Dramatic Twist
Chapter I-4 ∙ In the Most Remote Place God Could Find
Chapter I-5 ∙ ESO — Quo Vadis?
Chapter I-6 ∙ Towards the 3.6-metre Telescope
Chapter I-7 ∙ Sky Mapper
Chapter I-8 ∙ Of Heaven and Hell, the Vatican and the Mission
Chapter I-9 ∙ The Changing of the Guard
Chapter I-10 ∙ Garching United

19
21
25
35
43
53
59
75
85
93
99

Part II: Years of Experimentation
Chapter II-1 ∙ Upping the Ante
Chapter II-2 ∙ Inventing a Game Changer
Chapter II-3 ∙ EMMI, SUSI, SOFI and the other Darlings
Chapter II-4 ∙ Hubble at ESO
Chapter II-5 ∙ History in Passing
Chapter II-6 ∙ An Annus Mirabilis
Chapter II-7 ∙ Decision Day
Chapter II-8 ∙ A Mountain in the Middle of Nowhere
Chapter II-9 ∙ NTT First Light

107
109
119
125
137
147
155
171
177
187

Part III: The Breakthrough
Chapter III-1 ∙ Back to the Drawing Board
Chapter III-2 ∙ Aux Instruments, Chercheurs!
Chapter III-3 ∙ Breaking the Seeing Barrier
Chapter III-4 ∙ From double-sight to supersight: Interferometry
Chapter III-5 ∙ The Return of the Dalton Brothers
Chapter III-6 ∙ Bang for the Buck
Chapter III-7 ∙ Paradigm Revisited
Chapter III-8 ∙ Upgrading, De-scoping
Chapter III-9 ∙ Clouds on the Horizon
Chapter III-10 ∙ At the Brink
Chapter III-11 ∙ Tranquillity in Chile, Icy Winds in Europe
Chapter III-12 ∙ Tuning a Formidable Science Machine
Chapter III-13 ∙ The Countdown
Chapter III-14 ∙ Clear Skies, at Last
Chapter III-15 ∙ First Fringes of the Phoenix
Chapter III-16 ∙ Not just a Telescope, an Observatory; Not just an Observatory, a Home

199
201
215
231
243
251
265
271
279
289
295
305
317
327
337
351
361

Part IV: Towards New Horizons
Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA
Chapter IV-2 ∙ Into New Territory
Chapter IV-3 ∙ Buds at ­Paranal

367
369
393
401

7

Chapter IV-4 ∙ Of Eponymous Birds and Euros
Chapter IV-5 ∙ The VLT in Retrospect
Chapter IV-6 ∙ A Love Affair
Chapter IV-7 ∙ A Growing Organisation
Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge
Chapter IV-9 ∙ Born in Europe, at Home in the World
Chapter IV-10 ∙ A Window to the Public

411
427
445
451
457
487
501

Epilogue

513

References

517

Appendices
Appendix 1 ∙ Important Milestones
		 Important milestones during the period covered in Part I
		 Important milestones during the period covered in Part II
		 Important milestones during the period covered in Part III
		 Important milestones during the period covered in Part IV
Appendix 2 ∙ List of ESO Council Presidents and Directors General
Appendix 3 ∙ List of Interviewees
Appendix 4 ∙ List of Acronyms
Appendix 5 ∙ Index of Names
Appendix 6 ∙ Subject Index

527
529
529
531
532
533
535
537
538
543
550

8

Author’s Preface

I

n early 1988, my supervisor at ESO, Richard West, called me to his office, where
I met with Adriaan Blaauw, who had served as ESO’s second Director General,
succeeding Otto Heckmann. Richard explained that Adriaan had begun to work
on a series of articles about the early years of the organisation at the suggestion
of ESO’s then Director General Harry van der Laan. These articles had originally
been intended for The ESO Messenger, but had soon turned into a book project,
and ­R ichard asked me to assist Adriaan in particular with pictures. Richard had
served under Adriaan and it was clear that great respect and mutual sympathy existed
between the two. Richard wanted to extend all the help he could to Adriaan in his
new undertaking. During the months to come I did my best to help, but the task
soon changed from one simple job among many to a deeply fascinating assignment
that enabled me to obtain a deeper insight into ESO’s history as told not just by an
insider, but by someone of the impeccable academic and human stature that has
always characterised Adriaan. It was an intellectual feast that I have never forgotten.
I had joined ESO only eight years earlier as a member of what was then called the
ESO Sky Atlas Laboratory. The main task of the laboratory was to produce the
ESO Survey of the southern skies, based on large photographic glass plates obtained
with the ESO 1-metre Schmidt telescope at the La Silla Observatory and later also,
together with the UK’s Science Research Council (SRC), the ESO/SRC Deep Surveys, a task that also involved the UK Schmidt Telescope at Siding Spring in New
South Wales, Australia. All in all, the task of the laboratory took more than 20 years
to complete. My own task was peripheral to the main job, but it included developing
techniques to enhance the exploitation of the tremendous scientific treasures that
were contained in these glass plates. Furthermore, I had become interested in, and
made a bit of a name for myself in, wide-field imaging techniques and their application to astronomy. But when Adriaan began his book project my professional path
had taken a twist. In 1986, ESO established an information service and ­R ichard,
who had been in charge of the laboratory, was appointed head of this new service.
He asked me whether I would like to follow him into this new endeavour, and this
enabled me to pursue another interest of mine, the public awareness of science and,
more generally, the interaction between science and society, topics that were to determine my continued career for the decades to come.

9

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Adriaan’s book was published in 1991. Although it was a history tracing the earliest years of ESO, it appeared to me as almost eerily timely, for at the time ESO was
passing through a rough patch as we struggled with the challenges of the recently
approved Very Large Telescope (VLT) project. His precise description of the difficulties in the 1950s and 1960s provided both food for thought and a good understanding of the challenges ahead — but also of the ingenuity, tenacity and immense
dedication displayed by everyone who had been associated with the great adventure
that we now label rather summarily ESO. This is perhaps the most important lesson learnt from what we now call an adventure and the “five-star success” (Flensted
Jensen, 2002) that has enabled the strong comeback of European astronomy: success
does not come by itself. Rather it is the result of a mechanism that can foster, absorb
and bring to fruition great ideas, wherever they may be. Many battles were fought,
many mountains climbed (also literally), many hurdles overcome — some which are
widely known, others which will remain known to only a few. Some which deserve
scrutiny because lessons can be learnt from them, others that deserve little more than
to disappear in the mist of forgotten times.
Meanwhile, many years have passed. In December 2009, ESO’s Director General,
Tim de Zeeuw asked me if I would be interested in writing a new book about ESO’s
fascinating history — focussing on the more recent period that Blaauw for obvious
reasons could not cover. I gladly accepted the offer and the challenge. I have been
privileged to follow ESO’s evolution for more than 30 years, and in connection with
the 40th anniversary actually produced a video about ESO’s history. With this background, and in preparation for this book, I have carried out extensive interviews with
key actors, both from inside and outside the organisation, trying to obtain a more
comprehensive understanding of ESO’s role and evolution. These interviews and
conversations have been invaluable and I am more than pleased to acknowledge the
many people who have given me their time, and their voices, telling me their version
of the ESO story. A complete list of interviewees is given in Appendix 3.
The interviews have complemented the treasure trove of information found in The
ESO Messenger, the quarterly magazine that has been published since 1974 (and now
amounting to a staggering 10 000 pages), the Annual Reports, minutes of the ESO
Council and Committee meetings and a myriad of other publications from ESO.
Of course, with such rich material, the challenge has been that of selection. It is the
hard job, but also the prerogative of the author, to make the choices. I have done so
knowing that others might have chosen differently.

10

Author’s Preface

This book sees ESO’s development as falling into four distinct phases: Catching Up
(1962–1980), Years of Experimentation (1980–1990), The Breakthrough (up until
the VLT’s inauguration and science operations, and also first fringes at the Very
Large Telescope Interferometer [VLTI]), and finally, Towards New Horizons (up
until 20071), when ESO began to set the research agenda through new and unique
projects. This is a rough division, of course. The reality is that while one can observe
a chronological development — and a logical evolution both of the organisation and
the scientific and societal context in which it has operated — the process was anything but linear or straightforward. Rather, it was an iterative one, and with various elements compounding and interacting with each other. In this sense a simple
timeline is an inadequate guide for a full comprehension of ESO in all its dimensions — for science, for the scientists, for technology, for the Member States and for
their citizens. It is therefore hoped that the excursions that I have made from the
exact timeline help the reader, rather than cause confusion. Also, while it is hoped
that members of the astronomical community will read this book with interest, it is
aimed at a wider audience, for the ESO story is not just interesting in its own right.
It is both a symbol of, and an example for, a period during which Europe struggled to
regain its former position as a continent of science through a process of cooperation
and integration — ultimately within a framework known as the European Research
Area (ERA). Many astronomical ideas and concepts are therefore explained in a way
that makes them accessible to readers with a variety of backgrounds.
In his book, Europe’s Quest for the Universe, Lodewijk Woltjer summarises the main
elements behind the advances in modern ground-based astronomy, to which ESO has
so richly contributed. He writes: “The trio that … has dominated progress was increased
sensitivity, increased angular resolution and increased wavelength coverage… . To the
above we have to add a fourth: cost reduction.” But there is a fifth element, which is
perhaps the single most important one: the human one. This is therefore also a story
about people — how many individuals from many different cultures and walks of
life came together to contribute to the ESO project; mostly working hand-in-hand,
though sometimes also struggling to find common ground — each thinking and acting within his or her own reference system — yet at the end of the day found constructive and forward-looking solutions. This is perhaps the essence of ESO’s success: its ability to rally world-class people and top-notch material resources in pursuit
1	

The year 2007 coincides with the departure of ESO’s sixth Director General, Catherine Cesarsky. Although
some important developments that took place after 2007, but which originated earlier, will be mentioned, the
author does not attempt to describe ESO’s history beyond 2007.

11

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

a common and fundamental goal for humankind — to obtain a deeper and better
understanding of the Universe in which we live and of which we are a part.
This is now the time for acknowledgements and thanks. I have already mentioned
my “interview victims”, several of whom provided most valuable comments as the
manuscript progressed. But others have helped. They include my long-time collaborators and friends: Hans Hermann Heyer, who helped me with photographs, Herbert
Zodet provided sound recordings of past interviews, Uta Grothkopf supplied ESO’s
publication statistics and helped me to find many papers and logbooks, Jean-Michel
Bonneau was a competent source as regards ESO budget and finance questions,
­Ferdinando Patat and his team provided statistical information about observing
proposals. I must also thank Elisabeth Völk for her invaluable help in (re-)establishing contact with former colleagues, and for many fruitful conversations about ESO’s
long history, and Mafalda Martins, who did the graphical layout of the book. I also
want to thank everyone who provided photos for the book (as indicated in the captions). Note that images without a specific photo credit are courtesy of ESO. Last,
but certainly not least, I wish to acknowledge the work of and thank the four people, who agreed to review the final version of the manuscript: Bob Fosbury, Henrik
Grage, George Miley and Richard West.
This book is dedicated to the memory of Adriaan Blaauw. My last visit to him took
place in July 2010, when I conducted my final interview with him about his long
association with ESO. He also provided most valuable comments on the early draft
manuscript of this book. Even at the age of 96, he was not only able to draw on his
rich memories in a clear and succinct manner, but having visited both ESO Headquarters and P
­ aranal Observatory recently, it was also evident that he retained a keen
interest and pride in the further development of the organisation. “My dream now,”
he confided to me, “is to live to see ESO celebrate its 50th anniversary in 2012.” Sadly,
that wish would not be fulfilled. On 1 December 2010, he passed away.

12

Author’s Preface

Despite his great age, Blaauw travelled to Chile to visit P
­ aranal in February 2010. Here he is seen enjoying
the ­Paranal sunset together with Tim de Zeeuw, ESO’s current Director General. (Photo: Ueli Weilenman)

13

Prologue

The Hinge: The VLT
“OK for everybody on the mountain. Thank you very much:
We have the First Light!”
Massimo Tarenghi, ­Paranal Observatory,
Monday, 25 May 1998, 22:00 hours local time.

I

had the good fortune to be on ­Paranal on 25 May 1998, the night of first light for
the first VLT Unit Telescope, Antu. Together with my colleague Herbert Zodet
and a small team from Swiss television, I was supposed to produce a piece for the
international television news, to be distributed by satellite. I vividly remember the
tense atmosphere in the control room as night fell — soon to be transformed into
moments of complete elation once the first exposures had been provisionally examined. People react very differently in such situations: Jason Spyromilio spontaneously
broke into a beautiful dance of joy. Massimo Tarenghi kept his carefully controlled
composure, but he was clearly happy too. For a split second, he gave away his true
feelings as only an astronomer can: “Oh-point-five!” he cried triumphantly to Jörg
Eschwey, the site construction manager, referring to the image resolution of 0.5 arcseconds. We did a short interview with him in the control room immediately afterwards, and although he clad his statement in modest words, his deep sense of satisfaction was plain.
The observing team left the control room for half an hour or so for a midnight champagne party, the only time ever that observations were interrupted for reasons other
than adverse weather conditions or technical problems. I stayed behind because I had
promised to give a telephone interview to the early morning programme on ­German
radio. As I was put through to the studio at WDR, I heard the usual pop song and
a traffic alert concerning jams on the highways in the Cologne area. Then the studio host announced that he was now connected live to the P
­ aranal Observatory,
where the world’s biggest telescope had just been put to use for the first time. And
then he fired off his question: “So, what did you see...?” The public mass media have
their own dynamics — the VLT had been on its way for more than 20 years, it was

15

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

more than ten years since the project had been formally approved, and thousands of
­individuals had been involved in realising this dream — and then there were just a
few seconds to explain the outcome. I honestly don’t recall what I said, but probably
not much more than a minute later, it was over; the next song was played, followed
by the weather forecast for North-Rhine-Westphalia. Showers, I believe.

Massimo Tarenghi (right) talking to the author at the VLT console shortly after first light, with Herbert
Zodet behind the camera. (Photo: Peter Gray)

We did the news piece for television on our return to Santiago, uploaded it to the satellite for worldwide distribution the following day and then attended the first light
press conference at ESO’s Santiago Office. I left for Europe in the late evening and, as
usual, the in-flight entertainment included a news programme, and suddenly I found
myself, with some 300 other passengers, watching the VLT first light: happy faces,
Jason’s joyous dance, a view of the planetary nebula NGC 6302 (the Bug Nebula, one
of the first light press pictures), and an excited Rolf Kudritzki, of the UniversitätsSternwarte München, praising the first pictures at the Garching press conference.

16

Prologue ∙ The Hinge: The VLT

The public mass media indeed have their own dynamics — catch a few photons from
outer space, and everybody watches… . For me, it was the end of a string of intensely
hectic days. I closed my eyes.
≈
Before that, for years, we had toured the ESO Member States with exhibitions and
presentations about the VLT. At a technology fair in 1997, a very important representative of his government’s ministry for research literally stormed into our stand.
He must have had an awful day. It was late and he had clearly only come because one
of his subordinates had implored him to stop by. He was in an extreme hurry and
exuded an unholy mixture of exhaustion, frustration and stress. He nodded briskly
and went up to a model of the VLT. “So this is the VLT,” he barked, “this [expletive]
thing that is costing us so much money… .” In such circumstances, prudence would
normally dictate a cautious reply, but he caught me off guard, and it was the end of
a long day for me too. So, instead of seeking refuge in diplomacy, I shot back: “If you
think this is expensive, what are you going to say, when this telescope delivers the first
picture of a planet outside the Solar System?” He looked at me, completely stunned,
and then became very friendly. Nonetheless I felt uncomfortable that night, feeling
that I had committed the unforgivable sin of overselling. Yet only seven years later,
the VLT did exactly that: it delivered the first direct image of an exoplanet.
There are many tales to be told about the VLT and some of them will be mentioned
in this book. The VLT represented the dream of a generation of astronomers and it
marked an impressive comeback for European astronomy after decades of taking second place to scientists across the Atlantic. How did ESO achieve this great success
and where would ESO go after this magnificent achievement? What did it mean for
science? What did all of this mean for Europe? And what did it mean for the proverbial man in the street, whose tax money had enabled the realisation of this dream?
Searching for these answers, we will embark on a historic journey that began 45 years
before the magical moment of first light, that 25th day of May 1998… .

17

Part I:
Catching Up

Signatories to the 1954 declaration.

Chapter I-1

The Oldest Science
“The situation in the thirties was largely that Europe —
European astronomers, in a way, left big telescope astronomy
to the Americans.”
Bengt Strömgren1

A

stronomy has often been described as the oldest of the sciences. It is evident that
most cultures have studied the heavens and that these studies have deeply influenced people’s lives both in practical terms and in their world view.
Without prejudice to other cultures, however, it seems fair to state that for several
centuries, astronomy, as a science, was closely associated with Europe, especially following the Renaissance and the Enlightenment. Copernicus, Tycho and Kepler stand
out as early examples, though still tied to the pre-telescope era. The great breakthrough enabled by the invention of the telescope and its use for astronomical observations by Galileo, initiated an increasingly dynamic evolution of European astronomy. The names of Adams, Le Verrier, Halley, Messier, Rømer, Lacaille, the Cassinis,
the Herschels, Laplace, Lomonosov, Bode, Piazzi, Struve, Bessel, Fraunhofer, and
many others grace the history of astronomy. Newton stands out by establishing the
mathematical framework that has held for centuries. At the beginning of the 20th
century, scientists such as Hertzsprung, Eddington, Oort and others were expanding our knowledge about the world, but names like Hoyle, Bethe and von Weizsäcker
also deserve mention, as they signal the gradual transition of astronomy in the direction of astrophysics, from a taxonomical and phenomenological description of the
world to a physical understanding of it. The advent of nuclear physics, Einstein’s theories of relativity and the strange world of quantum physics also set their mark on
the science of astronomy as much as they were inspired by it.

1	

Interview with Bengt Strömgren by Lillian Hoddeson and Gordon Baym, 13 May 1976. (Niels Bohr Library
and Archives, courtesy: The American Institute of Physics).

21

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

For astronomers in Europe in the first half of the 20th century, the main focus was
the study of the stellar system known as the Milky Way galaxy, or simply the Galaxy, and the individual stars therein. As Adriaan Blaauw expressed it, at the time “the
Universe was the Universe filled with the stars… .” Their studies ranged from objects
in the Solar System (including asteroids and comets), individual stars (including
double and variable stars) to the shape, structure and kinematics of the Milky Way.
Whilst the attention of observational astronomy in Europe was on our own galaxy,
interest in modern-day cosmology — the study of the large-scale properties of the
Universe as we know it today — received a boost in the US with Edwin P. Hubble’s
1925 paper, based on his observations with the 100-inch Hooker reflector in California. This paper provided empirical evidence that some of the fuzzy patches in the
sky — ­nebulae — were stellar systems far away from, and independent of, our galaxy. ­Hubble’s 1929 paper went further and suggested that these systems were independent galaxies and moving away from us. This discovery set US astronomy on a
quite different path from that pursued by European astronomers, even though scientists in Europe, such as Alexander Friedman, Georges Lemaître 2 , Willem de S­ itter,
Arthur Eddington, and Otto Heckmann had undertaken seminal theoretical work
in cosmology, which today forms one of the main areas in astronomical research
worldwide.
≈
Where was astronomy in the mid-1950s? The main focus of many astronomers was
on stellar evolution and on understanding the internal structure of the stars and
their atmospheres, supported by progress in nuclear physics. Stellar spectral classification was important in determining the ages, masses and temperatures of stars,
greatly helped by theoretical modelling, which in turn was enabled by technological
advances in the field of computing. Astronomers had also developed a fairly good
understanding of the Milky Way system as a whole, with its different stellar populations and star formation taking place in the spiral arms. Radio astronomy had
enabled the mapping of neutral hydrogen (HI) in the Milky Way, and there was an
emerging understanding also of how spiral structures form from discs of gas and
dust. So, for stellar astronomy, a coherent if rudimentary and incomplete picture was

2	

Two years before Hubble’s famous paper, Lemaître had published his ideas about the expanding Universe —
not dissimilar to those of Hubble’s — in the Annales de la Société scientifique de Bruxelles (Block, 2011). The
philosophical roots of the idea of galaxies as islands in the Universe, however, can be traced back to Immanuel
Kant’s work The General History of Nature and Theory of the Heavens, published in 1755.

22

Chapter I-1 ∙ The Oldest Science

beginning to emerge, although many questions were still open. Many details of star
formation, internal stellar structure, chemical abundances and their relationship to
stellar evolution were all poorly understood, as were late stellar evolutionary stages.
The situation was even less clear when it came to extragalactic astronomy. The dispute about the reality of the Big Bang took centre stage; with proponents, such as
George Gamow, arguing that the Universe was expanding — and thus ever changing — while opponents, such as Fred Hoyle3 , countered that the Universe could exist
within a general steady state, expanding, perhaps, but with new matter being constantly created to replenish it. With time, the Big Bang theory gained widespread
acceptance. Establishing the age of the Universe was a related question, and here too
the ideas were quite rudimentary, with estimates ranging between 10 and 20 billion
years. But, as so often, searching for answers led to new questions. Radio astronomy would soon lead to the discovery of mysterious radio sources such as quasars,
which served as probes in the study of the intervening space. The advent of space
flight would soon open up potent windows for observations in previously inaccessible wavelength domains, such as gamma and X-rays. The combination of ever more
sophisticated observational techniques and a better general theoretical understanding provided for a dynamic development of the discipline in a continuous interplay
between observations, theoretical work and the development of new technologies.
New and powerful telescopes — both in the optical and radio domains — would
play an important role, but in the mid-1950s, all the large telescopes were located in
the northern hemisphere.
While differences existed between astronomy as conducted in Europe and in the
United States of America, by the middle of the 20th century this reflected the hard
reality that the twin scientific communities were confronted by very different circumstances. Thanks to philanthropy, American astronomers had been able to construct large new telescopes in sites that were favourable to astronomical observations
— under clear skies and on mountaintops far away from cities — beginning in 1918
with the 100-inch Hooker reflector on Mount Wilson and culminating in 1948
with the 200-inch Hale telescope on Mount Palomar in southern California. European astronomers were not so fortunate. It is fruitless to speculate to what extent
this was a result of a different scientific emphasis, but it is clear that the maelstrom
of the world wars and totalitarian ideologies that engulfed Europe had dire consequences for all European science, including astronomy.
3	

Fred Hoyle was arguably one of the most pronounced opponents of the Big Bang theory. Ironically, to ridicule
the idea, he was also the man who coined the term.

23

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

But Europe’s relative weakness in the field was a problem for astronomy as a whole.
As Otto Heckmann, ESO’s first Director, wrote in his book Sterne, Kosmos,
­Weltmodelle: “American astronomy, based on large instruments, seemed destined to
remain a monologue, even though fruitful science demands dialogue, yes even controversy.” (­Heckmann, 1976).
So, in the early 1950s, a group of astronomers undertook an important initiative to
reverse the decline of European astronomy. The vehicle for change and turnaround
was to build new and competitive observational facilities.
In the southern hemisphere.

24

Chapter I-2

Returning from the Abyss
“Il faut faire l’Europe.”
Charles Fehrenbach1

T

he initiative by the astronomers, however unique it may have appeared, reflected
the prevailing zeitgeist: a European desire to rise from the ashes of the Second
World War and an understanding that this had to happen within a broader European framework. This understanding was underpinned by the Cold War chill (the
Warsaw Pact being signed in 1954), causing western European countries to move
closer together, Germany’s arduous efforts to re-join the community of civilised,
democratic nations and, of course, by the gigantic economic and social challenges
that faced each of Europe’s nation states at the time. Food rationing in the United
Kingdom, for example, was only lifted in the summer of 1954. In France the Fourth
Republic was entangled in protracted colonial wars and saw no less than eight governments between 1953 and 1958. At the same time, two social trends gained strength:
the drive towards European cooperation and the notion that science and technology
constituted the key to a better future. Following one of the most horrific and bitter
conflicts in the history of humankind, post-war European cooperation was not built
on love. It was built on a desire to avoid the mistakes of the past that had caused the
conflict. This meant reaching out to former enemies, and it is therefore not surprising that European integration became a project driven primarily by an intellectual
and visionary elite — in politics, but also in science 2 . In the political arena, European cooperation was first suggested by Winston Churchill in his famous speech on
19 September 1946 in Zurich, but was given a more concrete form on 9 May 1950
by the French Foreign Minister Robert Schuman, initiating the process that would
later lead to the Treaties of Rome and, ultimately, to the creation of the European
Union. It should be mentioned that post-war cooperation between the countries of
1	

Quoted in Blaauw, 1991.

2	

By contrast, when the International Council of Scientific Unions was created after the First World War, it was
not possible to include scientists from what was then known as the Central Powers, Germany and Austria.

25

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

western Europe was nurtured by the United States of America and science and technology were fields that presented themselves as fertile ground for cross-border collaboration. As the historian of science John Krige has pointed out, the US saw this as
an important element of its “ foreign-policy objectives in the European theatre” at the
time (Krige, 2005). So it was a member of the US delegation to the fifth UNESCO
General Conference in June 1950, Nobel Laureate Isidor I. Rabi, who encouraged
European collaboration in nuclear physics. On 1 July 1953, the European Council for
Nuclear Research (Conseil Européen pour la Recherche Nucléaire, CERN) opened a
convention establishing a European Organisation for Nuclear Research for signature,
and thus began a research facility that would evolve to become the world leader in
particle physics. This convention also inspired and paved the way for a series of other
European collaborative projects in science. ESO would become the second such initiative, with its convention based on that of CERN. Also in ESO’s case, g­ entle US
encouragement played an important role, both during the initial discussions and later
on, although there is no direct evidence that this was led by wider strategic considerations, as was the case for CERN. Thus, in the spring of 1953, Walter Baade — a
German astronomer who had emigrated before the war and was now working at the
Palomar and Mount Wilson Observatories — visited Leiden 3 . In discussions with
Jan Oort, then Director of the Leiden Observatory (Sterrewacht Leiden) and arguably one of the most respected European astronomers, the idea of a European observatory was born — an idea that rapidly caught on. Soon thereafter, in June a group
of astronomers began to consider it, using the opportunity of a conference on Galactic research, held in G
­ roningen 4 , and by the beginning of 1954 it was given concrete
form, with a formal statement signed in Leiden on 26 January of that year by 12
leading astronomers from Belgium, France, Germany, the Netherlands, Sweden and
the United Kingdom. The main elements of the statement, including the scientific
rationale, would later find their way into the convention: an observatory was to be
established in the southern hemisphere, comprising a large telescope (3-metre class)
and a Schmidt survey telescope (thus imitating the highly successful combination
at Mount Palomar), jointly supported by several European countries. However, the
statement also declared that participation should be restricted to neighbouring countries (“ le nombre des participants a quelque pays voisins formant un groupe restreint”).
3	

Baade had worked at the Hamburger Sternwarte in the 1920s before joining the Palomar and Mount Wilson
Observatories in 1931. In the mid-1930s he had contemplated a return to Europe to assume the directorship of
the Hamburger Sternwarte. Before his migration, Baade had been awarded a one-year Rockefeller fellowship,
sponsored by Harlow Shapley. He was the first German astronomer to be accepted for a fellowship after the
Great War.

4

International Astronomical Union (IAU) Symposium No. 1.

26

Chapter I-2 ∙ Returning from the Abyss

Participants at the IAU Conference No. 1 in Vosbergen (Groningen), from left to right: Guillermo Haro,
Bertil Lindblad, Wilhelm Becker, Richard Stoy, Walter Baade, Otto Heckmann, Vladimir Kourganoff,
Jöran Ramberg, Jan Hendrik Oort, Lukas Plaut, Carl Schalén, Adriaan Blaauw, William Morgan,
Harold Spencer-Jones, Laura Nassau, Pieter Oosterhoff, Jason Nassau, Priscilla Bok, Pieter van Rhijn,
Petr Grigorevich Kulikovsky, Boris Vasilevich Kukarkin, Viktor Ambartsumian, Pavel Petrovich
Paranago and Oleg Melnikov. (Courtesy: J. Merkelijn-Katgert Leiden/IAU)

≈
The choice of the southern hemisphere had historical justification and recognised
that the southern skies, being relatively unexplored and at the same time featuring
objects of particular interest, offered rich hunting grounds for Europe’s astronomers. With easy access to the centre of the Milky Way and a unique view of the twin
Magellanic Clouds, the southern skies could provide the stage for the comeback of
European observational astronomy that its astronomers so coveted.
European astronomers had shown interest in southern hemisphere astronomy quite
early. In 1750, Nicolas Louis de Lacaille observed the southern skies from the Cape
of Good Hope, determining the positions of nearly 10 000 stars. Later, in 1834, John
Herschel set up his observatory at Wynberg in the Western Cape Province, with the

27

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

purpose of extending the catalogues compiled by his father, William ­Herschel, to
cover objects in the southern skies. John Herschel recorded 2307 nebulae and 2102
double stars, which were added to the General Catalogue of Nebulae and Clusters. By the mid-20th century, astronomers from Belgium, Germany, Ireland, the
­Netherlands, Sweden, and the United Kingdom had access to observational facilities in South Africa, as had the Americans (Harvard). Aside from the many interesting objects in the southern skies, in South Africa the astronomers found observational conditions that were vastly superior to those in Europe, with clear skies and
truly dark sites.
≈
The Leiden Statement was a clear manifestation of the strong desire by Europe’s
astronomers to regain their position at the forefront of astromical research. Within
months, they had transformed a vague idea into a specific project proposal. Possibly intoxicated by the speed of events, they also stated that there was “no task more
urgent” (“ il n’y a pas de tâche plus urgente”) than to establish this new observatory 5 .
Alas, it was to take eight years, before the formal agreement, in the shape of an intergovernmental agreement, was signed, and no less than 22 years before the large tele­
scope, called for in the statement, would point to the stars for the first time. One of
the important lessons from the creation of ESO is that the key to success lay in the
ability of Europe’s astronomers to undertake concerted actions in pursuit of clearly
defined goals. Following in the footsteps of particle physicists, astronomers pioneered
formally organised cooperation in science in Europe. It was hardly a coincidence.
Astronomers have a long tradition of cross-border collaboration. It can in fact be
argued that by its very nature few sciences are as amenable to international collaboration as astronomy. But pooling resources also meant addressing the rather more
tricky issue of finding the right balance between national projects and joint activities. This was perhaps more of an issue for the larger countries, and notably for France
and the UK, both of whom at some level might have had the capacity to go it alone.
Tackling this issue was bound to be difficult and to take time, and for a while it led
to rather different decisions in those two countries.
At the same time, the astronomers’ impatience was understandable, for European
astronomy was steadily ceding ground to the US. Discussing the state of European
5	

As we shall see later, to avoid losing time, the idea was by and large to copy telescopes in the US rather than to
start independent development projects (Heckmann, ibid.).

28

Chapter I-2 ∙ Returning from the Abyss

astronomy in 1950s, Gustav Tammann wrote: “There were top achievements [in Eu­­
rope], but they came from single individuals. The average situation compared with the
United States was desolate. Every young PhD student, particularly when he was interested in observations, had only one aim: to find at least a temporary position in the US.”
(Tammann, 1995).
≈
The long wait ahead of Europe’s astronomer was, obviously, not known to them as
they set about to create the basis for their new observatory already towards the end
of the following year — in 1955. Hardly surprisingly, given both the historic and
contemporary links, the Leiden Statement had identified South Africa as the place
to locate the observatory. During the coming years, the efforts focussed on finding
the right location there, while also creating the necessary financial basis and legal
framework for an observatory. In his book about ESO’s early history, Adriaan Blaauw
(Blaauw, 1991) has provided an in-depth account of these efforts and the details
shall not be repeated here. It suffices to mention that having looked at a number of
locations in various parts of the country, interest gradually focussed on two locations in the Great Karoo semi-desert, which covers a vast area roughly between Port
Elizabeth and Cape Town: Zeekoegat, at 1000 metres elevation, located 80 kilometres south of the town of Beaufort West, and Klawervlei, 35 kilometres northwest
of it, offering three particular sites with elevations between 1490 and 1970 metres.
Site tests were initially carried out with the help of 25-centimetre reflecting telescopes, with visual assessment of the diffraction rings and, using small refractors,
with the help of photoelectric measurements, to determine atmospheric extinction.
Basic meteorological data were recorded as well. Later, measurements of temperature
variations at different elevations above ground were used to better understand local
conditions regarding turbulence and its effect on what astronomers call “seeing”, i.e.
the blurring and twinkling of stellar images caused by atmospheric effects. To assist
the scientists, young people with practical skills were sought. An announcement in
De Verkenner, the Dutch Boy Scouts’ magazine, explained that “ during the next two
years, … simple astronomical observations are to be made at a number of places in South
Africa. Since the observers will have to work and live under fairly primitive conditions,
scouts [are sought] to take these measurements. Leaders or former scouts, who would
like at least four months of adventurous life in South Africa can [obtain] further information… .” Among the volunteers were two young Dutchmen, Jan Doornenbal and

29

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Albert Bosker 6 . After the South African campaign had ended, both rejoined ESO in
1965. Doornenbal later became Head of the Mechanical Group at La Silla, but left
in 1969, whereas Bosker would serve ESO for 38 years, ending his career as Deputy
Administrator at ­Paranal. In South Africa, observers worked on a sunset-to-sunrise
work plan for 25 consecutive nights, followed by six days off. As André Muller, a
Dutch astronomer who was to play a key role at ESO during the early years, reported,
“ for the participants of the ESO Seeing Expedition 1961 in the Union of South Africa:
With the exception of these five nights, there will be no opportunity for outings, whatsoever!” Site testing in remote areas is a tough job, which requires almost super­human
stamina, dedication and discipline. It involves relatively sophisticated technology,
yet it takes place under the most primitive general conditions and furthermore, in
this case, cost was becoming an issue 7.

Photo left: André Muller and Paul McSharry at the Flathill observing site. At the end of an observing period, all the observers met to compare results. Photo right: Albert Bosker and McSharry with a
25-­centimetre Danjon seeing telescope. (Photos: Jan Doornenbal)

To boost the ESO undertaking and instil renewed enthusiasm by doing real science, Charles Fehrenbach, then director of the Observatoire de Marseille, proposed
installing a refractor, the so-called Grand Prisme Objectif (GPO) at Zeekoegat. The
GPO was a double astrograph with twin four-metre-long telescope tubes. One was
equipped with a prism and, by rotating the prism between exposures, it was possible to obtain radial velocities — the velocity with which an object moves along the

6	

Dedicated boy scouts as they were, once in South Africa they started a local Boy Scout Troop, which stood out
by being interracial — unheard of in South Africa at the time, but tolerated locally.

7	

At the time costs had to be covered out of national research agency budgets.

30

Chapter I-2 ∙ Returning from the Abyss

line of sight — with an accuracy of about 5 km/s 8 . The GPO, which became operational in 1961, was used thus to measure the radial velocities of stars, a project fully
within mainstream European research of the time. In a sense, the GPO enjoyed the
honour of being the first ESO telescope and, as it turned out, it came close to being
so twice. First in South Africa and later, at ESO’s site in South America where it followed hot on the heels of the 1-metre photometric telescope, which, in a provisional
dome, was the first telescope to become operational there. Fehrenbach’s suggestion
was not only motivated by scientific reasons. He also saw this as a move to secure
continued French support for the ESO project, at a time of great uncertainty in that
country 9 . In an article in The ESO Messenger he later summarised the situation:
“During these bad years (1953–1960), the United Kingdom definitely withdrew from
this project and the French authorities did not feel themselves to be very much involved.
The French delegation was no longer authorised to participate, but the astronomers did
not want to give up the project and they thought of building a French station for studying the M
­ agellanic Clouds, the operation of which would be in the framework of ESO.”
(Fehrenbach, 1981). German astronomers also installed a 40-centimetre telescope at
the Klawerlei site to carry out photometric measurements. It was used both for site
testing and for photometric observations of the Milky Way.
The site tests ceased in early 1963 and they ended with a surprise. As Blaauw put it
in his book, perhaps slightly tongue in cheek: “At the end, bewilderment and consent.”
≈
Meanwhile, in Europe, much effort went into organisational matters. It should
be remembered that ESO did not yet exist as a legal entity and thus all activities
depended on the goodwill of national institutes and agencies. The original cost estimate foresaw a capital outlay of 2.5 million US dollars and an operational budget of
100 000 US dollars per annum. This estimate was soon revised upwards to 3.5 million and 135 000 US dollars respectively. By 1959, the expected capital need had
grown to 5 million US dollars. And as site tests were underway, their cost, too, went
8	

It is interesting to compare this number with the performance of the instrumentation in use nowadays. The
HARPS spectrograph at La Silla, for example, provides an accuracy better than 60 cm/s. For spectrographs for
the next generation of telescopes much higher performance is planned.

9	

Preoccupied with its domestic problems, the position of France vis-à-vis ESO was unclear for a long time. In his
memoires, Otto Heckmann alludes to discussions among the remaining four countries — Germany, Belgium,
the Netherlands and Sweden as to whether to proceed without French participation. Luckily, it did not become
necessary.

31

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

up. The cost of the final site-testing period of one and a half years had increased
tenfold over the cost of the preceding time period of similar duration. The growing cost meant that the original thought that ESO could be established as a joint
facility between national organisations was no longer viable. Stronger commitment
was needed and that could only come from the national governments. Blaauw later
described the situation: “Many of the delegates from government side had been people who had a leading position in science policy in their own countries, and we have
just been fortunate … that the people in these important positions of science policy have
been so broad-minded that they said a European effort, also from the government point
of view, is the one that is the thing of the future.” Without prejudice to others who
helped behind the scenes, the names of two civil servants stand out: Henk Bannier
(of the Netherlands), who first argued for an intergovernmental agreement and Gösta
Funke (of Sweden). Both later became presidents of the ESO Council. The consequence was the decision, in 1960, to pursue a solution involving an international convention and the setting up of an intergovernmental organisation. It was fortuitous.
This particular legal framework has proved to be invaluable in ensuring the stability
and long-term strength of the organisation — essential as it embarked on the long
road towards facilitating a recovery for European astronomy. But the group that had
fought so hard to get ESO off the ground was not yet at the goal. In 1959, the United
Kingdom withdrew from the project, giving preference to collaboration within the
British Commonwealth — arguably a most serious setback for the ESO project as
it struggled to stay afloat. Fortunately, at the same time, the Ford Foundation (of
the US) declared its willingness to support a European observatory under certain
conditions — notably that at least four countries were ready to commit to the project 10, 11. The grant of one million US dollars, 20% of the estimated capital cost, was
undoubtedly instrumental in bringing the discussions regarding ESO to a successful conclusion. On 5 October 1962, representatives of the five founding countries
gathered in Paris to sign the ESO Convention. The Convention would come into
force upon parliamentary ratification of the fourth signatory. On 17 January 1964,
10	

The original statutes of the Ford Foundation allowed support for initiatives to strengthen world peace, freedom and democracy as well as education. In the late 1950s, the Foundation expanded its portfolio temporarily to include science and engineering. Heckmann attributes the Ford grant to ESO to the diplomacy of Bertil
­Lindblad and Jan Oort, arguing that support for this project would stimulate the early efforts of European integration in general (Heckmann, ibid.).

11	

The Ford grant not only ensured the necessary capital base for ESO, but may also have played a role in finally
securing French participation. The grant was discussed with Jean Monnet and the French Minister of Finance,
Antoine Pinay and it is believed that the topic was also raised with the President of the Republic, Charles de
Gaulle. This was not the last time that ESO affairs became a topic for discussion in the highest political circles
in France.

32

Chapter I-2 ∙ Returning from the Abyss

the final hurdle was passed, as France deposited its instrument of ratification. But
by that time a series of decisive operational decisions had already been taken, determining the future of the organisation.

27

21

28
29
22

32 34

30
31

23

6

7

8

1

10

25

2

11

26
13

12

4

3

36

33

24
9

35

14

15

17
16

18

19

20

5

ESO was a child of the European integration process, but it also played its own role in the process by fostering a true European astronomical community. The 1963 European Astronomers Conference at Nijenrode
Castle is an example. Organised by the Kapteyn Foundation for Research in Astronomy, the meeting
brought together a number of upcoming scientists from across Europe. It was seen at least by some as an ESO
conference, occurring as it did just one year after the signing of the Convention. At the meeting, Heckmann
introduced the young audience to “Instruments for the ESO Project”, André Muller to the site-testing in
South Africa and Chile. Seen in the photo are: (1) Luc Braes, (2) Waltraut Seitter, (3) Trientjes Stuit, (4)
unidentified, (5) unidentified, (6) Whitney Shane, (7) Ernst Raimond, (8) Kristen Rohlfs, (9) Adriaan
Blaauw, (10) Jan Oort, (11) Otto Heckmann, (12) Jørgen Otzen Petersen, (13) Richard West, (14) Jörg
Pfleiderer, (15) Peter Wild, (16) unidentified, (17) Ulrich Schwarz, (18) Erik Høg, (19) unidentified, (20)
Bruno van Albada, (21) James Lequeux, (22) Ulrich Haug, (23) Jan Borgman, (24) Theodor SchmidtKaler, (25) Wim Rougoor, (26) unidentified, (27) Kees Zwaan, (28) Max Kuperus, (29) Tibor Herczeg,
(30) Marcel Bonneau, (31) unidentified, (32) Raphael Steinitz, (33) Pierre Charvin, (34) Jørn Berentsen,
(35) unidentified, and (36) Mart de Groot. (Courtesy: J. Merkelijn-Katgert)

33

On horseback: Frederik de Vlaming, André
Muller and Otto Heckman at La Silla in Chile
in 1964.

Chapter I-3

A Dramatic Twist
“When one is riding south along the Panamericana
from Vallenar to La Serena one sees the big massif,
well isolated from the higher mountain chains in the east,
towering over the surroundings.
We feel that the mountain is beautiful.”
Gösta Funke, from a speech on the occasion
of the dedication of the road to La Silla, 24 March 1966.

T

he first two years of the new organisation entailed dramatic decisions of huge
significance. For eight years, the founding fathers of ESO had worked hard to
achieve their goal. It had certainly been an uphill struggle, requiring patience, diplomacy, political lobbying and a strong pioneering spirit, not least during the site tests.
Now, with the Convention signed, they wanted to see practical results. The Convention, which was based on the CERN Convention, both provided the framework
and set out specific tasks for the new organisation. It also described the governing
structure, with a council comprised of Member State representatives 1 as the supreme
organ of the organisation. The running of the organisation would be the responsibility of the Director General. An associated financial protocol established the Finance
Committee as an advisory body to the Council.
A sentence from the preamble establishes the overall framework: “The Governments
of the States parties to this convention … desirous of jointly creating an observatory
equipped with powerful instruments in the southern hemisphere and accordingly promoting and organising co-operation in astronomical research… .” ESO was not just a
new observatory: the authors also clearly intended to give the new organisation a
central role in European astronomy, although there is little evidence to suggest that
they had a clear vision of what that role might be. It is also interesting that the Convention simply spoke about astronomy. Admittedly, this was before the opening up
1	

Two from each country, representing the national astronomical community and the government, respectively.

35

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

of the electromagnetic spectrum — the possibility of observing celestial objects in a
variety of wavelength domains — had really occurred. But radio astronomy already
existed. This notwithstanding, Article II specified that the purpose of the organisation was to “ build and fit out an astronomical observatory in the southern hemisphere.”
The initial programme for the future observatory was also described in detail. The
observatory was to comprise a “telescope with an aperture of about 3 metres, a Schmidt
telescope with an aperture of about 1.20 metres, not more than three telescopes with a
maximum aperture of 1 metre, a meridian circle 2 ,” as well as the necessary auxiliary
equipment and buildings. Importantly, the Convention incorporated the option of
supplementary programmes — a provision that has enabled ESO to develop new
activities over the course of the 50 years of its existence. Given the 1954 statement
and the work undertaken in South Africa during the preparatory period, it was noteworthy that the Convention simply stated that the observatory must be located in
the southern hemisphere. What had happened?
≈
Jürgen Stock was a German-born astronomer. He had spent part of his childhood
in Mexico and later in his professional life he remained closely associated with Latin
America. He did his PhD under Otto Heckmann (who was to become ESO’s first
Director General 3) in Hamburg, but then moved to the US, according to H
­ eckmann
because during the long preparatory phase he had lost faith in the ESO project
(Heckmann, ibid.). In any event, Stock was a true adventurer and became involved
in site-testing activities in Chile 4 , on behalf of his American employers 5 . During this
work, he found Cerro Tololo, a 2200-metre-high mountain in Chile’s Norte Chico
(the Little North), a semi-desert area. Located in the Elqui valley area some 80 kilo­
metres east of the Chilean town of La Serena, Tololo was to become the home of
the first major observatory in Chile, the Cerro Tololo Inter-American Observatory
(CTIO) — effectively the American Southern Observatory. However, Stock had also
2	

The meridian circle was never acquired. Instead, ESO installed an astrolabe at the National Observatory of
Chile, located at Cerro Calán, just outside the capital, Santiago de Chile. For many years, the astrolabe also
formed the nucleus of the scientific cooperation between ESO and the Chilean astronomical community.

3	

Originally, Heckmann’s official title was that of Director. This was changed in 1967 following a reorganisation
that, among other changes, saw the appointment of Adriaan Blaauw as Scientific Director.

4	

The fascinating story of Jürgen Stock’s activities is provided in some detail in the book Geheimnisvolles
­Universum by Dirk Lorenzen.

5	

Both American and European astronomers had on earlier occasions been active in Chile. An article in The ESO
Messenger (Dürbeck et al., 1999) describes their work and even a brief site search in the Atacama Desert, conducted by Heber D. Curtis in 1909.

36

Chapter I-3 ∙ A Dramatic Twist

spent time at the Boyden Observatory in South Africa, maintaining contact with
European astronomers and with Heckmann, his old mentor. With his experience of
site testing, Stock quickly understood that Chile offered conditions far better than
those found in South Africa and he informed Heckmann accordingly. By the spring
of 1961, the ESO Committee, a predecessor of the ESO Council, became interested.
Heckmann met Stock in California and Stock showed a number of photographs
from northern Chile that left a deep impression on Heckmann. In June, Jan Oort,
the chairman of the Committee, contacted his American colleague Donald Shane,
who was involved in a US project to install a telescope in Chile, with a view to possible collaboration. The South African choice was no longer certain. It has later been
a source of speculation whether the political situation in South Africa played a role
in, or possibly was the cause of, ESO’s sudden change of interest6 . However, all the
available evidence, for example, as provided in writing and orally by Danjon, Blaauw
and Oort, suggests that political considerations played only an indirect role, in that
they may have stimulated an interest in considering alternative sites. When the scientific findings became available, no further convincing was necessary: in terms of
seeing, temperature variations during the night, and the number of clear nights, the
Chilean data were significantly better. In fact the number of clear observing hours
was more than 50% higher for the Chilean sites. Unsurprisingly, the Committee did
not find it difficult to reach a unanimous decision.
In November 1962, a few weeks after the signing of the Convention, a two-man ESO
team arrived in the Chile: André Muller, who had considerable experience from
the site tests in South Africa and was already a long-time ESO stalwart, and Paul
McSharry, a young South African geodesist who had also assisted in the site-testing
effort in his home country. They joined Jürgen Stock, conducting tests at Tololo and a
site further to the north. Their findings convinced ESO that the Chilean option was
worth pursuing, so in June 1963, Jan Oort, Otto Heckmann, Charles Fehrenbach,
Heinrich Siedentopf and André Muller went back to the country, where they met
with their American colleagues, Frank K. Edmondson, Nicholas Mayall and Jürgen
Stock, representing the (US) Association of Universities for Research in Astronomy
(AURA), now in charge of the main US project.
Together, they undertook a visit to the area around Tololo, partly by helicopter,
courtesy of the Chilean Air Force, partly on horseback — preserved for eternity by
6	

This speculation was not unreasonable given the growing worldwide concern over the situation in South Africa,
dramatically enhanced by the Sharpeville massacre in March 1960.

37

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The photo to the left was taken at the meeting in June 1963 between ESO representatives and their US
counterparts. From left to right: Siedentopf, Oort, Frank Edmondson (AURA President), a tour guide,
Muller, Heckmann, Fehrenbach, two unidentified participants and a Sr Marchetti (an architect). The picture was taken at Cerro Morado, a mountain near Cerro Tololo, on 10 June. The photo to the right is the
famous picture of the group exploring the terrain. (Courtesy: Frank Edmondson)

the famous photograph. Early discussions conducted by Heckmann with Chilean
authorities and universities also confirmed that ESO would be welcome. From this
time, it seems that Chile had de facto been selected as the host country for Europe’s
observatory. In November of that year, the ESO Committee took the formal decision, albeit subject to confirmation by the ESO Council, which would be set up
upon ratification of the Convention. But the question of exactly where the observatory should be built remained open. Despite most cordial relations, the initial idea
of placing it together with the American observatory proved not to be feasible. As an
international organisation at intergovernmental level, ESO possessed a legal status
that was difficult to reconcile with that of AURA, itself an association of national
universities. This became a serious issue in connection with the question of land
ownership and although the discussions between the Americans and the Europeans remained inconclusive, ESO began to consider alternatives. This was painful for
some, not least for Jan Oort, who favoured as close a collaboration with the American astronomers as possible. Common scientific interests and close personal friendships certainly played a strong role. However, the feeling, especially among the government representatives behind ESO, was that an independent observatory would
better serve Europe’s interests in the long run. So, in October 1963, Heckmann
returned to Chile. He had been authorised to approach the Chilean authorities with
a view to understanding the conditions under which the Europeans could establish their observatory, but things went not just very smoothly but also very quickly:
faster than ESO had anticipated. Heckmann went the whole way: within a couple
of weeks, he completed and signed the formal agreement between ESO and Chile,

38

Chapter I-3 ∙ A Dramatic Twist

called the Convenio, setting the legal framework for ESO’s activities in the R
­ epublic
of Chile. It was a daring act to put it mildly, since it had neither been presented to
the ESO Committee in advance, nor had the Convention been ratified. The reasons
for ­Heckmann’s swift, unilateral move, however, were understandable: his conversations had been helped significantly by the German immigrant community in Chile.
One name that recurs is that of Father Bernhard Starischka, who headed the G
­ erman
School, the Liceo Alemán, in Santiago.

Photo left: Having obtained a PhD in astronomy in Bonn, Father Starischka was no stranger to European
astronomy. Here he is seen with Waltraut Seitter and Hans Schäfer at the Observatorium Hoher List.
(Photo: The Seitter Estate (Hilmar Duerbeck), courtesy: AIP Emilio Segre Visual Archives). Photo right:
Heckmann (to the left) at La Silla.

With a common nationality, faith and professional background, Heckmann found
it easy to develop a good rapport with Father Starischka, who he had already met
in Germany in 1959. Father Starischka was quite influential in Chile and had connections to people in high positions in Chilean society, including ministers in President Jorge Allesandri’s administration. Elections were due and it was not clear what
changes they might bring. Heckmann saw a unique but narrow window of opportunity. It was not to be lost and he acted accordingly. Grudgingly, because of the
circumstances under which it had been concluded, the ESO Committee went along
with the deal and it was finally approved at the first formal meeting of the ESO
Council on 5 February 1964. On 17 April, the Chilean government also endorsed the­
Convenio: ESO’s future now lay in the Chilean desert. Hardly more than a month
later, the ESO Council selected the location for its observatory, a 2403-metre -high
mountain, some 100 kilometres northeast of La Serena and 90 kilometres north of
Tololo. At the time the mountain was known as Cinchado Norte, but today it is
called La Silla — Spanish for “the saddle” — because of its saddle-shaped top. The

39

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

final selection had been based on desert plots that were government properties, where
water could be found and mining activity was limited. Given the extensive search in
the preceding years and the resources that had been allocated to finding the best possible site, it is almost unbelievable that no real site-testing was carried out at La Silla.
Yet so strong was the conviction that “almost any site in the La Serena area at the
level of 2000–3000 metres, well isolated from surrounding mountain peaks, should be
adequate,” as Blaauw wrote. Heckmann certainly had no doubts. He described it as
a stroke of luck (“ein Glücksfall”). Time would show that he was right.
It had been a long journey. Ten years had passed since the Leiden Statement. But
within the last two and a half years or so, things had changed completely: the Convention had been agreed, signed and ratified, the basic institutional settings defined
— and a location for the new observatory had been settled, albeit in a completely different place than originally expected. Even so, for a while La Silla — or, as it became
colloquially known, “the mountain” — would remain exactly that: a lone mountain
in the middle of the desert.

Following the site decision, ESO could begin to build its observatory — and its future. On-site conditions
were tough, but so were the people. Seen here are André Muller and Hans-Emil Schuster (right) during a
relaxed moment. This picture was taken after the completion of the road, possibly as late as 1967. (Photo:
Jan Doornenbal)

40

Chapter I-3 ∙ A Dramatic Twist

Chile would, however, develop into one of the most important countries for groundbased astronomy in the world, with observatories at Cerro Tololo (AURA, US),
La Silla (ESO, Europe) and Las Campanas (also known as CARSO, owned by the
Carnegie Institution for Science, US), in addition to the Chilean observatory at
Cerro Calán. The Soviet Academy of Sciences was also installing an observatory not
so far from Santiago, but withdrew after the political events in 1973. Later, other
sites would be opened, including Cerro ­Paranal, Llano de Chajnantor and Cerro
Armazones.

41

San Pedro de Atacama

Chajnantor

Antofagasta
­Paranal
Taltal

La Silla
La Serena

Valparaíso
Santiago

Chapter I-4

In the Most Remote Place God Could Find
“En vez de dejar que estas maravillas se perdieran,
Dios las dispuso todas en el lugar más remoto de la Tierra.”
Leyenda de la Creación de Chile.

A

ccording to a legend, much treasured in Chile, when God had created the wonders of the world, He had a bit of everything left over: rivers and valleys, glaciers
and deserts, mountains, forests, meadows and hills. Instead of letting these wonders
go to waste, God put them all in the most remote place on Earth. This was how Chile
was created. Despite the charming story, scientifically minded people subscribe to a
different explanation, but they too would undoubtedly agree that Chile offers spectacularly beautiful scenery and extraordinary landscapes.
Chile became fully independent from Spain in 1818 — in the aftermath of the Napoleonic wars — and in the period 1879–83 it fought a war with Peru and Bolivia (the
War of the Pacific), which gave the country control over large parts of the Atacama
Desert with its vast mineral riches. The heroes of the war, at least from a Chilean
perspective, are still revered. Their names grace public squares, parks, streets and avenues in many places in the country.
Located on the western rim of South America, and stretching roughly from the
15th parallel to the southern tip of the continent, Chile is almost 4300 kilometres
long, with all climate zones except the tropical. The northern part is mostly desert,
thanks to the particular conditions found here: the Pacific anticyclone shields the
area from the cold air of Antarctica, while the cold Humboldt current running along
the coast creates an inversion layer — with a semi-permanent cloud layer — at altitudes of about 1000 metres. Precipitation occurs over the ocean or on the coast itself,
but a low mountain range running north to south along the coast is enough to prevent clouds from penetrating further inland. On the other side of the country, the
­Cordillera de los Andes effectively blocks humid continental air from the East.

43

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The mountain, which became known as La Silla, is located in the IV Region, with
La Serena as its capital. From La Serena, Ruta 5 — known elsewhere as the PanAmerican Highway — winds through sparse scrubland and the low coastal mountain range. Shortly after the pass of La Cuesta de Pajonales, at La Frontera — a modest place where truck drivers check in for a meal and some rest — travellers can spot
a mountain ridge with white shining domes to the east: the La Silla Observatory.
Back in 1964 the area was largely empty and the Chilean government ceded to ESO
a property of 627 square kilometres around the mountain to ensure proper protection from mining and other disruptive activities. The price was 8000 US dollars, to
which should be added another 6000 US dollars, paid to a family subsequently claiming to hold a title to a part of the land. Corrected for inflation, the total price would
amount to about 100 000 US dollars today. It might appear that for such a large
stretch of desert the price was quite favourable, but it did reflect the market value at
the time. The odd fact that more than one party held a title to a particular piece of
land gave rise to a smile or two rather than to serious concern. The story was, however,
to repeat itself at a later point in ESO’s history — this time on a very different scale.
≈
With the acquisition of La Silla, Europe’s astronomers could begin to realise their
new observatory. The first telescopes to be built for La Silla were mid-sized telescopes
and we note an interesting, if not surprising, correlation between traditional national
areas of expertise (in the Member States) and the projects they worked on. The Dutch
took a lead in developing a 1-metre photometric telescope following their scientific
interests and expertise, particularly at the Kapteyn Laboratory in G
­ roningen. The
French built a 1.5-metre spectroscopic telescope, essentially a copy of the one at the
French national observatory at Haute-Provence (Observatoire de Haute-Provence,
OHP) as well as the double astrograph (GPO) already mentioned, while in Germany
work focussed on the Schmidt telescope (a speciality of the Hamburger Sternwarte)
— and the 3.6-metre telescope to which we shall return. The telescopes were all very
different, of course, but in terms of detectors, they reflected the practice of the day:
they either relied on photographic plates or on direct photoelectric measurements of
the light coming from the object of observation, i.e. measuring the intensity of the
light in different, distinct colours.
Meanwhile, in Chile, the overall observatory infrastructure had to be created. A base
camp was established at the foot of the mountain, and a 20-kilometre-long road built
to enable the transport of the heavy and bulky, yet delicate, instrumentation from

44

Chapter I-4 ∙ In the Most Remote Place God Could Find

the camp to the top of the mountain. A number of general facilities such as workshops, dormitories, a power station etc. were also needed to support the observatory.

The base camp at Pelícano ca. 1967. (Photo: Jan Doornenbal)

The base camp was established where the road from the Pan-American Highway
reaches the foot of the hills that lead up to La Silla. The name of the camp was Campo
Pelícano. Blaauw’s well-chosen quote from the ESO Annual Report of 1964 lets us
catch a glimpse not only of how far (or how little) the ESO project had evolved, but
also the conditions the small group of ESO employees, truly pioneers, were facing.
At the end of 1964, the La Silla operation comprised:
“a) Office in La Serena, functioning with five persons active,
b)		Camp Pelícano, with two old houses and four new ones installed, a carpenter’s workshop in use, fifteen persons active, animals’ camp installed and functioning with five
horses and six mules, two wells ready with one pump installed.
c)		Road project [i.e. planning and lay-out of the road], ready from camp Pelícano to
the top of La Silla.”
The camp manager, a Chilean, had organised life according to Chilean traditions,
where the staff ate separately according to rank and status. The freshly arrived

45

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Europeans displayed a more egalitarian view and soon changed this, so that from
then on, all staff would frequent the same quarters and eat together.
In 1966, the road to La Silla was completed. It was now possible to bring equipment
up to the top of the mountain, and soon after, the first scientific work at La Silla
began. Later in that year, the 1-metre photometric telescope was the first telescope
at La Silla to become operational. This was certainly a milestone, but the 1966
Annual Report dryly noted that, “the astronomical observing activity was started late
in November, after the 1-metre Photometric Telescope had been installed in a provisional building.” And in December, the first visiting astronomer, Jean Pierre Brunet
from the Observatoire de Marseille, arrived at La Silla, “to initiate a photoelectric
programme of observations of stars in the Magellanic Clouds.” However, it took until
mid-1968 before the system that we know today, with six-month observing periods,
was put in place, following a decision by the Scientific Programmes Committee (see
also the following chapter). The first call — for what became P21 in ESO jargon —
announced in the ESO Bulletin No. 4, illustrates nicely the atmosphere of ESO at
the time:
“Applications for the use of the ESO 1-metre Photometric Telescope for the period March
1 — September 1, 1969.
Applications for the use of the above mentioned telescope within the above period
may now be submitted to the Directorate of the European Southern Observatory, 131
­Bergedorfer Straße, 205 Hamburg 80, W. Germany.
The applications should be received by the Directorate not later than September 1, 1968.
Applicants may expect to be informed by November 1, 1968 whether, and how much,
time will be granted… . The application should normally be endorsed by the Director of the applicant’s Institute. It will be reviewed by the ESO Scientific Programmes
Committee… .
The ESO Budget provides for travel funds and for fixed allowances for lodging and
food to such an extent that, as a rule, it will not be necessary for the applicants to whom
observing time is granted (or for their Institute) to contribute financially. Defrayal of

1	

The numbering system was referred to in the ESO Annual Report for 1972, with the period 1 November 1969–1
May 1969 as P1.

46

Chapter I-4 ∙ In the Most Remote Place God Could Find

travel expenses of accompanying wives is foreseen to a limited extent and only in case the
observers will have to stay in Chile for a period of at least 6 months.
Hamburg-Bergedorf, June 1968.”
So long observation runs were considered — and the remark about accompanying
wives clearly suggests that observers were assumed to be male.

In 1968, the 1-metre telescope
was also followed by the GPO
and the 1.5-metre telescope,
which became “the king of
the hill” — at least as regards
its size. It was originally fitted with a Cassegrain spectrograph, which became known as
the “Chilicass” 2 , and soon after
with a coudé spectrograph.
Observational astronomy was
Working with the coudé spectrograph at the 1.5-metre
telescope.
very different then from today,
as is illustrated by a small anecdote told by the Belgian astronomer Jean-Pierre Swings, the son of Pol Swings, one
of the founding fathers of ESO. “My first experience at La Silla was in January 1972
when I was a Carnegie fellow in Pasadena, doing research on peculiar emission-line stars
with infrared excess. I used the 1.5-metre telescope coudé spectrograph. One of the objects
was the star HD 45677, a peculiar Be star that my father had already worked on in the
1940s. It has a tremendous infrared excess due to circumstellar dust in an equatorial
ring. I decided to make a very long exposure — of three nights. In the middle of the second night, there was an earthquake — so we closed the shutter and resumed observations afterwards. Afterwards we developed the plate. Nothing had moved, so my spectrum was perfect!”
2	

Richard West offers a fitting description of what it was like to observe with the 1.5-metre telescope in the early
years. Observing a 13th magnitude nova in the Large Magellanic Cloud (LMC), “I spent three nights at the
­Chilicass spectrograph … exposing continuously for 4, 5, and 7.5 hours, respectively. To do the visual guiding properly… . I had to balance most of the time in total darkness, high up on a ladder at the edge of the floor platform. It
was indeed a rewarding feeling when I finally saw a useable spectrum on the small plate in the dim darkroom light
at the end of the night.” (West, 2002)

47

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Whilst scientific life had begun at La Silla, more mundane issues had to be addressed as well, such as
securing the water supply. This picture was taken in October 1971, when ESO was searching for additional water sources. The search was led by Jacques Rouel (sitting with his back to the camera). To his right
is Emile Leroy, to his left Raul Villena with his hand on his cheek. The man to the left is unidentified.
(Photo: Svend Laustsen)

In the following year (1969), according to the ESO Annual Report, the first scientific publications were registered by ESO: four by ESO staff (Arne Ardeberg, Eric
Maurice, James Rickard and Bengt Westerlund) and one by a visiting astronomer,
François Noël. Since then, ESO has kept track of scientific publications based on
observations with telescopes at ESO, and this record provides an important key to
understanding the impact that ESO has exerted on European astronomy over the
years 3 .
Among the early observers was a Czech astronomer, Luboš Kohoutek, who, after the
political turmoil in his homeland in 1968, had found a position at the Hamburger
Sternwarte. His main scientific interest was the study of planetary nebulae, objects
that are stars in their final evolutionary phase rather than planets in formation as the
name seems to suggest. His first observing run, in January 1974, however included a
somewhat different object: Comet 1973f, which he had discovered during the previous year and which, at the time, was expected to become the brightest comet of the
3	

The current record year for publications was in 2011, with 783 refereed papers.

48

Chapter I-4 ∙ In the Most Remote Place God Could Find

century. It did not 4 , but bright comets have always aroused public interest, so a press
conference was organised at the hotel at La Silla. Bengt Westerlund, as ESO Director for Chile, chaired the session, but the “star attraction” was the comet discoverer
himself. Such events were rare at La Silla, and not really part of the La Silla ethos
at the time. Nonetheless, it provided the public with a glimpse of the work of the
observatory and the fascination of astronomy. And at that time, La Silla had truly
become a working observatory — a factory, as Kohoutek later described it. The 1974
ESO Annual Report lists 66 publications (albeit including a few articles published
in popular magazines). Unsurprisingly, most of the research activities focussed on
the classical domains of European astronomy — the study of the Milky Way and its
components — although some extragalactic work had begun.
≈

“La Silla 19xx?” — Under this heading the March 1978 ESO
Messenger cartoon addressed the question of the proliferation
of telescopes at La Silla. (Drawing by Karen Humby)

4	

The sharp increase in scientific
activity and thus in publications
was not only due to the implementation of the initial telescope programme, as foreseen
in the Convention. In 1967,
the installation of a telescope
not foreseen in the Convention
had already begun: a 0.6-metre
telescope owned by the Ruhr-­
Universität Bochum. This was
to become the first of a number
of national telescopes that with
time added to the growing telescope park at La Silla. Unlike
the ESO telescopes that were
essentially purpose-built, the
Bochum telescope was a standard off-the-shelf instrument,
supplied by Boller & Chivens

The comet reached magnitude 0, making it the 10th brightest comet of the century. By contrast, Comet West
(C/1975 V1), discovered a couple of years later by ESO astronomer Richard West and not expected to become
very bright, reached magnitude –3 and, in the 20th century, only superceded by Comet Ikeya-Seki (C/1965 S1).

49

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Joachim Dachs preparing for a night’s observations with the
Bochum photoelectric reflector in 1982. (Photo: by the author)

(B & C) in the US. Initially in­­
stalled in a provisional dome
(the one used for the 1-metre
telescope and later to be used by
the Dutch 0.9-metre telescope),
it was equipped with a photometer built at the Georg-AugustUniversität Göttingen. Built
“to supplement in an optimal
way the instrumental plans of
ESO” (Schmidt Kaler & Dachs,
1968), it became a highly productive and reliable workhorse
at La Silla for many years.
Bochum observers also became
the equivalent of what Mir cosmonauts became to spaceflight
— known for their long-duration observing runs, often lasting for months 5 .

The Bochum telescope was soon to be followed by a 0.5-metre photoelectric telescope
equipped with a four-channel photometer for Strömgren narrowband photometry.
The telescope belonged to the University of Copenhagen (Københavns Universitet)
and was admitted to La Silla following the accession of Denmark to the ESO Convention in 1967. This telescope began its career in the provisional dome, until it was
placed in its own building in 1971. The telescope had been built in Denmark and
in 1971 ESO acquired a copy of it, partly to serve as a testbed for technologies to be
applied to the 3.6-metre telescope 6 . The idea of using a telescope that was in service
5	

The long observing runs gave rise to the expression “the good-weather catastrophe”. Astronomers obviously need
good weather, but after many weeks or months of clear skies — and thus uninterrupted work, even the most
dedicated scientists may have longed for the occasional break under the excuse of an overcast night.

6	

The case of what became the ESO 0.5-metre telescope is also interesting from other points of view. According
to the Annual Report of 1968, “The Copenhagen Observatory generously agreed to build this telescope at their own
cost. The instrument is to be provided with a digitally controlled presetting system. It should not be considered as an
additional telescope in the sense of the ESO Convention… .” Over the years, again and again, Member States have
made additional voluntary donations to ESO, ranging from instruments and various other pieces of equipment
to complete telescopes. The reference to the ESO Convention shows that there was an ongoing discussion, and
perhaps some unease in certain corners, about how freely the Convention could actually be interpreted.

50

Chapter I-4 ∙ In the Most Remote Place God Could Find

in this way was repeated twenty years later when the NTT played an important role
in the preparation programme for the Very Large Telescope. Further national telescopes to follow included the Dutch 0.9-metre telescope, the Danish 1.54-metre telescope, and three Swiss telescopes, first a 0.4-metre telescope (installed under a special arrangement since Switzerland was not yet a member of ESO), later a 0.7-metre
and, finally, the 1.2-metre Leonhard Euler Telescope, used now for exoplanet hunting — a topic to which we shall return.
For a while La Silla would be populated with about as many national telescopes as
telescopes belonging to ESO. The organisation provided logistical support and maintenance in return for part of the available telescope time. This significantly increased
the scientific life at the observatory and brought a whole generation of young astronomers into contact with ESO (and with each other) at an early stage in their careers,
but it also drained resources and it was not liked by all ESO Member States. Blaauw
alludes to discussions in Council about the proliferation of telescopes, with concerns
about available space and status of the national telescopes. And in his book Europe’s
Quest for the Universe — and on a more critical note — Woltjer states that “[the]
multiplicity of efforts may well have been detrimental for the progress of the main project, the 3.6-metre telescope.” We shall return to the 3.6-metre project shortly, but it
is worth noting that the question of prioritisation has remained with ESO and has
resurfaced on several later occasions.
≈

The ESO office in Vitacura in December 1968. The main building to the left contained offices for the staff,
whereas the building to the right of the centre was the first Astroworkshop, providing mechanical services
for the observatory. The photo was taken from a small tower at the adjacent United Nations compound.
(Photo: Eric Maurice)

51

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

In parallel to the development of the La Silla site, ESO had established an office
complex on land donated by the Chilean government in Santiago’s Vitacura district,
adjacent to the United Nations Economic Commission for Latin America (CEPAL).
Furthermore, already in 1964, ESO had acquired a guesthouse, a charming colonialstyle house in the agreeable nearby district of Las Condes. The decision to create an
office in Santiago was preceded by discussions both about the location and the role
of this office. AURA and CARSO, the two US observatories, had set up their central
offices in La Serena7, but ESO preferred to locate their offices in Santiago to maintain closer contacts with the universities, the government authorities and also out
of consideration for the needs of its staff — schools, medical services, cultural life
and, in general, the amenities that a capital city can offer. The close scientific interaction with the American astronomers, however, fell somewhat by the wayside. To
understand this, it should be mentioned that the question of whether ESO should
have its own staff of scientists — or not — was still undecided. ESO’s Santiago Centre with offices, library, photographic service and a technical workshop was finished
in March 1969, at the same time as the inauguration of La Silla.

The inauguration ceremony at La Silla. From left to right: Gabriel Valdés Subercaseaux, Minister of
Foreign Affairs of Chile; Olof Palme, Minister of Education of Sweden; the President of Chile, Eduardo
Frei Montalva and Henk Bannier, President of the ESO Council.
7	

ESO also established an administrative office in La Serena in 1964.

52

Chapter I-5

ESO — Quo Vadis?
“Bei ESO lag nichts vor als die Pariser Konvention
und ihr Finanzprotokoll.”
Otto Heckmann, 1976.

T

he establishment of La Silla, even if the main telescope was not yet there, meant
that a dream had come true for Europe’s astronomers: they could begin to do
science. Astronomers are driven by their unrelenting thirst for knowledge and the
need to understand of some of the greatest riddles the Universe has to offer. To
address these questions, they need telescopes, ever more advanced and (most of the
time) ever bigger. Given the magnitude of this overall task it is perhaps not surprising
that their focus is precisely on that: getting access to telescopes. This was their purpose in creating ESO in the first place. But what did that mean in practical terms?
What kind of organisation would ESO be? How should it be run? How would it fit
into the overall scientific landscape? And how would it adapt to changes, whether scientific, technical or political? There were many different opinions about these issues,
but very little is set out in the Convention, which — when it came to defining the initial telescope programme — is otherwise remarkably specific and precise. Developing
the institutional framework for ESO’s activities thus became the task for the Director
General together with the various committees, and in particular the ESO Council.
Otto Heckmann had been appointed as Director (General) of ESO in 1962. He was
highly respected as a scientist and had been Director of the Hamburger Sternwarte 1,
a post he assumed in 1941. During the war, he had managed to keep many young scientists on his staff on the pretext that they were vital for the war effort, a rather unusual label for astronomers, but one that may have saved the lives of young scientists.
In 1942, he also published the book Theorien der Kosmologie, and, as Alfred Behr
later noted in Heckmann’s obituary in The ESO Messenger (Behr, 1983), “ ­whoever
witnessed the period of intellectual suppression in the late thirties in Germany, can
1	

Hamburger Sternwarte is located in Bergedorf, on the south-eastern fringes of Hamburg, some 15 kilometres
from the city centre. The present site was opened in 1912, in what was then relatively tranquil countryside.

53

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

imagine the hazardous enterprise of such a publication at that time.” 2 But Heckmann
was also a man of the old school — disciplined and autocratic. Even so, he was highly
respected among his senior collaborators, as someone who would listen to advice and
support his people. Heckmann felt comfortable in Hamburg and he used the services of the observatory there to help him during the early years. Here he surrounded
himself by a small team, with Jöran Ramberg (of Sweden) as Technical Director and
Johan Bloemkolk, a Dutchman, as Head of Administration. He also used his private
resources: his wife, Joahanna, acted as an unpaid secretary during his tenure. There
was little reason, he thought, to look for an alternative place for ESO’s Headquarters, despite the statement in the Convention that the Headquarters “shall be provisionally established in Brussels” 3 .

Aerial photo of the Hamburger Sternwarte in 1960. (Courtesy: Hamburger Sternwarte)
2	

Behr’s account is not undisputed. Interested readers are referred to a detailed discussion by Jochen Schramm
(Schramm, 1996). Whatever facts, Heckmann’s appointment was endorsed by prominent scientists including
Oort and Blaauw, who, given the proximity of the war, were unlikely to accept any German candidate solely on
the basis of scientific merit.

3	

With the appointment of Blaauw as his successor, it is therefore no wonder that there was some speculation that
ESO might move to Amsterdam, but this was never seriously considered.

54

Chapter I-5 ∙ ESO — Quo Vadis?

≈
The first specialised ESO Committee, established even before the organisation formally came into being, was the Instrumentation Committee. This was created in
1961 and continued until 1974, chaired by Charles Fehrenbach until 1971, with the
exception of a short period in 1961/62, when Otto Heckmann led the proceedings.
From 1971, Jan Borgman chaired the meetings. As the predecessor to the Council,
we have already met the ESO Committee, which was created in 1953 and ceased in
1963, chaired for most of the period by Jan Oort 4 . In 1967, a Scientific Programmes
Committee was established, led by Bengt Strömgren. This committee initially looked
after both the allocation of observing time and scientific policy, but split in 1971
into an Observing Programmes Committee and a Scientific Policy Committee. The
Scientific Policy Committee, in turn, absorbed the Instrumentation Committee
to become the Scientific Technical Committee, which still plays a key role today in
ESO as the principal forum for discussing the scientific orientation of the organisation. What were the issues confronted by these committees? The main questions
were how an operational model for the allocation of telescope time could be developed, now that the first telescopes had become available, basic issues of how much
work should be done within the organisation and how much could be carried out
by external contractors and the question of scientific staff and the rules for employment. Let’s take each of these issues, but in reverse order.
≈
One of the fundamental questions was whether ESO should be an observatoire de
mission — a service provider operating observational facilities on behalf the Member States and their scientific communities — or become a scientific centre in its own
right, with its own scientific staff. This issue has been a source of discussion and tension that has surfaced on several occasions during ESO’s history, with the pendulum
taking a few swings, although the general idea that ESO needed a group of active
scientists became widely accepted in the mid-1970s (albeit following dramatic discussions, which both Blaauw and Woltjer have described in their books). We shall
return to this later, since it had implications that went far beyond the question of hiring staff. One aspect, however, should also be mentioned at this stage — the idea that
staff would be hired for limited periods of time, or, as it was expressed in those days,
as semi-permanent staff (originally thought to mean for three years). Astronomers
4	

Bertil Lindblad chaired two meetings, Otto Heckmann and Paul Bourgeois one each.

55

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

joining ESO were thus expected to have positions in their home countries to which
they could return after their stint at ESO. Although this was seldom the case, the discussion cast a long shadow forward to the wider mobility question — still unresolved
— within European science today in the context of the European Research Area.
The question of what should be done by the organisation and what could be done
outside it was no less of a source of diverging opinions. Today we would term this
outsourcing, but this would fail to describe the situation in the early 1960s accurately since ESO in fact had a minute staff. The question, therefore, was rather what
insourcing might be required and how that could be achieved. This turned out to be
far more serious than many had thought and the failure to solve this question in a
timely fashion undoubtedly was a major contributor to what emerged as ESO’s biggest problem at the time: the snail-paced progress of the 3.6-metre project. With
the benefit of hindsight, the answer today would have been that ESO both needed
to possess in-house competencies and work closely with industry. But hindsight was
not available in the early 1960s. On the contrary: “… even if you put together the best
European astronomers and their instrumentally minded colleagues, they had no experience at all in realising a project of that size!” as Adriaan Blaauw expressed it in an
conversation with the author many years later.
On the question of allocation of telescope time, the original thinking was that applications would first be considered by the country from which the application came
and subsequently by ESO, reflecting a traditional view of European cooperative projects. However, in the end, the national pre-selection was never carried out and ESO
simply collected and assessed all the applications through the appropriate committee.
One reason why this could happen may have been the small number of applications
at the beginning — quite natural given the limited number of telescopes. In 1967,
ESO organised an information meeting in Hamburg for applicants. Five astronomers attended. This would soon change and today, ESO receives about 2000 applications each year. Nonetheless, this single-stage European-level evaluation of proposals clearly preceded practices in other fields of science by decades and it is interesting
to note the many similarities between the selection procedure at ESO and the one
used by the European Research Council (ERC), established 40 years later and widely
praised for its work and its new approach.
≈

56

Chapter I-5 ∙ ESO — Quo Vadis?

That the European view on matters prevailed within ESO (despite the small number
of Member States) is also evident in its support for the creation of the journal Astronomy and Astrophysics (A&A) in 1968. A&A was the result of a merger of five (later
six) national astronomical journals in Belgium, France, Germany, the N
­ etherlands
and Scandinavia, initially at the initiative of Stuart Pottasch, Jean-Louis Steinberg,
and Anders Reiz (Blaauw, 2004). Since the new journal had no legal personality
of its own, ESO made its good
offices available for the purpose of concluding contracts
on behalf of the journal. In the
usual reserved style of the day,
the 1968 Annual Report stated
that “ESO lent its administrative and legal advice to the foundation of a new international
astronomical journal” Behind
this factual statement lies the
fact that A&A contributed to
ESO on television — While ESO had begun to address some
instilling a sense of European
of its institutional issues, work proceeded on the telescopes to be
identity to its own astronomical
installed at La Silla. Dutch television showed the construction
community. Meanwhile, A&A
of the 1-metre telescope at Rademakers in Rotterdam. This
has become one of the leading
photo, taken from a television screen, shows (from left to right)
the head engineer at Rademakers, Blaauw, Jan Doornenbal
journals for professional astron(at the time mechanical engineer at the Kapteyn Laboratory
omers and ESO has maintained
in Groningen) and Martin de Vries, astronomer at Kapteyn.
its links with it and its board of
The person seen from behind is Ben Hooghout, who designed
directors ever since.
the telescope. The programme was transmitted in March 1965.
(Courtesy: Jan Doornenbal)

57

The 3.6-metre telescope and Coudé Auxiliary
Telescope (CAT) buildings under construction
in early 1975. The crates contain material for the
dome.

Chapter I-6

Towards the 3.6-metre Telescope
“The design of a large telescope, though not possible without
the help of astronomers, is essentially an engineering problem.
It may well be that the organisation of a close co-operation
between engineers and astronomers is one of the really
important steps towards a modern large telescope.”
Klaus Bahner, ESO Bulletin 5, 1968.

O

n 25 March 1969, La Silla was officially inaugurated. The formal ceremony
took place in the (empty) Schmidt telescope dome, with high-level visitors
from Europe and Chile, including the President of Chile, the Chilean Minister of
Foreign Affairs and the Swedish Minister of Education of the time, Olof Palme. Yet
despite the festive occasion and the joy of having passed an important milestone
towards the realisation of the initial programme, ESO still had a long way to go.
Work on the main project, the 3.6-metre telescope, as well as on the Schmidt survey
telescope progressed in Germany, albeit slowly. The initial idea, harking back to the
first discussions in 1953/54 had been that ESO’s main telescope should be a copy
of the 3-metre telescope at the Lick Observatory in the US. This observatory dates
back to the late 19th century. Placed on a mountaintop near San José in California it
illustrates well how American astronomy progressed through the opening of observational sites under superior conditions. The 3-metre telescope (120-inch), known
today as the C. Donald Shane Telescope, was the largest at Lick and the second largest reflector in the world when it was commissioned in 1959. Today we would call
it a classical telescope, meaning one with a massive, monolithic primary mirror and
a telescope structure on an equatorial mount, contained in a huge dome. Yet at the
time, the Lick telescope was a modern telescope, just entering into service as ESO
was being formed. However, it soon became clear that what one today might call a
copy-and-paste solution would not be the right approach for ESO. Firstly, large tele­
scopes usually represent one-off solutions, developed to satisfy the particular scientific requirements of the time. Secondly, the chosen location has a significant influence on the particular design, as have a number of perhaps more mundane, but very

59

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

practical ­considerations such as access to the site. It is therefore not surprising that
the history of the development of the astronomical telescope is one of constant refinement, improvement and adaptation. Historically, this has been a fairly smooth progression and, it could be argued, with only a few paradigm changes: the switch from
the refractor to the reflector, the introduction of multi-mirror (array) telescopes and,
in the late 20th century, the development of thin-mirror and segmented-mirror telescopes, to which we shall return later. At this stage it suffices to understand that
ESO’s decision not simply to build a copy of the Lick telescope was fully in line with
this tradition of continued development and ultimately gave European astronomers
a better (and larger) telescope. There was another advantage, perhaps not fully appreciated at the time: the well-proven value of learning by doing. By the end of the 3.6metre telescope project, ESO had built up the skills, and the self-confidence, enabling it not simply to think of the next generation of astronomical telescopes but to
lead their development, at least as regards some of the crucial technologies needed.
What a learning curve! But let us return to the situation in the late 1960s.
≈
Originally, the task of designing the main mechanical structures for the telescopes
had been given to an engineering company in Hamburg, run by Walter Strewinski.
Strewinski possessed an ingenious, but complex mind. He clearly exerted a strong
influence on the design of 3.6-metre telescope but, due to his erratic ways, he also
caused much frustration and in any case, his small design firm was clearly inadequate to carry out a task of this magnitude. By 1969, the lack of tangible progress
with the design of the mechanical structure caused ESO’s Council to lose patience
and ESO began to take the 3.6-metre project into its own hands. While Council
and the Instrumentation Committee had long been uneasy about the situation, this
new development had started in the previous year. A small group was set up at the
­Hamburg Office 1 and charged with addressing automation aspects2 of the telescope.
The group was led by a Danish astronomer, Svend Laustsen, and initially included
another Dane, Mogens Blichfeldt, a mechanical engineer. In Chapter I-4, we saw
how the 1-metre telescope carried a strong Dutch signature and the 1.5-metre a clear
French signature. From now on, the 3.6-metre project would acquire a Danish character, even if the magnitude of the project obviously meant the involvement of experts
1	

The group was not physically located at the observatory, but occupied rented rooms, first at the Iduna-Haus, in
the centre of the town of Bergedorf.

2	

Computer control of telescopes was in its infancy in those days.

60

Chapter I-6 ∙ Towards the 3.6-metre Telescope

from many countries, with Bernth Malm (from Sweden) and Jean Weber (a Frenchman) among the first recruits. The group formed the nucleus of what was to become
the ESO Telescope Project Division, created in 1970. Building a major astronomical
telescope is not a simple task: the technical challenges are numerous. New and innovative solutions, going hand-in-hand with technological progress, mean that, normally, no two telescopes are alike. Finding people who can master telescope design
and construction is a challenge in itself. Reaching the critical mass of competent scientists and engineers necessary to realise a major project, such as the 3.6-metre, is no
less of a challenge. The small group in Hamburg quickly got its teeth into the project, but it, like Strewinski’s group, was nowhere near sufficient to deliver a modern
telescope of this size 3 .
Before we turn the next page of the tale of the 3.6-metre, let us briefly stop to look
at the telescope as it was planned. It was a quasi-Ritchey-Chrétien telescope 4 with a
primary mirror 3.5 metres in diameter. There were three foci: an f/3 prime focus at
the top of the telescope with a camera including a Gascoigne plate corrector (later
to be replaced by a triplet corrector offering a wider field of view), an f/8 Cassegrain
focus below the primary mirror and an f/30 coudé focus located below the observing
floor. The increase in size of the primary mirror over that of the Lick telescope was
chosen to compensate better for the obscuration of the prime focus cage, which had
to accommodate the observer. As it happened, upon delivery of the primary mirror,
it turned out that the useable area could be extended to about 3.6 metres, increasing the light-collecting area and giving the telescope its name. The telescope was to
have an equatorial mount with a combined horseshoe and fork structure, one of the
modifications that Strewinski had proposed to the Lick design. Strewinski had also
suggested the use of interchangeable top ends, with those not in use being stored
outside the telescope rather than being carried within the telescope’s mechanical
structure at all times.
The primary mirror, provided by Corning Glassworks in the US (and paid for with
the grant from the Ford Foundation) was made of fused silica and had a mass of
11 tonnes. The order was placed in January 1965 and the blank was delivered in
February 1967 and shipped to REOSC, the French optical company, for ­polishing.
3	

From the outset, designing the entire telescope was not part of the task of the group.

4	

A Ritchey-Chrétien optical design, named after its inventors Henri Chrétien and George Ritchey, combines a
concave primary with a convex secondary mirror. To improve the image quality over a wider field of view than
the classical Cassegrain telescope, both mirrors are hyperbolic.

61

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Due to flaws in the surface, it
had to be returned to ­Corning,
but — with a new top layer —
was back at REOSC in 1969
and finally accepted by ESO
in 1972. Despite the delay
caused by the defects in the
original blank, when the mirror arrived in Europe there
was no mechanical structure
in sight. ­Heckmann’s faith in
The 3.6-metre primary mirror at REOSC in 1968.
­Strewinski and his company
had been in vain. At the same
time, ­Heckmann’s term in office was coming to an end after having been extended
in 1967. Council chose Adriaan Blaauw, who had been associated with ESO since
day one, to succeed him. They also made it clear that the most important task for
the incoming Director General was to complete the 3.6-metre telescope5 . Blaauw
assumed office officially on 1 January 1970, but by the autumn of 1969, he had
already started to look for solutions to what was now a major problem for ESO. He
first contacted CERN in Geneva, asking for help. Soliciting help from CERN was
natural: CERN had in many ways served as a model for ESO, and delegates of three
of ESO’s Member States also represented their countries on the CERN Council.
Most importantly, CERN also possessed the necessary skills and capacities needed to
develop advanced scientific instrumentation on a scale that made it possible to engage
in telescope design, even if the field was new to the CERN engineers. Even better:
at the time, CERN was about to complete what was the world’s first proton–proton collider, the Intersecting Storage Rings (ISR), while the next project, the Super
Proton Synchrotron (SPS) was still a while away. At precisely the right time, CERN
had free capacity in terms of engineering work.
In parallel, Blaauw also made contact with ESRO, the European Space Research
Organisation6 , whose Director General Hermann Bondi — himself an accomplished
cosmologist — also viewed potential cooperation favourably. Blaauw has provided
5	

The pressure was on, as can be seen by a letter of 4 June 1970 from the Chairman of the ESO Science Policy Committee, Bengt Strömgren, to the ESO Council: “… any postponement regarding the 3.6-metre Telescope would
endanger the future of ESO.”

6	

Together with the European Launcher Development Organisation (ELDO), ESRO was transformed into the
European Space Agency (ESA) in 1975.

62

Chapter I-6 ∙ Towards the 3.6-metre Telescope

The process of establishing institutional links between ESO and CERN was greatly eased by personal relations and friendships. Seen in this picture, obtained at CERN in December 1966, are Henk Bannier (left)
and Gösta Funke. Bannier was President of the CERN Council in 1964–66, followed by Funke (1967–69).
Funke presided over the ESO Council in 1966–1968, Bannier in 1969–1971. (Photo: CERN)

the details of the discussions both with CERN and ESRO, so that we shall restrict
ourselves to recalling that, after due consideration by the ESO Council and subsequent successful negotiations with CERN, an agreement was signed on 16 September
1970, allowing ESO to establish its Telescope Project (TP) Division on the CERN
premises in Meyrin on the outskirts of Geneva, straddling the Franco-Swiss border.
The agreement foresaw that ESO would set up its operations with its own personnel,
but with help from CERN’s scientific and technical divisions. Furthermore, CERN
would provide space for the erection of ESO offices as well as administrative and
logistical support, while ESO would appoint a head of the division, with the same
authorisation and powers as a CERN division head. We shall return to the political
aspect of the CERN–ESO collaboration in Chapter IV-9. At this moment, however,
our focus will remain on the 3.6-metre telescope project.

63

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

At the first Committee of Council7 meeting, held in Hamburg on 6 May 1970,
Blaauw presented a thorough document — “the first one to describe in comprehensive way the various aspects of the [3.6-metre telescope] project, their interrelations,
the time schedule and the personnel planning… .” The main author of the report was
Svend Laustsen, assisted by the small technical group as well as Jöran Ramberg. Three
para­g raphs in the introduction defined the new path, an almost complete relaunch
of the project:
“A. ESO must form its own group of astronomers, engineers, etc. which group shall be
able to conduct the project through all its phases including the first period of operation
of the instrument in Chile… .
B. The group must at any time have all parts of the project under firm control. But in
order to keep the group within reasonable bounds, a major part of the design work and
all construction work will be done by consulting and manufacturing firms… .
C. The group should be offered the best possible working conditions. For its tasks in
Europe it should be located in a scientific and technological milieu and be offered good
service facilities.”
The initial plan foresaw the staff complement growing from 5.5 full-time equivalent
positions in July 1970 to 26 by 1 January 1972.
Svend Laustsen was appointed as head of the new ESO division with Alfred Behr
and Anders Reiz as close collaborators. On 1 October 1970, Laustsen’s group moved
from Hamburg to Geneva. During the subsequent years he oversaw the building up
of a highly competent group of engineers, some on ESO contracts and some seconded
from CERN. One of the key recruitments from CERN8 was Wolfgang Richter,
who became chief engineer of the 3.6-metre telescope. Other recruits of key importance involved staff from CERN’s Services and Buildings Division, including Jacques
Rouel and Emile Leroy. But for some skill sets ESO needed to look elsewhere. On
the occasion of ESO’s 40th anniversary Svend Laustsen wrote in The ESO ­Messenger:
“In the optical field, however, … we had not succeeded … in attracting optical technicians.
7	

The Committee of Council was intended to allow Council Members to meet under less formal circumstances
and, among other things, discuss sensitive issues ahead of the regular Council Meetings. The Committee of
Council was instituted in December 1969.

8	

Several key people remained on CERN contracts though they worked full-time for ESO.

64

Chapter I-6 ∙ Towards the 3.6-metre Telescope

Finally Alfred Behr and I agreed to ask Ray Wilson at the Zeiss Works, whether he
knew of any young man he could recommend to us. He replied: ‘No, I do not know of
any technician for that job, but I can offer myself to ESO as an optician… .’ Shortly after
taking up his duties he presented plans for an optics group, and according to this Francis
Franza, Maurice Le Luyer, Daniel Enard … were engaged.” 9 (Laustsen, 2002) All of
them were key recruitments, but as we shall see, the hiring of Ray Wilson and D
­ aniel
Enard would turn out to be of especially decisive importance for the organisation.
As an initial task, the TP Division drew up a revised schedule and presented it to the
ESO Council in February 1971. The plan foresaw the completion of the 3.6-metre
building by December 1975, followed by the telescope assembly and culminating
with first light in 1976.
≈
The way forward had now been defined, but it was less straightforward than many
would have liked. Telescope design had not stood still in the intervening years and
the long delay meant that Strewinski’s design was no longer up to date, particularly
in terms of exploiting the benefits offered by the new electronic control systems. Since
the telescope optics were ready, the new telescope team was forced to accept a number of technical compromises. Both time and financial pressure made this unavoidable. But sometimes this pressure turned out to be beneficial. Thus the next step was
the crucial decision to discard the existing plans for the telescope building and begin
again from scratch. The original design, developed by the Hamburg-based firm of
Lenz Architekten & Ingenieure, foresaw a huge, rectangular coudé floor, protruding from the circular telescope building and involving very high cost. Too high, the
Finance Committee thought 10 . In the end, a much smaller and undoubtedly better solution was found. The most important changes involved the reduction of the
coudé floor by more than 50% and a dramatic reduction in the area to be heated11,
paving the way for the design of the clean, cylindrical building that has since graced
the highest point of La Silla.

9	

The Optical Group was established in March 1973.

10	

Chapter II-3 will look at the question of the coudé focus from an instrumentation point of view.

11	

Over the decades, an important trend in telescope design has been to remove as many heat sources as possible
to avoid thermal effects within the telescope enclosure that could degrade the seeing. At ESO, the fruits of this
were reaped with the 3.5-metre NTT and later with the VLT, but these were early days and the complexities of
dome seeing were poorly understood.

65

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

By 1973, construction contracts had been awarded to industry for the building (to
the Dutch company Interbeton), the 350-tonne steel dome (Krupp, Germany) and
the main mechanical structure (Creusot-Loire of France). Further contracts included
the main gears for the telescope (MAAG, Switzerland) and the provision of the diesel-driven power turbines (Motoren Werke Mannheim)12 . Major industrial contracts
are coveted by industry, and therefore often involve difficulties as Member States vie
for them. It appears, however, that the awarding of the main contracts for the 3.6metre telescope presented fewer problems than some of the large contracts for later
telescope projects. It is also possible that, in this situation, time pressure had a healthy
effect on the decision making. With major national projects on their way in both
France and Germany, ESO had to deliver on its promise to European astronomy, if
it were not to lose its relevance before it had really begun in earnest.
At La Silla, construction started in June 1973 and 18 months later, after 3000 cubic
metres of concrete with 350 tonnes of reinforcing material had been poured, this
work was completed (Leroy, 1975). In Europe, the mechanical structure was assembled for test purposes at a factory in Saint Chamond near Lyons in the autumn
of 1974. The tests were completed by November 1975. Before it was shipped out
from the Port-St-Louis-du-Rhône near Marseille, the ESO Council had a chance to
inspect the test assembly.
In 1973, the first ESO TP staff were transferred to Chile with a gradual build-up in
numbers as the 3.6-metre project progressed. For many TP staff the prospect of moving to Chile involved interesting tasks in an unusual environment, and it was not difficult to convince people to leave Europe for a period of time. However exciting the
task may have been for the individual staff members, though, there was a price to pay
for their families, most of whom would settle in Santiago, 600 kilo­metres away, and
accept that while they might live a materially comfortable life there, neither Chile
nor Santiago could, at that time, offer medical and educational standards comparable
to those in Europe. Spouses — almost always husbands — spent long and exhausting
12	

Along with these contracts, ESO also awarded a contract for the building to house the planned Danish 1.54metre telescope. This illustrates that the new TP Division almost instantly had additional tasks on its hands,
beyond delivering the 3.6-metre telescope. According to the ESO Annual Report of 1974, it also included tasks
previously carried out by the Technical Department of ESO-Chile, including “construction of support facilities
such as new stores and workshops, living quarters for the local staff, the improvement of the water, heating and electrical distribution networks as well as the road improvement programme.” Clearly this was far from negligible:
Laustsen later estimated that these tasks may have taken up to 50% of the capacity of the TP Division. Perhaps
we also see the seeds to the 1987 suggestion that the VLT could be built with only a small addition to the staff,
an idea that we today regard as totally unrealistic.

66

Chapter I-6 ∙ Towards the 3.6-metre Telescope

The main mechanical structure of the 3.6-metre telescope at the factory site of Saint Chamond.

duty tours at La Silla, and La Silla became the burial ground for many a marriage.
“ESO is a disaster for families,” as one staff member expressed it.
≈
But for one employee, simply transferring to Chile was not good enough13 . As project
leader, Svend Laustsen felt that he had to be reachable on the site all the time. Married and with four school-age children, he took over some abandoned drawing offices
that had been erected next to the construction area (close to where the Swiss 1.2metre Leonhard Euler Telescope is now located) as his private quarters and moved
there with his wife and two younger children. His wife looked after their school education, often served as a charming host for many visitors from Europe and created
an atmosphere of normality in this otherwise rather unusual place — a combination
of a remote mountain observatory and a large construction site. The Casa Laustsen
became a popular place on the mountain, often referred to as “the Culture House”.
13	

There are a few examples of staff living for extended periods at La Silla, with or without family. Mart de Groot
is one and Hans-Emil Schuster another.

67

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

A rare example of family life at La Silla — Kirsten Laustsen with daughter Susanne (photo left) and
Susanne having fun with one of the desert foxes that thrive on waste food at La Silla. (Photo: Svend
Laustsen)

≈
On 7 April 1976, the Spanish vessel MV Riviera arrived at the Pacific seaport of
Coquimbo, 150 kilometres southwest of La Silla, with the mechanical parts for the
telescope in its hold. Twenty-three trucks were waiting, forming a 500-metre-long
convoy, to transport 450 tonnes of material to La Silla (Plathner, 1976). It took three
days, but everything arrived safely and the assembly of the main mechanical structure could begin.

Snow at La Silla in 1975. The building to the left is the Danish 1.54-metre telescope. Behind, the 3.6metre building, still with an uncovered dome, is seen. (Photo: Svend Laustsen)

68

Chapter I-6 ∙ Towards the 3.6-metre Telescope

On 26 May, La Silla was hit by a severe storm. “There was ice all over as we drove up to
the dome. When we came out again, the wind had pushed the cars quite a bit from where
we’ d left them. The wind speed at the top of the mountain reached at least 200 km/h,
then the anemometer was blown down,” Laustsen later recalled. The result was severe
damage to the inner insulating shell of the dome.
Soon after, on 2 June 1976, the telescope optics left the factory site at Ballainviliers
near Paris. They travelled first to Dunkirk and then onboard the m/v Anjou to
Coquimbo. CERN’s press office did not miss the opportunity: its press release carried the headline: “Precious Cargo — Don’t Drop!” They didn’t. But if Laustsen had
thought that all the troubles had now been put behind them, he was wrong. On
26 August, as the installation work at La Silla was running at full speed, lightning
struck the dome of the building. “I was in the dome at that moment together with some
colleagues … suddenly there was an enormous bang. It did not seem to come from any
specific direction; we were right in the middle of it. We later found a hole in the dome.
The lightning destroyed a lot of the electrical equipment, giving us a month-long delay.”
In earlier times, some might have interpreted these events as wrath of the heavens,
but 20th century scientists had a more rational approach to the problems. They simply carried out the repairs.
By mid-September, the optical alignment and testing of the telescope optics began,
carried out by Ray Wilson, Francis Franza, Maurice Le Luyer and André Bayle from
REOSC, with tracking tests by Charles Fehrenbach. On 8 November 1976, the
moment that everybody had been waiting for finally arrived: the slit of the huge dome
opened under the velvety dark sky and the 3.6-metre telescope mirror caught its first
photons from the star-speckled firmament. First light at last14! Laustsen made his first
entry in the observation log for the new telescope: a small field in the beautiful globular cluster Omega Centauri15 . Selecting the targets for the first objects to observe was
his prerogative, though several astronomers made suggestions and soon saw impressive new images of their pet objects. It had been a long journey for ESO and some
intensive years for Laustsen and his team. Never a man for theatrical gestures or bold
statements, he was deeply satisfied by reaching this goal. In a brief report in the The
ESO Messenger, dated 12 November, he wrote: “During the first five nights we have
14	

As is normal, the 3.6-metre had seen technical first light a few days before. At that time, however, the primary
mirror had not been finally adjusted and no astronomical images could be obtained.

15	

At the suggestion of Ray Wilson, who was interested in a field with many stars to assess the optical quality of
the telescope.

69

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

taken about 30 plates and the image quality looks very good. We still have to determine the limiting magnitude, but it should be at least 24m16 , possibly even fainter.” 17
One of the first observations was of a 16th magnitude irregular dwarf galaxy in the
constellation of Sculptor. This object had been discovered a year earlier by Richard
West on a plate obtained with the ESO 1-metre Schmidt telescope. The combination
of a wide-field survey telescope and a large telescope, which had proved its value on
Mount Palomar, was now also available to Europe’s astronomers.

The 3.6-metre telescope and the 1.4-metre Coudé Auxiliary Telescope. (Photo: John Launois/Black-Star)
16	

As a technical term magnitude is an expression of the brightness of an astronomical object. The brightest star
in the sky, Sirius (α Canis Majoris) has a magnitude of –1.5. The faintest stars that can be seen with the naked
eye are around 6. The difference in brightness between two objects whose magnitudes differ by one is roughly
a factor of 2.5.

17	

Laustsen’s prime focus photos clearly demonstrate the optical quality and success of the 3.6-metre telescope
(Wilson, 2010), but it would take a very long time before the telescope was able to reach its full performance,
with the dome seeing being the main culprit. At the time of first light, this was not clear. As Ray Wilson later
wrote: “The terrible ‘chimney effects’ of dome air were (fortunately) mitigated by the Gascoigne plate prime-focus
corrector which sealed off the tube as well as correcting the spherical aberration and field coma” (Wilson, ibid.). In
Chapter III-8 we return to the 3.6-metre upgrade, which was undertaken in the 1990s.

70

Chapter I-6 ∙ Towards the 3.6-metre Telescope

The Cassegrain focus was used for the first time on 19 April 1977, in photographic
mode since the photometer was still a few months away from installation. At that
time, about 700 plates had been obtained at the prime focus, with “many … under
evaluation by astronomers in the ESO countries,” as Laustsen reported in the The ESO
Messenger (Laustsen, 1977). Nonetheless, the use of the telescope remained restricted
for a while. This is not unusual: the commissioning phase of any new telescope is a
period of fine-tuning and testing as much as it is a time for initial science to be done.
Finally, with the observing period commencing in October 1977, the 3.6-metre telescope was opened for visiting astronomers. A total of 49 applicants submitted 54 proposals for the first round, with 26 being accepted. The first observing period coincided with ESO’s 15th anniversary. A fine birthday present, even if many wished
that it had come earlier.
Among the first users was a young Italian astronomer, Massimo Tarenghi, who
came to observe clusters of galaxies. The 3.6-metre still had teething problems, and
Tarenghi quickly developed an interest in the technical aspects, becoming what
today would be called an instrument scientist. He developed an automatic plate
changer for the 3.6-metre prime focus, so that the astronomer would no longer need
to ride in the cage during the observations18 .
≈
The 3.6-metre building is a towering building. It stands 45 metres tall, overlooking the mountain ridge with its retinue of telescope domes. Next to it, a much narrower cylindrical tower, connected to the main building through a horizontal tube
and a suspended walkway can be seen: this building that houses the Coudé Auxiliary Telescope. The building was originally supposed to host a 1.4-metre siderostat,
feeding light into the coudé focus, but in 1973, it was realised that installing a tele­
scope instead would greatly enhance the scientific capacity. So the mirror, which
18	

Partly because of the delay, the ESO 3.6-metre telescope came right at the time when technological advances
enabled major changes in observing practices. The tension between what was and what could be is nicely illustrated by an anecdote, told later by Daniel Enard: “Around the Cassegrain adapter and instruments arose a fierce
debate, in particular as to whether the astronomer should sit in the Cassegrain cage to guide the telescope through an
eyepiece or whether it was at all thinkable to trust a television camera and perform the control from the control room!
Although an eyepiece was included, the ‘modern’ school eventually won, but not before making three prototypes of
the ‘Cassegrain chair’, an improbable object somewhere between a medieval torture device and a dentist’s chair for
cosmonauts.” (Enard, 2002). Illustrations of these remarkable contraptions appeared in The ESO Messenger, presented with the dubious comment: “these three chairs represent the latest in European modernity!” (Richter, 1976).

71

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Photomontage showing the planned siderostat at the 3.6-metre telescope. (Photo: OHP)

was already at hand, was used for the new telescope. The CAT marked ESO’s first
step away from classical telescope design. To accommodate the telescope within the
dome, which had already been designed, Wolfgang Richter had proposed an unusual
alt-alt mount for the telescope, instead of the classical equatorial mount, which had
become common. However, because of the pressure to finish the 3.6-metre telescope,
he soon left the CAT project to a newly-arrived young engineer, Torben Andersen.
Andersen’s design contained several novelties for ESO. The telescope had no fewer
than four secondary mirrors, mounted in a turret. Each mirror had a different coating, optimised for a particular wavelength domain. A tertiary mirror rotated to keep
the output light beam pointing in a fixed direction. Finally, Andersen introduced
the idea of direct drives, which have since become the norm in telescope design.
The mechanical structure was produced by MAN in Germany and the optical elements were delivered by Grubb Parsons (UK). In 1979 the telescope was assembled
at CERN for testing before being shipped to Chile. The CAT became a very popular
telescope and ensured that the coudé spectrograph in the 3.6-metre building could
be used independently of the main telescope. In the mid-1990s, it was one of three
telescopes that, for a while, were used in remote-control mode from Garching, but
at the end of September 1998 it had its last observing run. In 2006, the telescope
returned to Europe, having been bought by Lund Observatory, now also Andersen’s
home institute, and mounted in a former water tower, retrofitted with a proper dome.

72

Chapter I-6 ∙ Towards the 3.6-metre Telescope

Torben Andersen in front of the CAT at the assembly hall at CERN in Geneva. (Photo: Roy Saxby)

73

The ESO 1-metre Schmidt telescope at La Silla.
(Photo: Bernard Pillet)

Chapter I-7

Sky Mapper
“The stars with deep amaze
Stand fixed in steadfast gaze, …”
John Milton, 1645.

I

n addition to the 3.6-metre telescope and the other smaller telescopes, the initial programme also foresaw the installation of a Schmidt telescope at La Silla.
At Mount Palomar, the combination of a major telescope and a survey telescope had
proved extremely successful, with the survey telescope finding interesting objects that
could subsequently be studied with the bigger telescope with its special instrumentation. A Schmidt telescope is a giant photographic camera with a large field of view
and excellent aberration-free image quality, thanks to the combination of a spherical primary mirror and an elaborately shaped corrector plate — a huge aspheric lens
— at the top end of the telescope, at the centre of curvature of the primary mirror.
The detector — in those days large photographic glass plates — is located inside
the telescope. Since the focal plane is curved, the glass plates had to be bent accordingly during exposure, requiring the plates to be fairly thin, so as not to break in the
plateholder.
Schmidt telescopes are associated with the Hamburger Sternwarte. It was here that
Bernhard Schmidt, a somewhat introverted optician of Swedish–Estonian origin,
developed the original concept. With ESO being so closely linked to this observatory, it was natural that ESO’s Schmidt telescope would be built in Hamburg. The
task was given to Walter Strewinski, the engineer who we have met in connection
with the 3.6-metre telescope. Strewinski had already built a Schmidt telescope for the
Hamburger Sternwarte with a 1.2-metre mirror and a corrector plate of 80 centimetres. This telescope had been in service since 1954. The ESO Schmidt was originally

75

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

expected to be a copy of the telescope at Mount Palomar 1, 2 , but instead it became a
bigger sister of the Hamburg one, with a primary mirror of 1.6-metre and a 1-metre
corrector plate. One of the reasons for this choice was that ESO wanted to be able to
fit an objective prism and the smaller aperture (than the Palomar one) would help to
save weight and thus potentially provide for greater stiffness of the tube. But, importantly, the telescope was designed to have the same focal length — and hence image
scale as that of the Palomar 3 telescope, 1 millimetre = 67.6 arcseconds 4 .
Strewinski demonstrated his skill in the mechanical design. As Bruce Rule (of the
Palomar Observatory) put it: “Most of the new ideas and the new mounting proposals
involve rearrangements of the equatorial mounts to combinations closer to symmetrical designs.” (Rule & Sisson, 1965). This was also what Strewinski had in mind. He
designed the telescope so that if an imaginary sphere surrounded all the movable
parts, the centre of gravity of these parts would coincide with the centre of a sphere
around which the telescope rotated, so that a minimum of force was required to
move the telescope. He had already tested this solution with success at the H
­ amburg
Schmidt.
The primary mirror was made of Schott Duran, a borosilicate glass with minimal thermal expansion, while the single corrector plate was made of ultraviolet-­transmitting
UK50 glass and the objective prism of UBK 7 with a resolution of about 450 Å/milli­metre in blue light (near what astronomers call the Hγ line at 4340 Å). The primary mirror and the additional optics were figured by Carl Zeiss in Oberkochen,
Germany. The telescope offered an unvignetted image field of 5.4 × 5.4 degrees
on the sky, to be recorded on photographic plates, each 30 × 30 centimetres in size.
In terms of detection capacity, to use modern-day terminology, each Schmidt plate
would contain the equivalent of something like 800 megapixels or more — depending on the particular kind of photographic emulsion. But, seen from today’s perspective, there would be serious drawbacks as well. Firstly, the nonlinear transformation
1	

Now known as the Samuel Oschin Telescope.

2	

We will recall the association of Walter Baade with the Hamburger Sternwarte. Coming from Hamburg, Baade
was familiar with the work of Bernhard Schmidt and his telescope design and he naturally became involved in
the Palomar Schmidt Telescope. It is illustrative of the mutually enriching relationship between the two continents after the war that the Europeans now thought of copying the US telescope.

3	

The UK Schmidt Telescope (UKST), which would be added to the southern hemisphere telescopes at the AngloAustralian Observatory in Siding Spring, New South Wales, somewhat later also featured that focal length.

4	

Angular measure, subdivison of 1 degree (= 60 arcminutes = 3600 arcseconds).

76

Chapter I-7 ∙ Sky Mapper

of intensity into density, depending both on the intrinsic characteristics of the type
of emulsion, the production batch and the actual processing, made photometry a relatively complicated and uncertain affair. Secondly, the data would be analogue. To
exploit them scientifically — to extract the information in a digital form — it was
necessary to scan the plates, a cumbersome and time-consuming exercise. Thirdly —
and perhaps the worst problem — the general sensitivity, known as detective quantum efficiency, was low, and at low intensity levels the inherent sensitivity dropped
even further, an effect called the Schwarzschild effect or linear reciprocity failure.
To counter the latter problem, the plates were subjected to a hypersensitising treatment, typically by baking them in an oven filled with nitrogen or hydrogen shortly
before exposure. This increased the sensitivity markedly, but occasionally caused
inhomogeneities across the plates. Often, working with these plates was more of an
art than anything else, but at the time, there was no alternative and photographic
plates, therefore, remained the primary detector in astronomy for a century.
≈

Heckmann taking a stroll outside the Schmidt telescope. (Photo: Svend Lauststen)

77

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The ESO 1-metre Schmidt telescope was delivered to La Silla in late 1971, two years
late. The delay was partly the result of Strewinski’s simultaneous involvement with
the 3.6-metre telescope. The installation was overseen by Heckmann, who had kept
his involvement with ESO for a while after his retirement as Director General, a fairly
unusual occurrence in the history of ESO. By 1972, the telescope began operations
but, over the following couple of years, it would undergo a series of adjustments and
major improvements, notably in the drive and control systems, optical collimation
and mirror handling, an effort led by André Muller. Muller had been involved with
ESO in Chile since the beginning and also in South Africa. During the early Chile
years, he had the function of superintendent, which meant being the chief troubleshooter. In 1969, he went back to ESO’s Headquarters in Bergedorf to take charge
of the organisation of observing programmes, while Bengt Westerlund took over
in Chile, now with the title of Director for ESO Chile. As problems continued to
plague the Schmidt telescope, Blaauw decided to send Muller back to La Silla. At
La Silla, he worked with the Dutch engineers Jan van der Ven and Jan van der Lans, as
well as Hans-Emil Schuster, a German astronomer, who had previously been involved
with the Hamburg Schmidt telescope. Schuster had joined ESO in early 1964 and
arrived in Chile in October 1964 as assistant to Muller, so the two knew each other
well, and together they formed an excellent team.
During the 1950s, the Palomar Schmidt telescope had been used to produce the
National Geographic Society/Palomar Observatory Sky Survey 5 , which had covered
all of the northern sky as well as the part of the southern sky that could be reached
from the site near San Diego in California (down to –30 degrees). This survey, carried out in two colours (using blue-sensitive and red-sensitive photographic plates),
had strongly influenced contemporary astronomical research. It provided the first
major inventory of objects in the sky and went much deeper than any previous survey. Targets found on the images could be chosen for study with larger telescopes, and
the photographs themselves could be used to study variable objects (by comparing
plates obtained at different times) and moving objects — such as comets and asteroids. The plates could also be used for astrometric purposes, the positional determination of objects in the sky, as well as for photometry.
The 1954 Leiden Statement made explicit reference to the Palomar Observatory and
also called for a Schmidt telescope of a similar size (the latter being repeated in the
5	

The National Geographic Society/Palomar Observatory Sky Survey was led by Rudolf Minkowski, a friend of
Walter Baade from his Hamburg days and a pre-war émigrée from Germany.

78

Chapter I-7 ∙ Sky Mapper

1962 Convention). Though not specifically stated, it seemed an obvious idea to carry
out a survey of the southern sky similar to the Palomar survey and ESO intended
to do exactly that. A major argument for placing the observatory in the southern
­hemisphere was that this part of the sky had not been as well explored as the northern part. When the United Kingdom began to consider installing its own Schmidt
telescope (the UKST) at the future Anglo-Australian Observatory in 1967, it was
with the expressed objective of extending the Palomar survey to cover all of the
southern sky. This, for ESO somewhat surprising development, led Blaauw to contact Vincent Reddish, who was in charge of the British plans, to see if it was possible for ESO to join forces with the Science Research Council of the UK and eventually this resulted in an agreement to carry out a joint survey. The agreement was
signed in January 1974.

Guido Pizzaro during an observing run with the Schmidt telescope. (Photo by the author)

When the Schmidt telescope at La Silla was commissioned, Schuster became responsible for its operation, and thus for the implementation of the survey, and remained
so until 19916 . At the Schmidt, Schuster had two Chilean assistants, Oscar and
Guido Pizzaro. Together they formed a very dedicated and capable team, albeit much
6	

From 1984 to 1987 he assumed the post of acting director at La Silla and from 1987 he oversaw the site testing
in the north of Chile until 1991.

79

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

smaller than that of the other large southern hemisphere Schmidt — the UKST. To
deal with the Schmidt plates ESO established its Sky Atlas Laboratory in Geneva
in 1972. The laboratory was headed by Richard West, assisted by French photographers, Bernard Dumoulin — who joined from CERN — and Bernard Pillet. The
task of the laboratory was to produce both glass and film copies of the plates from
both Schmidt telescopes 7. It evolved to become the larger of the world’s two specialist laboratories capable of dealing with Schmidt plates, combining industrial production methods with the extraordinarily high demands in terms of quality and precision that were inherent to this kind of scientific work 8 .
In the ESO Bulletin No. 10, West introduced the new project “at the request of the
Director General of ESO in order to inform in detail the ESO Council and its Committees as well as other interested parties of the purpose and scope of the ESO Sky Survey
Project.” (West, 1974). In the article, he pointed out that rather than simply copying
the Palomar approach and using it for a southern sky survey, new methods in astronomy, as well as progress in the field of astronomical photography, warranted a new
approach. The ESO/SRC survey would set completely new standards. It is interesting to note that while Palomar and its owners, the California Institute of Technology (Caltech), provided valuable help to ESO to get the project going, when in 1987
it was decided to undertake a second Palomar Survey, ESO returned the favour and
worked closely with the Americans in the realisation of what eventually became the
Palomar Observatory/ESO Sky Survey.
The Southern Sky Survey, now carried out jointly by ESO and SRC, comprised 606
fields and covered the area from the celestial pole up to –20 degrees (securing an
overlap with the Palomar Survey, quite prudent since the southernmost Palomar
plates did not have the same quality as the other plates, due to the larger intervening airmass 9). The survey was carried out in two spectral bands, the J-band (plates
obtained with the UK Schmidt telescope) and the R-band (with the ESO Schmidt).
Kodak IIIa-J and IIIa-F emulsions were chosen for the plates and both kinds were
7	

Unlike for the Palomar Atlas, it was decided not to offer copies on photographic paper. This was because paper
prints would not do justice to the quality — and thus scientific usefulness — now possible thanks to advances
in the copying process.

8	

By 1990, the ESO Sky Atlas Laboratory had produced more than 300 000 high-fidelity copies of Schmidt plates
for the Atlas (ESO Press Release, 26 January 1990).

9	

Observing celestial objects from the ground implies looking through the terrestrial atmosphere. Since the atmosphere introduces various negative effects, such as scattering and absorption of light as well as wavefront deformation (see Chapter III-3), astronomers prefer to observe objects at zenith, where the amount of intervening
air is smallest.

80

Chapter I-7 ∙ Sky Mapper

hypersensitised. For the red survey (covering 6300–6900 Å, thus including the Hα
line at 6563 Å), the aim was to reach a limiting magnitude of 22.5. This would require
an exposure time of 120 minutes (90 minutes for the J-plates), placing extremely
tough demands on the quality of the telescope guiding and drive systems. Given
that observations could not be carried out in moonlight, the demands on the performance of the telescope and the intricacies of hypersensitisation, particularly for the
red plates10 , it was clear that this project would last quite some time. In fact it turned
out to be a herculean task. It was decided, however, that ESO would initially produce what became known as the Quick Blue Survey (QBS), to “accelerate the [optical]
identification of thousands of radio and X-ray sources … in parts of the sky not covered
by the Palomar Atlas.” (Lauberts, 1982). The Quick Blue Survey would use coarsegrain unsensitised IIa-O plates exposed for 60 minutes to reach a limiting magnitude of 21.5 and covering the spectral range of 3850–5000 Å. The Quick Blue Survey was completed in 1978, after which ESO concentrated fully on the red survey11.

High-fidelity copying of the large Schmidt plates was both a science and an art. Here, Bernard Dumoulin
of the Sky Atlas Laboratory is seen processing an atlas copy plate. (Photo: Bernard Pillet)

≈
10	

The IIIa-F emulsions used for the red part were considerably more difficult to sensitise.

11	

The QBS coverage was later extended from –20 degrees to the celestial equator.

81

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

An early research project linked to the survey involved the University of Uppsala
(Uppsala Universitet). The ESO Annual Report of 1973 explains that “ it was … felt
that the expertise (and necessary time) was not available within ESO for a large-scale
searching of the Schmidt plates. In order to avoid haphazard first exploitation of this
field and to put the searching for new objects into a system that would be of advantage
to all parties involved, the idea arose that ESO should collaborate with an observatory
with experience in this field.” 12 Andris Lauberts of Uppsala University carried out
the measurements using specially designed survey machines built at the university.
They were to cover all New General Catalogue (NGC) and Index Catalogue (IC)
galaxies, all galaxies with an angular extension of more than 1 arcminute (1 millimetre on the original plates) as well as clusters and planetary nebulae. This led to the
ESO/Uppsala Survey, published in early 1982, with positional coordinates, angular
extension, B-­magnitudes, classification and, in some cases,
radial velocities. The catalogue
listed more than 18 000 objects,
of which “about 60% [were
re­corded] for the first time”
(­Lauberts, ibid.). This work was
followed up by a systematic scan
of the galaxies found on the
Schmidt plates, this time using
a PDS scanner at ESO Headquarters. The new survey also
included the deep red plates.
It was carried out by Andris
­Lauberts and Edwin Valentijn
and completed with the pubThe Optronics scanner was originally installed at ESO in
lication of The Surface Photo­
Geneva. With the move to Garching in 1980, it was transmetry C
­ atalogue of the ESO-­
ferred, together with the entire Sky Atlas Laboratory
equipment.
Uppsala Galaxies in 1989.
The main survey (also called the Deep Survey) was finished in 1990 when the last
copies were produced and distributed. At that time, however, plans were under way
12	

Such an institute was the Uppsala Observatory, whose director, Erik Holmberg, had worked at Mount ­Palomar.
Under Holmberg, Peter Nilson in 1973 had published the Uppsala General Catalogue of Galaxies, based on the
Palomar Sky Survey, and listing almost 13 000 galaxies visible from the northern hemisphere (Nilson, 1971).

82

Chapter I-7 ∙ Sky Mapper

to repeat the Palomar Survey, and Caltech contacted ESO for advice. Although ESO
was prepared to help Caltech re-establish its own production facility, the final outcome of the discussions, concluded in January 1990, was that ESO took over the copying process of the new survey, extending the life of the Sky Atlas Laboratory until
2002, when it finally closed.
As a scientific project of its own, in terms of its duration and the resources invested,
it was arguably the largest project that ESO has ever carried out. Further to the main
programme, the Schmidt also carried out a smaller wide-field survey in the nearinfrared (which was not subject to copying) and also produced many plates with the
objective prism. Its legacy is several thousand wide-field photograph plates, each a
record of a part of the sky at a particular epoch. The project also constituted a concrete link between ESO and UK astronomers in a period before the UK joined the
organisation.
≈
With the completion of the ESO survey, there was free capacity for other, userproposed projects such as a quasar survey by Lutz Wisotzki and Dieter Reimers.
The search, known as the Hamburg/ESO Survey (HES), began in 1993. It was an
objective-prism survey covering the southern extragalactic sky (about 9000 square
degrees, partitioned into 373 ESO Schmidt fields). The purpose was to record the
largest possible number of bright quasars13 , both for statistical studies and for detailed
­follow-up studies with other telescopes (Reimers & Wisotzki, 1997) — in other
words the classical function of a sky survey. With the scanning of the plates, the
survey was completed towards the end of the decade. Another project was an asteroid project led by Claes-Ingvar Lagerkvist, together with a group from Deutsche
Luft- und R
­ aumfahrtforschung (DLR) Berlin, to study asteroids near Jupiter in orbits
­similar to the planet, but located 60 degrees ahead of it in the Jovian L4 Lagrangian
point. These objects are often referred to as Trojans, because they carry names from
Greek mythology related to the Trojan War. The telescope searched about 900 square
degrees around the Jovian L4 point twice, with follow-up observations of selected
objects by the Bochum telescope, as well as by the NTT.
13 

Quasars — short for quasi-stellar radio sources — are extremely luminous, seemingly star-like objects at large
(cosmological) distances. Today, quasars are considered to be galaxies with very massive black holes at their
centres. Aside from the intrinsic interest in understanding quasars, their brightness makes them useful for the
study of the intervening space. The discovery of quasars, which goes back to the late 1950s and early1960s, is an
interesting story, demonstrating the interplay between radio and optical astronomy.

83

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

But slowly, twilight fell on the Schmidt telescope and in December 1998, it was closed
down14 . Other telescopes with wide-field capacity, not comparable to the Schmidt
as regards the field of view, but with much more sensitive detection systems 15 , began
to take over. For ESO, the closing of the Schmidt led to an interruption in survey
programmes that has only been convincingly ended in December 2009 when the
4.1-metre Visible and Infrared Survey Telescope for Astronomy (VISTA) telescope
began operations at P
­ aranal. As VISTA entered into full operation, a research group
under the name of LS-Quest from Yale University began using the ESO Schmidt telescope again, now equipped with a mosaic of 112 thinned, back-illuminated CCDs
(each with 600 × 2400 13µ × 13µ pixels), covering almost the full field of view of the
telescope (approximately 3.6 × 4.6 degrees), and built at Yale University and Indiana University. Thanks to the giant leap in sensitivity, compared to the photographic
plates of yesteryear, it is possible to cover 1200 square degrees of the sky, twice, in
just one night. The plan is to return to the same field with a four-day rhythm for a
continuing search of 4800 square degrees to find low-redshift Type Ia supernovae,
RR Lyrae stars and trans-Neptunian objects. The camera was previously used at the
Samuel Oschin Schmidt telescope at the Palomar Observatory and installed in early
2009, with first light in April 2009.

14	

The UK Schmidt Telescope, from the outset better resourced than the ESO operation, continued its classical
operations with photographic plates, until 2005, although the transition to other observing modes had begun
long before.

15	

CCD mosaics.

84

Chapter I-8

Of Heaven and Hell,
the Vatican and the Mission
“There is general unrest in the country,
but for the time being it does not affect the ESO establishments.”
ESO Council meeting minutes, June 1971.

I

n the past chapters, we have looked at the establishment of the La Silla Observatory and the build-up of the telescope park, more or less as stipulated in the
Convention. We have also seen how additional telescopes were added. The desire to
exploit the new site was clearly strong, perhaps insatiable. La Silla was becoming a
Heaven for Europe’s astronomers. Or perhaps more appropriately expressed, the best
place next to Heaven. This view was undoubtedly shared by the new Director General, Adriaan Blaauw. He was fully occupied by the work involved in reviving the
moribund 3.6-metre project, but Blaauw was also an astronomer himself. Staying
at La Silla gave him the occasional opportunity to observe. In those early days the
atmosphere at ESO was a curious blend of a pragmatic “let’s-do-it”, hands-on ethos
and at the same time a rather elevated and reserved atmosphere. Blaauw’s wish to
observe might well have been fully understood and appreciated by his scientist colleagues1, but some administrators found it hard to understand 2 that a Director General would take time to “ look at the stars”, as they put it. But, Blaauw’s wish to observe
was not only the desire of a scientist, but also a way for him to see for himself how
ESO really functioned for visiting astronomers: the core business of the observatory.

1	

Staying active in science whilst also holding high office is obviously not easy. Blaauw therefore hired Richard
West as a scientific assistant to carry out some of his observations. West was also charged with building up a scientific library before he became head of the ESO Sky Atlas Laboratory.

2	

One of the challenges of science organisations like ESO is to turn what could easily become a destructive tension between an administrative backbone, acting within strict legal and fiscal rules and regulations and, not to
forget, traditions and a free-wheeling academic world into a fruitful symbiosis. Over the years, however, I believe
that ESO has been remarkably successful in this respect.

85

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Blaauw was an unpretentious and congenial Director General, well liked by his staff.
Christiaan Sterken, who at the time served as a junior astronomer 3 recalls Blauuw’s
straightforward manner: “In 1971 (mid-April or early May) Adriaan Blaauw spent
considerable time in the guesthouse, and before returning to Hamburg he went on a
shopping expedition with Hilde Fritsch (in charge of the Guesthouse), and he bought a
typical Chilean carpet. He asked for a hammer and nails, climbed a chair, and started
hammering the thing on to the living room wall (between the window doors to the garden). I had to hand him the nails, one by one, till the DG’s [Director General’s] handiwork was done.” Another example serves to illustrate his management style. Life in
Chile was not easy in the early 1970s, either for the local population or for the foreign ESO staff. Travel between the observatory and Santiago became more difficult,
and staff had to accept long and time-consuming coach rides. For the occasional visiting astronomer, this may have been quite acceptable, but staff who regularly had to
commute found it hard. When Blaauw asked a young staff member about his wellbeing at ESO and he seized the opportunity to express unhappiness about this continued nuisance, Blaauw’s reaction was prompt. “Give me your bus ticket,” he said. “You
can have my plane ticket instead!” But Blaauw’s generous manners could not compensate for the fact that the situation in the country was worsening. Strikes, powercuts, shortages of all kinds of everyday supplies, from spare parts and fuel to food,
and a burgeoning blackmarket, were sure signs of Chile’s downward spiral in the
early 1970s. Uncertainty and fear became widespread and this affected the families
of the ESO staff, however privileged, as well as every citizen of
the country. The blackmarket
economy undoubtedly c­ reated
temptations and in a few rare
cases some ESO staff could not
resist, creating difficulties for
the organisation. To prevent
such problems, ­Westerlund im­­
posed various regulations on his
staff.
ESO’s international staff were able to import goods from
Europe duty free. To sell goods, however, they were required
to obtain permission from ESO’s administration. In this letter, a departing staff member requests permission to sell his
car, refrigerator, automatic washing machine and gas cooker.
3	

The equivalent of a student in today’s ESO terminology.

86

In November 1972, the ESO
Council paid a visit to Chile.
Council meetings in Chile have

Chapter I-8 ∙ Of Heaven and Hell, the Vatican and the Mission

been most helpful in fostering a deeper understanding of the operational issues on
the ground — far away and quite remote from the perspective of ministry offices in
Europe. On the fourth day of the meeting — 24 November 1972 — a Council delegation was received by the President of the Republic, Salvador Allende. Allende
showed great interest in the ESO project. He also expressed an interest in cooperation between Chilean universities and ESO, “not only for the education of young
astronomers and their preparation for fellowships in Europe, but also in the technological sector” 4 . A few years earlier, at the inauguration of La Silla, Allende’s predecessor
had, almost poetically, declared that “… for us [the ESO Observatory] not only means
the construction of material buildings for a centre of scientific progress; we hope … that
it will benefit our country to have among us men who silently explore the heavens from
this vantage point. May they reveal to us the harmony and greatness of the Universe and
the humility which their profession and their dedication teach them.” Allende’s comments could certainly be seen as a move towards a relationship with more concrete
benefits for Chile. In the aftermath of the audience, Council discussed the issue of
closer cooperation with Chile, and in general, there was a readiness, within the limits of the organisation, to see what could be done. But unknown to Council were
the dramatic events that lay ahead — the general further deterioration of the overall conditions in the country 5 and the abrupt and gruesome end of Allende’s presidency, less than ten months later.
≈
On 10 September 1973, Hans-Emil Schuster returned to Santiago after a visit to
Europe. “It was strange,” he said in an interview with the author. “Everyone seemed
to leave the plane in Buenos Aires, where we made a ground stop. In the end, there were
only three passengers continuing to Chile. In Santiago, we found the airport almost
empty. There was no immigration check and no custom’s officers. Outside, all the taxis
had disappeared. I called the ESO Guesthouse in Las Condes and they sent a car to
pick me up. We drove through deserted streets and arrived at the Guesthouse. On the
next morning, a bus came to pick us up and take us to La Silla. We saw planes in the
sky and at the edge of the city we were stopped by the police at a roadblock. ‘No-one can
4	

No direct record of the discussion has been available to the author. The quote is based on the recollection of the
ESO Council President, Augustin Alline, who took part in the encounter and is contained in the minutes of
the Council debate that followed immediately afterwards.

5	

In a report to the ESO Council, Bengt Westerlund noted that “from early 1973, the ESO staff were really living
in a ‘special hazard’ situation. A civil war seemed imminent, travel on the Pan-American Highway became risky…”
and of course, the overall supplies of goods, including food, had dwindled.

87

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

travel to the North,’ we were told, so we returned to the Guesthouse. Bengt Westerlund
told me to stay and ‘guard’ the Guesthouse. He would remain at the ESO Office in
­Vitacura. We had a visitor … [from an Eastern European country] … who told us that
all foreigners were requested to report to the nearest police station or military patrol. He
insisted on following this order, so I locked him in his room. That may have saved his
life. D
­ uring the night we heard shots. For three days, we did not know how things were
at La Silla.” On that day, Monday 11 September 1973, the military staged a bloody
coup d’état, bringing an end to the government of Salvador Allende and the beginning of a 16-year long dictatorship. “Finally, we obtained laissez-passer documents and
came to La Silla.” At La Silla, the Belgian administrator, Georges Anciaux, had been
at a police station to help with the release of a close relative of an ESO employee, who
had been detained. Other staff members off duty had also tried to reach the observatory, but few had succeeded in passing the checkpoints and only under caution
that no-one could guarantee their safety. Whilst communication with La Silla was
interrupted, the Vitacura office managed to establish shortwave radio contact with
the German embassy in Buenos Aires and thus families in Europe could be notified
about the well-being of their loved ones.
The events in Chile sent shockwaves through the ESO Member States and the ESO
Council. Nonetheless, neither ESO nor the Americans considered withdrawing.
ESO’s mission was clear and unambiguous — to serve the scientific communities of
its Member States, and that essentially meant to serve science. ESO found itself in
a classical dilemma — seen in many other cases where fundamental political issues
become entangled with human activities such as sports and the arts as well as science. Could serving science, unquestionably a noble goal, stand above politics? The
Council had no doubts and did not waver. The task would therefore be to ensure that
ESO’s mission was not jeopardised, despite the difficult times. It would be for ESO
management to manoeuvre with extreme care in the years to come to avoid any sign
of support or collusion with the military regime, yet to protect the organisation and
its ability to operate as necessary and in accordance with its remit. Contacts with
the regime were kept to a necessary minimum and at as low a level as possible. ESO
would be correct and polite, as befits conduct in international affairs, but it would
refrain from large public manifestations in the country. Thus there never was a festive inauguration of the 3.6-metre telescope and the NTT inauguration in 1990,
during the final days of Pinochet’s rule, took place in Europe, with a relatively lowlevel parallel event in Chile. The ESO Council did not pay any further visits to the
country until a new democratic government took over.

88

Chapter I-8 ∙ Of Heaven and Hell, the Vatican and the Mission

≈
The turbulent situation in Chile, both before the coup d’ état and afterwards fed into
an ongoing discussion about ESO’s presence, especially in Santiago. These deliberations had already come up in 1972 in connection with the TP Division, which had
begun to become active in Chile. A plan for expanding the facilities in Santiago
was not approved by Council. Many argued that the distance between the observatory and the ESO centre in Santiago had an adverse impact on the efficiency of
the organisation. Furthermore, the office in La Serena could play an increased role,
when La Silla was fully developed, meaning at the time the when 3.6-metre project
was completed. Conversely, it was felt that perhaps some of the functions carried
out at the Santiago centre could perhaps be transferred to Europe. This scheme may
appear rather confusing, but it illustrates a more basic issue that has remained with
ESO, in sense because it has been “built into the system”: the constant dialogue, and
occasional tension, about the proper balance between the main research facilities in
Chile, for which the organisation exists, and the Headquarters in Europe, without
which it cannot function. There have been, and are, many aspects of this dialogue
and many operational decisions have hinged upon the contemporary state of it. It is
therefore understandable that the ESO Council discussed these matters, although
often in an inconclusive way. The visit to Santiago in 1972 had convinced some members that a move might be unwise. Even so it was thought that the La S­ erena office
could play a bigger role. ESO also acquired land to build a compound for its international staff there. But discussions about the individual merits of the various solutions
ceased when the incoming Director General, Lodewijk Woltjer, presented a much
more radical approach — to concentrate activities at the observatory proper — at
La Silla. In his proposal to Council, submitted for the December 1974 meeting, he
argued cogently why, both from a point of view of cost and scientific efficiency, the
existing solution needed to change. In his arguments we also see a return to the subject of a scientific centre in Europe (see also the next chapter). Since such a centre
was lacking, Santiago had taken over some of these necessary functions, he argued,
an altogether unsatisfactory situation in his view. On the other hand Woltjer also
underlined that ESO staff should be “free to live where they prefer”, and continuing to
live in Santiago, an option that most preferred, could be made possible by the introduction of regular flights between Santiago and Pelícano, the old base camp at the
foot of La Silla, where an airstrip had just opened. A further element of his restructuring plans was to reduce the number of international staff and increase the hiring
of local staff from Chile. And so, it was decided.

89

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The decision to relocate almost all ESO staff in Chile to La Silla made sense at the
time. It improved the overall efficiency of the operation and it, literally, distanced,
and shielded the organisation and its staff from the grim political situation in the
country. Woltjer defends the decision in his book, adding that “… in any case, it was
not ESO’s role to finance an astronomical centre [in Santiago]”. But it came at a price.
In the short term the cost was simply the additional expenses incurred to keep the full
staff on a desert site, with additional financial compensation and much more travel.
In the longer run it may have contributed to isolating ESO from Chilean society.
La Silla was sometimes compared to a monastery, also in the European media. And
it may have contributed to creating the impression that ESO did not care about the
host country and its inhabitants. This was hardly justified, but — twenty years on
— this isolationist image would come back to haunt ESO.
≈
Before we conclude this chapter, we shall briefly return to the issue of internal communication. With facilities in several locations, some of which lay 12 000 kilometres
apart, communication constituted a major challenge. Before the advent of modern
information technology this was even more daunting, but necessary for the proper
functioning of the observatory 6 and for the organisation as a whole. Working in relative isolation, the risk was high that each facility would develop its own solutions and,
in an understandable attempt to achieve the best results, acquire ever more functions
locally, sometimes leading to rivalry and what might appear as wasteful duplication.
When these changes were denied by the management, disappointment and frustration might occur. Keeping everyone informed was therefore of huge importance.
When solid information was lacking, it left ample space for stereotypical expectations. Such problems were often countered with humour, albeit mixed with a degree
of sarcasm that was hard to overlook. Garching — meaning the ESO Headquarters
— became known in Chile as “the Vatican”, while La Silla enjoyed the doubtful honour of being called “the Mission” in Europe. The importance of communication was
recognised by Adriaan Blaauw, who instigated the creation of an ESO newsletter, The
ESO Messenger. In May 1974, the first issue of the new in-house magazine appeared.
The primary aim of this new publication (which succeeded the ESO Bulletin) was to
strengthen internal communication, but also “to give the outside world some impression of what happens inside ESO.” (Blaauw, 1974). The first issue was rather modest,
6	

As late as the early 1970s, the only means of telecommunications at La Silla was a shortwave radio, though telephone and telex connections followed later in the decade.

90

Chapter I-8 ∙ Of Heaven and Hell, the Vatican and the Mission

with just six pages, written in English, but with selected texts also reproduced in
Spanish. It provided various titbits of information about new staff, technical projects, construction progress and general issues, but it soon also included articles about
astronomy. This was originally meant to motivate the non-astronomical staff at ESO.
However, it soon became clear that the magazine could provide a window onto ESO
for the outside world. The editor therefore sought a balance between light and easyto-read stories of general interest and more technical articles. It occasionally even
published letters to the editor, such as the following in the December 1979 issue,
allegedly from a certain ‘H.D.’: “Since The Messenger is evolving in the direction of
serious journals, one should consider the problem of quoting articles in lists of references.
The other day I found the reference: ‘ESO Mess’ — which is perhaps not the best compliment to the otherwise fine organisation… .” A particularly amusing article, written by
the editor, discussed the transformation of observing, from the classical style with

The article “Brave New World”, published in the December 1979 issue of The ESO Messenger, offered a
dark-humoured preview of how computer automation might determine the way astronomers would work
in the future.

91

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the astronomer glued to the eyepiece, patiently guiding his telescope for an hour or
more, to the modern automated (as it is described) mode of observation. Nonetheless,
from September 1976 (issue no. 6) onwards it increasingly became a forum for scientific users and instrument builders to describe their projects. With some v­ ariations
in emphasis, depending on the respective editors in charge, this would continue up
to the present. The ESO Messenger might even sometimes be used for fast presentation of new research results: though without a peer-review system it never aspired to
become a formal journal. The Spanish summary was discontinued in March 1988,
although two articles, in much abbreviated versions, appeared slightly later. The last
one, with the title, ‘Mi Visita a La Silla’, described a recent visit to the observatory
by André Muller, the ESO Superintendent in Chile of the early years. This article
was published in December 1988. It is gratifying to note that The ESO Messenger
today has a wide readership outside the organisation and thus evidently continues
to fill a specific need, but it failed to become the internal communication tool that
Blaauw had in mind.
Despite the continued need for internal communication, later attempts also failed.
In 1988, Harry van der Laan encouraged the creation of the ESO Echo, but this ran
to only two issues. Again in 2000 Catherine Cesarsky instigated the creation of an
on-line newsletter, called Open Skies. Although it survived for several years it never
really caught on as a major information and communication channel within the
organisation.

92

Chapter I-9

The Changing of the Guard
“I was lucky to come to ESO when I did … it [was] possible
to develop ESO as a scientific organisation with gradually
the astronomical community on the continent identifying
itself with their organisation, something fostered with
the VLT project and its policy of building instruments in the
institutes of member countries.”
Lodewijk Woltjer, communication
with the author, November 2011.

T

he arrival of Lodewijk Woltjer to ESO in 1975 initiated a phase change within
the organisation. Before coming to ESO, he had been chairman of the astronomy department at Columbia University. He was not primarily an observational
astronomer, but a theoretician. He had a broad overview of the science, understood
what European astronomy needed to do to evolve and become competitive, and
his approach was not at all theoretical. As Johannes Andersen, one of the European astronomer who was heavily involved in the early instrumentation programme
and known in the scientific community for his occasional incisive remarks, put it:
“Having a theoretician as Director General was of great help to the instrument builders, because he actually believed that the laws of physics also applied to instruments.” 1
Woltjer is a strong-willed person, in his own quiet way direct and blunt if necessary,
but also a master of tactics and thus able to navigate the sometimes complex and sensitive landscape of science politics.
What brought Woltjer back to Europe was a strong desire to push European astronomy forward and he saw that ESO had the potential to achieve this goal. He possessed both the will and the intellectual strength to get his way, even if — this being
1	

It would be hard to argue otherwise, but Woltjer chose another no-nonsense explanation: “Technical matters
concerning large optics are generally better left to optical engineers than to scientists.” (Woltjer, ibid.). And he proceeded accordingly.

93

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Europe — not everyone agreed with him from the outset. A key to his success was a
much closer link between active scientists, engaged in frontline research, and the tele­
scope and instrument builders at ESO. This could only be achieved by having active
scientists working directly at ESO, carrying out their own science, but also interacting with the engineers — pushing them, but also working with and helping them to
achieve excellence in all aspects of the ESO operation. As he said in an interview with
the author: “I wanted to have the opportunity to make ESO also a first-class scientific
institution and not only a place where telescopes were built… .” But that was precisely
what some Member States did not want, sticking to the concept of the observatoire
de mission. Blaauw had already pushed for a scientific group, but failed to convince
the Council. At the same time, Council and its President, Bengt Strömgren, had
wooed Woltjer for some time.
With Blaauw’s term expiring, Council gave in. Blaauw quotes from the minutes
of the Committee of Council meeting in November 1974, only eight weeks before
his term of office as Director General came to an end: “As to the creation of an astronomical Centre in Europe, which had been made a condition by Professor Woltjer for
his acceptance of the position of Director General 2 … a course of action would seem to
be acceptable … to start recruiting a nucleus team… .” But the battle was not over yet3 .
Woltjer recalls a stormy Council meeting in October 1975 in which this development
was under threat of being undone. Woltjer did not yield. In the end, a showdown was
avoided through firm handling by the otherwise convivial Council president of the
time, Bengt Strömgren. The matter came up again at the December Council meeting, but Woltjer stood fast. Introducing his plan for “The Scientific-Technical Centre
of ESO in Europe” he once more presented the case for having a dedicated scientific
group. “Some … have expressed … that it would be more efficient to have a small number of persons who would spend all their time on [supporting the 3.6-metre telescope
and its instrumentation] and for the duration would forget their about their research
2	

In his book, Blaauw mentions his own struggle to convince Council of the necessity of establishing a science
group. He also writes that “an astronomer of outstanding qualification had, in private, expressed to the Director
General interest in [leading this group]. However, contrary to expectations raised at Committee of Council, the
Council meeting of November 1972 held in Chile acted reluctantly. It authorised the Director General to approach
the person concerned about the intended association with ESO, but rejected creation of the research-oriented group.
As a result, interest on the part of the person concerned faded.” “The person concerned” was Woltjer, whom Council now tried to win for the post of Director General.

3	

In fact, the observatoire de mission discussion resulted in a proposal in Council to reduce the TP Division on
the grounds, that the 3.6-metre telescope was now close to completion, after which ESO would no longer need
telescope and instrument development capabilities on this scale. With the clarity and determination characteristic of him, Woltjer — not yet in office — made it clear that he did not intend to lead ESO in this condition.
The discussion then subsided.

94

Chapter I-9 ∙ The Changing of the Guard

activities… . Could one really believe that the optimum use of the 3.6-metre telescope
— or the European cooperation with that in mind — could be effectively promoted by
second rate-scientists? Or does one have the illusion that one could get such scientists to
an organisation where research is judged to be superfluous or in any case an impermissible luxury?” he wrote. Both Blaauw and Woltjer have dealt with this topic in their
books. It illustrates how deep-rooted this discussion has been within ESO, and it
has returned on later occasions, albeit in more benign forms. This is illustrated by
the frequently changing status of the science group, sometimes forming a division,
sometimes an office linked to the Office of the Director General, sometimes a directorate — sometimes headed by a deputy director for science, a division head or even
something else 4 . It also shows why Woltjer was the right leader for ESO at the time.
Only someone with a strong personality and a clear vision for the future could have
brought ESO forward in a decisive way. Woltjer’s vision — and victory — was a victory for ESO and for European astronomy. He soon began to unfold that vision. During his term of office, he carefully cultivated ESO’s potential, exploited fresh ideas
from the scientific community and wove them into the ESO programme, preparing
the ground for the breakthrough that ESO achieved towards the end of the century.
≈
In ESO’s newly established scientific group, Woltjer gathered a group of young and
talented scientists from all over the world. The first three members were J­ ürgen
Materne (Germany), Michel Dennefeld (France) and Phil Crane (USA). Even
though ­Dennefeld was still a student, he already had some experience with ESO,
having worked as a co-opérant 5 in Chile. Phil Crane had been involved in CCD
detector development at Princeton. The group was soon strengthened with the
arrival of John Danziger (Australia), who joined the group from Chile. With time
it grew, adding short-term visitors, fellows and staff astronomers. Among others the
group included Guido Chincarini and Massimo Tarenghi (Italy), Jorge Melnick and
Hernán ­Quintana (Chile), Daniel Kunth, Danielle Alloin, Marie-Helène Ulrich
Demoulin, Philippe and Mira Véron (France), Alan Moorwood (UK) and Peter
Shaver (Canada). Their diverse national origins clearly reveal one of the decisive features and strengths of ESO: its commitment to scientific excellence and its ability to
4	

Currently, the science group is vibrant and strong, headed by a Director for Science. The latest change, which
occurred in early 2008, followed a strong recommendation by an international visiting committee and was fully
accepted by the Member States. For the time being, at least, this discussion has been consigned to its grave.

5	

The civilian equivalent of military service in France.

95

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

free itself of national constraints when it came to recruitment. Woltjer nurtured the
group, even walking from office to office to pick up “his scientists” for lunch at the
CERN canteen. The group soon began to exert its influence on the operations and
the future development of the organisation. It was initially headed by Franco Pacini,
who, in 1978, was succeeded by Per-Olof Lindblad, a mild-mannered S­ wedish scientist with a decidedly stately air and the son of Bertil Lindblad, one of the astronomers who had signed the 1954 declaration. In the years to come, the Science Division remained a highly dynamic group, with members leaving (often returning to
their home countries) and others joining. Early newcomers to the group in ­Garching
included Helène Sol, Joachim Krautter, Gösta Gahm, Ian Glass and many other,
mostly young, scientists — many more than we can mention in this book.

Gerhard Bachmann (left) entertaining guests during the lunch offered by the German President on the
occasion of the inauguration of the Headquarters building in Garching. (Photo by the author)

Whilst the incoming Director General was supported on the science side by the
changing heads of the science group (later Science Division), the key person on the
administrative side was Gerhard Bachmann, who was ESO’s Head of Administration from the end of 1972. This post was generally considered to be the second highest staff position in the organisation. Bachmann, a German national, had worked in
a German state government administration and in NATO before he joined ESO as

96

Chapter I-9 ∙ The Changing of the Guard

Head of Finance and subsequently took over as Head of Administration from Johan
Bloemkolk. Bachmann remained in this position for almost 20 years. With his broad
Berliner dialect, he could be jovial, but he ran a tight ship for his staff. His tasks
were not confined to budgets, bookkeeping and personnel issues. A great admirer of
French diplomacy in particular, he was often called upon to help solve delicate issues
of a diplomatic nature over the years.

Lodewijk Woltjer, Robert Fischer, Bernard Dumoulin, Philippe Crane and Jürgen Eichler, project manager for the ESO Headquarters building on behalf of the Max-Planck-Gesellschaft. The person to the
extreme left is thought to be Walther Nöbel, an assistant to Fehling and Gogel, the architects of the building.

97

The new Headquarters building in Garching,
photographed in 1980. (Photo by the author)

Chapter I-10

Garching United
“The Federal Republic of Germany, together with the
Max Planck Society for the Advancement of Science,
offers ESO a site at Garhing near Munich
for its European Headquarters.”
Introduction, official proposal to the
ESO Council 29 April 1975.

S

etting up the TP Division also threw up the question of where ESO’s long-term
home should be. The choice of Hamburg had been largely coincidental, while
the selection of Geneva constituted a very deliberate choice, driven mainly by the
need to gain access to a rich and highly competent technical reservoir. However,
there was also a small “ESO group” in Marseille, a relic of the early years, where everybody chipped in with whatever they had to offer 1. With facilities at La Silla, in
La S­ erena and in Santiago as well, some people muttered that ESO seemed to be an
excuse for travelling. Reducing the geographical spread was necessary. The arrival
of ESO at CERN, had stimulated a group of Swiss astronomers, notably Marcel
Golay, the Director of the Observatoire de Genève, to consider Swiss membership
of ESO. With the first technical departments now on Swiss territory and the recognised need for bringing ESO’s European activities together in one place, the idea
of suggesting that the new headquarters could be in Geneva was in the air 2 . At the
1	

The Marseille group was not formally part of ESO.

2	

In the end, nothing became of this. The Swiss decision to join ESO came too late for this idea to be seriously
considered. Nonetheless, the disappointment in Switzerland was palpable: in a jab at the Germans, on 4 December 1975, the newspaper Tribune de Genève titled “We want to keep what we have” (“Nous voulons garder ce que
nous avons”), but did not spare the Swiss of criticism either: “The Swiss Science Council saw this too late. The
­Confederation risks one day becoming the sad figure of the Far West cowboy who closes the stable door after all the
horses have bolted.” (“Le Conseil suisse de la Science a vu juste trop tard. La Confederation risqué d’avoir un jour
la triste fi­ gure du cow-boy du Far West qui ferme soigneusement l’ écurie après que tous les chevaux son parties.”).
This might appear to be a drastic comment, but it must be understood against the background that Geneva had
also lost its bid to host the European Molecular Biology Laboratory (EMBL). In any event, on 1 March 1982,
upon completion of the ratification formalities, the Swiss Confederation joined ESO as its seventh member.

99

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

same time, however, the German government was wary of losing ESO. For historical reasons few other international organisations had settled in Germany at that
time and this had not gone unnoticed by the German Federal authorities. In June
1973, the German Council delegate read out a formal statement, in effect offering to
host a new ESO Headquarters in Germany. Blaauw has described how this became
intertwined with the still unresolved discussion about whether ESO should develop
into a scientific centre in its own right or follow the idea of being an observatoire de
mission. Irrespective of this, in December 1973, Council authorised the Director
General to “study the offer of the German government… .” In the course of 1974 the
offer became more specific, with Garching being the site of choice, leading to a formal proposal by the German government presented to the ESO Council at its meeting of 29–30 April 1975.
≈
Garching was a small rural village, located some 15 kilometres north of Munich, on
the high plain that leads to the Alps. The quality of the soil is poor and did not allow
prosperous farming and so land was cheap. In 1958, the German government chose
this rather uninspiring place as the site for Germany’s first experimental nuclear reactor, which, because of the shape of its building, became known as the “Atom Egg”.
Over time the site became the breeding ground for a dynamic research campus and
a powerhouse for work in the physical sciences. By the late 1970s, the Max-PlanckInstitut für Plasmaphysik and the Max-Planck-Institut für Extraterrestrische Physik
had been joined at G
­ arching by the Max-Planck-Institut für Astrophysik and the new
Max-Planck-Institut für Quantenoptik was also expected to settle on the campus.
It was clear that the stimulating environment here was precisely what ESO needed.
In December 1975 the Council accepted the German offer and half a year later, the
administration left the Bergedorf premises for a new start in an interim location —
an apartment building in Garching. The decision to bring together all ESO facilities in Europe also required a new Headquarters Agreement between ESO and the
­Federal Government. The Agreement formally confirmed the commitment by the
government to provide land and a Headquarters building free for a period of 99 years.
This agreement was signed on 31 January 1979. ESO could now look forward to
bringing its European staff together under one roof, but — perhaps understandably — not all staff saw this positively. Many of the staff, especially those in Geneva,
decided against a life in Munich and, in the wake of the transfer, ESO lost a sizable
fraction of its very competent engineering and technical staff. While recovery was

100

Chapter I-10 ∙ Garching United

certainly possible, it slowed down a number of activities, such as instrumentation
development. Construction of the new home for ESO began in October 1978 and
the building was ready in September 1980.
The German government was clearly prepared to put an adequate headquarters building at the disposal of ESO. Through the Max-Planck-Gesellschaft, which oversaw
the construction project, they appointed the upcoming German architects Hermann
­Fehling und Daniel Gogel to be in charge of the project. They had already designed
the adjacent building for the Max-Planck-Institut für Astrophysik and had made
a bit of a name for themselves. Yet it was the ESO Headquarters building that elevated them to the status of star architects (even if the expression may be ill-chosen in
the context of an astronomy book). The result was a modernistic unusually-shaped
concrete building with offices, an auditorium, a large library, laboratories and an
assembly hall for instrumentation. All in all, 4200 square metres of space awaited
the ESO staff as they began to arrive, either from their interim offices elsewhere in
­Garching, or from Geneva. At the time, there were a total of 40 staff members in
Europe (­Fischer & Walsh, 2009). With 120 offices, an auditorium, laboratories and
storage rooms, this was certainly a generous space allocation, but it would not take
long, before the growth of the organisation, led by an increasingly dynamic and ambitious programme, meant that an expansion became necessary 3 .
The main idea behind the unusual design was to create open “communication spaces”,
such as the entrance area with its bridges and stairs and to enable a fast transition
from one area of the complex building to other areas: at the price of creating what to
many newcomers must appear as a bit of a maze. The German weekly, Die Zeit, tried
to describe the challenge that the architects had seen and attempted to solve. In a
somewhat free translation of the article, it said that “organising the building was more
complicated than [the Max-Planck-Institut für Astrophysik], because [at ESO], thinkers
and engineers, software people and technicians work together, as closely as possible, yet

3	

The first extension was built in 1986, adding a wing of 1300 square metres to the existing building. In addition, the workshop area was expanded by 500 square metres. A further expansion occurred in 1990, when an
additional storey of 575 square metres was added. Alas, this expansion also only provided a temporary reprieve.
In 1998, as a provisional measure, ESO began to install offices in containers and, as the need for offices continued to rise, ESO rented office space elsewhere on the Garching campus. By 2008, almost half the ESO staff in
Garching were housed outside of the Headquarters building. In that year, Council agreed to add a completely
new building complex to the existing Headquarters, based on the outcome of an architectural competition in
the preceding year. Construction work began in early 2012.

101

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

clearly separated and without disturbing each other.” 4 (Sack, 1980). Less epideictic and
in his own unique way, then-editor of The ESO Messenger Philippe Véron offered his
view of the new headquarters building: “A short period of familiarisation was needed
during which everybody lost their way during a few hours or a few days in what, at first
sight, looks like a labyrinth of the kind used to test the intelligence of rats. But human
beings are on average cleverer than rats and the problem is quickly solved; after a while
it appears that everybody found the building to be very convenient and a pleasant place
to work in.” (Véron, 1981). It is probably impossible to achieve consensus about modern architecture, and some technical staff who had to fit their equipment into curved
rooms — in some cases even to cut large holes in massive concrete walls simply to
get the equipment into these rooms — may not have seen the building in the same
way as the journalist from Die Zeit. Yet the ESO Headquarters remains a landmark
building, and the goal of fostering communication and interaction between various
groups in ESO by means of the architecture has undoubtedly been achieved5 .

Lodewijk Woltjer welcoming the inauguration guests at the Garching Headquarters (photo left). President
Karl Carstens and Woltjer during a relaxed moment. (Photos by the author)

On 5 May 1981, the new Headquarters building was inaugurated in the presence
of the President of the Republic of Germany, Karl Carstens, the Prime Minister of
Bavaria, Franz-Josef Strauss, diplomatic representatives of the Member States, the
President of the Max-Planck-Gesellschaft, Reimar Lüst, and the ESO Council and
numerous members of the scientific community. Because of the large number of
4	

“Die Organisierung dieses Hauses war komplizierter als die des anderen, weil hier Denker und Ingenieure, ­Rechner,
Mechaniker miteinander arbeiten, möglichst nahe beieinander, aber deutlich und störungsfrei voneinander
getrennt.”

5	

For many years the ESO Headquarters building remained an object of study by groups of architectural students.

102

Chapter I-10 ∙ Garching United

participants, the assembly hall, intended for the integration of large components
(even telescopes) had been transformed into a festive hall for the day. The inauguration itself was followed by a formal lunch, offered by President Carstens, and an
evening state reception at the Antiquarium, the stunningly beautiful 16th-century
renaissance hall of the former Royal Palace in Munich. In between these events, and
on the following day there was a scientific symposium entitled Evolution of the Universe. The symposium featured high-profile speakers, such as Hubert Curien, two
Nobel ­Laureates (Hannes Alfvén and Manfred Eigen), a former Director General of
CERN (Léon van Hove) and two astrophysicists of world renown, Dennis Sciama
and Jan Oort, the spiritual father and long-time associate of ESO. The strong showing at the inauguration marked the arrival of ESO on the research campus and helped
to put G
­ arching on the world map of physics.

Jan Oort speaking at the scientific symposium in connection with the inauguration of the Garching
Headquarters. (Photo by the author)

≈
With the move in September 1980, the reorganisation, as Woltjer had planned
it, had been achieved. In its new Headquarters, ESO Garching was becoming an
important focal point for optical astronomy in Europe. And a natural meeting place
for astronomers from the Member States and beyond. The Visiting Astronomers

103

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

office, led by Jacques Breysacher and ably assisted by Christa Euler — perhaps the
most famous non-astronomer female in European astronomy — handled the applications for observing time and organised the meetings of the biannual Observing
Programmes Committee (OPC), which tended to grow as the number of proposals kept increasing.
The many ESO conferences created important fora for the exchange of ideas and
drew many scientists to Garching. Others came to use the measuring machines, the
PDS and Optronics scanners with which they digitised their photographic plates,
or to reduce their data with the help of computers at ESO.

The Users Room at Garching where visiting astronomers could reduce their observational data obtained
at La Silla. (Photo by the author)

This was a time when microelectronics began to assume great prominence. It was
not limited to control systems for telescopes and the development of new detectors,
but also to the treatment of astronomical data — or “image processing” as it became
known. At ESO, the first step in that direction was taken by a young Dutchman,
Frank Middelburg. The son of the Dutch Ambassador to Chile, Frank M
­ iddelburg
had followed the early epoch of ESO’s presence in the country, and in 1967, he joined
the organisation to work at La Silla. Middelburg developed an interest in the use of
computers for image analysis. At the time ESO’s Santiago office operated a Grant

104

Chapter I-10 ∙ Garching United

Measuring Machine, a one-dimensional scanner used for spectra on photographic
plates. In 1975, he was transferred to Geneva, where ESO acquired a two-­dimensional
S-3000 Optronics scanner (for the scanning of Schmidt plates) and from then on the
system, which he almost single-handedly developed and named the Image Handling
and Processing System (IHAP), became an official ESO project. In the years to come,
IHAP would be expanded and it not only became the workhorse image processing
software at ESO, but was also implemented at 15 major institutes in Europe. IHAP
owed its success to the fact that it contained most of the functions of systems still
to come. However, it was highly optimised for the HP-2100 mini-­computers that
ESO had selected for its facilities. Porting the system to other platforms, or even
using it with operating system updates, required a major effort and posed considerable problems (Grosbøl & Biereichel, 2003). With new non-­photographic detectors, notably the CCDs, emerging and in general, the move towards digitisation, it
was clear that more powerful computer systems would be needed, and ESO moved
to VAX 11/780 computers.
Even though IHAP was a well-developed and popular system by 1980, ESO had
embarked on developing a more versatile software system, which received the name
MIDAS — the Munich Image Data Analysis System. King Midas acquired his fame
by turning everything he touched into gold 6 . ESO’s MIDAS could hardly compete
with such a performance, but it did become the dominant image processing software
for astronomy in Europe for more than ten years, with yearly releases and substantial user support. More significantly, MIDAS was conceived as an open and modular system. The MIDAS development was led by Phil Crane, initially supported only
by Klaus Banse, but later the group 7, 8 grew in size.
≈
So where was ESO by the early 1980s? From the perspective of the Member States it
would seem to have accomplished its task. It had completed the initial programme
6	

A software project more likely to make gold was software with the same name, but developed for the financial
sector, and at the time unknown to ESO. For this reason ESO had to change the formal name of its software
product to ESO-MIDAS (Banse, 2003).

7	

Others working on MIDAS were Preben Grosbøl, Charlie Ounnas, Daniel Ponz, François Ochsenbein, Michèle
Péron and Rein Warmels.

8	

The Image Processing Group was ultimately absorbed into the Data Management Division to which we shall
return. In the end, given that a competing image processing system called IRAF had been developed in the USA,
Riccardo Giacconi decided that ESO should concentrate its resources elsewhere.

105

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

foreseen in the Convention and it had established a highly efficient setup in the sense
of extremely smooth operations and a high degree of user satisfaction. With all European activities finally concentrated in one place, the ESO “system” was complete.
And the organisation had begun to prepare for the future, embracing new ideas and
concepts. On the other hand, by that time, ESO had not really achieved anything
that had not been done before by others. For all its merits a 3.6-metre telescope as
the major observational facility was perhaps not so much to write home about after
all. Some individual Member States had in parallel embarked on programmes that
would develop national 4-metre-class telescopes of their own. On Hawaii, France
was building the 3.6-metre Canada France Hawaii Telescope. In Spain, the German Max-Planck-Gesellschaft was erecting a 3.5-metre telescope. Among the countries that would later join ESO, the UK was already operating the 3.9-metre Anglo
Australian Telescope (AAT) at a site in New South Wales, Australia and was planning to build the 4.2-metre William Herschel Telescope on La Palma in the Canary
Islands. In addition Italy’s 3.5-metre Telescopio Nazionale Galileo was being considered and would later also be built on La Palma. From a global perspective, there
were nine telescopes in the 3.5–6-metre range, though only three of these were in
the southern hemisphere. Also, in the field of detectors and instrumentation, crucial for a telescope’s ability to collect scientific data and generate new knowledge,
others — notably the AAT — had moved more astutely. Finally, telescope designers
had begun to develop and test new ideas, such as implementing alt-azimuth mounts
and dreaming about arrays of interconnected telescopes. Ideas for much larger telescopes existed as well. If ESO had caught up, reaching the goal also meant realising
that this goal was itself moving fast.
In the world of science, ESO’s reputation was still mixed. To many astronomers, perhaps especially in non-member states, ESO was the target of scorn, perhaps also of
envy. Some American astronomers assailed ESO for its luxurious habits, such as flying its staff and visitors in and out of La Silla instead of having them take the bus.
Woltjer coolly dismissed the criticism, simply referring to the higher efficiency and
the matter was put to rest. But the fact remains that in the global community, scepticism prevailed. It is almost as if ESO was the ugly duckling of world astronomy.
But ugly ducklings may become beautiful swans, and ESO’s Member States understood this.

106

Part II:
Years of Experimentation

Chapter II-1

Upping the Ante
“It was no longer a question of catching up
with the rest of the world, but of taking the lead.”
Lodewijk Woltjer, in his book
Europe’s Quest for the Universe.

O

ptical astronomy is fundamentally a question of photon-hunting. If we disregard the Sun, we cannot travel even to the nearest star to carry out detailed
in situ measurements. Hence astronomy is really an example of remote sensing, catching a little of the electromagnetic radiation that reaches us from objects in the sky
and analysing it. But that radiation is weak and some therefore say that astronomy
is photon-starved. The remedy is to set up traps — telescopes with large collecting
areas — the larger the better. In December 1977, scientists gathered at CERN in
Geneva to discuss exactly how to do that. The occasion was an ESO Conference entitled Optical Telescopes of the Future.
In his introduction to the meeting, Woltjer mentioned the long lead times for new
telescope projects, twenty years or more. He also stressed that, in spite of the merits
of the Hubble Space Telescope, whose launch was then expected in 1983, in many
areas of astronomical research large ground-based telescopes would offer better performance. The science case that he outlined covered studies of the chemical composition of main sequence stars in globular clusters in the Milky Way and of similar
objects in nearby galaxies, detailed spectroscopic observations in the field of cosmology, studies of faint optical counterparts to the mysterious radio- and X-ray sources,
and also “ high time-resolution photometry of X-ray sources, pulsars and other objects.”
A man of great clarity, he did not hide his ambitions: “The scientific case for one or
more very large future telescopes is strong. The investment costs … would not much exceed
the sum … of the present ESO, German and French large telescope projects. As such, the
construction of a very large telescope of the future would be a fitting project for European cooperation.” (Woltjer, 1977).

109

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Of the more than 240 participants, 19 came from the US. Not surprisingly, though,
with 15 out of a total of 46 presentations, they played a prominent role. There were
also many presentations by scientists from the UK and Canada. In the part dedicated to incoherent arrays and multi-mirror telescopes — arguably the core part of
the conference — US astronomers gave seven out of the twelve talks.
It was evident that new ways had to be found to overcome the existing barriers in
telescope design, whether technical or financial. Topics such as active and adaptive
optics were mentioned as theoretical possibilities. Interferometry was mentioned
as well, although with widespread scepticism. Nonetheless the options presented
by Don Hall from Kitt Peak for what was then called the KPNO Next Generation
Tele­scope — a 25-metre equivalent aperture optical and infrared telescope — more
or less described the general situation. They were:
1)	An “Arecibo Bowl” solution, i.e. a stationary, spherical primary composed of passive segments. The celestial object would be followed on the sky by pivoting the
secondary mirror;
2)	A “Rotating Shoe” solution, reminiscent of the Arecibo Bowl, but enabling the
entire structure to rotate in azimuth. (This solution came to be realised in 1997
with the 9.2-metre effective aperture Hobby-Eberly telescope at the ­McDonald
Observatory in Texas and its sister, the Southern African Large Telescope
[SALT] in Sutherland, South Africa);
3)	A giant steerable dish, with suggested 25-metre diameter (again for the KPNO
project);
4)	A Multi-Mirror Telescope, i.e. several mirrors on a single mount. This represented a scaled-up version of the University of Arizona/Smithsonian MMT1 on
Mount Hopkins, which would soon go into operation;
5)	An array of individual telescopes in the 8–10-metre-class, the solution finally
selected by ESO; or
6)	Arrays of smaller telescopes, in some proposals up to one hundred or more
2-metre-class telescopes.

1	

The Multiple Mirror Telescope (MMT) constituted a radically new approach to telescope design. It served as
an important source of inspiration also for the Europeans in the years to come.

110

Chapter II-1 ∙ Upping the Ante

The 25-metre steerable dish — one of the telescope concepts presented by Don Hall at the 1977 ESO conference at CERN.

From ESO, both Ray Wilson
and Wolfgang Richter gave
presentations, but they elected
to describe generic issues rather
than a particular project. Nonetheless, the presentation by
Richter contained a drawing of
a 16-metre f/8 Cassegrain telescope with a segmented mirror. The telescope was housed
in an enclosure, but outside the
enclosure, Richter had placed
a 60-metre windmill. This was
intended to reduce the wind
load on the telescope, and
simultaneously produce energy
for the facility (Richter, 1978).
The windmill, not surprisingly,
joined the not-so-small collection of curious, but long forgotten ideas, but the notion of the
16-metre telescope remained.

Wolfgang Richter’s proposal for a 16-metre telescope, to be operated in the open air, but with a giant windmill “to diminish the influence of the wind”.

111

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

≈
While much of the conference focussed on the technical challenges and merits of
the individual ideas, lurking in the background was also a deeper issue, about how
astronomy should be conducted in the future. More precisely, where should the balance lie between investments in large telescopes, expected to be used only by a few
elite scientists, and smaller telescopes, of which there could be plenty and thus also
be available for a much larger number of astronomers. This issue came to the fore in
the final panel discussion, chaired by Jesse Greenstein of Caltech/Palomar Observatories. Harry van der Laan expressed the concern of many vividly: “The astronomical
community does not consist of one mastermind and n robots. The creativity and enthusiasm that goes with individuality and rivalry are aspects that must have great weight
when considering the next generation of facilities.” In spite of the fairly sharp debate, a
consensus seemed to emerge. The technology was not ripe enough to think in terms
of really large single-dish telescopes. But without increased light-collecting power,
many of the science goals could not be achieved. Therefore the solution lay in arrays
rather than in single-dish extremely large telescopes. On the other hand, the individual telescopes of such arrays ought to be bigger than the already existing large telescopes to allow real progress.
≈
Despite the relatively low profile of ESO 2 at the meeting — at least as regards the
number of presentations — the Geneva conference was pivotal for the development
of a European Very Large Telescope project. It was the first major conference in this
process, which would span two decades. Further milestone conferences, still to come,
were the ESO conference on the Scientific Importance of High Angular Resolution
at Infrared and Optical Wavelengths (1981), which ensured that adaptive optics and
interferometry remained on the agenda, the VLT workshops in Cargèse (1983) and
in Venice (1986), among many other meetings.
The Geneva conference opened up interesting perspectives for the future and Woltjer
was clearly determined that ESO should play a leading role in that future. So, after
the conference, Woltjer asked Wolfgang Richter to set up a study group at ESO.
Not surprisingly, the group looked at three options: a single 16-metre telescope, four
2	

There were no presentations of an ESO large telescope project per se, but in his introduction Woltjer “ for illustrative purposes, … [considered] some aspects of a 16-metre aperture equivalent telescope” (!)

112

Chapter II-1 ∙ Upping the Ante

8-metre telescopes and sixteen 4-metre telescopes. At the same time Woltjer started
to ponder a name for ESO’s new project. “Why don’t we call it what it is?” was Ray
Wilson’s straightforward answer. “Why not simply call it the Very Large Telescope?”
And so, under the heading “Ten Nights at the Very Large Telescope (VLT)!”, in 1978
The ESO Messenger opened its pages to contributions from members of the scientific
community, describing the science they would wish to conduct with the new telescope. The fire had been lit.
The work of the study group, however, was disrupted by the move to Garching and
the ensuing reorganisation of ESO’s technical departments. In addition, two new telescope projects, to which we shall return below, meant that resources, always scarce,
had to be reallocated to those other tasks. But in January 1981 a new study group
was established, initially chaired by Ray Wilson and, from April 1981, by Jean-Pierre
Swings. In the course of 1982, it became clear that the limited array concept (of four
8-metre telescopes) was the preferred option 3 , although a number of technical questions remained to be clarified and, indeed, solved. One of the main issues was the feasibility of interferometry on the scale required for such a facility. The idea behind the
array was the light beams of each telescope could be combined, either incoherently or,
preferably, coherently. In the first case, the array would act as a “light bucket” with
a light grasp equivalent to a 16-metre telescope. In the second case, the array could
be used as a giant interferometer, yielding an angular resolution comparable to that
of a much larger telescope. We shall look at this later. The outcome of the work by
the study group was presented and discussed at a meeting of about 50 scientists in
Cargèse, Corsica, in May 1983. At the meeting there was support for the basic idea
that the VLT should consist of an array, rather than a single-dish telescope. Following the workshop, ESO’s Scientific Technical Committee — and subsequently
Council — decided that ESO should set up a dedicated project group within the
organisation. Daniel Enard was appointed to lead this group. Before joining ESO in
February 1975, Enard — an outstandingly gifted, yet modest engineer — had worked
at the Optical Division of MATRA, the French automotive and defence company.
At ESO, he had made his mark mainly by developing scientific instrumentation, an
area in which ESO had been trailing badly. Since 1980, he had been in charge of the
instrumentation group and as leader of the VLT project group he would play a crucial role in developing the project to the stage where it could be formally submitted
to the ESO Council for approval.
3	

The 16-metre option was found to be too risky from a technical point of view and the 4-metre was viewed as not
ambitious enough and therefore politically risky (Wilson, 2012).

113

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The project group would interact with an advisory committee, comprised of members
of the scientific community and led by Jean-Pierre Swings. The committee would,
in turn, be assisted by dedicated working groups dealing with critical issues such as
instrumentation (imaging and spectroscopy), site selection and interferometry. To
ensure consistency and cohesion, the chairs of the working groups were also members of the advisory committee.
≈
The new VLT project group again reviewed the three main options, this time also
from a technical/industrial point of view, and increasingly the array solution emerged
as a winner. In an article in The ESO Messenger, Daniel Enard provides the main
arguments for the final choice of the 4 × 8-metre telescope array. But, as he also
acknowledged, this choice had its own challenges: “Indeed, the array concept presented a number of problems which had to be matched by adequate solutions. There
were three of them: the feasibility of the primary mirror, an efficient way to recombine
the beams and a building concept combining a low-cost, a minimal degradation of seeing, the best use of the site’s topography, and an optimal arrangement for interferometry.” (Enard, 1987). ESO therefore carried out a number of detailed feasibility studies, mostly contracted out to European industry, leading to a proposal that could be
discussed again with the broad scientific community. For this purpose, a conference
was organised at the Cini Foundation in Venice in October 1986.

The participants in the landmark VLT conference in Venice in October 1986.

114

Chapter II-1 ∙ Upping the Ante

Building on the outcome of this meeting, ESO then formulated its formal proposal
to the Member States for the construction of the VLT. We shall return to this proposal in Chapter II-6, but for now, we need to look at a few parallel developments
within ESO, some of which had a direct bearing on the VLT project and on ESO as
a whole. At this stage, we shall just note that “the VLT was very much in the air”, to
quote Jean-Pierre Swings 4 .
Nonetheless, ESO would need a few interim steps, partly because they were highly
prudent from a development point of view, partly to deal with the growing shortterm needs of ESO’s users, not the least due to the entrance of Italy and Switzerland,
which had become a reality around 1980 (even if the formal membership process with
its political and legal steps had not been completed).
≈
The addition of two new Member States meant dealing with a larger user community, adding to the pressure on the ESO facilities. To alleviate this pressure somewhat, it was decided that the entrance fee of the two newcomers should be used to
construct a new large telescope. At the same time this new facility, which became
the 3.5-metre New Technology Telescope, could be used to test the many new ideas
about telescope design that were emerging in these years and without which the much
larger telescopes of the future could never be built. The construction of the new tele­
scope fitted nicely with the proposal by Italy to pay part of its entrance fee in-kind
by providing the primary mirror 5 .
Around the same time, another option came up that would expand the La Silla tele­
scope park further. The Max-Planck-Institut für Astronomie, located in Heidelberg,
was undertaking a substantial effort on its own, which included the construction of
a 3.5-metre telescope, to be placed at Calar Alto in southern Spain, as well as two
2.2-metre telescopes, one for Spain and one to be erected in Namibia. The Namibia
telescope had been built but, for political reasons, was never installed in its foreseen
4	

Interview with the author for the ESO 1992 promotional film The VLT Tale.

5	

In1968 Italian astronomers had acquired a 3.5-metre blank for a planned Italian National Telescope. As was
custom at the time, this was cast with an aspect ratio (thickness vs. diameter) of 1:5 for a traditional, passive
tele­scope. With the new ideas about thin telescope mirrors emerging, the idea was to slice the Italian mirror
into two, but it turned out that only the top part could be used. This was then thought to become the primary
mirror of the Italian National Telescope Galileo on La Palma, a modified copy of the ESO NTT. The Italian
in-kind contribution to ESO was converted into orders to Italian industry.

115

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

location and instead had been stored in boxes for several years. Following an agreement between the Director of the Max-Planck-Institut, Hans Elsässer (who had actually himself taken part in the early ESO site tests in South Africa) and ESO’s Director General, the 2.2-metre telescope was put at ESO’s disposal on a 25-year loan from
the Max-Planck-Gesellschaft, on the condition that ESO installed the telescope at
its own cost 6 . Woltjer, in turn, had not only committed to doing this in record time,
but also allocated a mere five million deutschmarks for the job. Undoubtedly, Woltjer
was keen to demonstrate ESO’s prowess, but there was a scientific need for speed, too:
the 2.2-metre was a fine telescope and should be available to scientists sooner rather
than later. He asked Massimo Tarenghi to become project scientist, but soon after
changed his status to project manager. Tarenghi acted without delay and in a way
that, for ESO, was unusual at the time. He brought two accomplished Chilean staff
members, Gerardo Ihle and Manuel Cartes, up to Europe and put them in charge
of the installation of the tele­scope. He also solicited help from Carl Zeiss, the company that had produced the telescope. Finally, at the suggestion of Robert Fischer 7,
he decided not to develop a new dome, although initial plans had been to construct
a scaled-down version of the 3.6-metre dome. Instead, he procured a commercially
available dome from Observa Dome in the US, which was installed in a space of just
six weeks in October/November 1982 (Bauersachs, 1982). Erection of the telescope
began on 15 February 1983, and first light was achieved by 22 June of the same year.
This must be close to a world record for such an undertaking! The initial instrumentation was a photographic camera and the Boller & Chivens spectrograph with
a CCD camera. Later instrumentation included a Wide-Field Imager (WFI) 8 and
FEROS, the Fibrefed Extended Range Optical Spectrograph, which was transferred
from the ESO 1.52-metre telescope.
The telescope would serve as a most useful addition to the arsenal at La Silla and it
also played an important role in a series of experiments that ESO undertook regarding possible remote control of telescopes. For a while three telescopes were being
operated remotely from Garching, the CAT, the NTT and the 2.2-metre telescope.
The rationale for remote control was partly to reduce travel costs and time, and to
allow for a much more efficient operation of the telescope. Satellite communication,
6	

In addition the Max-Planck-Gesellschaft would receive 25% of the available observing time.

7	

ESO’s Head of Contracts and Procurement.

8	

In the VLT era, much deeper surveys were needed than the ESO/SRC Survey and thus the requirements
exceeded the capability of the Schmidt telescope. The WFI was a joint project of ESO and the Max-PlanckInstitut für Astronomie to provide ESO with a wide-field capability, covering 0.5 × 0.5 square degrees with a
67-megapixel camera. We shall deal with the issue of survey telescopes again in Chapter IV-3.

116

Chapter II-1 ∙ Upping the Ante

which had become a readily available option, opened up new opportunities. However, the first attempts began much more humbly and without involving satellites
in geostationary orbits. The first test was carried out over a distance of a few metres
in June 1984 by Tarenghi and Gianni Raffi, a software engineer based at Garching.
They tried the idea from a console a few steps away from the telescope, causing a few
smiles at La Silla. After that, they moved to La Serena, to continue the experiment
from the ESO office there. Since the 2.2-metre telescope was not really designed for
remote control, a telescope operator (then called a night assistant) stayed behind to
check that everything was working properly and also to carry out the few manual
functions that could not be steered remotely. The computers in the control room and
at the La Serena office (two HP-1000 systems) were connected by a telephone line.
The observers thus had the choice of observing remotely or talking to the night assistant, when they needed his help. With a smile, Tarenghi later recalled: “At a certain
moment, the operation went so smoothly that we decided to continue observing without
interruption. When we were finished — in the morning hours — we called the night
assistant and told him that he could now close the dome. ‘OK’, he replied, ‘ but before I
do so, could I please go to the toilet, because you have gone on for hours without talking
to me.’” (Tarenghi, 2010).
With the completion of the 2.2-metre, Tarenghi became involved in the NTT project, first as a consultant, but soon after as project manager. The NTT was a springboard to the VLT and we shall therefore deal with this telescope in some detail.
The next chapter examines some of the underlying ideas that made this telescope so
revolutionary.

117

Chapter II-2

Inventing a Game Changer
“The development of telescope optics is a fascinating story… .
Over all its history, the optical development of the telescope
has also depended on technical inventions,
above all in mirror materials, glasses, support systems
and means of achieving high reflectivity.”
Ray Wilson, 1996.

T

he task of an optical astronomical telescope is simply to collect and focus the
faint light from objects in the sky. It usually does so by means of one or more
mirrors and the bigger the main (primary) mirror, the more light it can collect. Since
a mirror reflects light, what really matters is the reflecting top layer of what is normally a glass substrate. For almost all telescopes, this layer is comprised of aluminium and, remarkably, only a few grams of it will suffice to create a thin, yet highly
reflective coating, even for the largest mirrors. However, to keep this reflective layer
in its place one needs a support — the glass substrate already mentioned — properly shaped, and fixed in a mount that can turn to point the telescope towards its
target and to counter the rotation of the Earth during prolonged observations. One
also needs equipment to detect the light as it arrives at the focus and thus the whole
structure needed to keep these few grams of aluminium correctly positioned, and to
exploit the light scientifically, becomes a giant machine weighing many tonnes, in
fact sometimes hundreds of tonnes.
In the case of ESO’s 3.6-metre telescope, to maintain the shape of the primary mirror
accurately, irrespective of the direction in which it points, the glass mirror weighs 11
tonnes. It is supported by a mirror cell and a polar axis of 119 tonnes and the mechanical structure needed to keep the secondary mirror in its right place adds an additional 70 tonnes to the mass budget. Including the non-moving pedestal, the mass
of this telescope is of the order of 245 tonnes. Clearly, any increase in the diameter
of the primary mirror to improve the “photon catch” would involve a string of additional problems related to the overall mass growth and, even if these were solvable,

119

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

would surely lead to a dramatic increase in cost. For traditional telescope designs,
the relationship between cost and size seems to follow an empirical law, according
to which the cost rises by roughly the 2.6th power of the diameter of the primary
mirror. For these reasons, the practical upper limit in terms of diameter of the primary mirror was considered to be around 5 metres, the size of the famous Hale Tele­
scope at Mount Palomar1.
If astronomers wanted to build telescopes with larger light-collecting surfaces, they
would have to fundamentally rethink the way telescopes were designed. Among the
optical scientists who had thought about this was Ray Wilson, at the time working
at Zeiss, where he was conducting a study for the optics of the ESO 3.6-metre telescope in 1966. Originally, it was neither the weight issue nor the cost that caused him
to think about other solutions, but rather the inherent difficulties of maintaining a
proper alignment of the main optical elements of a telescope — between the primary
and the secondary mirror — as the telescope changed its orientation during tracking. Poor alignment resulted in an aberration that opticians call decentring coma.
He dubbed the problem “Cassegrainitis”, because it applied to all classical ­Cassegrain
telescopes. His great insight was the realisation that if it were possible to measure the
adverse effect on the image, then it would be possible by means of an active support
system to correct the problem. It would also be possible to correct other kinds of aberrations such as astigmatism. At the time, however, Zeiss showed little interest in these
thoughts and moving to ESO (in 1972) gave Wilson the opportunity to pursue the
idea further. In 1977, after the completion of the 3.6-metre telescope, he published
his ideas, followed by a more elaborate paper in 1982, in which he also introduced
the term “active optics”. The idea was stunningly simple. The telescope mirrors would
be controlled by an active support system that would apply the necessary force to
the mirrors to maintain them aligned with each other (in spite of tube flexure2) and
correct for gravitationally induced deformation as the telescope changed its orientation. The correcting forces would be applied on the basis of analysis of an actual star
image during the observations, so that the telescope would, in effect, be self-adjusting and always produce the optimal result3 . But simple ideas do not always convince
everybody. In a comprehensive article about the history of active optics in The ESO
Messenger, Wilson recalls the reaction of an American scientist, when he explained
1	

The Russians had built a 6-metre telescope at the Special Astrophysical Observatory, which revealed the huge
problems associated with conventional telescopes of that size.

2	

Deformation of the telescope mechanical structure under the influence of gravity.

3	

Alternative — but less elegant — solutions, pursued elsewhere, involved correcting the telescope according to
pre-calculated flexure, rather than measuring the actual image deterioration.

120

Chapter II-2 ∙ Inventing a Game Changer

the system. “Well, my feeling is that such a system will never be realisable in practice,”
said the American (Wilson, 2003). Feelings or not, he was wrong.
But why was this idea so important? Firstly, significantly improving the image quality
meant a dramatic improvement in the resolution of the images that could be obtained
with the telescope. But higher resolution also means that more (light) energy is concentrated in a smaller area on the detector. This in turn makes it possible to detect
fainter objects. However, the real advantage was that with an active support system, the primary mirror in particular could be made much thinner, breaking out
of the straightjacket that led to a disproportionate weight growth when increasing
the diameter of the mirrors. With lower mass, thermal effects would be minimised
and the whole telescope structure could be slimmed down. And last, but not least,
stringent specifications as regards the optical quality of the mirrors could be relaxed,
because much could be corrected by the support system. Basically, the invention of
active optics held the potential to push the door wide open to much larger telescopes,
both technically and financially. If only it would work.

The active optics experiment at the ESO optical laboratory in
Garching. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)
4	

To demonstrate the feasibility of active optics, an experiment was set up in the optical
laboratories at Garching with
a thin 1-metre test mirror resting on an active support system with 75 actuators, produced by Oberto Citterio of
the L
­ aboratorio CNR Fisica
Cosmica e Tecnologie R
­ elative 4
in Milan. In addition to Ray
­Wilson, the experiment mainly
involved Paul Giordano and
Lothar Noethe, the l­atter joining ESO in 1983 from ­Siemens.
The setup was not just used to
demonstrate that the active

The mirror was later donated to the Deutsches Museum, the huge technical museum in Munich, where it was
prominently displayed in the permanent astronomy exhibition.

121

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

support system worked but also the image analyser, based on a Shack–Hartmann system of lenslets and a CCD detector allowing for real-time analysis. The latter was of
essential importance for the success of the entire system. The tests went on for about
one year. Although the team had expected complications along the way, at least one
problem was completely unexpected. After a successful start, the test results began to
raise eyebrows. Results could not be repeated, and the system seemed to behave in a
completely random way. Evidently, something was wrong, but what? In the end, the
team decided to remove the mirror and check the actuator system below. This was
not an entirely trivial exercise, but it — literally — brought the cause of the problems into the light of day. The ESO Headquarters building is located on a green-field
research campus north of the small town of Garching near Munich. Looking out of
their office windows staff could enjoy the charming view of fields being tended to by
local farmers. Less pleasant, though, was that by autumn, the Headquarters building
seemed to have been selected as cosy winter quarters for harvest mice. Some found
the warmth and darkness underneath the 1-metre mirror experiment an almost ideal
place to build a nest, with food right on their doorstep — since mice seem to like to
eat the protective layer of plastic around electrical cables (and, if need be, the copper
wire as well). The affair caused a great deal of amusement and discussions about the
solution — some suggested simply getting a cat, but being a high-tech place, ESO
instead acquired an ultrasound system which made the mice migrate, presumably
to more welcoming locations.
Wilson’s active optics became the main novel feature of the New Technology Telescope. But when it went into operation it combined a host of technical solutions that,
in combination, made it one of the world’s finest optical telescopes, perhaps the finest. We shall look at the NTT in more detail later, but at this stage it is important to
realise that the NTT constituted a bold attempt to exploit a wide range of new ideas
about telescope design. Woltjer’s decision to go ahead, backed by the ESO Council,
allowed ESO to cut free of its existing programmatic paradigm, to search for and to
develop new pathways. In a sense, it was the birth of a new ESO, but, just like stars
that form inside dense clouds of interstellar dust and gas, and are thus shrouded from
our sight, it would take a while for the new ESO to become visible.
Whilst the first light of the NTT that we describe in Chapter II-9 undoubtedly marked the professional high point of Ray Wilson’s career, he subsequently
received several high honours, including the prestigious Medaille Lallemand of
the French Académie des Sciences in 2005, and, in 2010, both the Tycho Brahe

122

Chapter II-2 ∙ Inventing a Game Changer

Prize of the European Astronomical Society, and the Kavli Prize 5 , awarded by the
Norwegian Academy of Science and Letters (Det Norske Videnskaps-Akademi),
the Kavli Foundation and the Norwegian Ministry of Education and Research
(­Kunnskapsdepartementet), for his seminal work.

5	

Shared with Roger Angel and Jerry Nelson of the US — other great telescope builders.

123

Chapter II-3

EMMI, SUSI, SOFI and the other Darlings
“The long time … has led me into reconsidering
whether the coudé spectrograph really deserves the high
priority it has been given, and I am convinced that it does not.”
Johannes Andersen (letter of 9 October 1974 to Ray Wilson).

A

stronomy is as close to fundamental science as it gets. Yet progress in astronomy has always depended strongly on technology. Sometimes the necessary
technologies existed already, sometimes they had to be invented and, in such cases,
astronomers often gave a hand in the technical development. Galileo, the first person
known to have used a telescope for astronomical observations, did not invent it. But
he put it to use as soon as he could lay his hands on one. Conversely, John Herschel,
the astronomer, played a major role in the development of photography. Astrophotography, it has been said, was the step that “turned observational astronomy into a
true science” (Schilling & Christensen, 2009). Astronomers were no longer dependent on the human eye and the subjective and fallible perception caused by the signal processing in the human brain. Instead they had objective records that could be
measured and compared. And they could collect light over long periods of time, adding photons as they came in. The introduction of solid-state detectors came as a godsend (if that term can be used in connection with astronomy)1. The increase in quantum efficiency was dramatic, data came in digital form and thus could be exploited
scientifically much more easily. Cumbersome darkroom processing, often at the end
of a long night and a tiring observing run, became a memory of a distant past. But
CCDs were still far from perfect and once more, astronomers played an important
1	

In the course of the 1970s, the photographic plate was superceded as the detector of choice, in a sense simply
because the emerging world of electronics provided exactly that — a choice! Initially image intensifiers were
used in front of photographic film, and also electronographic cameras, pioneered by André Lallemand, providing a badly needed increase in sensitivity. Yet they were not very practical to use, and the next step — the
Spectracon and McMullan cameras — was a short one, as subsequently, charge-coupled devices became available. Readers interested in electronic cameras will find an overview in a paper by Dennis McMullan and Ralph
­Powell (McMullan & Powell, 1977).

125

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

role, together with industry, in optimising the performance, with respect to spectral
sensitivity, even better quantum efficiency, lower noise and more efficient read-out.
We have already discussed why astronomers are keen to have bigger telescopes, but
we see here that there is more to it than large mirrors. The auxiliary instruments and
their detectors, the equipment with which astronomers actually record and analyse
the light from their targets, are at least as important. But whilst astronomers have
expended great efforts on developing their telescopes, for a long time, their focus
has been rather less on what we today call instruments. In fact, in the past, the term
was used almost arbitrarily, as can be seen in the ESO Technical Report No. 1, in
which Svend Laustsen describes the 3.6-metre telescope as ESO’s principal instrument
(Laustsen, 1974)2 . Fortunately, all of this has changed, enabled by technological progress and by changes in telescope design. This, in turn, has led to new operational
concepts and to an explosion in the amount of scientific information — i.e. data —
that we collect. The development of astronomical instruments has arguably been one
of the most dynamic and significant areas for the evolution of the science. But we are
jumping ahead. The roots of ESO’s instrument development programme were laid in
connection with the 3.6-metre project, and the early phase was anything but auspicious. It is indicative that Blaauw’s book on the early history of ESO pays only scant
attention to the question of instrumentation for Europe’s new flagship telescope.
The 3.6-metre telescope had three foci: firstly a prime focus at the top of the telescope
used for direct photography. Behind the main mirror was the ­Cassegrain focus, with
the light being bounced from a secondary mirror through a central hole in the main
mirror. And finally, a coudé focus was located a floor down in the telescope building, with the light being brought there by means of a series of mirrors. Much attention and effort, and many hopes, were directed towards the coudé focus of the tele­
scope. In conventional telescopes, the coudé focus offers the only place where very
heavy and bulky instrumentation can be placed. Unlike the other conventional foci
(prime focus and Cassegrain), the instrumentation is not mounted on the moving
structure and so the coudé was the location of necessity for the large instruments
that were needed to obtain high spectral resolution 3 . We have already encountered
2	

To be fair it should be noted that the terminology was different in those days. What we today call an instrument was then called an auxiliary instrument. However, even this term betrays the somewhat subordinate status of this component in the minds of many telescope designers.

3	

The preoccupation with the coudé spectrograph, to which Johannes Andersen alludes at the beginning of this
chapter, was not simply a technical question. Rather it was rooted in the fact that while it was a key instrument
for stellar observations, it was less useful for the observation of faint galaxies. Yet at least some astronomers saw
the 3.6-metre telescope as crucial for opening up extragalactic studies for European researchers.

126

Chapter II-3 ∙ EMMI, SUSI, SOFI and the other Darlings

Gerhard Schnur riding in the prime focus cage at the top of the 3.6-metre telescope. From this position, the
observer guided the telescope and exchanged the photographic plates. (Photo: John Launois/Black-Star)

the term spectrograph many times and will continue to do so. The reason is simply
that a spectrograph is the most important tool in the hands of an astronomer. In a
typical spectrograph, a diffraction grating spreads (disperses) the light from the astronomical objects into its individual colours, or as the scientists would express it, wavelengths. These spectra provide a wealth of information about the target object. With
an echelle grating it is possible to obtain high dispersion spectra, i.e. of high resolution, and a wide wavelength coverage at the same time. This is ideal for detailed studies of the chemical composition of stars, for example. The first instrumentation plan
for the 3.6-metre telescope — i.e. for the instruments to be mounted at the three foci
— was modest and at the same time reflected traditional thinking. Woltjer put it less
diplomatically: when he arrived at ESO he found that “… instrumentation developments were in a catastrophic state.” (Woltjer, ibid.).
A joint ESO/SRC/CERN conference on Research Programmes for the New Large
Telescopes, held at CERN in May 1974, provided a forum for thinking about the kind
of instrumentation needed to tackle some of the big research questions. One of the
participants was Johannes Andersen, a young, dynamic astronomer from Denmark,
who had recently gathered experience in spectroscopy first at the Observatoire de
Marseille and subsequently at the Dominion Astrophysical Observatory in ­Victoria,
­Canada. Not a timid person, in his characteristic bold way he quickly developed a
good rapport with Woltjer, who was poised to become the next Director General

127

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

of ESO (though at that time he had not yet been formally appointed). Andersen
brought fresh ideas with him and he became an important player — together with
Ray Wilson4 and Daniel Enard — in fundamentally revising the plans for the coudé
instrumentation for the 3.6-metre telescope. They developed the design for a powerful, up-to-date scientific tool: the Coudé Echelle Spectrometer (CES), which would
offer a resolving power of 100 0005 . That, however, would take considerable time, and
in the end, it was only put to use after the Coudé Auxiliary Telescope was installed
in November/December 1980.

The CES at the 3.6-metre telescope. (Photo by the author)

So, at the start of operations, the 3.6-metre instrument complement was sparse. Aside
from the prime focus camera and a photometer, the main instrument was a Boller &
Chivens spectrograph, another off-the-shelf instrument bought in the US. The decision to go for a readily available commercial instrument was not undisputed, but it
4	

The working relationship between Wilson and Andersen is nicely illustrated by an anecdote, told years later by
Andersen on the occasion of the retirement of Ray Wilson: “Returning from my first observing run at La Silla
in March 1973, I came on a fine morning to the newly-established ESO TP Division in Geneva to visit a Danish
colleague. Treated to my then standard sermon on spectrograph design, he quickly introduced me to the new Head
(and only member) of the Optics Group with a comment that we might have common interests to discuss. Indeed we
had: after what seemed like five minutes, the cleaner politely suggested that we get out of his way; everybody else had
gone home long ago!” (Andersen, 1993).

5	

The resolving power of a spectrograph is normally given by a number that expresses its ability to resolve features
in the electromagnetic spectrum in a given wavelength domain.

128

Chapter II-3 ∙ EMMI, SUSI, SOFI and the other Darlings

was taken for reasons of time and was, in any case, necessary for extragalactic studies. Yet it is also an indication of the lower importance given in the early years to
planning and developing instruments for frontline science relative to the efforts of
building the telescope itself.
≈
Aside from the CES, the first steps to develop dedicated instrumentation at ESO
began with a spectrograph for the 3.6-metre Cassegrain focus, an instrument called
CASPEC. CASPEC was an echelle spectrograph enabling a resolving power of
20 000 (and later up to 50 000). Such a resolution was previously the domain of
coudé focus instruments, but since CASPEC did not need an elaborate optical train
of mirrors — each resulting in additional light loss — it could be used to study
much fainter objects (down to the 15th magnitude). This opened up new possibilities for studying stars in the Milky Way and nearby extragalactic objects. The development of CASPEC was led by Maurice Le Luyer and began in the TP Division in
Geneva in the mid-1970s. The instrument saw first light on the 3.6-metre telescope
in June 1983 (D’Odorico et al., 1983). An SEC Vidicon tube had initially been foreseen as detector, but this was changed in favour of a 512 × 320 pixel, thinned, back-­
illuminated RCA CCD detector 6 — the first such detector at ESO 7 to come into
operation in a spectrograph.
This instrument was followed by the ESO Faint Object Spectroscopic Camera,
EFOSC, conceived by Daniel Enard. EFOSC was a focal reducer and spectrograph
capable both of imaging and faint object spectroscopy and in this sense the first
multi-purpose, or multimode, instrument at ESO. Focal reducers provide for a reasonable field of view even with a small detector, while better concentrating the light
and thus ensure a better signal-to-noise ratio (Dekker, 2009). The optical design
of EFOSC, which became the mother of many other FOSCs produced elsewhere,
was due to Bernard Delabre, an ingenious young optical engineer from France and
one of the unsung heroes at ESO 8 . It was first installed at the 3.6-metre telescope
6	

A CCD that has been thinned has higher sensitivity, especially to shorter wavelengths, and also has a higher
quantum efficiency than front-illuminated CCDs, because the light can pass through the back layers instead of
through the CCD’s gate structure at the front which blocks some of the light.

7	

The first CCD detector at La Silla was used at the Danish 1.54-metre telescope for direct imaging (Pedersen &
Cullum, 1982). Both systems had been procured in the US. Although in the days of the Cold War, such advanced
equipment was not easy to get, thanks to the efforts of Phil Crane, ESO succeeded.

8	

Delabre has played a key role in developing the optical design for most of ESO’s instruments.

129

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

in June 1984 and offered to the user community in April of the following year. The
detector in this case was also a thinned, back-illuminated RCA CCD.
The move towards multi-purpose instruments was based on the experience that constant instrument changes, necessary on the 3.6-metre telescope to accommodate
many different observational needs, were time-consuming and achieving a perfect
optical alignment reliably could be problematic, quite apart from the wear on connectors that had to be constantly connected and disconnected with every change. Perhaps
more importantly, there was no flexibility during an observing run. The reasoning
was, therefore, that if the telescope had fixed instruments that could perform different types of observations, this would bring about a major improvement in efficiency.
≈
Multi-purpose instruments tend to be much more complex than their single-purpose
brethren. This almost inevitably has consequences for their size and weight. And since
Cassegrain instruments are mounted underneath the primary mirror — and thus
riding on the structure as the telescope tracks the stars — there are limits to what
can be done this way. The solution came not primarily from changes in instrument
design, but from electronics. Or rather from the new possibilities created by the introduction of computer control for telescopes. In the earlier chapters we have discussed
the equatorial mount used by most classical telescopes. A simpler solution is the altitude-azimuth (alt-az) mount, where the telescope rotates about two mutually perpendicular axes, one of which is vertical, leading to a cleaner, simpler and more symmetric design and load distribution. This was first introduced for large telescopes by the
Russians with their 6-metre Bolshoi Teleskop Alt-azimutalnyi (BTA) telescope9 at
the Zelenchuk Special Astrophysical Observatory in the Northern ­Caucasus region.
Tracking the stars with an alt-az mount is more complex, because the telescope has
to move around two axes with continuously changing speeds. Furthermore, the field
— the image, so to speak — rotates, so that the detector must rotate as well to keep it
steady. However, with the advent of modern computer control, all of this is possible.
The advantages are that alt-az mounts are lighter and cheaper to make. They can also
carry heavier, i.e. larger, telescopes. More importantly in the context of instrumentation, however, is that they enable the use of another type of focus — the Nasmyth
focus10 . In this scheme a flat ­tertiary mirror diverts the light coming from the
9	

In operation since 1976, i.e. the year of first light for the ESO 3.6-metre telescope.

10	

In classical telescopes, the Nasmyth focus can be used only to relay the light, e.g. to a coudé instrument.

130

Chapter II-3 ∙ EMMI, SUSI, SOFI and the other Darlings

secondary mirror towards a location on the side of the telescope’s main mechanical structure, which can easily accommodate heavy and complex instrumentation.
And by rotating the flat mirror through 180 degrees, instruments can be placed on
either side of the telescope. This was the solution adopted for the New Technology Telescope, which for a while became the main field of occupation for the ESO
Instrumentation Departments11, which had been established within the TP Division. The NTT meant a major change at ESO in terms of instrumentation development, not only because the technological advances opened up new perspectives for
sophisticated design solutions, but also because instrumentation was included from
the outset in the telescope project in a way that had not been the case before. Seeing
instrumentation as integral to the entire project and as a vital means of optimising
the scientific use of the telescope, in other words adopting a holistic approach to the
development of a new “science machine”, has been the hallmark of ESO ever since
and is the foundation of the success of both the NTT and the VLT.

This photo of EMMI, taken in 1989 during the final testing
at Garching, provides a good impression of the complexity of
the new generation of instruments. (Photo: Hans Hermann
Heyer)

The original instrument complement for the NTT comprised
EMMI, the ESO Multi-Mode
Instrument, and the infrared
spectrometer (IRSPEC, which
was transferred from the 3.6metre telescope). The EMMI
two-channel i­ nstrument (ultraviolet [UV]-blue and Visualred) was ­specifically developed
for the NTT and was a good
initial all-round instrument for
both imaging and medium- and
high-resolution spectroscopy. It
was efficient, flexible and had
wide wavelength coverage 12 .
However, its designers had not

11	

The reason for two departments was to separate work on optical and infrared instruments. These evolved at a
different pace and in any case had somewhat different requirements.

12	

Years later, to illustrate the versatility of EMMI, Hans Dekker made an analogy with the mythical Bavarian
animal, the “egg-laying woolmilkpig” (Dekker, 2009).

131

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

anticipated the spectacular first-light images produced by the NTT (see also Chapter II-9). These images provided a stark illustration of what could be achieved by controlling the dome temperature and ventilation to optimise the local seeing. But they
also demonstrated the quality of the site — and it was realised that the instruments
would not be able to take full advantage of superb atmospheric conditions when they
occurred. Since it became clear that this actually happened “ for a relevant fraction of
the observing time” (D’Odorico, 1991)13 , ESO set out to quickly develop a CCD camera that, with a pixel size corresponding to 0.13 arcseconds, would be able to exploit
these opportunities — the SUperb Seeing Imager, or SUSI, for short14 . And quick it
was: SUSI saw first light in April 1991, sitting on the so-called Nasmyth B platform
of the telescope, together with IRSPEC.
≈
Let us briefly turn to the subject of observations in the infrared. Infrared observations complement observations at visual wavelengths. They provide us with additional information about the nature of the objects that we study and, in some cases,
they allow us to study objects that cannot be seen at all in visible light. This is, for
example, the case for stars in their early formation phase, which occurs inside dense
clouds of gas and dust, impenetrable to visible light. Likewise, the central part of the
Milky Way is heavily obscured by dust while it shines brightly in the infrared. At
certain wavelengths, infrared observations can be carried out from the ground, but
at others space-borne telescopes are needed. ESO, of course, focuses on the groundbased work.
If ground-based observational astronomy is normally a struggle for photons, it could
be said that infrared observations are as much a struggle against photons. This is
because of the high degree of infrared radiation in the local environment compared
to that coming from distant celestial sources. Infrared radiation is basically heat and
heat is of course generated almost everywhere. Even the telescope structure itself radiates heat and so does the large quantity of electronics associated with any modern
telescope. Add to this the fact that the atmosphere is partly opaque to infrared radiation from the Universe (while itself being a strong infrared emitter) and the challenge
13	

According to the 1990 ESO Annual Report, about 10% of the observing time at La Silla offered a seeing better
than 0.5 arcseconds (full width at half maximum [FWHM]).

14	

In 1995, ESO in collaboration with the Osservatorio Astronomico di Roma upgraded the instrument with a
new imager with a much larger field and of a better camera as regards read-out speed and sensitivity.

132

Chapter II-3 ∙ EMMI, SUSI, SOFI and the other Darlings

facing infrared astronomers becomes clear. As ESO astronomer Hans-Ulrich Käufl
expressed it rather graphically: “Translated into the words of optical astronomy this
is equivalent to observing stars from within a furnace (like the one in which the VLT
blanks have been cast) rather than from a dark astronomical site.” (Käufl, 1993). At
least part of the technical remedy is cryogenics. The study of heat sources in the sky,
thus, becomes cool science, literally speaking. The engineering task is to build complex opto-mechanical instruments that can operate flawlessly in ultra-low temperatures. But there is more to it. Even without the local effects the excess radiation
from space is sparse. Observing an object in the infrared therefore requires a constant check on the general sky background, which is achieved by switching between
the field of observation and a neighbouring field. This is best achieved with the help
of a so-called “chopping secondary”, i.e. by moving the secondary mirror frequently
— and rapidly — between two positions. This is not in itself trivial, considering the
mass of the mirror and the requirements in terms of constant optical precision, but
it is feasible.
Infrared astronomy, however, was not just a struggle for or against photons. It was
also a struggle for detectors. The technological development received a boost in the
1980s in the context of the US Strategic Defence Initiative, also known as the Star
Wars Programme. This however meant that whilst new detectors were being developed in America, the US military also controlled the market and obtaining export
licenses was difficult. Since US observatories had better access and furthermore benefited from the Hubble Space Telescope programme15 , ESO and European astronomers were put at a disadvantage. In Europe, the French and UK carried out military
development programmes in this area as well, but obtaining access to these developments for civil applications was exceedingly difficult.
ESO’s first infrared imager offered as a common user instrument was IRAC, the
InfraRed Array Camera, which was mounted on the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope
in 1988. The camera had a 64 × 64 pixel detector. It was followed in 1992 by the
Thermal lnfrared Multimode Instrument (TIMMI). Developed at the Laboratoire
d’électronique et de technologie de l’information (LETI/LIR) in Grenoble, the first
TIMMI detector was based on the detector of ISOCAM16 , flown on the ESA Infrared
15	

In particular, the development of the NICMOS instrument for the Hubble Space Telescope (HST).

16	

Despite the difficulties regarding military developments, Pierre Léna had started discussions with C
­ ommissariat
à l’Energie Atomique (CEA) about supplying the detectors for ISOCAM. Together with François Sibille, he
carried out important preparatory work for this project. The principal investigator of ISOCAM was Catherine
Cesarsky, who became ESO Director General in 1999.

133

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Space Observatory (ISO). TIMMI was described as a kind of infrared EFOSC (Käufl
et al., 1992), and like its next of kin placed at the Cassegrain focus of the 3.6-metre
telescope. It provided for imaging as well as some long-slit spectroscopy, and as such
was probably the first instrument of its kind in the world (Käufl, 1994). The TIMMI
instrument was built by the Service d’Astrophysique of the French Commissariat
à l’Energie Atomique. In view of ESO’s VLT instrumentation plans, the TIMMI
contract therefore also served to test the waters regarding procurement of scientific
instruments from national institutes, a topic to which we shall return later. As part
of the La Silla upgrade effort, described in Chapter III-8, TIMMI was replaced
in 2000 by a completely new camera — now with a 240 × 320 pixel detector —
this time built by the Astrophysikalisches Institut und Sternwarte of the FriedrichSchiller-Universität (FSU) in Jena, Germany 17. The Universität Wien was also
involved and contributed software. TIMMI 2, as the instrument was called, was
discontinued in June 2006.
A further instrument for the near-infrared (wavelengths in the range 1–2.5 μm)
was SOFI, an imager/spectrometer: i.e. yet another “infrared EFOSC”. SOFI was
installed at the NTT on La Silla in early December 1997 (Moorwood et al., 1998).
From a semantic point of view, the name constituted a bit of a paradox: SOFI stands
for “Son OF ISAAC”, the larger and more complex Infrared Spectrometer And Array
Camera (ISAAC) infrared instrument, which was being built for the VLT. As we
shall also see later, developing advanced instrumentation can take a long time, but
SOFI was in fact realised by ESO in less than two years and in parallel with the ongoing ISAAC development. For that reason it was also finished before its father, hardly
a normal father–son relationship! SOFI, however, was a son in spirit and to some
extent even in parts. It was built in the context of the NTT Upgrade Plan to maintain the NTT, and La Silla, as a competitive facility, albeit at low cost and within
a minimum use of time. This does not mean that it was a secondary instrument in
terms of its scientific capabilities. By the late 1990s, infrared detector development
had made great advances, opening new opportunities for observers. Thus SOFI provided much improved performance over IRSPEC, its predecessor at the NTT, both
in terms of resolution, limiting magnitude and sensitivity.
It is difficult to overestimate the importance of the increased focus on instrumentation. In fact, improvements in instrumentation optics, allowing for higher
17	

This project was funded by means made available to institutes in the former East Germany in connection with
the German reunification effort.

134

Chapter II-3 ∙ EMMI, SUSI, SOFI and the other Darlings

efficiencies, and dramatically increased sensitivity of detectors and the associated
electronics had a significantly stronger impact than the growth in telescope size.
The increase in sensitivity of existing telescopes was equivalent to a fivefold growth
in their size (Gilmozzi, 2006). This development had, however, only just started. As
we shall see when we deal with instrumentation for the VLT in Chapter III-2, enormous strides forward could still be made, a situation that prevails to this very day.
Yet, as we build ever more efficient instruments, fitted with detectors that exploit
almost 100% of the light, it also becomes clear that the next leap forward will only
be possible with larger telescopes. Much larger telescopes. We will come back to this
issue later in the book. For now, we shall take a look, not at a larger telescope, but at
one in an unusual place.

135

Chapter II-4

Hubble at ESO
“ESO has provided much more than an operational
infrastructure for the ECF. It has
created a rich and active scientific environment for the staff
and enabled the exchange
of ideas on a wide range of technical issues.”
Fosbury & Albrecht, 2002.

E

SO is devoted to ground-based observational astronomy, but there are clear synergies with space facilities as well. As the project for the Space Telescope (later
to be named after Edwin P. Hubble) began to take firm shape, both the synergies
with observatories on the ground and the need for astronomers to be involved early
on became evident, in the US as well as in Europe. The 2.4-metre Hubble Space
Telescope is a joint NASA/ESA project, although with a 15% share, ESA is a relatively small partner. The main facility to handle the data is the Space Telescope Science Institute (STScI) located on the campus of the Johns Hopkins University in
Baltimore, M
­ aryland (with Riccardo Giacconi as its first director). To assist European astronomers, however, a service facility in Europe was considered necessary. In
1980, ESA invited bids to host and co-sponsor this facility, and on 26 June 1981, it
selected ESO over rival proposals by the Royal Observatory Edinburgh, the Institute
of Space Astrophysics at Frascati and the Institut d’Astrophysique de Paris. As reasons for choosing ESO, Bob Fosbury and Rudi Albrecht wrote: “Strong points of the
ESO proposal were the large, although not 100%, overlap of the ESA and ESO scientific
communities and the fact that ESO was already operating a major multinational observatory in Chile using an operating concept similar in many respects to that foreseen for
HST.” (Fosbury & Albrecht, ibid.). So, on 23 February 1983, the Directors General
of ESA, Erik Quistgaard, and ESO, Lodewijk Woltjer, signed the agreement for the
Space Telescope European Coordinating Facility (ST-ECF), and in April 1984, the
facility was set up at ESO’s Headquarters in Garching. The ST-ECF was headed by
Piero Benvenuti, who had worked in the International Ultraviolet Explorer (IUE)

137

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

project. It had an original staff complement of fourteen, seven from ESA and seven
from ESO.
The ST-ECF was intended “to enhance the capabilities within Europe for the scientific
use of the Space Telescope and of its data archive.” (Benvenuti, 1984). The initial tasks
of the ST-ECF were “coordination of development of ST-related data analysis software
in Europe and with the Space Telescope Science Institute in the US, [developing] original application software for the reduction and analysis of ST data, [creating] an efficient means of archiving, cataloguing, retrieving and disseminating non-proprietary ST
data,” as well as providing advice and support for European ST users.
≈
The telescope was originally supposed to be launched on the NASA Space Shuttle in
1983, but the project suffered serious delays. For a long time the launch was scheduled
for October 1986, so that the ST-ECF was established well before the planned start
of operations. But on 28 January of that year the Space Shuttle Challenger exploded
during launch, with the tragic loss of seven astronauts, and the entire shuttle fleet
was grounded for 32 months. The launch of the Space Telescope finally occurred on
24 April 1990 to much public attention. This was not simply because of the impressive sight of the launch itself, but because of the massive public relations campaign
that NASA had conducted in support of the project. On 20 May 1990, the telescope
saw official first light, initially with a one-second exposure, followed by another of
30 seconds of NGC 3532, an open cluster of stars in the southern constellation of
Carina. First light images are always a special experience. They are not intended to
be used scientifically. More than anything, they provide the first glimpse of how the
telescope is performing, of great interest to scientists and engineers alike. They are of
course also widely disseminated by the media and of interest to the public in general.
At this point the scientists and engineers may subsequently spend quite a bit of time
carefully analysing the images to understand better how well the telescope works
and how it can be further fine-tuned. But the requirements of the media in terms of
immediate information, in simple straightforward language, are difficult to reconcile. And so it happened that the first reports about Hubble’s first light were quite
upbeat. This was misleading, for things were far from well. A second observation carried out some days later, a 100-second exposure with Hubble’s Wide-Field Planetary
Camera, confirmed the growing suspicion that something was seriously wrong. On
17 June 1990, first light was then achieved for the second on-board instrument, the
Faint Object Camera (FOC), an ESA contribution to Hubble.

138

Chapter II-4 ∙ Hubble at ESO

According to Eric Chaisson, then Director of Educational Programs (and also handling media requests) at the Space Telescope Science Institute, the STScI scientists
were acutely aware of ESO’s initial success with its 3.5-metre New Technology Tele­
scope (see Chapter II-9), which had delivered the then sharpest image of a celestial
object ever obtained. “There was a bit of a race between ESA and ESO for the sharpest
images of the sky,” he claims (Chaisson, 1994). This is a bit of stretch, though. Firstly,
space-borne and ground-based facilities are clearly complementary; secondly if there
had ever been competition in the field of optical imagery between the ESO NTT and
the Hubble Space Telescope, it was certainly one of (a very modest) David against
(a mighty) Goliath1. However, in this phase, it was indeed the NTT that took home
the points — a fact that, as we shall see later, was not without irony. In any event, the
first light images obtained with Hubble’s FOC did not bring relief to the NASA/ESA
team in Baltimore. As it turned out, the telescope’s primary mirror suffered from
an optical flaw, the primary mirror being too flat along the edges by a minute, but
decisive 2 µm. This caused a spherical aberration, which meant that only about 15%
of the starlight was concentrated within 0.2 arcseconds, the rest being spread over
a much larger area (Wilson, 1999). A layman might have described the images simply as fuzzy or out of focus, but things were more complicated than that. And that
proved to be a good thing.
As soon as the problem was recognised, a frantic search for solutions began. Between
August and October 1990, an ad hoc panel of experts was formed to consider possible
solutions. With Hubble in orbit above the Earth, there was obviously no possibility
of a quick fix to the problem. The way forward therefore branched into two strands
— what could be done immediately in terms of processing the degraded images and
what could be done to cure the problem by in situ treatment, which would have to
await the first service mission with NASA’s Space Shuttle. Two ESO scientists played
important roles in that connection, Ray Wilson and Leon Lucy, of whom the latter
would soon join the ST-ECF team.
For the short-term solution, the particular pattern of the stellar images, caused by
the spherical aberration, lent itself well to analysis and the application of the numerical image-processing technique known as deconvolution. Some of these deconvolution methods are closely related to those used in work on another problem that was
recognised even before the launch of Hubble. Astronomers call this “undersampling
1	

In Chaisson’s estimate, the NTT cost 1/100 of Hubble, though this cannot take the launch cost for the service
missions into account.

139

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

of the point spread function (PSF) by the detector array”, meaning that the detector
is not able to capture details as fine as those that the telescope can actually see. The
reason for this was partly that at the time the telescope was designed, CCD detectors
were coarse, small and with relatively few pixels. To cover a reasonable field, detectors were mounted next to each other in an array 2 . Another reason had to do with
the wish to minimise “detector noise”. In any event, it was thought that this problem could be corrected partly through image reconstruction, and therefore scientists had been thinking about this for a while. Lucy had been working with another
ESO colleague, Dietrich Baade, and in an article in The ESO Messenger in September 1990 they proposed their method as a powerful way of dealing with the gravely
affected Hubble images (Baade & Lucy, 1990). During the previous year, they had
already demonstrated the efficiency of their method in connection with the NTT
first light image, which featured a treated version as an add-on to the already outstanding image, produced with the NTT’s active optical system. The methods developed by Lucy, Richard Hook and Hans-Martin Adorf at the ST-ECF to reconstruct
full-resolution images from dithered exposures from the Hubble cameras became a
standard operating procedure for Hubble and strongly influenced the choice of pixel
scale for the telescope’s subsequent cameras (ACS and WFC3).
With the application of the Lucy method and others developed elsewhere, it became
possible to reconstruct the Hubble images and thereby achieve the originally foreseen resolution, although crucially it could not make up for the loss in contrast and
sensitivity. The work of those early years, thus, helped to deal with a serious threat
to the Hubble programme. But it also had a long-term effect. Appropriately, Bob
Fosbury and Rudi Albrecht, wrote: “While, in retrospect, those three years of aberrated HST operation have been largely eclipsed by the superb optical performance subsequently achieved, the mathematical infrastructure triggered by those early needs has
matured and grown into many areas of astronomical data analysis, including spectroscopy as well as imaging.”
As regards possible longer-term solutions to Hubble’s ailment, Ray Wilson carried
out a thorough analysis of the first images. Transforming what opticians call the longitudinal aberration into the wavefront aberration — which is the physical measure
of the aberration — was necessary to understand the precise nature of the error and
therefore to work out any possible corrective measure. In the end some 15 different
2	

To cover the gaps between the detectors the technique of “dithering” was developed, i.e. combining multiple,
slightly shifted exposures.

140

Chapter II-4 ∙ Hubble at ESO

options to solve the problem presented themselves. They ranged from a group of
solutions to provide a full-field correction at full aperture to providing corrections
for the individual on-board instruments. A group of options was designated radical solutions. The first group contained proposals such as placing a helium lens over
the telescope or an aspheric mirror placed at an angle of 45 degrees above the telescope, possibly as a free-flying module. Based on his mathematical analysis, Wilson
provided an elaborate overview with the pros and cons of each solution. One option,
however, did not need scientific computation. It was listed under the radical solutions and simply said: “Build new HST!” (Wilson, 1990)3 .
In the end a relatively simple solution known as COSTAR was chosen. COSTAR,
or the Corrective Optics Space Telescope Axial Replacement, was designed to correct the spherical aberration for three of Hubble’s instruments, the Faint Object
­Camera, the High Resolution Spectrograph (HRS), and the Faint Object Spectrograph (FOS). It was popularly described as a “contact lens”, but in reality consisted
of several pairs of small mirrors that would correct the flaw before feeding the light
into the science instruments, in what opticians call pre-focal plane correction4 . New
instruments, developed later each contained their own corrective optics, so that
COSTAR could be removed during the 2009 servicing mission.
As Wilson later acknowledged: “What determined what would be done, what could be
done, was not people doing equations with optics on the Earth, but the astronauts up in
space … the COSTAR solution was chosen because it was the only one they could carry
out.” COSTAR could be slipped in as replacement of the High Speed Photometer,
and thus did not require high-precision work during the EVA — or spacewalk —
beyond what was possible for the astronauts with their thick suits and gloves. The first
servicing mission was carried out in December 1993, and COSTAR was installed,
as well as a new, corrected, camera called WFPC2. Among the astronauts was the
Swiss astronomer Claude Nicollier, who had in the past also observed at La Silla.
It was therefore a particular pleasure to receive him and his colleagues at the ESO
Headquarters on 16 February 1994, as the team made a high-profile visit to Europe.

3	

Much of Wilson’s report is found again in the official NASA/STScI report, published in 1991. The radical solutions, however, are not!

4	

Wilson provides a brief overview of the options for correcting the spherical aberration in the March 1991 issue
of the ST-ECF Newsletter.

141

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

On Wednesday, 16 February 1994, the STS-61 crew that successfully repaired the Hubble Space Telescope
during a Space Shuttle mission in December 1993 paid a visit to the ESO Headquarters. Among the crew
members was the Swiss scientist Claude Nicollier, who had previously carried out observations at La Silla.
Seen here are Nicollier and Harry van der Laan. The ESO flag was flown on the Shuttle mission and is
now on display at the ESO Headquarters. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

The ST-ECF was born before the internet-based worldwide web, originally developed
at ESO’s sister organisation CERN, changed so much about the way that we communicate and work. Not surprisingly, among the first professionals to understand
and exploit the new opportunities offered by the web were scientists and so, by the
mid 1990s, some of the original functions of the ST-ECF were no longer necessary.
Of course, it was still important for ESA to possess in-house expertise as regards
­Hubble and its instruments as well as an independent data analysis and curation
capability. Following a review by Len Culhane, Rolf-Peter Kudritzki and George
Miley, the ST-ECF took on new tasks including work on the Guide Star Catalog II
(GSCII) and post-operational archive calibration. The ST-ECF developed unique
know-how, for example, in the area of dealing with slitless spectroscopy data, from
Hubble’s ACS 5 and NICMOS 6 instruments, delivering science-ready data to what
has become known as the Hubble Legacy Archive. At the same time, not having
5	

Advanced Camera for Surveys

6	

Near Infrared Camera and Multi-Object Spectrometer

142

Chapter II-4 ∙ Hubble at ESO

day-to-day operational responsibilities, it could act in some respects as a think tank.
In a sense, the ST-ECF moved from being fundamentally a Hubble outlet, providing an interface to the European astronomical community, to contributing to the
ongoing Hubble programme in an integrated manner. In this way the ST-ECF also
helped to secure a strong European participation in the Hubble programme, perhaps
even exceeding that which the financial contribution might seem to suggest. On the
other hand, with the encouragement of NASA, the ST-ECF also began an outreach
effort 7, aimed at demonstrating that Hubble included significant European participation. This effort would later be integrated into ESO’s outreach activities.

With its iconic status, the HST generated much interest among visitors to the ESO Open House Days. In
this picture, from October 2006, Michael Rosa and Lars Lindberg Christensen are surrounded by visitors,
curious to learn about the telescope and the role of ST-ECF. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

≈
In 2010, the sun set on the ST-ECF. Amazingly, Hubble was still going strong 8 . It had
arguably become the most iconic telescope in the history of astronomy, but it had seen
7	

Led by Lars Lindberg Christensen, who later took charge of ESO Outreach.

8	

Hubble’s design lifetime was 15 years.

143

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

its last servicing mission and, in any case, had outlived the original need and reason
for having a pied-a-terre in Europe. The next large space telescope, originally known
as the Next Generation Space Telescope and later renamed the James Webb Space
Telescope, will require a different operation model. Furthermore, by 2002, ESA had
decided to move some of its activities from Garching to its own centre at Villafranca
near Madrid, which in the past had been the operational centre for the IUE.

The location of the ST-ECF at ESO strengthened the ties between Europe’s space-borne and ground-based
observational astronomy. Like ESO, the ST-ECF had a Users Committee. In this photo, from 1998, the
committee members, together with Tim de Zeeuw who was visiting ESO at the time, are taking time off
to see for themselves the progress on VLT instrumentation, in the shape of the high resolution spectrograph UVES. From left to right: Reynier Peletier, Max Pettini, Tim de Zeeuw, Yannick Mellier, Lukas
Labhardt, Sandro D’Odorico and Giovanni Zamorani. (Photo: Robert Fosbury)

144

Chapter II-4 ∙ Hubble at ESO

What, then, did the ST-ECF mean to ESO? The ST-ECF was embedded in the ESO
system, yet it always kept a high degree of independence. It operated in a fruitful
symbiosis with ESO and, especially under the directorship of Giacconi, became an
important cultural interface, between those familiar with space-borne operations in
astronomy and those on the ground. The combination of the information technology (IT) revolution and the operational concepts and requirements of space operations strongly influenced ESO’s thinking about the VLT, especially in the area of
data management and curation of scientific data9 . Indeed perhaps the most important contribution lay in the operational experience gained from constructing a science archive with the original data at STScI and a copy at the ST-ECF in Garching,
the content of which would be made available to the worldwide community of scientists, released after one year of propriety usage by the original observing teams. It
became the model upon which the ESO Science Archive was built and run, both as
an archive in its own right and as an integral part of an overall operating concept
for the VLT and some of the other telescopes at ESO. Through the ST-ECF, ESA/
ESO relations were strengthened considerably, both institutionally and at the personal level. Thus the two organisations organised workshops and published reports
about topics in astrophysics that could be addressed in a complementary way by each
other — such as exoplanet research, fundamental cosmology, studies of star populations in the Milky Way, including their chemistry and dynamics, and on synergies
between the Herschel mission and the Atacama Large Millimeter/­submillimeter
Array (ALMA) project.

9	

In fact, the long-term head of the ST-ECF, Benvenuti, also became the first — interim — head of ESO’s Data
Management Division, established during Riccardo Giacconi’s directorship at ESO.

145

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Comet Halley seen from La Silla on 21 March
1986. At that time the comet was 118 million
kilometres from the Earth and 151 million kilometres from the Sun. (Photo: Reinhold Häffner)

146

Chapter II-5

History in Passing
“Comets drive people dotty.”
Nigel Calder, 1980.

I

f members of the public were asked to list well-known astronomical objects apart
from the planets in the Solar System, one object that would almost certainly come
out at the top of the list would be a comet — Halley’s Comet, named after the
famous British astronomer Edmund Halley. It is a tradition to name comets after
their discoverers, but Halley’s great contribution lay not in discovering the comet of
1682, but in showing that it was a periodic comet that had been seen in the past. In
fact, research by historians of astronomy has since revealed observational records of
­Halley’s comet as far back as 164 BC (Tammann & Véron, 1985), and perhaps even
earlier. But more importantly Edmund Halley’s insight enabled him to successfully
predict the return of the comet in 1758, 76 years later — an event that he unfortunately was not to enjoy himself. Since then, Halley’s Comet has been with us as a
recurrent feature and through its returns in 1835 and 1910 attained an almost iconic
status. The return in 1985/86, thus, was not a surprise, yet it was eagerly awaited by
those astronomers who take a special interest in the Solar System and its objects.
And, of course, members of the public had also heard about the famous visitor, but
few living people had actually seen it. This time Halley would be welcomed by an
armada of astronomical telescopes placed all over the world and also spacecraft from
Japan, Russia (USSR) and Europe. The most ambitious space project was the Giotto
mission from ESO’s sister organisation, the European Space Agency. To coordinate
the global observation effort, the International Halley Watch was set up in 1982 as
a network of observers across the planet and with NASA’s Jet Propulsion Laboratory (JPL) as the central node.
The conditions for observing the comet were somewhat complicated by the fact that
around the time of perihelion, the closest point to the Sun, the comet and the Earth
would be on opposite sides of the Sun. On the other hand, the comet was predicted
to reach its peak brightness while moving through the southern skies, a fact that

147

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

naturally pleased ESO observers. It was therefore evident that ESO’s telescopes at
La Silla could make a major contribution to the worldwide effort. Perhaps of greatest importance were precise measurements to determine the orbit and the rotation of
the comet’s nucleus, crucial information needed to steer the spacecraft scheduled to
perform fly-bys. For the Giotto probe, it meant penetrating the coma and sweeping
past the nucleus at a distance of a few hundred kilometres. Without a correct orbit
determination, the probe might not achieve this goal.
During the 1910 passage — or apparition as astronomers call it — the first detection
was made by the Helwan Observatory in Egypt on 24 August 1909, eight months
before the comet passed perihelion. By the time of the second apparition in the 20th
century, however, progress in observation techniques allowed astronomers to follow
the comet for much longer (and earlier). This allowed them to study the comet before
heat from the Sun had caused the development of the coma, the characteristic giant
cloud of gas and dust that surrounds the comet’s nucleus, and the source of the brightness that allowed naked-eye observations during the passage. The first detection was
made with the 5-metre Hale Telescope at Mount Palomar as early as 16 October
1982, no less than 40 months before perihelion. At that time, the comet was at a distance of 10.5 AU1, i.e. beyond the orbit of Saturn, and racing towards the Sun. And
on 10 December of that year, ESO reported its first detection 2 by Holger Pedersen,
using the significantly smaller Danish 1.54-metre telescope and blind tracking. At
the time, Halley had a magnitude of a mere 24.5, more than 8 magnitudes fainter
than when it had first been spotted in 1909.
Meanwhile, the need for fresh positional information to refine the orbital calculations remained. In an article in The ESO Messenger, one of the observers, ­R ichard
West, provided a vivid description of this difficult work, and we shall simply let
him speak here, describing this quite unusual observing run: “During most of the
months of June and July 1985, Halley was behind the Sun and could not be observed.
From about 15 July, attempts to obtain images of Halley were made in various places,
and it now appears that the first confirmed sighting was made at the European Southern Observatory on 19 July. On this date Halley was at declination +18 degrees and
only 30 degrees west of the Sun. From the time the comet rose over the eastern horizon
1	

An astronomical unit (AU) equals the mean Sun–Earth distance or roughly 149.6 million kilometres.

2	

First attempts with the 3.6-metre telescope and the 1.54-metre Danish telescope had been undertaken as early
as 1980, but they had failed, the comet’s nucleus being too faint for the detector, photographic plates at the 3.6metre telescope, and the electronographic McMullan camera on the 1.54-metre (West, 1983).

148

Chapter II-5 ∙ History in Passing

at La Silla to the moment when the sky brightness became excessive, there was at most
20 minutes. The only telescope at La Silla which is able to point in this direction is the
40-centimetre double astrograph (GPO) — all others are prohibited [from doing so] by
sophisticated computer control or limit switches without pity. The 40 centimetre is also
the smallest telescope on La Silla, so the outcome of the attempt to observe Halley was
very doubtful. At this very low altitude, accurate guiding is difficult because the refraction in the Earth’s atmosphere changes very rapidly as the object moves away from the
horizon. Moreover, the expected brightness of Halley was only 14.5–15.0 and it could
under no circumstances be seen in the guiding telescope. Offset guiding at the rate of the
comet’s motion was therefore necessary.
Together with Drs Pereyra and Tucholke, I was not optimistic about the prospects on
that morning, when we made the first attempt. A heavy bar, which supports the dome,
obstructed the view and it was only possible to get one good 10-minute II a-O plate.
After processing, it was inspected carefully — it showed stars down to 16th magnitude
or fainter, but there was no obvious comet image. Since the field is in the Milky Way,
there were several very faint images; however, they all turned out to be faint stars when
a comparison was made with the Palomar Atlas.
Another plate was obtained on 20 July, but this morning the wind was strong and gusty
and the telescope could not be held steady. The limiting magnitude was therefore about
0.5 magnitudes brighter than on the preceding morning. Then came a snowstorm and
with that the end of our attempts.” (West, 1985) But they were not in vain. Using a special enhancement technique, the comet was in fact later found on both plates, allowing new positional determinations that were subsequently confirmed from other
observatories. As a side note, it was gratifying that the venerable GPO, which had
been in service during the early days in South Africa as well as at La Silla, was still
found to be a very useful instrument, albeit for these rather special observations3 . It
is worth remembering at a time when observers sit comfortably behind flat-screen
monitors in air-conditioned control rooms that observing with a telescope like the
GPO meant working in an open dome, hardly a pleasure in a situation with strong
winds and icy temperatures.
≈
3	

The GPO was finally retired in the middle of 1995. Some 15 000 photographic plates had been obtained with it.
Belgian astronomer Olivier Hainaut and his French colleague Christian Coutures switched off the light (Ihle,
1995).

149

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

When Halley passed perihelion on 9 February 1986, it was again behind the Sun as
seen from the Earth. This was just one month before the planned encounter with the
Giotto probe and once more updated positional measurements were in high demand.
Fortunately on 15 February, when the comet was seen no more than 15 arcminutes
above the horizon, the first ground-based observations could be made from La Silla
— once again with the venerable GPO (Laustsen et al., 1987). The early sighting confirmed that the comet had survived its perihelion passage and allowed for higher precision determination of the orbit as Giotto and the other space probes were racing
towards their encounter. Astrometric observations from La Silla continued right up
to shortly before the encounter on 13 March.

The first observation of Comet Halley after perihelion. The comet is the tiny white dot just above the
horizon.

As Halley moved closer to the Sun, it slowly began to brighten and eventually to
unfold a spectacular dust and ion tail. However, some of the most spectacular observations were only obtained after perihelion. At the beginning of March 1986, the
comet reached its peak brightness, with a magnitude of 2.6, while on 11 April it
reached its closest point to the Earth.

150

Chapter II-5 ∙ History in Passing

While many observers focussed on improving our knowledge of the nucleus — its
composition and structure, its jet-releasing vents and its rotation, the ESO Schmidt
telescope was essential to study the large-scale phenomena, such as the evolution of
the tails. But specially developed equipment was also used at La Silla. With a widefield camera equipped with a CCD detector, Holger Pedersen obtained a truly spectacular time-lapse sequence of the rapid changes in Halley’s tails between 23 February and 8 March.
0
0

200

200

0

400

200

400

400

1500

1500 1500

1500 1500

1500

1000

1000 1000

1000 1000

1000

500

500

500

500

500

500

0

0

0

0

0
0

200

400

Mar 3

0

200

400

Mar 4

0
0

200

400

Mar 5

From Holger Pedersen’s time-lapse observations: Variations in Comet Halley’s ion tail in early March
1986.

On 13 March, ESA’s Giotto space probe delivered a sterling performance in a d­ ramatic
close encounter with Halley. Not surprisingly, the probe was seriously damaged 4 by
cometary dust particles, and its camera was destroyed. But before this ­happened, it
4	

Orginally thought to have been lost, Giotto survived and was brought back into action for a new cometary
encounter. Although the camera remained dysfunctional, the spacecraft collected very valuable data about
Comet Grigg-Skjellerup six years later, a feat of which ESA can justifiably be proud.

151

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

had captured stunning close-up images of the nucleus, leading to a revision of our
ideas about this kind of body. From the point of view of this book, the Giotto experience also emphasised the value of close cooperation between ground-based and
space-borne facilities with their complementary capabilities. With scientists from
ESA and ESO working hand in hand during these intense months there is no doubt
that relations between the two organisations was strengthened.
As Halley again moved away from us towards its icy aphelion, which it will reach
in December 2023, observations gradually ceased. However, in 2003, using three
Unit Telescopes of the Very Large Telescope Array, ESO astronomers caught a final
glimpse of the famous celestial body. With a magnitude of a feeble 28.2, no other
observations have ever been made of a comet that faint and far away — 4200 million
kilometres or 28.06 AU from the Sun. However, with today’s technology it would
even be technically possible to follow the comet throughout its entire orbit.
≈
Of course, Halley’s Comet generated strong public interest. Weather conditions in
Europe were not favourable, but many people saw a comet for the first time. Some
even went for comet flights on chartered airplanes, evading the winter clouds. ESO
had just established an information service and a small embryonic group was beginning to form. The Halley apparition clearly offered a unique chance to launch this
new service, and within the shortest space of time the group created an itinerant exhibition with spectacular images of the comet, obtained from La Silla. The first stop
for the show was the head office seat of the Reuschel Bank in downtown Munich.
The exhibition opened here on 20 March amidst great public attention. Much of
the image material, including the time-lapse sequence, would later find its way into
planetarium programmes in Europe. Perhaps coincidentally, the 1986 apparition of
Comet Halley became the moment of birth for ESO’s public outreach activities to
which we shall return in Chapter IV-10.
Halley’s Comet has occasionally been described as the comet of the century. If brightness is the determinant, Halley does not deserve this title. The brightest comet of
the 20th century was Comet Ikeya-Seki (C/1965 S1), but other comets have stood
out, including Comet West (C/1975 V1), Comet Kohoutek (C/1973 E1), Comet
­Hyakutake (C/1996 B2) and Comet Hale–Bopp (C/1995 O1). Even so, Halley visited us twice in the 20th century and it is bound to remain the archetypal cometary

152

Chapter II-5 ∙ History in Passing

event in the public perception. Yet if 1986 had been a remarkable year in terms of
the public awareness of astronomy, the following year would be no less interesting,
although this time the events were completely unexpected.

153

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Supernova 1987A, the bright star at the centre
of the picture, observed with the ESO Schmidt
telescope. The supernova is embedded in a complex system of ionised hydrogen nebulae, called
H II regions by astronomers, with the Tarantula
Nebula (upper left), as the most prominent object.

154

Chapter II-6

An Annus Mirabilis
“I don’t think that any astronomer slept
for more than 2–3 hours a day during the first
two weeks.”
Patrice Bouchet1

F

or Europeans, the month of February is associated with the depths of winter,
with rain or snow depending on the location. But in the southern hemisphere, it
is summer with warm days and clear skies. February is a good month to observe in.
Naturally, the nights are not as long as the winter nights, but the observing conditions are usually excellent. In the language of the ESO Annual Report, “the Octoberto-April period includes the meteorologically most favourable months and also coincides
with the Magellanic Clouds season.” The month of February 1987 was no exception
and La Silla was as vibrant as ever, with 14 telescopes in operation.
To accommodate the visiting astronomers, La Silla has a hotel and a large canteen.
Since the observatory is open 24 hours a day, the canteen is not only open most of
the time, but also geared to serve different kinds of meals at odd times. In the afternoon, at tea time, astronomers normally show up, some to have breakfast and all to
have a chat before preparations for the work during the coming night begin. From
the canteen there is a wonderful view of the surrounding mountains and, 27 kilometres away, another string of telescope domes can be seen: the Las ­Campanas Observatory, operated by the Carnegie Foundation. While sipping their tea in the afternoon
of 24 February, how many astronomers took a casual glance at Campanas, with its
domes reflecting the afternoon sunlight? We shall never know, but if some of them
were still sleepy from the previous night’s observations, they would soon wake up
and look across the valley.

1	

Interview with the author on 16 October, 1992.

155

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The canteen at La Silla, seen sometime in the 1980s. (Photo: Albert Bosker)

Before tea, Bo Reipurth, who was the Astronomer on Duty during that week, sat in
his office busily preparing for the night. Stefano Cristiani came into the office and
handed him a telex 2 . Reipurth took a quick glance at it. “Well, another supernova,” he
said and gave the telex back. Occupied with operational issues, he had clearly not yet
grasped what this meant. “Take a look at the magnitude…,” Cristiani suggested. Then
the implications dawned on Reipurth. He went over to the restaurant with the telex.
The telex contained a note from the IAU Central Bureau for Astronomical Telegrams
with the number Circular 4316. It said: “SUPERNOVA 1987A IN THE LARGE
MAGELLANIC CLOUD — W. Kunkel and B. Madore, Las Campanas Observatory, report the discovery by Ian Shelton, University of Toronto Las Campanas Station,
of a mag 5 object, ostensibly a supernova, in the Large Magellanic Cloud… .”
Supernovae of the core-collapse type are massive stars — at least eight times heavier
than the Sun — that have come to the end of their life-cycle. It is a little similar for
2	

With three large observatories in the IV region of Chile, direct contact between them could be expected on such
an occasion. An alert call had also come in from Mark Phillips at Cerro Tololo to Patrice Bouchet, who had just
arrived in Santiago after an observing run at La Silla. Needless to say, Bouchet made a dash back for La Silla.

156

Chapter II-6 ∙ An Annus Mirabilis

human beings: being overweight can shorten your life and the end can be unpleasant. In the case of supernovae, the end is apocalyptic, as the star succumbs to a giant
explosion. During the last phase, the temperature inside the star rises dramatically,
which leads to a process known as nucleosynthesis, the building up of heavy elements
originally from hydrogen and helium, but already transformed in the nuclear furnace to carbon, oxygen, neon and silicon. Supernovae are thought to be cosmic factories in which a wide range of elements are forged. Most of the heavy elements that
we find on Earth were formed inside a supernova. With the explosion that rips the
star apart, the outer layers are ejected into the surrounding interstellar space, carrying some of these elements and thereby enriching the local environment. Some of
these elements may ultimately become part of the building materials for a new star.
During the explosion the star increases its brightness so much that it can shine as
brilliantly as a whole galaxy. Detecting supernovae is therefore not in itself difficult.
And, given the number of stars in the Universe, supernovae are frequent occurrences.
Yet they also happen within a gigantic volume of space. Detecting them at the time
of their explosion is thus to some extent a matter of luck. Supernovae are also common in our own galaxy, the Milky Way. Their frequency is thought to be around
one every few decades. However, they may well occur in places that are out of sight
for us, behind the thick dust clouds that are concentrated in the plane of the Milky
Way. Seeing a supernova with the unaided eye is therefore extremely rare. But it has
happened. The previous occasion was in 1604, when a supernova was observed by
Johannes Kepler. A few years earlier, in 1572, Tycho Brahe — Kepler’s mentor —
had seen one, the famous supernova in Cassiopeia. Tycho noticed the phenomenon
and described it as a “new star” (stella nova), because the brightness increase enabled
him to see it for the first time. Derived from Tycho’s description, the term supernova
was introduced in the 1930s by Walter Baade and Fritz Zwicky, a Swiss astronomer,
who like so many other scientists from Europe had emigrated to the US.
The situation that day in February 1987 was clearly exceptional: at a distance of
only 160 000 light-years, this was the closest recorded supernova since the telescope
was invented. Furthermore, no supernova had been discovered at such an early stage
before. And this time a battery of advanced telescopes with sophisticated instruments was ready.
However, a rather curious problem showed up. Most of the telescopes and indeed the
detectors and instruments had been developed with much fainter objects in mind
and not for observing objects as bright as this supernova. Before night fell, astronomers and technicians had to come up with some fairly creative solutions at the

157

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

t­ elescopes to cope with this excessive amount of light. On the other hand, it also
meant that smaller telescopes could also be used with some advantage3 .
“After sunset, we gathered in a small group waiting for full darkness to set in. As the
evening glow faded, the Large Magellanic Cloud emerged, and in it appeared a faint
reddish star. At that moment I realised that it was the most distant star I’ d ever seen
without the help of a telescope, its light having travelled for 160 000 years before reaching us,” Reipurth later recalled (Reipurth, 2010). But then a hectic observing night
began. Telescopes were trained on the target, shutters opened, photons were collected, probing eyes were cast on the first images, spectra and photometer readings
as they appeared on the screens in the control rooms.

Wide-field images of the Large Magellanic Cloud taken on 23 and 25 February 1987. These were taken
with a Hasselblad camera riding piggyback on the GPO and the Danish 1.54-metre telescope respectively.
The supernova is seen as a bright star to the right and below the Tarantula Nebula in the right-hand photo.
(Photos by the author)

One of the first questions was, which star (and which kind of star) had exploded. If
that star had been studied earlier, it would provide important information about how
stars evolve into supernovae. Here, the ESO/SRC survey came in handy. At G
­ arching,
Richard West made the first identification on ESO Schmidt plates obtained before
the event, as soon as the first astrometric information became available. It turned
3	

Since smaller telescopes are less likely to be heavily oversubscribed, it is easier to carry out long-term observations with them. In the case of SN1987, the 0.6-metre Bochum telescope in particular played an important role,
following the supernova for a year.

158

Chapter II-6 ∙ An Annus Mirabilis

out to be a blue supergiant, known to astronomers as Sanduleak -69 202. This was
a surprise, since supernovae had been thought to originate from red supergiants.
Another burning question was — what kind of supernova was this? Supernovae come
in two different main types, and until this moment, no Type II had ever been seen
in an irregular galaxy, such as the Large Magellanic Cloud. But during the very first
night at La Silla, the astronomers concluded that here was another surprise — this
was indeed a Type II. There was more to come. Later, in The ESO Messenger, John
Danziger and Patrice Bouchet captured the early moments of this remarkable episode: “During that initial period was the news, informally propagating at that stage,
but soon officially revealed in IAU Circulars … that neutrino bursts had been detected 4 ,
providing observational evidence that the theory was on the right track, but also giving
a precise time for the collapse of the core after the physicists had clarified which reported
events were real 5 . These neutrinos certainly played a part in giving an extra incentive
push that we were on to something special… .” (Danziger & Bouchet, 2007) Indeed.
It was in fact the first time ever that neutrinos from a celestial body other than the
Sun had been detected.
≈
Given the unpredictability of supernovae, it was a lucky coincidence that a number
of visiting astronomers specialising in supernova research were present at La Silla,
including Henning Jørgensen, Patrice Bouchet and John Danziger 6 . Also ESO’s
Director General, himself also an expert on the Crab Nebula7, was at La Silla at the
time (Woltjer habitually spent an extended period at the observatory at the beginning of each year). As we have discussed in Chapter I-5, observing time was based on
applications that had been vetted by the Observing Programmes Committee. But
allocation of telescope time is the prerogative of the Director General. He or she will
normally follow the recommendations by the OPC, but this was no normal situation
and observers were therefore requested 8 to abandon whatever programme they had

4	

To detect neutrinos, large underground facilities are used, often in former mines or other large subterranean
cavities. In the case of SN1987a neutrinos were detected at the Kamiokande observatory in Japan, the IrvineMichigan-Brookhaven detector in the USA and at the Baksan Neutrino Observatory in the former USSR.

5	

For the detection of the neutrinos, Masatoshi Koshiba was awarded the Nobel Prize in Physics in 2002.

6	

The main results of the observations were presented in a paper by Danziger et al., which later also became the
contribution of the ESO astronomers to the VLT Time Capsule (See Chapter III-11).

7	

A remnant of the supernova observed in the year 1054.

8	

Danziger and Bouchet use the term encouraged rather than requested, but it really meant the same!

159

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

planned in favour of studying the supernova. Most observers embraced the order with
enthusiasm, as did astronomers elsewhere at southern hemisphere observing sites.
The excitement is clear also from The ESO Messenger of March 1987, published only
20 days after the event, in which two photographs of the LMC region were shown,
before and after the explosion. Under the heading “Chronology of a Once-in-a-Lifetime Event”, Richard West, the editor, wrote “Only 48 hours separate the two photos
… but during this brief interval an event happened that excited an entire generation
of astronomers. Reflecting the importance of this supernova, the Central Bureau for
Astronomical Telegrams issued no less than 15 IAU Circulars in the course of nine days
only, breaking all records in the history of astronomy. At ESO, these circulars were read
through a computer link to the Headquarters in Garching as soon as they were issued,
and immediately sent on to the observers at La Silla by telefax. In this way, and also by
numerous telex messages and phone calls, the scientists were kept informed about what
was going on in other places.”
After the third night, Woltjer — in John Danziger’s Messenger article described as
“the admiral” — decided to have dedicated daily meetings of all the observers. To
continue the metaphor, the admiral steered his fleet effectively and efficiently —
with an authority that few others could match. The meetings lasted for hours and
one senses the excitement in a (later) statement by Patrice Bouchet: “The follow-up on
the observations… . I hope that every future generation of astronomers will experience
something like that … it was fantastic!” If the internal exchange of information functioned flawlessly, there was of course an equally intense exchange of news between
the observatories. Richard West has already mentioned the IAU Circulars, but naturally information was exchanged through all possible means — also reaching the
US media. Here, the admiral was more cautious. He sensed that, with the largest telescope park in the southern hemisphere, this was not simply ESO’s chance to demonstrate its scientific clout — a chance he had no doubt longed for — but also that
it was important to ascertain that the information to be released was correct and its
origin properly acknowledged. Amidst the understandable excitement during those
hectic days, not all observers may have agreed with this, but Woltjer had steeled
himself — and he was not alone. “The decision was correct. Others would have done
exactly the same,” one of the senior astronomers who were present later confided to
the author. For the same reason, Woltjer also pushed for fast publication of the results
in the way scientists normally do — in a peer-reviewed journal. And so, as early as
May 1987, just three months after the supernova had been discovered, six papers with
38 authors appeared in Astronomy & Astrophysics, covering astrometry, optical and

160

Chapter II-6 ∙ An Annus Mirabilis

infrared photometry, polarimetry, optical and infrared spectroscopy and high-resolution spectroscopy of this unique object. Aside from information about the supernova
itself — the precursor star, the explosion and the material ejected into the interstellar medium — the supernova had also acted as a powerful light source in the LMC,
much as a searchlight does. In this way it was possible to obtain valuable information about intervening matter in the halo of our own galaxy. This information came
through high-resolution spectroscopy with the Coudé Auxiliary Telescope9, the 1.4metre telescope that was connected with the 3.6-metre telescope, feeding the CES.
ESO also organised the first full-scale international scientific conference, with 200
participants, at the Garching Headquarters, as early as July that year.

Photo left: The participants listening to a talk by Paul Murdin at the VLT Conference in Garching. Photo
right: Wilhelm Kegel, Bruno Leibundgut, Gustav Tammann and Bob Kirshner in discussion. (Photos:
Herbert Zodet)

≈
What happened to the supernova? In the first instance, the brightness increased to
magnitude 4.5 on 28 February, then dropped briefly. It rebounded to reach 4.0 in
late March and continued until it peaked on 10 May at a magnitude of 2.8. This is
thought to have been driven by the radioactive decay of nickel and cobalt, and the
subsequent fading matched the half-life of cobalt-56 (Danziger & Bouchet, ibid.;
Wheeler, 2007).
In a review article, 20 years later, Claes Fransson and his colleagues summarise the
outcome of SN1987a so far. “It provided several observational firsts, like the detection
of neutrinos from the core collapse, the observation of the progenitor star on ­archival
9	

Especially in the study of interstellar lithium.

161

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Picture left: Light echoes from SN1987A, observed with the NTT. Emanating in all directions, some of
the light from the supernova was reflected by interstellar matter. By observing the resulting light echo it
was possible to construct a three-dimensional view of the supernova surroundings. Picture right: The light
curve of SN 1987A over more than ten years. (Source: Nick Suntzeff)

p­ hotographic plates, the signatures of a non-spherical explosion and mixing in the ejecta,
the direct observation of supernova nucleosynthesis … observation of the formation of
dust in the supernova, as well as the detection of circumstellar and interstellar material.” (Fransson et al., 2007). Several of these firsts were due to ESO observations,
including the observations of the cobalt content (observed with the 1-metre telescope) and the detection of dust in the envelope of the supernova on day 530 after
the explosion was detected. Thus the supernova has remained an interesting object
to observe, among others, with several VLT instruments, such as UVES, ISAAC and
SINFONI10 . And it still retains a secret or two: according to our current understanding of the ultimate fate of a supernova, it may end as a black hole or as a neutron star,
perhaps in the form of a pulsar — an extremely compact, rapidly spinning object.
Inspite of intense observations, however, nothing has been found so far.
While the supernova electrified the world’s community of astronomers, the public
impact in Europe was more modest, although far from negligible. By pure coincidence, a seasoned European science journalist, who shall remain unnamed here, was
present at La Silla at the time. His objective was to write about a visiting astronomer
specialising in supernova research. In the morning after observations of SN 1987A
had begun at La Silla, the author of this book met him happily walking towards the
10	

See Chapter III-2

162

Chapter II-6 ∙ An Annus Mirabilis

restaurant and a hearty breakfast. “So, have you filed your story?” I asked. “No,” he
said. “The supernova is not interesting. It can’t be seen from Europe!” The author’s reaction shall not be reported here, but it must have left a certain impression on him —
two hours later he returned. “I just sent the article,” he said.
≈

The famous gravitational arc in the galaxy cluster Abell 370, observed with the FOcal Reducer and low
dispersion Spectrograph (FORS1) on the VLT.

SN 1987A was handed to astronomers on a silver platter, not a frequent occurrence.
Normally, astronomy is associated with carefully planned, often difficult, painstaking observations followed by months of meticulous analysis of the data. This is the
way most great results come about, and the following is no exception. Thus the year
1987 saw the publication of another important discovery, explaining the origin of
the ­mysterious luminous arcs that had been observed in clusters of galaxies. French

163

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

astronomers had carried out spectroscopic measurements of such an arc, in a cluster
known as Abell 370, with the ESO 3.6-metre telescope. The result showed a redshift
similar to that of a much more distant object. It was concluded that the arc phenomenon was the result of bending of the light from a distant galaxy in an intermediate
gravitational field, leading to a displaced and distorted image of the galaxy in question
(Soucail et al., 1988). Already predicted by Einstein, such an effect would be observable if a heavy object lay almost exactly in the line of sight between the object from
where the light originated and the observer. Accordingly the phenomenon became
known as an Einstein ring caused by gravitational lensing. Aside from providing further evidence that Einstein’s general theory of relativity is correct, it had the welcome
effect that, thanks to the optical enhancement by the lens, such natural lenses enabled astronomers to study the furthest reaches of the Universe, so to speak, for free.
Gravitational lenses were undoubtedly a hot topic at the time. Later in the same year,
another group, led by the Belgian astronomer Jean Surdej, and using the MPG/ESO
2.2-metre and 3.6-metre telescopes at La Silla, had found a gravitationally lensed
quasar in the southern constellation of Cetus. The first of this kind had been discovered back in 1979, but the new result was the first one found purely with optical observations and based on a systematic search programme carried out at La Silla
(Surdej et al., 1987)11.
≈
The year 1987, however, had more to offer. At La Silla yet another telescope was added
to the already impressive park. This new telescope was of a very different kind from
those already gracing the mountain ridge. And although it constituted very good
news indeed, it almost started as a disaster.
Peter de Jonge, who had worked at ESO in Chile in the 1970s, had become director of IRAM, the Institut de Radioastronomie Millimétrique in Grenoble, founded
in 1979 by the Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique (CNRS) of France,
­Germany’s Max-Planck-Gesellschaft and the Spanish Instituto Geográfico Nacional.
He was keen to establish close connections between his new institute and ESO.
IRAM was now building an array of 15-metre telescopes for observations in the
11	

Soon after, Surdej and his team discovered the Cloverleaf Quasi-stellar Object (QSO) at ESO. This object, formally designated as GL 2 = H 1413 + 117, is a quadruply lensed quasar that was first observed with the MPG/
ESO 2.2-metre telescope. The scientific paper, published in Nature, was also selected for the VLT Time ­Capsule
(see Chapter III-11).

164

Chapter II-6 ∙ An Annus Mirabilis

submillimetre/millimetre domain to be placed at the 2550-metre-high Plateau de
Bure near Grenoble12 . It appeared possible to add one more antenna to the production at a very reasonable cost and thus the idea arose to place it in the southern hemisphere. At the same time, Swedish astronomers were thinking about participation
in a major radio astronomy project. These ideas were given a boost by the arrival
from the UK of Roy Booth as director of the Swedish Onsala Space Observatory
(Onsala R
­ ymdobservatorium, OSO). In August 1982, at the IAU General Assembly in Patras, Greece, Booth and de Jonge discussed the idea and the prospect of a
collaboration between OSO and IRAM. In subsequent conversations with Woltjer,
they gained his support, leading to a three-way partnership, now with ESO, and the
decision to place the new telescope at La Silla. In June 1984 Council approved the
necessary agreements with Sweden and IRAM. Accordingly, IRAM oversaw the
installation of the telescope, OSO was responsible for operations and the facility was
incorporated into La Silla like a national telescope. With its 15-metre diameter dish,
the Swedish-ESO Submillimetre Telescope (SEST), as it was called, became the first
large millimetre/submillimetre reflector in the southern hemisphere. It also marked
ESO’s first step away from being a purely optical astronomy observatory.
In early 1987, SEST assembly at La Silla was completed. The assembly had begun in
the previous year and progressed well. The 176 panels had been mounted to form the
collecting dish, followed by the subreflector (the equivalent of the secondary mirror of an optical telescope) on its four supporting legs, a quadrupod. For the purpose of mounting, a scaffold had been erected at the north side of the telescope. The
mounting then followed easily by rotating the telescope in azimuth (around the vertical axis). Then, on Saturday 22 November, when most of the assembly team had
gone down to La Serena for the weekend, an accident happened. La Silla is located
at 29 degrees southern latitude. At noon, the Sun is close to zenith during the southern summer. At an elevation of 2400 metres, the solar intensity is immense, and a
15-metre dish with highly reflective panels will collect a lot of it. For that reason,
the mounting was not carried out close to midday. On the previous day, the quadrupod with the subreflector had been mounted, although only fixed in a preliminary
way. The work continued in the morning, when a handset used to rotate the telescope from the top of the scaffold broke. Unable to rotate the dish, heat started to
12	

Europe’s involvement in millimetre astronomy involved a range of facilities. These included the array on the
Plateau de Bure, the 30-metre IRAM antenna at Pico Valeta in Spain, the 20-metre at Onsala in Sweden, the
15-metre James Clerk Maxwell Telescope (JCMT) at Hawaii, and others (Shaver & Booth, 1998). But, as already
mentioned the 15-metre SEST was the only one in the southern hemisphere, in stark contrast to Europe’s engagement in optical astronomy.

165

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

build up. While trying to repair the handset, the engineer noticed smoke from edge
of the subreflector, prompting him to alert the fire brigade. The firefighters quickly
arrived on the scene13 , but due to strong winds and problems with the water pressure, they could not reach the 15-metre dish and the subreflector in its zenith position. It was necessary to lower the dish towards the horizon. This was not easy, however. Firstly, the quadrupod was not properly fixed. Secondly, the scaffold was in the
way. Thirdly, to clear the scaffold the engineer had to operate the telescope manually
from inside the pedestal (out of sight of the telescope). Working under stress, when
tilting the telescope dish, the engineer drove the dish into the scaffold. Meanwhile,
the fire caused molten aluminum from the upper structure to drop onto the surface
of the dish, burning holes in the panels. Luckily, the fire could be contained. After
replacing the parts that had been destroyed and repairing those that had only been
lightly damaged, the telescope was handed over to ESO on 13 March 1987 with first
light achieved just 11 days later (Booth et al., 1989). A unique facility, it would constitute an important element of the observatory until it ceased operations, with the
last scheduled observation on 26 August 2003. We shall briefly return to the SEST
again in the context of the ALMA project.

After the fire. Photo left: Preparing the new subreflector for the SEST. Photo right: Albert Grewe measuring the accuracy of the reflecting panels with a theodolite. (Photos by the author)

≈
In December 1986, Lodewijk Woltjer had informed Council of his wish to pass on
the baton as ESO Director General by 1 January 1988. He did so with the intention
13	

Fire has been an extremely rare occurrence at La Silla. However, on 25 October 25 1992, the dome of the 1-metre
telescope caught fire. Luckily neither the telescope itself nor the delicate instruments suffered any damage.

166

Chapter II-6 ∙ An Annus Mirabilis

of achieving a decision to construct the Very Large Telescope before his departure. In
March 1987, ESO submitted the formal proposal, in the shape of a 342-page document, entitled “Proposal for the Construction of the 16-metre Very Large Telescope”.
In the scientific community, it became known simply as the Blue Book. According to
the proposal, the VLT would comprise a linear array of four independently mounted
8-metre telescopes, each with two Nasmyth foci, and a common incoherent focus,
hence the term “a 16-metre telescope”14 . There would also be a coherent focus and
this opened up the possibility of using the four telescopes as an optical interferometer with a baseline of 104 metres. The primary mirrors would be thin meniscus mirrors and both the primary and secondary mirrors were to be actively controlled — an
extension of the system that would be used at the NTT, at the time under construction. While Cassegrain foci were possible, they were not foreseen to be implemented
“until the need for it is proven”, and therefore also not budgeted for. Importantly, the
telescopes were designed to work without adaptive optics (AO) — understandable,
since the first AO systems were only under development at the time15 . As an interesting feature, the telescopes were to be operated in the open air with a fixed, giant wind
screen providing the necessary protection during observations and inflatable domes
to be used in case of bad weather 16 . The proposal did not contain a dedicated instrumentation plan but referred to “a preliminary model instrumentation package [that]
was outlined at the Venice Workshop in October 1986”. The ideas included a focal
reducer with spectroscopic capability — a VLT EFOSC, a multimode instrument
(reference was made to EMMI, the instrument which was planned for the NTT),
a high-resolution instrument for the incoherent combined focus17, infrared instrumentation including cameras optimised for two pass-bands (1–5 µm and 8–20 µm),
a photometer and spectrographs for medium- and high-resolution work. Despite the
strong interest in the interferometric option, expressed especially by French astronomers, no instrumentation for interferometry was mentioned — a testimony to the
experimental character of optical interferometry at the time.
The proposal set mid-1994 as the target for first light, with completion of the entire
facility in 1998 and finally provided a budget estimate of 382 million deutschmarks

14	

Together, the four telescopes would have the same light-collecting surface as a 16-metre telescope.

15	

Even so, it was clear that adaptive optics was likely to play a big role and a whole chapter in the proposal was
devoted to this technology.

16	

Open-air operation remains a fascinating possibility for telescope designers. Later, the OverWhelmingly Large
(OWL) Telescope project for a 100-metre telescope also pursued this idea.

17	

In the end, this is only planned to be realised with the second generation VLT instrument ESPRESSO.

167

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

at 1986 values. Optimistically, it stated that it would not be necessary to add more
than a dozen people to the Telescope Project Division staff (55 people at the time).
Woltjer’s ambition, however, went beyond the VLT approval. He also pushed to
choose Cerro P
­ aranal as the site for the new telescope, as the preliminary results
from the long site-testing campaign had convinced him of the superior conditions
that prevailed there. The Blue Book, however, did not press the matter, but rather
it stated that “ it would seem … advantageous to postpone a definite choice of site until
some time in 1990, so that the available data on which a decision is to be based will be
as complete as possible.” This notwithstanding, under the title “A Time for Change”,
published in The ESO Messenger in June 1987, Woljer presented his thoughts about
ESO’s future, including the two-site scenario. Appearing on the front page of the
journal, his article featured a picture of the ­Paranal mountain with a truck climbing
the steep slope of the eastern side, testifying to the accessibility of the site. ­R ichard
West, who as editor of The ESO Messenger and author of the ESO press releases
excelled in masterly chosen, and often quite subtle, plays on words, selected a seemingly innocent caption: The road to P
­ aranal.
≈
On 5 October that year, the Council came together in Paris to celebrate ESO’s 25th
anniversary. The event took place in the distinguished surroundings of the Kléber
Centre des Conférences Internationales, where the ESO Convention had been
signed two and a half decades earlier. On this occasion the French hosts presented
an extraordinary gift to ESO’s Director General, an original print of the book by P.
S. de Laplace, Système du Monde. ESO’s birthday present to itself was a coffee table
book entitled Exploring the Southern Sky, with Svend Laustsen as the main author
and published by Springer Verlag, appearing in English, German, French, Spanish
and Danish language versions.
In parallel with the formal celebration, ESO organised a large exhibition at the prestigious Palais de la Decouverte on Avenue Franklin and close to the main artery of
Paris, the Champs Elysée. The exhibition, as well as the anniversary event and the
book, was not only a celebratory gesture, but also served to present the Very Large
Telescope project to a wider audience, including key decision makers.
In terms of European research infrastructures this time stands out as quite unique,
possibly because the governments of several of the major countries on the continent

168

Chapter II-6 ∙ An Annus Mirabilis

had prominent science ministers (Curien, Ruberti, Riesenhuber). Within a few years,
major steps and decisions were taken about the Large Hadron Collider at CERN, the
establishment of the European Synchrotron Radiation Facility (ESRF), the European Transonic Windtunnel, European participation in the International Space Station, the Ariane V programme, ENVISAT and other large-scale initiatives. And of
course the VLT.
As regards the latter, needless to say the scientists on the ESO Council were all highly
supportive of the proposal. But ESO also benefited from the strong commitment and
close cooperation between three influential science administrators: Umberto Vattani
of Italy, Jean-François Stuyck-Taillandier of France and Christian Patermann of Germany. Even so, in the run up to the decision about the VLT it had become clear that,
whilst there was strong support in most Member States, a positive decision could not
be regarded as a foregone conclusion. Unexpectedly, in France the situation was perhaps more critical than elsewhere.
Hubert Curien, one of the most prolific science ministers and an ardent supporter
of European cooperation in science, had prepared the way for the forthcoming decision, with French support for the VLT. He was backed by the President of the Republic, François Mitterand, whose science advisor, Jean-Daniel Levi, was very much in
favour of the VLT project. But by 1986, the socialist government had lost in parliamentary elections and the new French Prime Minister was Jacques Chirac. This
was the difficult epoch of “co-habitation”, where the President and his Prime Minister represented opposing political camps and the policies and decisions of the previous government were questioned, including the French position regarding the VLT
project. The Science Minister was also new in office and he did not express himself
very clearly on the subject. Shortly before the decisive Council meeting in December 1987, Pierre Léna, one of the two French Council delegates, was summoned to
the Prime Minister’s Office, where he was received by an advisor. Léna knew that
there was some opposition there to the VLT project, but during the two-hour long
conversation he reiterated the arguments in favour of the VLT. The meeting ended
at 9 pm. The next day, Léna received a call asserting that the Prime Minister had
agreed to the VLT. The vote of the delegate from the Ministry of Foreign Affairs to
the ESO Council would be positive. Encouraging signals had also been sent from
other European capitals.
The stage, it seemed, was set for a positive decision on the VLT, but it would turn out
that there were more hurdles to overcome.

169

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The ESO Council on 8 December 1987. From left to right:
Kurt Hunger, Gerhard Bachmann, Lodewijk Woltjer,
Harry van der Laan, Christian de Loore, Noel Vercruysse,
Jean-François Stuyck-Tallandier, Pierre Léna, Marcello
Griccioli, Jan Bezemer, Willem Brouw, Giancarlo Setti,
Massimo Tarenghi, Daniel Enard, Richard West, Henning
Jørgensen, Henrik Grage, Christian Patermann, Bengt
Westerlund, Mats Ola Ottosson, Peter Creola, Marcel
Golay, Martin Huber and Per-Olof Lindblad. (Photo by
the author)

170

Chapter II-7

Decision Day
“Europe Decides To Build The World’s
Largest Optical Telescope”
ESO Press Release, 8 December 1987.

O

n 8 December 1987, Council convened at the ESO Headquarters. The main
point on the agenda was the proposal to construct the VLT as it had been presented in the Blue Book. The discussion began with a tour de table to assess the general mood. First to speak was Jan Bezemer of the Netherlands, who declared that
his government was ready to approve the proposal. Next to speak was Jean-François
­Stuyck-Tallandier on behalf of the French delegation. France would be in favour,
but hoped that a decision could be obtained with unanimity. Italy followed suit, but
stressed that they saw a need for unanimity. The Belgian delegation declared its support as well, but could only vote ad referendum (i.e. subject to later confirmation),
since for internal political reasons (a forthcoming election), the final decision on the
part of the Belgian government had been deferred. Switzerland and Sweden were in
favour. Germany, represented by Christian Patermann, declared that Germany, too,
would support the project. The German government did not insist on unanimity, but
could, on the other hand, not cover the contributions of countries that might not
be able to participate — basically a position that Switzerland had also assumed. It
looked good. Last to speak was Henrik Grage from Denmark. He stressed that whilst
the Danish delegation strongly supported the VLT as such, he was not authorised
to commit his country financially 1. With a share of 2.9% Denmark was the smallest contributor in real terms, but still, with this statement unanimity seemed out of
reach. Would the proposal fall?

1	

The Danish astronomical community was fully behind the VLT project, but in the wake of general prioritisation
discussions in the country’s research council, the VLT had not fared well, partly because of Denmark’s engagement in the Nordic Optical Telescope (NOT), which occurred at the same time and for which more resources
had become necessary than originally foreseen.

171

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The wish for unanimity was not just a question of cost-sharing, but also linked to the
ESO Convention. The Convention had described a well-defined initial programme.
But wisely, Article II, paragraph 3 allowed for a supplementary programme, which
could be approved with a two thirds majority. Countries that did not vote in favour
of the supplementary programme would neither be required to contribute to it financially, nor allowed to use the extra facility. Whilst the option was technically there,
using it would change ESO fundamentally by breaking the coherence of the organisation, increase the administrative overhead and complicate matters tremendously.
In other words, proceeding without unanimity was not an attractive option. But,
on the other hand, time was short — a solution had to be worked out without delay.
One reason was that shortly before, in the middle of October, the stock market had
crashed. Within a five-day period, the Dow Jones Industrial Average had suffered a
decline of a staggering 31%. Though the markets recovered quickly, the event sent
tremors through the financial system and created considerable nervousness everywhere — certainly also in the finance ministries of ESO’s Member States. Postponing the decision about the VLT, thus, would be a risky bet.
A solution was formally proposed by the Swiss delegate, Peter Creola 2 . The decision
could be split into two resolutions, voted on independently. The first would be to
build the VLT, as proposed and within the foreseen budget. The second vote would
address the financing. Unanimity could be obtained for the first resolution and the
second resolution would basically declare that 2.9% of the financing was — at that
moment — not covered. Denmark would be invited to join the project in the course
of 1988. It was a simple solution that received immediate support from the French
and the German delegations. Nonetheless, the drafting of the resolution texts took
time. Council was anxious not to send wrong signals either to Denmark, whose participation was still hoped for, or to any of the other countries who might renege on
their promise, using the argument that other countries had not committed firmly.
And, as Pierre Léna remarked, it was important to announce in a clear manner to the
outside world “that the VLT was started”. As expected, the first resolution received
unanimous support, and after much fine-tuning, the second resolution passed as
well, with seven votes in favour and — understandably — Denmark abstaining 3 . The
2	

This solution had been informally discussed already at the preceding Committee of Council meeting on
1 December with the full support of Mr Grage.

3	

As hoped, Denmark joined the VLT project fully in 1989, restoring the “musketeer principle” that has been followed by ESO over its lifetime.

172

Chapter II-7 ∙ Decision Day

f­ actual minutes of the Council meeting fail to capture the intensity of the discussions
as the delegates, guided by the President, Kurt Hunger, and assisted by the Director
General, struggled to find a way forward. But later, in an interview Harry van der
Laan, who attended the meeting as incoming Director General, recalled: “It was a
very long Council meeting, interrupted several times by coffee breaks, by the necessity
of consulting ministries back home, with an excellent lunch to improve the atmosphere,
and when we all thought — and Prof. Hunger, the President of Council thought — we
are ready for a vote — this was after many tours de table we had to deal with particularly thorny issues, to try to mitigate conditions and provisional acceptance that some
delegations wanted to make … when we were ready for the vote, at the very last second,
the Italian delegate, Griccioli, raised his hand … Christian Patermann [the German
government delegate], I saw him tense, looking extremely disturbed, when the Italian
delegate said: ‘Mr President, I still have a very important issue!’ There was dead silence
around the table. And then he said: ‘Mr President, what about the press release?’ This
was such an incredible statement … that it totally broke the tension, everybody roared
with laughter. Patermann couldn’t contain himself and he laughed the loudest of all.”
Keen to bring the meeting to a successful conclusion, Peter Creola refocused the
attention of all: “Look, Gentlemen, suppose an Earth tremor occurs in any minute, with
us not having taken the decision!” (Léna, 2012). And then the vote was cast.
Griccioli’s successful intervention to relieve the tension of the meeting reveals a
deeper change within ESO and within science in general. Attempts to involve the
public at large were practically non-existent in the early years of ESO. Europe’s great
adventure in astronomy happened within the confines of the professional community
of scientists and, perhaps, to some extent, the rather limited world of advanced amateur astronomers. But these were times of change and the need for a much more extrovert communication culture had been recognised. By 1987, press releases and thorough public information had begun to be seen as an integral part of ESO’s activities.
≈
The decision to build the VLT did not go unnoticed across the Atlantic. Under the
title “European Telescope Will Be Biggest”, Malcolm Browne wrote in the New York
Times: “American astronomers who had hoped to build a telescope of equivalent power
will be forced to watch from the sidelines.” He continued: “Dr Peter A. Strittmatter,
director of the University of Arizona’s Steward Observatory, said that American scientists now face a crisis… . We congratulate European astronomers for ESO’s decision to
build a 16-meter telescope, but we can’t help envying them.” But competition stimulates

173

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

business. American plans to build a 15-metre New National Technology Telescope
had just been scrapped, although in September 1987 they had been replaced by a recommendation to build two 8-metre telescopes (one to be placed in each hemisphere)
(McCray, 2004), a much more moderate proposition. But ESO’s decision may have
boosted another large telescope project that had been underway at the University of
California since the late 1970s — the 10-metre W. M. Keck telescope, which would
enter into operation in 1993, with an interconnected twin telescope achieving first
light in 1996. Others in the US made plans, too, and Japan would also soon be joining the company with its 8.2-metre Subaru Telescope. What was on the drawing
boards at the various design bureaus, however, was more than a number of large,
new telescopes. It was blueprint for a new golden age of astronomy. Especially gratifying to European astronomers was that for the first time in almost 100 years, the
old continent was playing a key role.

174

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The P
­ aranal area, seen in early 1991, before construction began. (Photo by the author)

176

Chapter II-8

A Mountain in the Middle of Nowhere
“If the stars were visible from just one place on Earth,
people would never stop
travelling to that place in order to see them.”
Lucio Anneo Seneca, Naturales Questiones.

T

o almost every living soul on Planet Earth, Cerro ­Paranal is a place in the middle of nowhere, which is of course one of the prime reasons why it is of interest
to astronomers. ­Paranal is located some 130 kilometres south of the Chilean port
town of Antofagasta and about 12 kilometres inland from the Pacific Ocean. Standing more than 2600 metres tall, it forms an almost perfect cone. Cerro Paranal
­­
is
part of the range of mountains that runs along Chile’s Pacific coastline — relatively
low mountains as opposed to the majestic Andes range further to the east that also
demarcate Chile’s eastern borders. Between the twin mountain ranges stretches the
Atacama Desert, thought to be the driest place on Earth: the average rainfall in the
region is just 1 millimetre per year. Some weather stations in the Atacama Desert
have, in fact, never recorded rain. ­Paranal is indeed an inhospitable place, without
water, without vegetation, without animal life. The indigenous people, generically
known as the Atacameños, live a simple life along the eastern fringes of the desert.
And, along the coast, there are a few towns with seaports. But the main desert is
empty. Or almost so. In the 16th century, Spanish conquistadores came through
this region in their attempt to expand the Spanish empire southwards. Later, others
have traversed the arid land under the blazing Sun. The trails of many of those travellers can still be found, for little changes in this landscape which seems locked in a
time-warp. Yet it is anything but static. During the early hours of the day or towards
sunset, this seemingly monotonous landscape is modulated by long shadows and
intensely glowing colours as the low rays of sunlight are reflected by minerals embedded in the topsoil of the desert. Minerals are the treasures of the Atacama. And as
the Sun sinks below the horizon, another treasure unveils itself — the breathtaking night sky with the centre of the Milky Way overhead and the twin Magellanic
Clouds vying for attention from their positions to one side of the Milky Way’s band

177

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

of stars. Standing atop ­Paranal is like having a front seat to the intensely beautiful,
yet enigmatic view that the Universe offers us. Some describe ­Paranal as out of this
world, but the truth is that in a very basic sense, it may be more in tune with the world
than we think 1. Yet it takes more than beauty to seduce levelheaded astronomers.
In their quest for finding the best observational sites, terms like sky transparency,
water vapour column density, atmospheric turbulence, temperature gradients, number of photometric and spectroscopic nights make astronomers’ hearts beat faster. Of
course, seasonal variations and long-term climatic effects are important, too. Establishing what these might be required meteorological studies over long time periods,
clearly impossible in the case of northern Chile, as meteorological records have not
been obtained for much longer than half a century in this sparsely populated part
of the world. Nonetheless, some information existed and piecing the various bits of
information together enabled astronomers to obtain a general idea of the prevailing
conditions. It looked promising. One such piece came from the records of the Montezuma Station, near San Pedro de Atacama, which was operated from 1923 and into
the 1950s by the Smithsonian Institution, to undetake solar observations. Other
information constraining the conditions in the area of interest came from work in
the 1970s by John Warner, observing from a site near La Paz. Also general findings
by Jürgen Stock, whose pioneering work in the early 1960s on behalf of AURA cannot be overestimated, played a role. In 1968, he reported in the ESO Bulletin: “There
are a number of mountains of sufficient elevation south of the town of Antofagasta and
very close to the coast. The abrupt rise from the Pacific Ocean on one side, and a large
flat plain, more than 1000 metres lower, on the other side give these mountains rather
special conditions.” (Stock, 1968). As space satellite imagery became widely available, Arne Ardeberg, then Director of La Silla, used this new tool and, finally, an in
situ inspection of the area in April 1983 by Lodewijk Woltjer and a small group of
senior ESO staff enabled ESO to home in on a few specific, highly promising sites.
A description of the expedition, in which ­Paranal was “discovered” is given in The
ESO Messenger (Woltjer, 1991). Shortly afterwards, a small site-testing team set up
shop on ­Paranal. The core members of the team were Francisco Gomez and his sons
Francisco and Italo together with Julio Navarrete. The team had two containers at
their disposal, one with beds and one called “the office” with the instruments. For
seven years, they carried out continuous meteorological and seeing measurements,
first under the leadership of Arne Ardeberg and subsequently of Marc Sarazin, with
1	

The Atacama Desert has also been struck by a meteorite, known as the Vaca Muerte metorite. The impact is
believed to have occurred 3500 years ago. In the late 1980s and early 1990s, two ESO astronomers, Harri
­Lindgren and Holger Pedersen, assisted by Canut de Bon of the Universidad de La Serena, collected 77 meteorite fragments in the desert, amounting to a total of 3400 kg (H. Pedersen et al., 1991).

178

Chapter II-8 ∙ A Mountain in the Middle of Nowhere

Hans-Emil Schuster in charge of the logistics. The team received supplies twice a
month, but other than that was left on its own. Until 1987, when the road was built
and it became possible to bring water to the summit, water was kept at the foot of
the mountain, so that people had to walk down to wash.

Site testing meeting at P
­ aranal. From right to left: Hans-Emil Schuster, Marc Sarazin, Roberto Alcayaga,
Francisco Gomez Campiano, Alfonso Vargas and Julio Navarrete.

≈
Life in the sun-scorched Atacama could be hard, but not necessarily one that would
be considered particularly dangerous. Yet the desert can be treacherous. And if rain
is indeed a rare occurrence at ­Paranal, it is different along the coast. Few people have
had more experience in moving around in this arid landscape than Arne Ardeberg.
On Monday 27 July 1987, Ardeberg, with a driver, had left P
­ aranal in a southwesterly direction to carry out further site-testing measurements in the area. Earlier in
the day, there had been sudden and very heavy rainfall, turning the part of desert
close to the coast into a field of mud. Eventually, the heavy-duty four-wheel drive
vehicle got stuck. They decided to head back towards P
­ aranal on foot, but after a
while fatigue set in and Ardeberg felt the need to rest. The driver continued, however, with Ardeberg set to follow somewhat later. By midnight, the driver reached
the summit. But by the next morning, Ardeberg had still not shown up and the small

179

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

­ aranal team became seriously worried. They contacted Daniel Hofstadt at La Silla,
P
who initiated a search, including soliticiting help from the armed forces. However,
the heavy rainfall had also hit Antofagasta causing a major mudslide and the emergency services were all engaged in the rescue operation in the town. On Wednesday,
the weather conditions improved and ESO hired a helicopter in Santiago and sent it
up to the ­Paranal area. The search focussed on an area to the south and southwest of
­Paranal, the desert area in which Ardeberg was likely to be, but it did not yield any
results. Eventually, the Chilean Air Force freed up capacity in the shape of an additional helicopter. The carabineros also put together a search team of some 60 officers,
in addition to two ESO teams, combing the desert in a systematic way. Still without
success, it was decided to expand the search area towards the north. This time they
were lucky: after four days, Ardeberg was found in a location far north of ­Paranal —
alive. “I’m fine, I’ve no problems!” was his comments according to the Chilean daily
El ­Mercurio, as he got out of the helicopter at Antofagasta’s air force base. “His ‘cold
blood’ and extraordinary capacity to survive allowed him to go on for four days,” 2 the
newspaper concluded (Guicharrousse, 1987). Newspapers are never shy of drama, of
course, but this had indeed been a close call. Luckily, this remained an isolated incident during the years of site testing.
≈
Apart from recording basic meteorological parameters, the initial site testing involved
a visual assessment of the photometric conditions 3 . The work would soon receive a
boost with the arrival of a young Frenchman, Marc Sarazin who joined ESO in 1984.
He came from the Engineering School of Physics in Marseille, and had worked on
problems of the propagation of light in atmospheric turbulence. The recruitment of
Sarazin and the conscious investment in a long-term research activity in this field
would pay off handsomely. Not simply in terms of assuring that the best site would
be chosen, but also in developing a comprehensive understanding of the complex phenomenon of “seeing”, whether high up in the atmosphere or at ground level, including
the issue of dome seeing. To improve this knowledge, both about the quality of the
candidate sites and to try to understand some of the local phenomena, a dedicated
2



“Su ‘sangre fría’ y extraordinaria capacidad de supervivienca le permitieron mantenerse cuatros días.”

3	

Woltjer quickly became convinced of the merits of the site and he even suggested moving the NTT, at the time
under construction. The place that he had selected for the NTT, however, was not on ­Paranal itself, but on a
close-by, but lower mountain north of ­Paranal, which he dubbed the NTT Peak. Within ESO it kept that name
for several years, even if the NTT never moved there. Today, the peak is home to a telescope of a similar size,
albeit different in every other way: the 4.1-metre VISTA telescope.

180

Chapter II-8 ∙ A Mountain in the Middle of Nowhere

effort under the project name of the La Silla Seeing Campaign, or LASSCA for short,
began in January 1986. The campaign consisted of a wide range of measurements,
including classical data obtained with the meteorological station and an acoustic sounder (SOund Detection And Ranging — SODAR) to reveal perturbations
caused by small temperature variations in the air between 30 metres and 800 metres
above the site (Sarazin, 1986). Furthermore, a radar sounding receiving station provided by the French Centre National de Recherches Météorologiques was used to
track balloons flying high into the troposphere, the realm of jetstreams. Importantly,
the tests also included three telescopes at La Silla, the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope, the ESO 1.52-metre telescope and, finally, the ESO 50-centimetre telescope.
At the 2.2-metre, Gerd Weigelt and his team observed a number of single and double stars, using a method with ultra-short exposures, known to professional astronomers as speckle interferograms, a technique that had been proposed by Antoine
Labeyrie in 1970 and developed further by Weigelt. For astronomical observations,
speckle interferometry would de facto remove the effects of the atmosphere, but the
technique could only be applied in particular cases and only if the sources were reasonably bright 4 . Used in the context of LASSCA, however, the interferograms would
serve a different purpose, showing the diffraction patterns of the refractive index
changes in the atmosphere. Simultaneous observations with the 1.5-metre telescope,
carried out by Jean Vernin and Max Azouit looked at the scintillation, i.e. the twinkling of the stars, whilst François and Claude Roddier mounted an interferometer
at the 50-centimetre telescope. This first concerted effort at ESO was conducted as
part of the work by the VLT working group for site evaluation, at the time under the
chairmanship of Harry van der Laan.
Sarazin soon replaced the system of visual and photographic assessment of the seeing by developing an automated 35-centimetre telescope known as a Differential
Image Motion Monitor, or DIMM 5, 6 . The entrance of the DIMM was fitted with
4	

Speckle interferometry built on work by the American physicist David Fried in the 1960s. Speckle imaging
basically means making exposures of a few milliseconds of stars, thereby obtaining images of the star in a “frozen” atmosphere. For the purpose of studying astronomical object, these images can be added and/or analysed
to reconstruct high-resolution pictures of the source. Speckle interferometry was already used for observations
of binary stars with telescopes at La Silla in the late 1970s (Ebersberger &Weigelt, 1978).

5	

The principle of the DIMM goes back to the 1950s (Hosfeld, 1954). François Roddier developed the mathematics to needed get absolute measurements (Pedersen et al.,1988), and with the advent of CCD technology, such
measurements became feasible.

6	

The DIMMs were built by the Belgian company AMOS in Liège. It was their first contract for an optical telescope, but since then AMOS has become a major supplier of precision optical instruments in astronomy, including the movable Auxiliary Telescopes for the VLT.

181

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

two c­ ircular holes, creating two images of a star on the CCD detector. Under perfect conditions, the images would be identical as regards their position. However, the
distortion of the wavefront, caused by turbulence in the atmosphere, would mean
that the two spots would shift relative to each other, allowing for a precise determination of the shift and thus of the amount and frequency of changes in the atmosphere. Since the measurements would be of the relative image motion, the result
would not be influenced by tracking problems, e.g., induced by the wind (Roddier
& Sarazin, 1990). In Chapter III-3, we will discuss how this technique can be used
not only to study the atmosphere, but also to correct for the effects of the turbulence on the images.

Site tests at Cerro Vizcachas. The 3.6-metre telescope at La Silla can be seen in the distance. (Photo by
the author)

A prototype of the instrument was tested at La Silla in 1986, and the first DIMM
was installed on P
­ aranal in April 1987. It was followed one year later by one at Cerro
Vizcachas, the peak next to La Silla and at the time a serious candidate site for the
VLT. Before that, as is the custom at ESO, the instrument was tested in Garching.
It passed the tests, but Garching itself certainly did not, according to Sarazin, who
wrote tongue-in-cheek: “The ESO parking lot in Garching must be eliminated from

182

Chapter II-8 ∙ A Mountain in the Middle of Nowhere

the list of candidate sites for the VLT. During the night of 19 April, the second seeing
­monitor underwent final full-scale tests before being shipped to La Silla. It was an opportunity to verify that the seeing in Garching is not of the quality that the VLT deserves.
During the few minutes we had before the instruments were covered with condensation,
an average seeing of 3 arcseconds was measured. (Not all that bad for Europe, though!)”
(Sarazin, 1988).
Later site tests7 also included La Montura (four kilometres northeast of ­Paranal) and
Cerro Armazones, 20 kilometres east of P
­ aranal — the mountain that would later
be chosen for the ESO European Extremely Large Telescope (E-ELT) project. ESO
focused strongly on sites in Chile, but that did not mean that others outside Chile
were excluded. In fact, at the suggestion of Pierre Léna, site tests were carried out on
the French island of La Réunion in the Indian Ocean. Later, tests were also done in
Namibia. However, the results could in no way compete with those obtained in the
Atacama Desert.
The data collected with the DIMMs covered a period of one and a half years, but other
measurements were made as well. Firstly we remember the year-long visual assessments made by the Chilean site-testing team, which had actually yielded data of remarkable reliability and consistency 8 . Secondly, the altitude distribution of the turbulent layers was studied with three instruments: a scintillometer (for high-­a ltitude
effects), the acoustic sounder (SODAR) for the 30–800 metre elevation range, and
finally microthermal sensors for monitoring local effects close to the ground. In May
1990, the results were presented in a report by the Site Selection Working Group,
now chaired by Jean-Pierre Swings 9 . The data spoke for themselves: apart from its
principal asset, the low amount of water vapour in the air, ­Paranal offered up to
70 clear nights per year more than La Silla. Importantly, these were the longer winter nights which therefore offered much more observing time. In terms of seeing,
­Paranal also turned out to be superior, though interestingly, it also became clear that
La Silla was in fact a better site than had been thought so far. The median seeing for
La Silla was 0.76 arcseconds and ­Paranal bettered it by reaching 0.66 arcseconds. But
when considering nights with exceptional seeing (better than 0.5 arcseconds), with
7	

A dedicated campaign, similar in scope to the LASSCA campaign (though without major telescopes), was conducted in 1992 in the ­Paranal area under the name PARSCA 92. Since, ­Paranal itself was subject to heavy construction work at that time, many tests were carried out from the nearby NTT Peak (Sarazin, 1992).

8	

One reason for the consistency was certainly that the measurements were carried out over the whole period by
the same small group of people.

9	

Succeeding Harry van der Laan in this function.

183

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

16% of all nights, ­Paranal came out as a clear winner with 2.4 times as many such
nights as La Silla. From a science point of view, this was it! But ­Paranal was bound
to pose a number of operational and logistical problems as well as financial issues. A
second site selection working group10 was therefore established to consider the full
range of questions.
≈
As we shall discuss later, Chile is prone to earthquakes. For that reason, important
seismic studies were carried out by the Institut de Physique du Globe in Paris by Raul
Madariaga, a geophysicist who was well acquainted with the geology of Chile. The
result was promising, as it showed that although also P
­ aranal is also in a seismically
active area, the rock there — solid granite — was considered to be more favourable
in case of earthquakes than the geology in other areas in Chile.
Finally, a multi-disciplinary study by Michel Grenon of the Observatoire de Genève
provided further information, in particular about the long-term evolution of the
local climate. Grenon had conducted botanical studies in the area since 1971, and
he pursued an independent and highly interesting avenue of enquiry, using “ biogeography as a tool to define with a high spatial resolution the integrated climatic properties
over various time scales depending on the life duration and propagation times of living
beings considered.” (Grenon, 1990). His conclusion further underpinned the notion
that ESO was on the right track in its efforts to find a home for its new telescope.
“All the climatic indicators considered here, biogeographic and meteorological, lead to
the conclusion that ­Paranal mountain is located in the best possible area of South America for the settlement of a modern astronomical observatory,” were his closing words.
On 4 December 1990, Council unanimously voted in favour of ­Paranal as the site for
the VLT. During the meeting, snow was falling gently outside the Garching Council Room, perhaps indicating the first signs of Christmas. If so, ESO had just given
itself the greatest Christmas present it could think of.
The primary purpose of the site tests was to ensure that the VLT would be put in
the best possible location. But, as the understanding of the many aspects of “seeing” improved, in particular as regards the construction of telescope enclosures, this
10	

Comprised of Jean-Pierre Swings (Chairman), Immo Appenzeller, Arne Ardeberg, Gerard Lelievre and Sergio
Ortolani.

184

Chapter II-8 ∙ A Mountain in the Middle of Nowhere

also led to major improvements in the performance of existing telescopes. In this
sense, the tests not only led to the choice of a new, and better, site, but also to major
improvements at La Silla, to which we shall return later. The atmospheric models
that were developed also took ESO on a path towards predicting observational conditions, much like the weather forecast, and formed a fundamental element of what
later became known as flexible scheduling. The unique expertise built up by ESO was
made available to others and Sarazin subsequently took part in other site characterisation efforts, e.g., in Uzbekistan, Argentina and Morocco. He also chaired the site
selection committee for the US Large Synoptic Survey Telescope (LSST) project.

185

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The ESO 3.6-metre telescope and the NTT at
La Silla in 1989. (Photo by the author)

186

Chapter II-9

NTT First Light
“A Revolution in Ground-Based
Direct-Imaging Resolution”
ESO Press Release, 11 May 1989.

I

n 1988, the La Silla skyline changed. A conspicuous new building appeared on the
hill that had been occupied by the Swiss 0.4-metre telescope in the past. It looked
very different from any other dome, with an appearance that reminded some of a
ship, others maybe of a somewhat peculiar shoebox: the New Technology Telescope.
The NTT was a 3.5-metre telescope1 on an alt-az mount. The primary mirror was a
meniscus, 24 centimetre thick and weighing 6 tonnes, resting on a system of actuators 2 . The thickness was chosen as a compromise between a fully rigid classical mirror
and a very thin mirror that would need active support at all times. Both the shape of
the NTT primary and the position of the secondary mirrors were actively controlled.
In a break with previous practice, the telescope had neither a C
­ assegrain, nor a prime
focus. Instead it featured multimode instruments placed at the twin N
­ asmyth foci.
The telescope was housed in a very compact and well-­ventilated enclosure3 to avoid
dome seeing, an ailment that had been the curse of the classical telescopes. For the
same reason, and as is now customary, all heat-generating sources had been removed
from the observing floor. Since the compactness meant that the telescope could only
move in altitude within the building, the enclosure was designed to rotate with the
telescope. Technically, but also in a very visual way, the NTT signalled the dawn of
a new age of telescope design.
From the outset, it was not at all obvious that this new telescope would become the
pioneer of a new generation of telescopes. In fact, when idea of the telescope first
1	

ESO astronomers colloquially talk about the 3.6-metre telescope — meaning the classical telescope at the very
top of the La Silla mountain — and the 3.5-metre NTT. But this is a bit curious since the 3.6-metre features a
primary mirror of 3.57 metres diameter, whereas the mirror of the NTT is actually 3.58 metres in diameter.

2	

75 axial actuators, three fixed points and 24 lateral actuators.

3	

Inspired by the Multiple-Mirror Telescope building on Mt. Hopkins.

187

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

arose — with Wolfgang Richter as the key engineer — the most novel feature had
been the alt-azimuth mount, an idea that, as we have seen, had also begun to be
used elsewhere. Soon, however, Ray Wilson’s ideas about active optics support systems were adopted as an integral part of the project. The early phase also brought
a reminder of the troubles of the 3.6-metre telescope project: originally a German
consortium had been tasked with designing the telescope, but in the end their proposal did not meet with satisfaction at ESO. Massimo Tarenghi, the NTT project
leader, consulted Wolfgang Richter, who had stayed in Geneva when ESO moved
to Garching. In the end, ESO decided to revise the design completely with the help
of an internal group, with Rainer Grothe and Sergio Lopriore as the main people
involved. The contract for the main mechanical structure was awarded to InnocentiSanteustacchio (INNSE) in Brescia, Italy, while Carl Zeiss won the contract for the
delivery of the mirrors. The primary mirror was cast on 25 July 1984 at the Schott
Glassworks in Mainz and transferred to Carl Zeiss Oberkochen in June 1986 for
the optical figuring.

The NTT primary mirror at Zeiss, mounted on the support structure, seen shortly before delivery to ESO.
(Photo by the author)

188

Chapter II-9 ∙ NTT First Light

Around this time the building was completed and the main mechanical structure
arrived in Chile from Genoa. On 13 July 1988 the NTT primary mirror was presented to a wider audience at a press conference at Carl Zeiss in Oberkochen. Before
this public event, the optical elements — the primary, secondary and Nasmyth mirrors had been subject to thorough testing by the manufacturer. The results were truly
impressive, as reported in The ESO Messenger: “… the results of the Carl Zeiss interferometric tests, established in a most rigorous way, are as follows for the whole optical
train M1, M2, M3: (a) 80% geometrical energy within ca. 0.30 arcseconds; (b) 80%
geometrical energy within ca. 0.125 arcseconds for the Intrinsic Quality 4 .” In a qualitative assessment, the project team wrote that “the results were so good that they exceeded
even the expectations of both Carl Zeiss and ESO in all respects.” (Wilson et al., 1988).
However, despite the statement about the “the whole optical train”, the telescope
optics were not tested together before being shipped to Chile.
≈
The mirror arrived safely at La Silla in September 1988 and was installed at the NTT
in January 1989, and everyone was getting ready for the moment of first light. In
Chapter III-14 (in connection with the VLT), we shall discuss in more detail why
this is so significant, but at the moment, it suffices to say that traditionally, first light
is the milestone that marks the passage of a telescope into the ranks of active scientific instruments. First light is normally preceded by extensive tests of all the systems, and this was no different in the case of the NTT. So, as soon as possible, Ray
Wilson took a first glance through the telescope at a real star. He had longed for this
moment and his expectations were high — after all, the optical test results at Zeiss
had been outstanding. Wilson is a truly kind and gentle person with a wide breadth
of interests. But below his amenable appearance is a personality with marked opinions and attitudes, not infrequently deviating from mainstream thinking. “Ray, the
heretic,” he sometimes calls himself, with a smile — and some pride. Perhaps these
are the hallmarks of a perfectionist. So it is no surprise that his dream was to build
the perfect telescope. But what he saw that night at the telescope was far from perfect. An expert optician, it did not take him long to recognise serious spherical aberration in the images. His first thought was that it was possibly caused by a large temperature gradient, in other words a transient effect. But he was worried as he went
to bed. The next night brought certainty: the reason why the images suffered badly
4	

Meaning “ if five terms, to be controlled actively, are mathematically removed from the combined image forming
wavefront”.

189

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

from spherical aberration was a matching error between the primary and the secondary mirror: the figure of the primary mirror was flawed! We have already discussed the Hubble Space Telescope and the optical problem that initially plagued
this telescope. At the time of the NTT commissioning, this was still not known,
but it is sobering to realise that, within slightly more than a year 5 , two astronomical
telescopes — both highly praised, eagerly awaited by the scientific community, and
indeed expected to become the standard bearers of astronomical science — would
turn out to feature flawed optics. The error had essentially the same cause in both
cases too: faulty test procedures leading to an incorrect figure for the primary mirror and hence a problem known as matching error. It is easy to criticise the tests, but
the truth is that testing a Ritchey-Chretien Cassegrain telescope, with its combination of a hyperbolic primary and a convex secondary, is intrinsically difficult and
even minute errors may have catastrophic effects. A key tool to probe the optical
performance is known as the compensation system or reflective null corrector. This
piece of equipment is itself difficult to manufacture because of the extreme precision required. Of course, the experts at Carl Zeiss knew how to make a null corrector, but sometimes human fallibility also puts in an appearance in the cathedrals of
science and technology. It turned out that during the manufacture, a spacer error in
the optical system of the null corrector had been discovered. However, the technician who was supposed to correct the error had mistaken a sign in front of a number and thereby doubled the mistake rather than eliminated it! In the end, the displacement was 1.8 millimetres. This may seem like a small amount, but in optics the
result is dramatic 6 . In his book, Reflecting Telescope Optics, Wilson quotes an optical
expert at Zeiss, Christoph Kühne, for the following remark: “God invented the number, the devil invented the sign!” (Wilson, 1996). However, in the case of the NTT,
it was not divine intervention that made up for the error. Fittingly for a telescope
that is “active”, the solution lay at hand — in the active support system. We remember that the actuators underneath the primary mirror serve precisely to influence the
shape of the mirror, so in principle, it should be possible to cure the fault by means
of forces applied by the actuators.

5	

The Hubble Space Telescope was launched on 24 April 1990, one year, one month, and one day after the NTT
first light.

6



Zeiss had decided not to perform an additional test, known as the pentaprism test, which would have revealed
the problem. In the parallel case of the Hubble Space Telescope, Perkin Elmer, the company responsible for the
optics, had also not made this final check. In the case of the NTT, the error was corrected by the active optics
system. This was not possible for the Hubble Space Telescope, its optical system being a passive one.

190

Chapter II-9 ∙ NTT First Light

Lothar Noethe, Gaetano Andreoni and Ray Wilson in the
NTT control room during first light.

“The Best Telescope Yet” was the headline about the NTT in
Sky and Telescope, the American popular astronomy magazine in September 1989.

191

Since the start of the NTT
project Woltjer had firmly
supported Ray Wilson’s ideas
about telescope design, but he
had imposed one condition on
the project: the telescope also
had to work in a passive mode.
For this reason, with a thickness of 24 centimetres, and thus
an aspect ratio of 1:15, the primary mirror was not as thin —
and therefore also not as flexible — as Wilson had wished.
But, fortunately, Wilson had
allowed for sufficient range in
the forces that could be applied
by the support system. Using
slightly less than 90% of the
full range, it was possible to
fully correct the error.
On the night that began on
22 March 1989, the corrected
NTT saw first light with spectacular success, delivering “the
best ever recorded images in
ground-based astronomy,” as
Wilson subsequently wrote in
The ESO Messenger. The NTT
team had chosen a perfect
night, and in the telescope control room, Ray Wilson, Lothar
Noethe and Jorge ­Melnick,
among others, watched with
growing excitement as the first
images appeared on the computer screen. The Director
General, Harry van der Laan,

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

recalled: “Lots of people were sceptical [in view of the many new design ideas]. First
light was something we looked forward to with anticipation and also with some trepidation. But when the first results came in we could hardly contain ourselves!”
Ray Wilson later described the moment as “the culmination of his career” (Wilson,
2002), which by a stroke of luck coincided with his birthday. The best image was
obtained two hours after midnight. From La Silla, the image files were transferred
to a control room in Garching, where Richard West and his team waited in suspense.
Upon arrival of the first picture, a crowded field of 47 × 47 arcseconds in the globular
cluster Omega Centauri, West withdrew to his office, packed with charts and photographic plates. Soon thereafter, he emerged with a happy smile: he had identified
the field in the cluster and had found a photographic plate of the same field obtained
with the 3.6-metre telescope during commissioning. The comparison was breathtaking: the NTT image displayed a resolution of 0.33 arcseconds against 1.0 arcseconds
for the 3.6-metre telescope7. “Some people said: Did they fake this? This can’t really be
true that the very first experiment more than meets the specifications,” van der Laan
continued. But true it was.

Field Near Centre of Omega Centauri
12

12

1-metre Schmidt (~2)

3.6-metre (~1)

NTT (raw;0.33)

NTT (deconvolved;0.18)

A result that raised eyebrows — the NTT first light image of a small part of Omega Centauri.
7	

It is a tribute to the new design, underpinned by technological advances, that while the NTT yielded a threefold increase in resolution, the construction cost actually amounted to roughly a third of the cost for the 3.6metre telescope.

192

Chapter II-9 ∙ NTT First Light

Impressive as it was, it could be bettered: in 1991, an observing team led by Reinhard
Genzel obtained NTT images 8 with a resolution of 0.25 arcseconds 9 of a field in the
Milky Way centre. The observations were part of a long-term study by the group of
the motion of stars at the centre of the galaxy in order to determine the mass of the
black hole then believed to reside there and now confirmed.
≈
The success of the NTT, in the first hours of its use, provided a strong boost to ESO
at a time when the organisation was preparing for the VLT. Despite severe technical
limitations at the commissioning stage in 1989, early observations included, among
others, studies of planetary nebulae, the optical identification of X-ray sources and
naturally observations of SN1987A. With the advantage of the superior optical performance, the small nebula of interstellar matter, excited by the ultraviolet flash at the
explosion, could be imaged “ better than any reported to date” (Gouiffes et al., 1989).

The NTT Deep Field in the constellation of Sextans. This picture shows a small part of the field and reveals galaxies down to
the 29th magnitude — in the words of the ESO Press Release
equalling “the faint light of a glow-worm in Garching, as
seen from La Silla, 12 000 kilometres away”.
8	

Astronomy is a highly competitive science, and so, resting on
one’s laurels is not good: either
for scientists or their telescopes.
Having already yielded the
sharpest image ever obtained
with a ground-based optical telescope, at first light, the NTT
soon broke another record. It
was used to detect galaxies of
the 29th magnitude, at least 2.5
times fainter than had ever been
seen before by any telescope, be
it on ground or in space. This
was achieved in 1991 with an
image of a small section of the
sky called the NTT Deep Field.
It was based on almost seven

With a special instrument for high-resolution imaging in the near infrared, SHARP.

9	

After image stacking and appropriate image processing.

193

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

hours of observing time and the stacking of 41 individual images of the same field
in the constellation of Sextans — selected for its apparent “emptiness”, understood
as meaning that it was free of bright objects. Of course, the field was anything but
empty really: it was full of faint galaxies. “As a matter of fact, it is not even certain that
there is any place where we are able to see the sky background,” wrote Bruce P
­ eterson,
the principal investigator, in The ESO ­Messenger (Peterson et al., 1991). This was
important, since what the team of scientists cautiously described as “ detecting and
measuring extremely faint galaxies” was in fact a bold attempt to see if the point could
be reached beyond which we would see no galaxies anymore. Even if the NTT Deep
Field image did not provide any spectroscopic information, from which redshifts
could be inferred, it seemed clear that this point had not yet been reached. This notwithstanding, “this NTT picture has given us a tantalising, first glimpse of what can
be done with the new and improved observational means which are now at our disposal.
It has given us a unique look into regions of the Universe, so remote in space and time
that they have never before been explored. This is the type of work that will be at the
frontline of optical observational cosmology during the coming years,” wrote Peterson.
There would indeed be more deep fields to come.

The first results from the NTT were presented at a press conference in connection with the inauguration
celebrations on 6 February 1990. Seen from left to right: Manfred Ziebell, Daniel Enard, Ray Wilson,
Harry van der Laan and Masssimo Tarenghi. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

194

Chapter II-9 ∙ NTT First Light

The early success of the NTT also contributed to increasing the confidence of the
Member States with respect to ESO’s next project — the VLT. This was clearly
pronounced during the festive inauguration of the telescope, held at the Garching
Headquarters, on 6 February 1990 in the presence of, among others, science ministers from Belgium (Louis Tobback), France (Hubert Curien) and Germany (Heinz
­R iesenhuber). Italy was represented by Antonio Ruberti (at the time Italian Minister and later European Commissioner for Research), while Ambassador Jean-Pierre
Keusch represented Switzerland. As already mentioned, the realisation of the NTT
had become possible with the extra funding provided by the two new Member States,
Italy and Switzerland. Indeed Ambassador Keusch put the early success of the NTT
into the wider context of the VLT: “With the commissioning of the NTT, its exciting career as one of the world’s outstanding scientific instruments now officially begins.
The other key role of our new telescope is of course that of a technological predecessor to
the Very Large Tele­scope, decided by the Member States in December 1987… . ESO’s
budget will have to be increased ­considerably, but I am confident that Member States
will honour their commitment and that the Executive, building on its experience with
the NTT, will cope successfully with this new challenge.”
≈
The NTT brought new opportunities to the scientific community of Europe. La Silla
now had two 4-metre-class telescopes and this enabled ESO to address a problem
that had been present for a long time. As mentioned earlier, obtaining observing
time is a highly competitive process. The telescopes had long been oversubscribed
and thus many scientifically very highly-ranked research projects could not be pursued. In 1987, for example, ESO received more than twice the number of applications than the slightly over 300 that could be accommodated. At the same time, to
satisfy as many users as possible, observing time, when granted, had been strictly
apportioned. On the 3.6-metre telescope it could be one night (or less) and practically
never exceeded a few nights. Indeed, of those proposals accepted, roughly half were
granted less observing time than they had actually applied for (Breysacher, 1988).
While this was often quite enough to secure a rich harvest of data, some research
projects needed considerably more observing time, frequently spread over long time
intervals. ESO’s Director General described the problem as follows: “The following
scenario is … a painful reality for many an ESO user. You request five nights in a judiciously balanced trade-off between minimal astronomical needs and your estimate of

195

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the OPC’s 10 range. Then you get three nights, of which one is partly cloudy; your astrophysical goal shifts another year and the substance of your PhD student’s thesis erodes
precariously. The focus of your own scientific attention is blurred, you have to work in
several areas at once and a rival/friend on another continent takes a decisive lead.” (van
der Laan, 1988).
The solution, it appeared to van der Laan, was to introduce the idea of Key Programmes, and these were proposed in the spring of 1988. Successful Key Programme
applications would be granted substantial observing time, thus enabling exciting new
science to be done. Examples of observing projects from which this approach would
benefit included optical identification of distant radio sources, the study of nearby
clusters of galaxies as well as of high-redshift (i.e. exceedingly distant) galaxies, the
search for quasars and gravitational lenses (as described in Chapter II-6). With a
heavy bias towards extragalactic research, this clearly stimulated a shift in research
priorities within the scientific community. It also helped the community to prepare
for the much more powerful VLT, a telescope that with its larger light grasp would
be ideally suited for exactly that kind of research.
The Key Programmes quickly became a hot topic among European astronomers 11.
Applying for massive amounts of telescope time would surely not be less competitive, and this had an interesting side effect, as can be seen in the description of one
of the first successful proposals: “At least three distinct groups … were already involved
in the study of gravitational lensing effects. Observations were being performed with …
the help of various telescopes on La Silla as well as at other observatories (Very Large
Array [VLA], Canada France Hawaii Telescope [CFHT], Palomar, Kitt Peak, etc.). A
general feeling existed that our individual work was progressing very slowly, the number
of effective nights that were allocated to our programmes being modest… . We all knew
that there was a total absence of coordination between our independent programmes
and that, of course, we could not avoid duplicating observations of similar objects. Furthermore, each of our teams was hoping very much to broaden its observational interests:
those studying highly luminous quasars wished to look also at distant radio galaxies, and
vice versa, but this would remain a mere dream until … it became really possible for our
10	

As mentioned in Chapter I-5, OPC, the Observing Programme Committee, is the body that evaluates observing proposals and recommends time allotments to the Director General. It is the body that has to make the
often painful choices between the many excellent proposals that the user community submit to ESO on a twiceyearly basis.

11	

In fact no less than 42 proposals were submitted in response to the first call in 1988. Twelve proposals were
accepted.

196

Chapter II-9 ∙ NTT First Light

present team to submit an ESO Key Programme entitled Gravitational lensing: quasars and radio galaxies. We do feel very fortunate today since our programme has been
generously allocated 54 nights with the ESO 3.6-metre and/or NTT telescopes, 48 with
the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope and 9 effective nights with the Danish 1.54-metre
telescope during the next three years, starting effectively during period 43 (1 April–1
October, 1989).” (Surdej et al., 1989). Thus the advent of the NTT not only realised
ESO’s aspirations in terms of exploring new ground as regards telescope technologies,
but also gave European astronomers a tool with which they could decisively advance
their research. What the NTT did not do, was to reduce the pressure factor on the
La Silla telescopes. It seemed that the more and the better observational facilities that
were put at their disposal, the more ideas were developed in the increasingly vibrant
European community of astronomers.
The Key Programmes were complemented by a new training programme for young
astronomers. This allowed for doctoral students to spend up to two years at ESO,
either at Garching or in Chile as part of their studies. This gave wonderful opportunities for promising young people and at the same time contributed to forging an
early awareness of the European dimension in astronomy. We shall return to this in
Chapter IV-8.
The initial success of the NTT, the Key Programmes and the Student Programme
all pointed towards a bright future for European astronomy. But obviously the most
important contribution to that future was the momentous decision to construct the
VLT. Yet it would be while before that telescope would collect photons from distant
celestial objects. In the coming chapters, we shall look at the arduous path towards
the realisation of this project and the breakthrough for European astronomy that
it signified.

197

Part III:
The Breakthrough

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Artist’s impression of the VLT in 1987. We see the four 8.2metre telescopes in a straight line. The telescopes were supposed
to be operated in the open air, but protected from the wind
by a screen running along the entire array (not shown in this
drawing). Inflatable enclosures would offer protection from
bad weather. There is a huge gantry crane to service the telescopes. Seen to the left of the array are two auxiliary telescopes
on tracks, one of them somewhat downhill. (Illustration by
Jean Leclercq)

200

Chapter III-1

Back to the Drawing Board
”Whereof what’s past is prologue,
what to come — In yours and my discharge.”
William Shakespeare, from The Tempest.

I

n his memoirs Riccardo Giacconi, who was to become ESO’s fifth Director General, writes “VLT … represented at least six times the organisation’s annual budget”
(Giacconi, 2008). The VLT expressed the aspirations of Europe’s astronomers, but
it certainly also constituted a gigantic challenge for the engineers, scientists and
project managers at ESO. If anyone was acutely aware of this fact it was Harry van
der Laan, who took over as Director General from Lodewijk Woltjer in January
1988. Van der Laan was the third Dutchman in a row at the helm of the organisation. Before assuming the post, he had been in charge of the national Dutch radio
observatories at Dwingeloo and Westerbork, as well as serving as scientific director
of the Leiden Observatory, but he had also been involved in the discussions about
the VLT project, notably as the first chairman of the Site Selection Committee.
Van der Laan is extremely eloquent, perhaps — some might say — with an occasional hint of loftiness, yet always deeply human in his approach to his staff. Barely
a month before, Council had taken its historic decision to embark on the VLT project, based on the Blue Book. Van der Laan’s task was to turn the proposal into reality. The path towards this goal would be bumpy, which should not have come as a
surprise to anyone. Pushing technology for science is about doing things that no one
else has done before. How could this project not have entailed surprises? Indeed, as
Adriaan Blaauw expressed it: “… ESO again entered a phase of pioneering, but this
time not just by European standards, but on a worldwide scale: whereas expertise for
certain components of the VLT is available here and there, no ground-based observatory of the scope foreseen for VLT is in existence yet. Therefore ESO has had to build up
in-house expertise, and in close collaboration with experts from outside, a set up qualified to do the job.” (Blaauw in Krige & Guzetti, 1995).

201

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The main issues that would mark van der Laan’s tenure were the detailed design
of the VLT — what in contemporary ESO parlance is called a Phase B1 — the site
selection, the key decisions on interferometry, the awarding of the main industrial
contracts (for the mirror blanks, figuring and the main mechanical structure). In
parallel there was the development of an initial VLT instrumentation plan and the
decision to devolve this programme to include national institutes, the introduction
of the concept of Key Programmes and the student programme. In this chapter, we
shall look at each of the VLT-related issues from a project management point of view,
and discuss more technical isssues in the chapters that follow.
In reality, the Blue Book was effectively a conceptual description with many options
and some top-level specifications. It could be nothing more, since much research
and development (R&D) still had to be done. This applied, for example, to the primary mirrors, where there still was discussion about the possible use of metal mirrors instead of glass ceramics. Nobody had ever cast a blank of that size and while
ideas existed about how to do it, they were still unproven. In the area of adaptive
optics, development had also only just started. The Blue Book presented the Unit
Telescopes as a linear array, but it also kept open the choice of site (though ­Paranal
was prominently mentioned), a choice that might affect the final configuration of
the array. And while there was no doubt that the interferometer would influence the
layout, it was not yet clear how.
The VLT project also meant that ESO changed from being a single-mission programme organisation to a project-driven one with multiple activities running in
parallel. Since the setting up of the TP Division, ESO had very much been a handson operation, in the sense that the people would take part at the most practical
level in developing telescopes and equipment for La Silla. But with the VLT, ESO
moved into a regime of heavy industrial interaction and cooperation, with stringent
requirements for the upfront definition of detailed technical specifications, financial
management and liability questions, especially in R&D-intensive areas. This in turn
necessitated changes within the organisation and the recruitment of a number of new
staff members. The first major change involved the splitting of the now venerable Telescope Project Division into two: a Project Division and a Technology Division. Two
years later, the Project Division was transformed into a dedicated VLT Division 2 .
1	

At the time this was called the Final Design.

2	

In January 1995, however, the VLT division was again split into two when a dedicated Instrumentation Division was established, moving some 40 staff from the VLT Division.

202

Chapter III-1 ∙ Back to the Drawing Board

We have seen how Woltjer had prepared the ground for ESO’s next steps, by navigating the political landscape, identifying promising technological solutions and
very much by recruiting the right people. But his style had been fairly autocratic.
This had hardly been an issue in the past. As a European organisation, ESO was
steeped in a Franco-German culture, with a fairly strict hierarchical order. The academic world in the 1950s and early 1960s was hardly any different. But now it was
nearly the 1990s, and van der Laan had different ideas about how ESO should be
run, with a more inclusive, or participatory, management style. Furthermore, the
constraints on budget and personnel 3 , developing the VLT, completing the NTT
and maintaining operations at La Silla, forced him to introduce a matrix organisational structure with about 20 individual VLT-related integrated task groups (covering optics, electronics and mechanics) — something new at ESO. The restructuring also meant changes at the upper management level. The early phase of the
VLT project, which we would today call Phase A, had been skilfully led by Daniel
Enard. With the transition in 1988 into the detailed design study, the Phase B, an
initial triumvirate of Enard, Tarenghi and Robert Fischer led the project. However,
in November 1991, after a brief interim period, during which time the project was
managed by Joachim Becker, who had come from the aerospace industry, Massimo
Tarenghi was appointed as project manager. Tarenghi brought both a profound scientific background and his project experience from the 2.2-metre and NTT projects. Ray Wilson, naturally, continued to play an important role as regards the VLT
optics, although mainly as a consultant.
While the new organisational structure was being put into place, van der Laan set
out to turn the VLT project into reality. First, this required a careful reassessment of
the project, now from the point of view of a practical implementation, which meant
taking firm decisions on a number of key issues. Work began on the detailed design
and — for components with long lead times, such as the primary mirrors — with
preparing the calls for tender. The outcome of this would reveal that the original project schedule had been too optimistic.
3	

The staffing level was set by the ESO Council and the Council had traditionally displayed considerable reluctance in increasing the staff complement. Realising the problems this created for the implementation of the VLT
project, van der Laan pushed hard for a staff increase. In the past a solution, which had been widely used, was
to hire personnel as auxiliary staff or in other categories intended for temporary functions. Towards the end of
the 1980s this was no longer tenable and it was decided to convert many of these positions into regular international staff positions. Thus the limited staffing increase of nine positions, to which Council agreed under pressure from the Director General, mainly went into converting existing positions instead of increasing the personnel. It wasn’t until 2006 that Council formally gave up its practice of determining the staff level and left the
decisions to the Director General within the general limit of the budget.

203

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

≈

By 1992, the VLT had assumed the shape that we know today, seen here in this aerial photo: The four 8.2metre Unit Telescopes in their enclosures, placed in an almost trapezoidal configuration, with the movable 1.8-metre Auxiliary Telescopes on tracks, the interferometric focus building at the centre of the photo
and the control room building to the left, below the telescope deck. A comparison with the illustration on
p. 200 shows how much it had changed. (Photo: Gerd Hüdepohl)

Meanwhile, over the next two years, the project would undergo significant changes
and become the VLT that we know today: this was partly because a reconsideration
of the scientific requirements led to the decision to add Cassegrain foci to all the
telescopes. This was a costly proposition and had major repercussions for the overall telescope design. The changes included raising the altitude axis to gain free space
underneath each telescope, significantly complicating the design of the primary mirror (M1) cell (among other things requiring a rotator and adding considerable weight
at what is its weakest point) to the M2 unit as well as modifying the M3 tower. However, measured by the amount of science that has since been done with Cassegrain
instruments on the VLT, there can be no doubt that this addition was important4 .
According to the Blue Book, the VLT was intended to be operated in the open air,
4	

During the period 1999–2009, the twin Cassegrain instruments FORS1 and FORS2 alone provided the basis
for no less than 1359 research papers. In 2009, when X-shooter, the first second generation instrument for the
Cassegrain focus, became operational, it instantly gained second position in terms of the amount of requested
observing time.

204

Chapter III-1 ∙ Back to the Drawing Board

but equipped with inflatable shelters to protect the telescopes in extreme weather
conditions. Experiments with inflatable shelters began at La Silla, using a half-scale
test setup in early 1988. However, when P
­ aranal was finally chosen as the site, the
features and conditions on this location firstly dictated that the idea of operating the
telescopes in the open air should be abandoned5 and secondly, it opened up options
for a different configuration of the array than the one foreseen in the Blue Book.
The idea of a linear array was therefore scrapped. But all of these changes took time.
For example, the introduction of huge enclosures meant that extensive wind-tunnel
tests were required to ensure that the seeing conditions on ­Paranal were not adversely
influenced by the buildings or by their placement relative to each other. Finally, a
major decision was that for the realisation of the project, ESO would act as its own
main contractor. It would, in other words, not delegate the overall project management to an external company, but instead define, prepare and monitor a large number of individual contracts for individual items or services to be delivered by industry.
≈
The first major contract to be concluded concerned the primary mirrors, for which
the Blue Book had presented two options — glass ceramics or metal blanks. ESO
had carried out experiments with aluminium mirrors but eventually decided against
this solution6 . Two suppliers of glass blanks made offers to ESO — the Schott Glassworks in Mainz, Germany and Corning, the US glassmaker that had also supplied
the blank for the 3.6-metre telescope. The Schott offer was for blanks produced in
Zerodur, a patented glass-ceramic product with a zero thermal expansion coefficient. Corning, on the other hand, had proposed a traditional solution of fused silica.
The Schott product was clearly superior from a technical point of view 7. But it was
5	

Also, by this time, the NTT experience offered proof that a telescope enclosure could be designed in a way that
avoided the dreaded dome seeing problem. The final decision to go for a scaled-up, simplified NTT building
was taken in 1992 (Zago, 1992).

6	

For a while, an idea to form an industrial consortium under the name LAMA (Large Active Mirrors in Aluminum) with the participation of firms in France, Germany, Italy and Switzerland was floated. They would
produce an 8-metre metal mirror for ESO with financial support by the European technology programme,
EUREKA, which had been established in 1985 as a Franco-German initiative. The LAMA project was not an
ESO suggestion, but the initiators were keen to exchange information with ESO, based on ESO’s own experiments with metal mirrors which — among others — included the successful testing of two 1.8-metre nickelcoated aluminium mirrors (Dierickx & Zigmann, 1991), and for ESO to possibly procure an 8-metre blank
from the consortium.

7	

The development of Zerodur dates back to the late 1960s.The first Zerodur blanks for astronomical purposes
were for the 2.2-metre and the 3.6-metre Max Planck telescopes at Calar Alto in southern Spain in the 1970s.
Zerodur made the Schott Glassworks a world leader in this most demanding market (Morian, 2003).

205

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

expensive and required a longer delivery time. Furthermore, Schott proposed to use
a novel technique, spin casting, which had not been tested and entailed a risk that it
was reluctant to carry itself 8 . Questions of liability became a major issue. However,
after lengthy negotiations, a satisfactory solution was found. The VLT mirrors obviously required a huge mass of glass to be prepared and poured at a very high temperature into a mould. For this purpose, vital parts of the equipment had to be made out
of platinum because of its unique non-corrosive characteristics. It was feared that the
substantial amount necessary — about seven tonnes — might severely, if momentarily, impact the world market 9 and, in any case, involve costs that could not possibly
be covered by the VLT project. Robert Fischer 10 , however, came up with an innovative solution: Schott should de facto rent the amount of platinum for the duration
of the casting, thus reducing the financial burden to acceptable levels11. In September 1988 a contract was signed with Schott for the delivery of four 8.2-metre blanks
at a price of 55.5 million deutschmarks. As already mentioned, at that time no one
had ever cast a glass mirror of that size, but Schott had firm ideas about how to do it.
However, they also had to erect an entirely new production plant. In July 1989, the
traditional ground breaking took place and the buildings, totalling 50 000 square
metres, were completed in 1991 (Müller et al., 1993). The second large VLT contract was also awarded in July 1989 — this time to REOSC for the polishing of the
VLT primary mirrors at a price of 36 million deutschmarks. REOSC also needed
a new facility, although it was more modest in size: a mere 1100 square metres, but
equipped with a 32-metre high tower for interferometric tests. This plant was dedicated in April 1992 by Hubert Curien, then the French Minister for Research and
Space. We shall look at the mirror production shortly. However, from the point of
view of project management, the logistics of the mirror production, in combination
with the expected construction of the telescopes, dictated a delay of several years12 . It
8	

The necessary R&D was supported financially by the German Federal Government.

9	

The world production of platinum in 1987 was less than 130 tonnes, and the market price was in excess of 10 million US dollars/tonne.

10	

In projects like this, with their strong focus on technology and science, it often happens that rather little credit
is given to the administrative side. However, in several conversations that the author has conducted with some
of the key actors, Robert Fischer was recognised and praised for his contribution to the VLT programme, not
the least for the superior way in which he guarded the integrity and credibility of the procurement activities.

11	

Accepting this solution, Schott bought the platinum at the London Commodity Exchange and sold it again
after closing the 8-metre production line.

12	

The Blue Book foresaw the completion of the first blank in December 1993, but the new projection suggested
November 1995. The delivery of the last blank, originally expected in December 1998 now slipped to August
2000, and possibly even into 2001, depending on the polishing capacity of REOSC. In the end, however, the
delivery occurred earlier than feared.

206

Chapter III-1 ∙ Back to the Drawing Board

appeared that the optics might not be completed before the year 2000. The news was
presented to the Scientific Technical Committee (STC) in October 1988 and subsequently to Council. Among the major contracts still pending were the contracts for
the M2 unit, the secondary mirrors with their complex control systems, and for the
main mechanical structure. The contracts for the M1 mirror cells with their intricate
support systems and, of course, the VLT enclosures were also pending.
To stimulate interest in industry and to give a fair chance to all, a four-day information meeting for European industry was organised at the City Hilton hotel in
Munich in April 1989.

Almost 300 representatives from industry attended the VLT Industry Days at the Munich City Hilton.
(Photo by the author)

≈
The sizes of the main VLT contracts were such that they whetted the appetite of
industry, causing fierce competition not simply between individual companies13 but
also, to some extent, between countries. ESO has to act within strict procurement
rules, aimed at securing the best deal for the organisation. Importantly, it does not
13	

In many cases, the number of potential bidders was small, due to the challenging technological requirements.

207

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

have to follow the principle of juste retour, i.e. awarding industrial contracts in a way
that is proportional to the contributions of its individual Member States. However,
even without the juste retour requirement, Member States eventually like to see a
balanced return on their investment, at least within a time period of perhaps five or
ten years. This is normally possible, but in a project with a few very large contracts
the representatives of the Member States naturally keep a close watch on ESO’s procurement activities. Occasionally, it may also cause situations where delegates must
master the delicate balance between the interests of the organisation as a whole and
the legitimate interests of the government and country that they represent.
In June 1990, the call for tender for the main mechanical structure went out to industry. This was the largest individual contract of the project, with a value of 76.5 million deutschmarks. Eight offers were received. In the end, two bids stood out as most
promising, one from a consortium in Italy, another from a group of companies in
France, Belgium and Switzerland. But both proposals raised points of concern. After
evaluation by ESO’s technical and administrative experts, their recommendation
came out in favour of the Italian consortium. However, the Finance Committee,
which normally deals with large contracts and must approve them before ESO can
go ahead, could not reach an agreement. It eventually became an issue for the ESO
Council and it was finally decided to organise individual meetings with bidders to
review their proposals. These were carried out over the summer and, in September
1991, ESO finally signed the contract with the Italian consortium under the acronym
AES, made up of three partners: Ansaldo Componenti (of the IRI ­Finmeccanica
Group), European Industrial Engineering (EIE), and SOIMI (­Società Impianti
Industriali, a part of the Asea-Brown Boveri (ABB) Group). The contract covered
all the steel structures, the hydrostatic bearings on which these heavy structures
would rest, direct drive motors to move the telescopes and high-precision encoders
to measure their exact position in order to ensure accurate pointing. A kick-off meeting followed in October of that year.
≈
In 1991, construction work started at ­Paranal. This was only nine months after Council had chosen the site. The work involved lowering the mountain by 28 metres, which
meant removing 350 000 cubic metres of rock to create a telescope platform of the
desired size. The blasting, which began on 23 September, was done by ­Interbeton,
the Dutch company that had carried out the concrete work for the 3.6-metre
tele­scope at La Silla thirty years earlier. ESO’s men on the spot were two former

208

Chapter III-1 ∙ Back to the Drawing Board

Blasting at P
­ aranal.

e­ mployees, Peter de Jonge and Jörg Eschwey 14 , brought back to ESO by Harry van
der Laan. Blasting is hard and extremely dirty work — and quite obviously, potentially dangerous. Yet even in the rough atmosphere of the blasting operation, serene
beauty could be found, in the person of Stuart Dunn, the blasting engineer. Also a
trained opera singer, he treated his workers to sublime aria performances during the
rest periods. But at an early stage, Dunn raised concerns about the stability of the
rock, leading to an additional geological study by Fabien Bourlon, a French geologist.
The study, however, confirmed that the VLT could safely be built there, but that it
did require structural reinforcement of one of the telescope building foundations 15 .
Then the news broke that a nitrate mine was being opened by the company ­Minera
Yolanda at a distance of only 21 kilometres from the mountain. Readers will recall
that when ESO chose La Silla it also secured the ownership of a substantial area
around the mountain to avoid the potential adverse influence of mining activities
in terms of light pollution and dust in the atmosphere. Mineral extraction in Chile
is often done by open-cast mining. ESO had sought protection around Paranal
­­
in
14	

A hugely experienced construction engineer, Eschwey left ESO in 1980 for the USA. There he advanced to
become Vice President of a large (billion-dollar turnover) construction company, before he was lured back to
ESO. He would also stay involved with ESO after his formal retirement, helping both with the ALMA project
and the Headquarters expansion in Garching.

15	

In order not to damage the granite base, the blasting left the last 1.5 metres unscathed. This was subsequently
crushed with jackhammers and the rubble, basically pebbles, carefully removed in order to ensure a clean surface and sturdy connection between the base rock and the reinforced concrete.

209

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Not really a happy lunch in the park — a thoughtful Jacques
Beckers during a site-testing mission to the P
­ aranal area.

a similar way as it had done
for La Silla, but even if the
piece of protected land around
­Paranal was not small, a major
mine right on the outskirts
was bound to create worries.
To determine the effect on the
observational qualities of the
site, Jacques Beckers carried
out a study of the atmospheric
pollution from the mine. Fortunately, the mine was located
southeast of P
­ aranal and thus
the prevailing winds could be
assumed to offer some help. To
everybody’s relief, it turned out
not to create any significant
problem, and a few years later,
the mining activities ceased.

The layout of the four VLT Unit Telescopes as well as the underground tunnels are clearly visible in this
aerial photo, obtained in 1994. (Photo: Herbert Zodet)

210

Chapter III-1 ∙ Back to the Drawing Board

≈
Gradually, despite the progress achieved — with the important project changes made
and the detailed design of the project advancing, major contracts awarded, the site
development underway etc. — a sense of crisis emerged. The shortage of staff had
begun to bite and manifested itself in several ways: the internal structure was not
functioning in an optimal manner and reorganising the top-level project management had proven to be fraught with problems. Compared to the Blue Book, the
schedule was slipping. Key contracts were still pending and where work had begun in
industry, especially on the main mechanical structures, the work was moving much
more slowly than anticipated. And there were growing concerns about cost. In June
1992, the Director General had warned about an increase of 50 million deutschmarks, though this could only be an estimate.
Perhaps there was nothing unusual about the problems. It seems that any large project
goes through distinct phases — from jubilation and excitement when it is approved,
through a sobering realisation of what the project really requires, to a period of hard
troubleshooting and, fortunately, in most cases, to a success that everyone can then
acknowledge and enjoy. But by late 1992, troubleshooting was called for more than
anything else. With the ending of Harry van der Laan’s term of office, Council chose
Riccardo Giacconi as ESO’s next Director General. He would soon get a chance to
demonstrate his awesome skills as a troubleshooter.
≈
Arriving in January 1993, Giacconi brought a breath of fresh air into ESO. Some
would say a storm. For Riccardo Giacconi was not just a man with a mission, but an
impatient one. His impatience was not only caused by his realisation that he would
not have much time to accomplish his task, but also by his awareness that astronomers in the US were on track to step into a new age in ground-based optical astronomy. In fact, the very same year as he joined ESO, the first 10-metre Keck telescope
obtained first light on its excellent site at Mauna Kea, in the Hawaiian Archipelago.
Once again, US astronomers had been faster than their European colleagues and a
new parameter space for discoveries had been opened up by them. Giaconni came to
Europe from America to resurrect a project that needed to move quickly to an implementation phase, but soon encountered a string of further challenges. He is a tremendously energetic person with what sometimes appears to be tunnel vision in his
search for uncompromising excellence, combined with an uncanny skill to strike at

211

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the heart of a subject. He had played a pivotal role in developing X-ray astronomy, for
which he was later awarded the Nobel Prize in Physics (in 2002), had been in charge
of the Uhuru satellite project, then the Einstein Observatory, and subsequently led
the Space Telescope Science Institute in Baltimore before the launch of the telescope
in 1990. He had also led the institute during the stormy time when the telescope’s
serious optical flaw was discovered, threatening to make Hubble the laughing stock
of science — had the potential loss of the considerable, expected scientific exploits
not been so dramatic. Riccardo Giacconi considers himself to be an adventurer rather
than a scholar and his direct ways support that notion: an eloquent diplomat he is
not. With his characteristic candour, he stated that the ESO he found had “a wealth
of engineering and scientific talent”, yet — in his view — “[the] organisation resembled a civil service agency rather than [a] research institution”. ­Others would have disagreed. ESO, of course, operated within a European culture and had to respond to
the ways and expectations of that culture. But, aside from that, ESO certainly was
supposed to act as a service agency for the Member States’ scientists 16 . But it is an
undeniable fact that the result was a clash of cultures that led to tension between
the staff and the Director General. That tension would prevail for all of Giacconi’s
tenure, but it is a tribute to both parties that it never impeded the strong desire to
develop the VLT and to make it the success that it has become. Indeed it remains a
fact that the wonderful VLT project, initiated by Lodewijk Woltjer and prepared
by Harry van der Laan, was now infused by G
­ iacconi’s ideas, especially about operational aspects, and with his single-minded, sometimes ruthless, drive was reenergised and fully delivered. To paraphrase G
­ iacconi, the situation caused by the uneasy
relationship was “grave, but not serious”. Serious challenges, however, were soon to
come from elsewhere.
≈
In April 1993, Council convened for an extraordinary meeting, with several critical issues on the agenda. Most pressing were the state of the VLT project and the
16	

This was not simply a question of different opinions. Rather it is deeply rooted in the differences in the way
research is funded, at least in astronomy, in Europe and in the USA. In the USA there is an integrated funding system that has a strong focus on the end result — the science — while in Europe funding is more diverse,
with different funding regimes, each with their own area of responsibility. The problem has remained unresolved, as can be seen in the ASTRONET Roadmap from 2008: “While European astronomers gain access to
their major facilities as the result of peer-reviewed selection, they are generally unable to obtain dedicated funding
to carry out the associated analysis and publication of results at a speed that is competitive with their non-European
colleagues and competitors, the latter often being funded by substantial grants associated with the use of the facilities.” (ASTRONET, 2008).

212

Chapter III-1 ∙ Back to the Drawing Board

relations with Chile, to which we shall soon return. The new Director General
reported on his first impressions and expectations for the VLT project17. In June,
he presented them in a more formal way in a written report to Council and since
the assessment had not changed, we shall simply review the main findings and consequences. Compared to the original proposal, the VLT project was now suffering
from a serious delay. The key reason for the delay was the lack of manpower. Furthermore, and partly as a result of this lack, the cost was going up. The cost increase
was also due to the additional requirements on the telescope, not the least the inclusion of the Cassegrain foci. Some costs had not — or not in a sufficient manner —
been considered in the Blue Book, e.g., for interferometry, various mirror handling
tools and technical CCDs. In many cases, the budget contained in the Blue Book
was based on a best estimate, while now, the real cost was becoming clear. The original price of 382 million deutschmarks had been set in 1986 prices. Giacconi’s estimate, now based on a cost to completion calculation, was for 573 million deutschmarks, against 430 million deutschmarks, the original price, properly adjusted for
inflation and contingency. But that was not enough. Giacconi also presented a plan
for a significant increase in the personnel — 46 new staff to be added to the existing complement of 193 staff 18 . Finally he presented his ideas about a general reorganisation of ESO, with policy issues including project budget planning to be carried out within the Office of the Director General and a major staff increase in the
VLT-related functions, such as a dedicated VLT system engineering group, more
resources for software development and VLTI as well as data management, including data reduction and analysis, calibration and archiving. First light would now take
place in January 1998 according to his projections. The plan laid the foundations for
the operational concept that became an essential element of the ultimate success of
the VLT, but at the time, the reaction was anything but ecstatic. It was shock treatment. At least one government representative speculated loudly about cancelling the
entire project, but most Council members seemed to accept that there could be no
going back. ­Giacconi got it his way: or almost. The implication of the cost increase
was, of course, increased Member State contributions, possibly also involving a loan.
At the meeting in December 1993, Council did not, in principle, reject an increase,
but made it contingent on a financial audit, and in any case made it clear that the
increase would have to be lower than that requested by the Director General. Since
17	

Some of the “first impressions” were based on a thorough project review that had uncovered several technical
weaknesses — not unusual for a complex project like the VLT.

18	

This included an increase of 12 members of staff that Council had already approved at the preceding meeting
in April.

213

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

neither the loan nor the full, increased contribution option found sufficient support,
the only option left was a postponement of certain parts of the programme. Sensibly, but painfully, the VLT Interferometer fell victim to the hard financial realities.
Furthermore the plans for creating adequate living quarters on P
­ aranal in the form
of a Residencia were provisionally shelved. Staff would continue to live in steel containers for several years to come.

The financial problems in the early 1990s caused considerable headaches both for Council, the ESO management and the staff. Here’s a somewhat sarcastic comment by Philippe Dierickx, not only a master optical engineer, but also a skilled cartoonist.

214

Chapter III-2

Aux Instruments, Chercheurs!
“The 3.6-metre at La Silla had started operation in 1978.
In the following 15 years — before the VLT —
starting almost from scratch ESO succeeded to established itself
as a self standing, high quality instrument builder.”
Sandro D’Odorico, retirement lecture,
31 May 2010.

I

n Chapter II-3, we reviewed the steps in instrumentation development pre-VLT.
This period was characterised by a growing understanding of instrumentation
not only as an issue of equal importance to the construction of a new telescope, but
also as something that should be addressed early on and in conjunction with the telescope developers. Importantly, ESO had itself become a centre for the development
of modern instrumentation. The VLT would benefit both from the experience gained
and the capacity of ESO to conceive and orchestrate an almost all-encompassing
instrumentation programme. Thus, almost ten years before first light, the first VLT
instrumentation plan was presented to the scientific community. The trend was to
develop permanently installed multi-mode instruments suitable for remote control,
capitalising on the revolution in electronics and allowing for dramatically increased
efficiency. But the VLT, conceptually different from any other large telescope, also
gave ESO the opportunity to take the next step in instrumentation. With no less
than 12 individual foci available (excluding the common foci), frequent instrument
changes at the telescope, as had been necessary on the 3.6-metre telescope, would
no longer be needed, thus enhancing the efficiency and the performance of the system. It would now be possible to develop a suite of permanently mounted instruments, each of them optimised for specific tasks1. In this chapter, we will look at
these instruments. For the lay reader, this means diving into a world of technical
1	

During the early discussions, placing duplicates of the main instruments at each of the Unit Telescopes had
been considered. The idea was never realised as the gain was found to be marginal and the trade-offs considerable. However, the legacy of these early considerations was the decision to build two nearly identical focal reducers, the FORS1 and 2 instruments.

215

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

terms and concepts and a possibly bewildering set of acronyms. For the astronomer
it simply means looking at what has arguably been the world’s most comprehensive
and coherent instrumentation programme in astronomy.
In late 1988, two panels were set up to discuss the VLT instrumentation. One group,
chaired by Jacques Beckers, dealt with interferometry, the other — led by Bernard
Fort — with instrumentation for the individual Unit Telescopes. At ESO, the instrumentation programme was led by Jacques Beckers (diffraction-limited and interferometric instrumentation), Sandro D’Odorico (optical instrumentation) and Alan
Moorwood (infrared instrumentation) (D’Odorico et al., 1991). Both D’Odorico
and Moorwood were old hands at ESO. Moorwood had joined ESO in 1978 after
working at the European Space Research and Technology Centre in Noordwijk,
the ­Netherlands. D’Odorico had arrived at ESO just two years later from the
­Osservatorio Astronomico di Padova. Together they would play decisive roles in
ESO’s instrumentation programme for more than 20 years. In June 1989, the first
ideas were presented to the scientific community in a document entitled ESO VLT
Instrumentation Plan: Preliminary Proposals and Call for Responses. Those days
were clearly infused by great optimism and excitement. And ambition 2 . The introductory text concluded: “There is time to get our act together, there is room for consultation, there is money for bright ideas, there are potential rewards for bold initiatives.
We invite your response.”
The call resulted in close to 40 replies. Following their evaluation, in March 1990, the
revised plan was presented to the Scientific and Technical Committee, followed by
a new call, now for proposals for specific instrumentation. If the VLT was an ambitious project, the instrumentation plan was no less so.
≈
The instrumentation plan foresaw a total of ten different instruments, of which initially two were to be built by ESO and eight by consortia of national institutes. The
rationale for retaining instrument-building activities at ESO was obviously to exploit
and maintain existing expertise, but also to establish the necessary standardisation
aspects for the full instrumentation programme. The rationale for devolving the
2	

At the time the VLT was to offer no less than 18 foci. In addition to the Nasmyth and the (newly added)
­Cassegrain foci as well as the coherent and incoherent common foci, it was also thought that each Unit Telescope would have a coudé focus. The technical installations necessary for the coudé were in fact implemented,
but in the end no instrument was developed.

216

Chapter III-2 ∙ Aux Instruments, Chercheurs!

programme, on the other hand, was to exploit unique expertise in the scientific community, to strengthen the overall involvement and thus support for the VLT and, of
course, to lessen the burden on the organisation. In any event, the instruments contained in the plan constituted the first generation suite of instruments for Europe’s
new telescope. The parameter space covered was exciting: high-resolution imaging in
the optical and infrared wavelengths, low- and high-resolution spectroscopy in the
optical and infrared domains and multi-object spectroscopy, an area that with time
would become significantly more attractive. As a start, in the optical region, four
instruments were planned, each with a more or less well-chosen acronym: FORS1
and 23 (FOcal Reducer/low dispersion Spectrograph) and UVES1 and 2 4 (UV-­Visual
Echelle Spectrograph). In the infrared domain, the plans were for ISAAC (Infrared Spectrometer And Array Camera) and CONICA (Coudé Near-Infrared Camera). Further instruments foreseen included a multi-fibre area spectrograph5 , a visible
speckle camera, and an imager/spectrometer for the 8–14 µm range, a high-resolution visible spectrograph for the combined focus, a multichannel Fourier transform
spectrometer 6 and finally, a high-resolution infrared echelle spectrograph.
It seems fair to say that with the VLT instrumentation programme ESO broke new
ground also in terms of project management and implementation. Back in the early
days, we have seen that the national scientific communities built specific instruments
for the first telescopes at La Silla. But the VLT instrumentation programme was
on a different scale and its realisation was also based on the experience from space
activities 7 — with clearly defined requirements and specifications, in-depth design
reviews and very tight project control, all following a clear project implementation
path. Everything was governed by firm contracts between ESO and its various consortium partners, including penalty clauses for late delivery or other cases of noncompliance. If this was new for ESO, it was even more so for the national institutes
with their more academic traditions. But mostly they lived up to the challenge, not
least because it was a win-win deal. ESO would cover the hardware costs, the institutes the manpower costs. In return, the institutes would receive guaranteed observing time, arguably the most coveted commodity among scientists. Aside from the
3



4



FORS1 and 2 were quite similar, but not identical. Orginally, FORS1 allowed for polarimetry, FORS2 not.
UVES 2 was never built.

5	

MFAS, later known as FUEGOS.

6	

Later abandoned in favour of CRyogenic high-resolution InfraRed Echelle Spectrograph (CRIRES).

7	

The space experience that proved so invaluable was introduced forcefully by Joachim Becker, the VLT Project
Manager, who came to ESO from the space industry.

217

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

immediate benefits it brought to ESO itself and indeed to the individual scientists in
the Member States, ESO’s decision to devolve its instrumentation programme contributed greatly to establishing a network of excellence that involved its user community fully in the project. In addition to the importance of harnessing expertise
wherever it might be in Europe, came the strong feeling of ownership that is felt by
the scientific community.
≈
The first science instrument to be mounted on the VLT was FORS, the Focal
Reducer/Low dispersion Spectrograph, placed at the Cassegrain focus of the first
Unit Telescope. FORS was developed under a contract between ESO and the Universitäts-Sternwarte München, the Universitäts-Sternwarte Göttingen and the
Landessternwarte Heidelberg, with Immo Appenzeller as Principal Investigator 8
and Gero Rupprecht as the person at ESO responsible for the instrument. The contract was signed on 6 February 1992, together with a contract for the second external instrument foreseen, CONICA, an infrared camera and spectrometer built by
a different consortium.
FORS was designed as an all-round instrument, but clearly aimed at extragalactic
research projects, including the measurement of redshifts of distant galaxy clusters,
counts of galaxies, the determination of their colours and shapes and the study of
gravitational lenses.
On 15 September 1998, FORS1 was ready for action at Unit Telescope 1 (UT1). The
very first technical image was stunningly sharp with a resolution of 0.6 arcseconds.
“Not bad,” was the dry comment by Walter Seifert, the optical engineer. “Let’s see if
we can do better!” They had hit the focus, but in a sense they could do better still. For
the formal first light image, the team had chosen a spiral galaxy, NGC 1232. This
target was mainly picked because it would fill the entire field of view of 6.8 × 6.8 arcminutes, but it is also a truly beautiful sight. And the FORS image certainly did justice to that sight. In the year 2000, the popular US astronomy magazine Sky and Telescope included it among the ten space pictures with the highest impact in the 20th
century. The picture became an icon of the VLT; it was used repeatedly and appeared
everywhere, in books, magazines, on CD covers, on giant murals and in numerous
exhibitions. It even featured as a giant back-lit reproduction on the ceiling of the
8	

With Rolf Kudritzki (Munich) and Klaus Fricke (Göttingen) as Co-Investigators.

218

Chapter III-2 ∙ Aux Instruments, Chercheurs!

The famous FORS image of NGC 1232, a beautiful spiral galaxy at a distance of 120 million light-years.

European Union pavilion at EXPO 2000, the World Exhibition in Hanover. Since
their first days (or perhaps one should rather say nights) the two FORS instruments
have been the workhorses of the VLT. This becomes evident from the publication
statistics, often used to assess scientific productivity. Celebrating 20 years of FORS
science operations in 2010 (i.e. roughly ten years for each instrument), Gero Rupprecht noted that FORS data had played a role in eight out of the ten most highly cited
VLT science papers. Perhaps more impressively, its publication rate of one paper per
observing night has made FORS the most publication-efficient instrument on the
VLT ever, with UVES hard on its heels (Rupprecht et al., 2010). During construction things had gone well and there was a remarkably smooth cooperation between
the consortium partners. But this is not to say that there were no problems along the
way. During the test phase in Europe, the collimator unit fell from a crane and was
destroyed. Luckily, since FORS2 was under construction, the team simply exchanged

219

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the part and thus no delay resulted. During the first installation at P
­ aranal, the
instrument suffered from water damage. To the uninitiated, this may sound rather
strange given that FORS was after all placed in the middle of the world’s driest desert.
It appeared that the source was coolant from a leaking hose linked to the VLT guide
camera controller, in front of the instrument. The commissioning team was left with
little choice but to dismantle the entire instrument and carefully clean every surface. But on the very next night, it happened again. In such cases, perhaps only dark
humour can brighten the day. Jokes were cracked about FORS as ­Paranal’s Yellow
Submarine, referring to the yellow paint on its casing. More effective than the jokes,
though, were different hoses that have been used ever since.
≈
The two instruments to be built by ESO were ISAAC and UVES. They would be
available early on Unit Telescopes 1 and 2, respectively, and they too were unique
instruments with a huge science potential. ISAAC, the infrared imaging spectrograph, provides for imaging and spectroscopy in the 1–5 µm wavelength domain as
well as polarimetry in the non-thermal 1–2.5 μm domain.
ISAAC was the first VLT instrument developed by ESO and, aside from its specific characteristics, it is a testament to the progress achieved in instrumentation
for infrared observations. As we remember, infrared instrumentation had from the
outset been separate from instruments designed for visual wavelengths. This was
partly because of the slower progress in the development of two-dimensional panoramic array detectors for this particular wavelength domain. But much had happened since the days, when infrared work was regarded as “a dark art” (Moorwood,
2009). ISAAC was the first instrument with a two-dimensional detector array in
the near-infrared, making it essentially a near-infrared EMMI. As such it is an allround instrument, suited for observing just about any kind of object in the infrared
Universe, from star-forming regions in the Milky Way and brown dwarf stars to distant clusters of galaxies. ISAAC was mounted at the Nasmyth focus of the first Unit
Telescope in November 1998.
As mentioned, the second ESO instrument built in-house was UVES 9, the two channel high-resolution UV-Visual Echelle Spectrograph, led by Hans Dekker. UVES was
designed to be a direct competitor to HIRES, a spectrograph at the 10-metre Keck
9	

Software was supplied by the Osservatorio Astronomico di Trieste.

220

Chapter III-2 ∙ Aux Instruments, Chercheurs!

A look into the interior of ISAAC: inside the vacuum vessel. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

Telescope on Hawaii. Since this had been in operation for several years, the Keck
astronomers had gained a considerable advantage and ESO would have to work both
hard and fast to produce an instrument that could outperform HIRES.

Jean-Louis Lizon enjoys a relaxed moment during the installation of UVES. (Photo: Peter Gray)

221

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

With first light on 27 September 1999, UVES became the first instrument to be
installed at Unit Telescope 2, Kueyen. Weighing no less than 8 tonnes, UVES was
conceived for placement at the Nasmyth focus with its large, stable platform at the
side of the telescope main structure. Like FORS, the early plans for UVES foresaw
two instruments (Dekker & D’Odorico, 1992) with slightly different characteristics. However, in 1994, the idea was dropped. Instead, it was decided to build a single
instrument with two arms (covering UV to blue, and visual to red light, respectively).
The heart of this elaborate instrument was a mosaic of two optical echelle gratings,
84 cm × 21 cm × 12 cm in size — at the time the largest in the world. The two-arm
solution meant that the performance both in the UV and the red could be optimised,
providing exactly the desired competitive edge vis-à-vis its Hawaiian counterpart 10 .
The combination of very high
resolution (potentially up to
110 000) and the light grasp of
the 8.2-metre Unit Telescope
made UVES ideal for studying the presence and composition of intergalactic gas (using
distant quasars as background
light sources), as well as investigating the physical conditions
and element abundances in the
faintest stars in the Milky Way
galaxy and beyond. It is no wonder that UVES became a heavily sought-after instrument and
has played such an important
UVES spectrum of SN 1987A, covering the wavelength­ role in many of the discoverrange 479–682 nm. The spectrum is divided into many indiies made with the VLT. Indeed
vidual parts, here seen as “steps”, which are characteristic
over the years, it has maintained
of an echelle spectrograph. The spectrum reveals both inforits position as one of the top five
mation about the chemical composition and state of the matter from the supernova.
VLT instruments in terms of
10 

UVES owes its success to much more than just the two-arm concept. Other features of the instrument include
the field rotator and the atmospheric dispersion corrector. The end-to-end observing concept and its spin off,
the centralised open access science archive with calibrated data also constitute essential elements of the story.

222

Chapter III-2 ∙ Aux Instruments, Chercheurs!

popularity (quantified, perhaps a bit negatively, in terms of oversubscription) and
in the publication statistics.
≈
Another of the instruments
planned for early deployment was CONICA, built by
the Max-Planck-Institut für
Astronomie (Heidelberg), the
Max-Planck-Institut für extraterrestrische Physik (Garching) and the Osservatorio
Astronomico di Torino under
an ESO contract. CONICA
stands for Coudé Near-­Infrared
Camera, but due to programme
changes linked to the financial
problems that hit ESO in 1993,
the individual coudé foci were
abandoned and it was instead
decided to move CONICA to a
Nasmyth focus and fit it with an
In the course of the 1990s, ESO undertook a dedicated effort
adaptive optics unit, renaming
to boost its activities in the field of detectors within its two
it NAOS-CONICA to which
detector teams, one for optical and one for infrared detectors.
Among other things, the groups developed new and highly effiwe shall return in the following
cient detector controllers, FIERA and IRACE that for more
chapter. The combined instruthan a decade became the standard for all instruments at
ment only saw first light on 25
ESO’s telescopes. The photo, from 1996, shows Manfred Meyer
from the infrared detector team with an IRACE controller.
November 2001, at Unit Telescope 4, Yepun. The instrument
may have been delayed, but it became very successful: over the first decade of operations it
provided the basis for about 240 scientific papers (Fusco & Rousset, 2011), including spectacular images of the Galactic Centre and the first direct image of the brown dwarf
2M1207 with its giant planet companion (see also Chapter IV-5).
The science instruments at the VLT had changed considerably in comparison with
the specifications originally set in the earlier days of the VLT planning. Not only had
their performance improved, but their complexity had also increased ­dramatically.

223

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The sheer physical dimensions of instruments had also grown, as well as their construction times. For some instruments, the lead time approached ten years and
development happened in parallel with the telescope construction itself. Involving
national institutes entailed challenges in terms of project management to secure
delivery on time, within specifications and budget. So it comes as no surprise that the
instrumentation programme underwent changes and modifications along the way
— from the 1989 document to the Instrumentation Plan itself and then through
the period of realisation.
The last instrument of the first batch was FUEGOS, a multi-object fibre spectrograph and one of the external instruments to be built by the Observatoire de ParisMeudon, the Observatoire de Genève, the Laboratoire d’Astrophysique de Toulouse
and the Osservatorio Astronomico di Bologna. Progress towards its realisation was
slow and in 1997 ESO saw itself forced to cancel the original contract and involve
additional partners to build a successor instrument, with ESO in charge of the project management. The two main components were the fibre optics and the mechanical part of the spectrograph. The contract for the fibre optics part was awarded to
what became known under the name of AUSTRALIS, a consortium of institutes in
Australia11, and given the appropriate nickname of OzPoz, whereas the mechanical
part, GIRAFFE, remained in the hands of the Observatoire de Paris-Meudon, but
ultimately ten national institutes contributed to this instrument12 . The final instrument, which was renamed FLAMES, would also feed the high-resolution spectrograph UVES. FLAMES was installed on the Nasmyth platform of Unit Telescope
2 between September 2001 and March 2002 (Pasquini et al., 2002). An important
feature of FLAMES was its large field of view, no less than 25 arcminutes in diameter. Combined with the fibre positioner and GIRAFFE, it allows up to 132 objects
to be observed at the same time. As a novelty, FLAMES also contained a so-called
integral field unit. We have discussed the unique role of spectroscopy for our understanding of the celestial objects that we observe and this chapter has illustrated how
important this is to astrophysicists. Normally, astronomers will obtain spectra of an
individual object, say a star or a galaxy, or of a number of objects using a multi-object
spectrograph. Integral field spectroscopy marks the next step in sophistication, as it
allows the simultaneous spectral analysis of multiple parts of extended objects, or for
11	

The institutes involved were the Anglo-Australian Observatory, the Australian National University and the
University of New South Wales. The prospect of involving institutes in Australia came about in connection
with Australia’s bid to join ESO in 1995.

12	

Aside from the institues already mentioned, the observatories of Geneva and Lausanne, Cagliari, Palermo and
Trieste were involved.

224

Chapter III-2 ∙ Aux Instruments, Chercheurs!

example, of multiple objects in crowded fields such as a globular cluster of stars. The
ability to study individual objects (or areas) with a minimum of angular separation
is of course the outcome of much improved telescope performance, with larger and
better telescope optics and, decisively, the application of adaptive optics.

Bernard Delabre and Bernard Buzzoni during the integration of the Nasmyth field corrector for FLAMES
in September 2001. (Photo: Peter Gray)

≈
In 1993, a working group chaired by Laurent Vigroux and comprised of ESO staff
and external experts reviewed and revised the instrumentation plan. UVES 2 was
cancelled. On the other hand new instruments were proposed and discussed at a
conference in G
­ arching in May 1994. The new instruments that formed this second
wave of the first generation instruments were VISIR, VIMOS and NIRMOS. In
the same year, ESO decided to create a dedicated Instrument Division, from January 1995 headed by Guy Monnet. Before Monnet had been Director of the ­Canada
France Hawaii Telescope. Together with D’Odorico and Moorwood, he would oversee the evolving instrumentation programme up to 2006.

225

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Next in line, as regards ESO contracts, was VISIR (the VLT Imager and Spectrometer for the mid InfraRed). This instrument was designed to cover the 10–20 µm spectral domain, with the aim of studying, among other things, the interstellar medium,
cool stars, and circumstellar and protoplanetary discs. VISIR would be the most
powerful instrument of its kind in the world by far. The contract was signed in
November 1996 with a French–Dutch consortium of institutes13 , with expected completion in early 2001. Realising the instrument turned out to be a bigger challenge
than expected. In particular the wish to have maximum efficiency in the 20 µm
wavelength range, meant that the instrument had to be cooled to 25 K (-248 degrees
Celsius), not a trivial requirement for a complex opto-electronic and opto-mechanical piece of hardware. Non-instrument related problems, such as a fire and the subsequent flooding of the CEA building in Sarclay that housed the laboratory, added
to the problems and so the development of the instrument was anything but quick.
VISIR was shipped to Chile in March 2004. Upon arrival, it barely avoided a disaster. ESO’s normal procedure is to subject new instruments to thorough testing in
Europe and, upon successful completion of the tests, dismantle the instrument, pack
and ship it to South America. However, to save time, VISIR was not dismantled and
thus arrived in Chile in one piece and in a single box14 . During customs clearance,
however, an alert SAG inspector 15 noticed a wasp peering out of a hole in the wooden
crate. Chile is understandably keen to protect its agriculture and enforces its vetenary
border controls accordingly. The inspector therefore decided that the crate — with
contents — should be destroyed. Luckily, Armin Silber from the ESO Instrumentation Division, was present to receive the consignment and he managed to convince
the inspector that it would suffice to spray the outside of the crate with insecticide,
arguing that the crate would be taken into the desert and any surviving bugs inside
would perish there. And so, on 1 May 2004, VISIR saw first light (Lagage et al.,
2004), almost eight years after the signing of the contract. The scientists were happy
and so was a SAG inspector who had travelled to ­Paranal to personally witness the
burning of the crate — with or without any surviving bugs.

13	

The Service d’Astrophysique of the CEA, Saclay, the Netherlands Foundation for Research in Astronomy
(NFRA), Dwingeloo, the Institut d’Astrophysique Spatiale (Orsay, France) and the Netherlands Foundation
for Space Research (SRON).

14	

This was not the only instrument that arrived in one box. TIMMI (see Chapter II-3), simply occupied an economy-class airplane seat, with a ticket issued in the name of Mr TIMMI. Alas, in the meantime instuments had
not only grown in capability but also in size and weight. Thus the total weight of the VISIR instrument amounts
to no less than 2300 kg.

15	

Servicio Agrícola y Ganadero (Agricultural and Livestock Service).

226

Chapter III-2 ∙ Aux Instruments, Chercheurs!

Another instrument that went through a difficult gestation was VIMOS (­V Isible
MultiObject Spectrograph). The contract was signed in August 1997 between
ESO and the VIRMOS consortium16 and foresaw two instruments, VIMOS and
­N IRMOS, for the visible and infrared spectral bands, respectively. VIMOS is a
multi-object instrument like FLAMES and can observe many objects (in fact, thousands) at the same time. The prime purpose for VIMOS and its near-infrared sister
NIRMOS would be the simultaneous observations of a large sample of galaxies at
different redshifts, i.e. cosmic epochs. As such the twin instruments were expected
to become powerful tools for cosmological studies. VIMOS was installed at Unit
Telescope 3, Melipal, in early 2002. Unfortunately it had a number of problems;
the most conspicuous being that it exceeded its weight specifications by a third, or
one tonne, which introduced serious problems of flexure and exceeded the allowed
torque on the telescope. Further mechanical problems appeared and it took a long
time before the instrument achieved its full performance. Yet, aside from its scientific importance, this instrument has also played an important role in the technical
evolution process of advanced scientific instrumentation.
The problems with VIMOS, however, led to the decision to cancel its infrared sister, NIRMOS. Instead, the detectors acquired for NIRMOS found a good home in
a new instrument, which, at least with respect to imaging, would act as a replacement, and with much improved performance — the High Acuity Wide field K-band
Imager (HAWK-I).
To complete the overview of what finally constituted the first generation VLT instruments, we need to mention SINFONI (Spectrograph for INtegral Field Observations in the Near Infrared) and finally CRIRES.
Like NAOS–CONICA, SINFONI 17 combined a Multi Application Curvature
Adaptive Optics (MACAO) module with a Spectrometer for Infrared Faint Field
Imaging (SPIFFI) (Bonnet et al., 2004). SINFONI was the second VLT instrument designed for integral field spectroscopy and the first for infrared work. It saw
16 

Laboratoire d’Astronomie Spatiale Marseille, Observatoire Midi-Pyrénées (Toulouse) and Observatoire de
Haute-Provence in France, and, in Italy, the Istituto di Fisica Cosmica del CNR, Osservatorio Astronomico
di Brera, Osservatorio Astronomico di Capodimonte, Istituto di Radioastronomia del CNR and Osservatorio
Astronomico di Bologna.

17	

The SINFONI consortium comprised the Max-Planck-Institut für extraterrestrische Physik, the Department
of Physics, University of California, Berkeley (US), Universität zu Köln, Max-Planck-Institut für Astronomie, H
­ eidelberg, University of Oxford, Ingenieurbüro Weisz, Munich, Leiden Observatory, NOVA and the
­Netherlands Foundation for Research in Astronomy.

227

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

first light on 31 May 2004 on Unit Telescope 4, Yepun. In 2006, it demonstrated its
awesome capabilities by enabling observations with a resolution of a stunning 0.15
arcseconds across a star-forming galaxy, BzK155043, at a distance of 11 billion lightyears (Genzel, 2006). In February 2006, SINFONI was used for the first time with
the laser guide star system on Yepun (see next chapter).
The last of the first generation VLT instruments, CRIRES, was developed as an ESO
in-house project. Although it had been on the wish list since the earliest days of the
VLT instrumentation plan, due to lack of resources it only started as a project in 1999
(Moorwood, 2003). Hans Ulrich Käufl was responsible for the project. CRIRES is a
high-resolution infrared spectrograph with a resolving power of about 100 000, covering the spectral range from 1–5 µm. As the detector it uses a mosaic of Raytheon
1024 × 1024 pixel InSb CCDs, providing a focal plane array of 4096 × 512 pixels
— reminding us once more of the incredible progress in the field of infrared area
detectors over the last 15 years. The instrument saw first light in May 2006 on Unit
Telescope 1, Antu. It was — and still is — a unique instrument. In terms of science it is particularly well suited to study a range of objects from the atmospheres of
Solar System bodies, the chemistry and kinematics of the interstellar medium to the
dynamics of the accretion discs around black holes. To some extent it can be seen as
an infrared UVES, but the combination of nearly diffraction-limited spatial resolution (thanks to adaptive optics) and the high spectral resolution makes it extremely
powerful, superior to any other similar instrument in the world.

Overview of the VLT instruments by the end of the first decade.

228

Chapter III-2 ∙ Aux Instruments, Chercheurs!

Before we round up we must briefly return to HAWK-I. This is a high-resolution
infrared (0.85–2.5 µm) camera with a field of view of 7.5 × 7.5 arcminutes. With
a pixel size of 0.1 arcseconds it is able to exploit even the best seeing conditions at
­­Paranal. As an imager, it partly replaces the cancelled NIRMOS instrument, though
of course without the spectroscopic capabilities. HAWK-I was commissioned in
2007, seeing first light in August of that year. HAWK-I was chosen following the
first call for proposals for second generation VLT instruments in November 2001.
However, since it uses parts originally intended for an earlier instrument, it is often
considered to be a generation 1.5 instrument.
≈
VLT instrumentation now moved towards the second generation to be implemented
during the second decade of the century. The formidable point-and-shoot Cassegrain
focus X-shooter — a single-object spectrograph covering the whole spectral range
from the UV to the near-infrared in a single exposure — would be the first newcomer.
With a large fraction of first generation instruments in operation or about to be
installed at the telescope, the process of identifying the first concepts of the second
generation was initiated in 2001. ESO adopted the same approach of fully involving the user community through conferences on the scientific priorities, the first
of which was held in June of that year, followed by feasibility studies and competitive calls for proposals. The advances in the scientific knowledge and understanding of the Universe, from the planets associated with stars in the relative vicinity of
the Solar System to the primeval galaxies at high redshift, coupled with the technical development, especially in the area of the near-infrared detectors and adaptive
optics, led to the identification of four new instrument concepts of highest priority,
which were the subject of a call in November 2001. Following extended feasibility
studies, four new instrument contracts were established with consortia of external
institutes: the K-band Multi-Object Spectrograph (KMOS), X-shooter, the Multi
Unit Spectroscopic Explorer (MUSE) and Spectro-Polarimetric High-contrast Exoplanet REsearch (SPHERE). ESO would contribute in many key areas like detector
systems and AO and, in the case, of X-shooter, coordinating the full project including the final integration. As for the first generation instruments, each would constitute a major step forward in its scientific capability, but at the same time take its place
in a coherent pattern of instruments with complementary and mutually enhancing
contributions to astronomy.

229

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

KMOS, a near-infrared, multi-object spectrograph, will enable studies of a large
sample of extremely distant galaxies detected with imagers such as the VISTA tele­
scope or HAWK-I.
As already mentioned, X-shooter is a unique facility that allows simultaneous observations covering the spectral range from the UV to the near-infrared, in a “pointand-shoot” mode. It aims to provide comprehensive “instant” information about
objects such as gamma-ray bursts, QSOs or X-ray binary stars, where time is a key
factor in making successful observations. Mounted at the Cassegrain focus of UT 2,
X-shooter was the first second generation instrument to go onto the VLT18, 19 .
Next in line is MUSE, an integral field spectrograph for the visual. It has a field of
1 × 1 arcminutes — significantly larger than that of VIMOS — and able to yield a resolution of 0.2 arcseconds. This instrument will rely on the full use of adaptive optics
with four laser guide stars. SPHERE will be used for exoplanet studies, with extreme
adaptive optics and all the tricks of the trade to characterise these objects and, if possible, search for biomarkers in their atmospheres. It is therefore the natural successor
to NAOS–CONICA. However breathtaking the performance of these new instruments may be, it is beyond the scope of this book to deal with them, but in passing
the author cannot but mention one additional, new instrument, ESPRESSO. This
instrument is an ultra-stable20 echelle spectrograph, designed for deployment at the
incoherent, common focus of the VLT. With ESPRESSO, the VLT will finally (also)
become what it was originally conceived to be — a 16-metre equivalent telescope, as
it looks at the time of writing, around 30 years after the VLT project was approved.
But as impressive as the first generation instrument suite was, we still have to mention those designed for the common, coherent focus — i.e. for the VLT Interfero­
meter. We shall look at these in Chapter III-15. In any event, the efforts and ingenuity going into scientific instrumentation have increased tremendously. So has, of
course, the scientific output, but for that to happen, we need to look at an area that
is of critical importance to ground-based astronomy. It is, in fact, decisive.
18	

X-shooter was commissioned in 2008 and made available to scientific users in 2009.

19	

The consortium behind X-shooter comprised the Niels Bohr Institute and the DARK Cosmology Centre of
the University of Copenhagen, and the National Space Institute, the Observatoire de Paris and the Université
Paris Diderot, with contributions from the CEA and the CNRS, the Observatories of Brera, Trieste, Palermo
and Catania; the University of Amsterdam (Universiteit van Amsterdam), the Radboud University Nijmegen
(Radboud Universiteit Nijmegen) and ASTRON.

20	

Expected to be able to measure radial velocity variations in the range of a few cm/s.

230

Chapter III-3

Breaking the Seeing Barrier
“An old dream of ground-based astronomers
has finally come true.”
Merkle et al., 1989.

A

stronomy is a constant struggle for photons. Astronomers build larger telescopes
and improve their detector systems to gather more light. But increasing the size of
the light-collecting surface, or rather the pupil, in theory also leads to better resolution.
The pupil of the human eye will, when dark-adapted, achieve a diameter of roughly 8
millimetres. This enables us, in principle, to distinguish objects with an angular separation of 15 arcseconds (although physiological limitations of the eye normally lead
to a much poorer value). A telescope with a diameter of 10 centimetres will allow us
to distinguish objects with a smaller separation, roughly 1.2 arcseconds. This is the
case for visible light, but the resolution that can be obtained with an optical system is
also dependent on the wavelength of the radiation and it is important to remember
the interplay between those two factors. But, for all practical purposes in astronomy,
another factor is usually even more important: the terrestrial atmosphere. When we
look at the stars from the ground, we see the starlight as it is after it has passed through
the atmosphere. Since atmospheric turbulence has the same effect as an optical lens,
and the atmosphere changes almost constantly, this leads to a continuously varying distortion of the wavefront of the light. This in turn degrades the image quality that can
be obtained with the telescope. The sad outcome is that while larger telescopes will collect more light, and thus allow us to see fainter objects, telescopes beyond 50–60 centimetres in diameter will not provide us with better resolution, even if in theory they
should do so 1 — unless one can do something about it. One of the first scientists to
ponder this problem was the American astronomer Horace Babcock, who presented a
paper in 1953 with preliminary thoughts on “The Possibility of Compensating Astronomical Seeing” (Babcock, 1953). At the time, no real practical solution was in sight,
1	

This applies to observations in the near-infrared. With shorter wavelengths, the maxium resolution is reached
already with telescopes of about 15–20 cm.

231

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

but serious research began in the US in the 1970s, although not in astronomy: the first
practical use was in satellite-tracking systems. Later, research in what had now been
termed adaptive optics continued in the US in the framework of the Strategic Defence
Initiative, popularly known as the Star Wars Programme, driven forward by the US
President Ronald Reagan. For this reason, the development of adaptive optics was considered as classified information and could not be made available to astronomy. Still,
some adaptive optics activities also began in astronomy, e.g., at the Kitt Peak National
Observatory, where Jacques Beckers was working on the problem.
≈
In March 1981, ESO organised a conference on the Scientific Importance of High
Angular Resolution at Infrared and Optical Wavelengths. We have mentioned this
conference in Chapter II-1 in the context of the early VLT activities. Among the participants was John W. Hardy, who had been involved in classified US military research
projects since the early 1970s, and therefore was not at liberty to reveal any details 2 . The
French military was also undertaking work in this area, but this too was unknown to
the participants of the conference. However, astronomers had clearly become active in
the field, sensing the scientific gains that could be achieved by mitigating the effects of
atmospheric turbulence. One of the participants, Fritz Merkle, had studied a system
with electrostatic actuators. Another was Pierre Léna, a great promoter of interferometry (and, in general, high-resolution imaging), who realised that to make interferometry work the atmospheric distortion had to be overcome. It was one of those crucial
moments that can happen at conferences, where the right people come together at the
right moment. Woltjer realised the potential of this: perhaps this was the way towards
the large optical interferometer that some were dreaming of in connection with the
VLT. Later adaptive optics would be seen, not simply as the way towards the interferometer, but as a crucial technology in its own right, enabling a full exploitation of the
powerful new telescopes — both to collect more light and to obtain sharper images.
As part of the preparations for the VLT, Pierre Léna led the interferometry study and
this work was presented at the 1986 Venice conference. Ahead of the conference, on
21 November 1985, the group held a workshop at ESO in Garching. Several questions were still open and opinions varied widely. Within the global interferometry
community some harboured doubts about whether it would make any sense at all
2	

Years later he described some of these activities in an article in Scientific American (Hardy, 1994). A fuller
account of the efforts by the US military is given in Duffner (2009).

232

Chapter III-3 ∙ Breaking the Seeing Barrier

to use large telescopes as interferometers. Speckle imaging, on the other hand, no
longer seemed to be the way forward and the option of adaptive optics, although at
this time identified theoretically, had not been tested (or more precisely, used for civil
rather than military applications). The issue was obviously of a technical and a scientific character, but it had a political side as well. Achieving consensus was important
to secure the backing of the community for the VLT project. In this situation Léna,
backed by Jean-Claude Fontanella (from ONERA 3) and Michel ­Gaillard (CGE 4
research director), proposed that a prototype device be built to demonstrate the feasibility of adaptive optics.
The proposal was presented at the VLT meeting in Venice, leading to a contract with
the Observatoire de Paris, ONERA and LASERDOT, the CGE successor company.
The result became known as the VLT Adaptive Optics Prototype (though colloquially called Come-On5), which was first tested at the Observatoire de Haute-Provence
during the nights of 12–23 October 1989, with a follow-up observing run in November of the same year. As so often is the case, the idea was stunningly simple, at least
in theory: to carry out a real-time analysis of the image distortion of a star, using a
Shack-Hartmann system of lenslets, just like in active optics. The lenslets created a
series of individual star images on the detector, each different from each other. The
difference, or to be more precise the relative displacement, of the individual star
images from the theoretical location, would provide the necessary information for
analysing the instantaneous distortion. This in turn would be used to control the
shape of a small flexible mirror, inserted in the optical train and supported by piezoelectric actuators. Changing the shape of the mirror meant deforming it in a way that
neutralised the original distortion of the wavefront of the light as it finally arrived
at the detector after its bumpy ride through the terrestrial atmosphere and the telescope’s surroundings. Put simply, the telescope would yield the same optical performance as if it were in space. Obviously, the correction would have to be conducted in
real time, in the case of the prototype meaning about 100 times per second (100 Hz).
By today’s standards the AO prototype was rather simple, with only 19 actuators 6 ,
but it nonetheless provided full proof of the concept, delivering diffraction-limited
3	

Office National D’Etudes et de Recherche Aerospatiale.

4	

Compagnie Générale d’Électricité.

5	

Reminding us of the producers – CGE, the Observatoire de Meudon, and ONERA.

6	

NAOS-CONICA, the first adaptive optics instrument on the VLT used 185 actuators operating at 500 Hz.
The next generation of extremely large telescope AO systems will have many thousands of actuators and work
at frequencies beyond 1 kHz.

233

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

images 7 in the infrared waveUncorrected
Corrected
length domain (from 2.2 µm
and beyond), and with noticeable improvements in resolution for shorter wavelengths.
However, as simple as the idea
was, realising it meant tackling
a number of challenges. Firstly,
the optical correction could
1
only be applied to a small field
around the optical axis, the soAdaptive Optics at ESO 3.6-metre telescope
called isoplanatic patch, typically only covering a few tens
An early Come-On result at the ESO 3.6-metre telescope: A
of arcseconds in the infrared.
5.5 magnitude star (HR 6658 located in NGC 6475), here
observed at 3.5 µm. The left image shows a normal observation
This was simply because light
(without adaptive optics). The resolution is 0.8 arcseconds. The
from stars located further afield
right image, with adaptive optics, features a dramatic increase
on the celestial sphere would
in resolution to 0.22 arcseconds and reveals that the star is, in
fact, a double star.
pass through different cells of
air and thus needed to be corrected differently. Secondly, the adverse optical effects of the atmosphere are less pronounced in the infrared compared to the visible band and are thus easier to correct8 .
Thirdly, as we know the resolving power of the telescope is a function not only of the
pupil size but also the wavelength, and this meant that AO would potentially yield
much more impressive results in the visible, but that the system would require significantly more actuators and much faster correction. That in turn required dramatically increased computing power. Finally, the system needed a bright star to allow the
image analyser to do its work. Since bright stars are not found everywhere in the sky
— and could not be assumed to reside close to observational targets — much more
sensitive detectors would be needed. But, despite these difficulties, a very promising
start had been made, more than justifying the opening of a couple of champagne
bottles at the ESO Headquarters. It was a real breakthrough. The ESO press release
clearly found the right words: “Catching a Twinkling Star: Successful Tests of Adaptive Optics Herald New Era”9. It is interesting that within a period of only half a year,
7	

Meaning that the images reflected the maximum theoretical performance of the telescope and that the atmospheric disturbance had been eliminated.

8	

A further limitation was the rudimentary state of infrared detectors at the time.

9	

ESO press release, 26 October 1989

234

Chapter III-3 ∙ Breaking the Seeing Barrier

two technologies, albeit somewhat related, that would change telescope design forever and pave the way for giant advances in astronomy, became available. The first,
servo-controlled active optics was, as already mentioned, invented at ESO, the other,
adaptive optics, was first demonstrated in astronomy by a joint ESO/French team.
If 1987 had been an annus mirabilis for ESO, 1989 was an annus mirabilis for the
world of astronomy. And no less so for ESO. Nature expressed it this way: “The gamble taken by ESO in 1985 when it decided to rely on adaptive optics for the VLT seems
to have paid off.” (Dickman, 1989).
The following year, between 11 and 16 April, Come-On was mounted at the
­Cassegrain focus of the 3.6-metre telescope at La Silla. The original wavefront sensor used a Reticon array detector, able to work with a tenth magnitude star, and the
camera was a 32 × 32 pixel infrared (IR) camera.

Michel Faucherre preparing Come-On+ for observations with the 3.6-metre telescope. (Photo: Herbert
Zodet)

235

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

A second run at the 3.6-metre was carried out between 31 December 1990 and 8 January 1991 this time with a coronagraph10 designed by the Observatoire de Paris-­
Meudon, and an improved detector as wavefront sensor, now allowing the use of 13th
magnitude guide stars (Gehrig & Rigaut, 1991). Further observing runs followed, but
in December 1992, the instrument was succeeded by Come-On+, now with 52 actuators and an electron-bombarded CCD as a photon-counting detector (sensitive
enough to work with 15th magnitude stars) for the wavefront sensor, working up to
200 Hz — twice the speed of the first prototype. These early attempts, Come-On and
Come-On+, provided the proof that it was possible to deliver the AO performance
expected for the VLT, but as prototypes, they were not really scientist-friendly. Thus
an AO run required a specialist team to be present at the telescope. ESO’s philosophy, however, was standardisation and ease of use, allowing even the most complex
systems to be used by scientists without any specialist knowledge. The term plug-andplay might be an exaggeration, but it would indicate the thrust of ESO’s intentions
for its users. Even so, impressive scientific observations were obtained with both prototypes, including images of the circumstellar disc around the star Beta Pictoris (see
also Chapter III-7). The next step was to develop a user-friendly upgrade under the
name of ADONIS (Beuzit & Hubin, 1993). Developed by ESO and the Observatoire de Paris, ADONIS featured improved control software and was be fitted with
the 256 × 256 pixel SHARP II camera, developed at the Max-Planck-Institut für
Extraterrestrische Physik, and also benefited from much improved mechanics. “It
worked!” as Jean-Luc Beuzit, the person responsible for the instrument, later stated
(Beuzit, 2009)11. “Since 1996, the telescope operator has also been operating ADONIS!”
With the successful demonstration by Come-On and Come-On+, it would appear
that the time had come to address the AO requirements of the VLT. AO systems
were foreseen at the coudé foci of each Unit Telescope, mainly to support the VLTI.
In 1993 MATRA had begun a design study for a coudé AO system for the VLT12 .
Alas, the timing was far from optimal. As mentioned, in 1993 the financial difficulties had led to a postponement of the VLTI, but it also affected the AO coudé systems. As a result, CONICA, one of the VLT instruments that was already under
development, was relocated to the Nasmyth focus. These changes ultimately led to
a long delay, but eventually the contract for the AO system intended for CONICA
10	

The reason for the coronograph was that a main target was the circumstellar disc around Beta Pictoris. Only by
avoiding the direct light from the star could the faint disc of matter be seen.

11	

At the time, half of the scientific papers based on AO observations worldwide were obtained by ADONIS.

12	

Despite the disturbance of the AO programme, the study later provided important input to the development
of NAOS.

236

Chapter III-3 ∙ Breaking the Seeing Barrier

was signed in March 1997 between ONERA, the Laboratoire d’Astrophysique de
l’Observatoire de Grenoble (LAOG) and the Observatoire de Paris, in collaboration with ESO. The Principal Investigator was Anne-Marie Lagrange, a former ESO
astronomer now working in France. The combined instrument, NAOS–CONICA,
or NACO for short, saw first light in November 2001.
≈
By 1998, ESO could again begin to seriously consider implementing the VLTI,
including its AO component. The goal was a low cost, yet reliable and easy-to-operate system and the solution was the 60-actuator MACAO system, using wavefront
curvature sensing and what are known as bi-morph mirrors, an idea developed by
François Roddier. This system was simpler than the by now classical Shack-Hartmann-based AO system, but it nevertheless yielded medium-order correction and
was able to work with systems with up to about 200 actuators. The principle which
had been tested with great success at the 3.6-metre Canada France Hawaii Telescope,
was taken over by ESO and found use in six AO systems at the VLT. Domenico
Bonaccini Calia, who had joined ESO from the Osservatorio Astrofisico di A
­ rcetri,
in ­Florence, was responsible for the conceptual design. MACAO was approved in
1997 and installed between June 2003 and June 2004.
We have seen how, within a short space of time, the technology of adaptive optics
improved — with more actuators, faster computers, more sensitive wavefront sensors and alternative ways to analyse the deformation of the wavefront itself. But some
tricky problems remained. How, for example, could a larger field on the sky be corrected? Despite the increased sensitivity of the sensors, what was to be done when
observing a target in a field void of sufficiently bright stars? And with the increasing
number of instruments and AO systems, would it not make more sense to make the
telescope itself adaptive? The answers were: multi-conjugate adaptive optics, laser
guide star systems and, yes, adaptive telescopes.
The idea behind multi-conjugate adaptive optics is that if a comprehensive determination of the disturbances at different heights in the atmosphere and in different
directions can be obtained, then it will be possible to obtain a fully corrected field
significantly larger than that possible with traditional adaptive optics. For this to
happen, a technique known to the astronomers as atmospheric tomography is necessary. This technique was developed in late 2000, in Europe mainly by Roberto
­R agazzoni, Enrico Marchetti and Gianpaolo Valente (all from Padua), and ­François

237

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Rigaut (Meudon), with financial support by the European Union Framework Programme. Atmospheric tomography implies probing the atmosphere in different
directions, with the help of natural or laser guide star systems and thus constructing a three-dimensional map of the atmosphere at a given instant. Corrections can
then be done by means of several deformable mirrors, and, as a result, a larger field of
view can be covered with all the point spread functions (i.e. the rendition of the stellar images) subject to the same degree of correction over the field. Expressed in more
simple terms, with conventional adaptive optics, the blurring of the stellar images
would increase towards the edges of the field. With the new system this would not
occur, despite the much fact that the field would be much larger. As an idea, multiconjugate adaptive optics was relatively new. Jacques Beckers had proposed it in 1988
at the ESO Conference on The Very Large Telescopes and their Instrumentation
(Beckers, 1988), but it was only after the technique of atmospheric tomography had
come about that it became possible to test the idea. By the turn of the century, our
understanding of the atmosphere, the ways to measure the continuous changes and
the required technology had matured enough to take the next step: to build a demonstrator device. Among others, the demonstrator was strongly supported by Roberto Gilmozzi, who we shall meet later in the book. While strongly involved in the
VLT project, he had also begun to dream of even larger telescopes, and it was clear to
him that the larger the telescope, the more dependent it would be on adaptive optics.
And so, in January 2002, ESO launched a demonstrator project 13 . Readers will by
now have realised that astronomers, next to their ability to develop novel technological solutions in support of their research, are as astute when it comes to inventing
acronyms. In this case, the acronym was truly emblematic: MAD, the Multi-conjugate Adaptive optics Demonstrator. Such an acronym would inevitably give rise
to jokes. Hardly oblivious to this, the project manager, Enrico Marchetti (who had
joined ESO), took the lead, putting a sign on the door to his office: Mad Manager,
it said. But of course, there was nothing crazy about MAD. In October 2005, it was
successfully tested in the laboratory and on 25 March 2007 on the sky, mounted at
the VLT Unit Telescope 3, Melipal14 .
≈
13	

Aside from ESO, MAD involved a consortium led by the Universidade de Lisboa, providing the high-resolution
infrared camera (CAMCAO), and the Observatories of Padua and Arcetri (Florence) developed the instrument
control software and a new type of wavefront sensor.

14	

The honour of the first successful on-sky test of a multi-conjugate adaptive system, however, goes to solar astronomers, who applied their system in April 2005 on the German Solar Vacuum Tower Telescope at Tenerife (von
der Lühe et al., 2005).

238

Chapter III-3 ∙ Breaking the Seeing Barrier

It takes only a casual glance at the sky to realise that stars are not distributed evenly
on the sky. We clearly recognise the Milky Way because here we find a much higher
concentration of stars than anywhere else. And as we have seen in this chapter, adaptive optics is dependent on the presence of a guide star of sufficient brightness in the
field of observation. But extragalactic research often involves studying parts of the
sky far from the Milky Way’s band of stars. If, in these seemingly dark parts of the
sky, no star bright enough for adaptive optics can be found, perhaps one could be
“made”? The idea was to shine a powerful laser beam with a wavelength of 5892 Å
onto the sky. The laser would excite sodium atoms in the upper atmosphere, the socalled mesosphere, around 90 kilometres above ground15 . These atoms would then
re-emit the laser light, producing a point light source bright enough to be used for
the wavefront sensor. This would be an artificial star so to speak — though astronomers with their particular phraseology would rather speak of a LGS, or laser guide
star. The potential of this was mind-blowing, for the statement that “stars are not distributed in an even way on the sky” is, in the context of adaptive optics, a dramatic
understatement. The sky coverage of conventional adaptive optics, i.e. the system
that relies on the presence of a suitably bright star, is of the order of 1% only. Supplemented with a LGS, the sky coverage increases to perhaps 90%16 .
Once again, the US military 17 had been ahead of everyone else and undertaken significant efforts in this area, though — as could be expected — in absolute secrecy.
Tests had been carried out as early as 1983 and in the period 1988–90, further tests
had been performed from a US Air Force site in Hawaii (Hardy, ibid.). But, as in the
case of adaptive optics, civilian astronomers were not far behind. In Europe, Renaud
Foy (at the time working at the Observatoire de Paris and Centre d’Etudes et de
Recherches Géodynamiques et Astronomiques [CERGA]) and L
­ abeyrie — without
knowledge of the US experiments — had presented their ideas about “adaptive telescopes with laser probes” in 1985 (Foy & Labeyrie, 1985). The gradual realisation,
not the least because of the work in Europe, that knowledge about this technology
could no longer be contained, led to the decision by the US military in 1991 to declassify information about American efforts in this area (Duffner, ibid.). In astronomy
early attempts, notably at the Lick Observatory and at the W. M. Keck Observatory,
appeared promising, and the Max-Planck-Institut für Extraterrestrische Physik in

15	

Weak radiation from the same layer of sodium atoms creates the “air glow”.

16	

In the infrared K-band (2–2.4 µm) and using a visible-light wavefront sensor.

17	

Through the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA).

239

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Garching (MPE) (through the German/Spanish observatory at Calar Alto in Spain)
also began to develop a system, known as ALFA 18 (Quirrenbach, 2000).
In 1999, ESO set up a group to look at LGS systems, headed by Bonaccini. Among
the recruits to the group was Wolfgang Hackenberg, who brought with him experience from the ALFA project. In 2003 work began on the first laser guide star
facility at ESO, with a 4W continuous wave sodium laser called PARSEC19 , in a
collaboration with the MPE (Garching) and the Max-Planck-Institut für Astronomie (­Heidelberg). The system was installed at Unit Telescope 4, Yepun, in 2006
and became operational the year after. The main elements were a) a laser laboratory,
of roughly the size of a small container 20 , b) the laser itself, c) a relay system based
on photonic crystal fibres to deliver the laser beam to d) a 50-centimetre launch
telescope attached to the M2 unit of the telescope. Finally e) an LGS monitor, a
30-­centimetre telescope about four kilometres away from the site, providing continuous information about the density of the sodium layer, the possible presence of clouds
along the line of sight (of the laser) and the performance of the laser itself (Bonaccini
et al., 2001). This was only the beginning. The way forward lay in developing a simpler and better system. Simpler, in that it could be used as a routine feature during
observations and did not require any specialised staff at all times. Better in terms of
being lightweight (and thus imposing fewer demands on the telescope main structure) and by optimising the relationship between input, in terms of energy, and the
output in terms of photons returned. This required an intensive R&D effort at the
laboratory in Garching. LGS systems were spreading across the world, with different groups testing different technical solutions. To obtain a deeper understanding
of the actual physical processes connected with laser-induced excitation of sodium
atoms, ESO teamed up with a group of quantum physics experts of the University
of ­California, Berkeley 21. The result of these efforts was a new fibre-optics-based continuous-wave laser delivering a power of 50 W. The R&D effort also led to patents
and licensing agreements with industry.

18	

Adaptive optics with Laser guide star For Astronomy.

19	

The ­Paranal Artificial Reference Source for Extended Coverage.

20	

The cabin was mounted underneath one of the Nasmyth platforms, thereby rotating with the telescope itself.

21	

Led by Dimitri Budker, but also involving William Happer at Princeton.

240

Chapter III-3 ∙ Breaking the Seeing Barrier

The laser guide star system at the Yepun telescope. The picture also provides a spectacular view of the southern Milky Way and the twin satellite galaxies, the Magellanic Clouds. (Photo: Gerd Hüdepohl)

≈
With the advances in adaptive optics, the dream of making the telescope itself adaptive had come closer to realisation. This could be done by turning the large secondary mirror into a fully deformable mirror: clearly a non-trivial task given its size and
mass. Among the advantages of this are that it would offer “ fast wavefront correction without the addition of supplementary optics or mechanics. Moreover, with the two
­Nasmyth and Cassegrain foci this gain is threefold. The system gives better throughput
to science instruments, lower emissivity for thermal IR instruments, large field of view
accessible to all instruments and less complexity/crowding at the focal planes” (­Arsenault
et al., 2006). As in the case of the LGS systems, practical tests were started in the US,
though based on seminal work at institutes in Italy, especially by Piero Salinari and
his team at the Osservatorio Astrofisico di Arcetri. The first test was carried out in
2002 at the Multiple Mirror Telescope on Mount Hopkins in Arizona and later (in
2010) at the Large Binocular Telescope (LBT) on Mount Graham, also in A
­ rizona.
At the LBT, the 0.9-metre secondary mirror was controlled by no less than 672 actuators working at an incredible 1000 Hz, ten times faster than the first AO system. At
ESO, at the suggestion of Norbert Hubin, who was in charge of ESO’s AO activities,
plans were initiated to develop the VLT Adaptive Optics Facility (AOF) in 2004.

241

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

This took the form of a feasibility study to be carried out by a consortium led by the
Italian company Microgate22 . The aim would be to turn Unit Telescope 4, Yepun,
into an adaptive telescope, with the help of a new secondary mirror with 1172 actuators, operating at a frequency of 1200 Hz. It falls beyond the scope of this book to
deal with the VLT AOF, which at the time of writing is still under development, but
it nonetheless deserves to be mentioned in the historical context. Since the AOF is
also a pathfinder project for the future E-ELT it is certainly not an end point in this
development. It can also be seen as a powerful illustration of how telescope technology in its widest sense has developed over the last 30 years or so.
The development of ever more efficient adaptive optics systems has had a profound
influence on contemporary astrophysics, notably in the field of extrasolar planets
and high-resolution imagery of the Galactic Centre, i.e. studying the black hole at
the centre of our stellar system as well as other areas that depend on high-resolution
imaging. It is also a good illustration of ESO working at its best, with stable funding
and the ability to mobilise a critical mass to “drive” industry. The alliance between
national institutes, initially especially in France, but later also with German and Italian institutes, and ESO, as well as with Europe’s high-tech industry, helped to catapult European astronomy to the forefront of this most competitive science. But our
story has wider implications. Unsurprisingly, we see that in these extremely specialised fields of high technology, such as interferometry, adaptive optics and LGS systems, the group of experts in the world is very small. Many of them have found their
way to ESO for a period of time, not least because ESO has been able to combine
good working conditions with very interesting professional challenges. But many
have also moved on to other projects elsewhere in the world. At a time when researchers’ mobility and “brain circulation” are seen as a key to innovation, economic prosperity and our ability to tackle grand societal challenges with the help of science
and technology, the examples from astronomy provide an interesting case to study.
It also offers a nice illustration of the nature of hi-tech developments — the impetus of competition and the value of co-operation — that has led to the coining of
the term “co-opetition”.
However, in our story of the VLT, which basically spans the 1990s, we have taken a
huge jump ahead in time. We shall therefore now turn to the other main elements
of the project and return to the beginning of that decade.
22	

Together with the Osservatorio Astrofisico di Arcetri, Microgate built, assembled, delivered and tested the
adaptive secondary of the MMT.

242

Chapter III-4

From double-sight to supersight:
Interferometry
“I had always considered interferometry an interesting option
for the VLT, but without much confidence in its early realisation.”
Lodewijk Woltjer, 2006.

A

s Lodewijk Woltjer writes, one of the major elements behind the progress of
astronomy has been the improvement in spatial resolution — the sharpness
with which astronomical objects can be seen. In the previous chapter, we have discussed the relationship between resolving power and telescope size, one of the reasons
why astronomers always dream of larger telescopes. But even in the best of worlds,
there are limits on how big telescopes can become, if for no other reasons than hard
financial ones. Could there be other ways to increase spatial resolution — to register
the finest details in objects far away? The answer was found in a technique known as
aperture synthesis using interferometry. It seems fitting to describe optical interferometry — the coherent combination of light beams from two or more separate telescopes — as the holy grail of astronomical imaging. The basic idea emerged from what
had perhaps been one of the most fundamental challenges to physics — to understand the nature of light. The first experiment to demonstrate the wave property of
light — known as the two-slit experiment — was carried out in the early 19th century by the Englishman Thomas Young, whose work was followed up by Augustin
Fresnel of France. When light from a source passes through two separate slits, the
waves emanating from each of the slits will interfere with each other, generating an
interference pattern that can be analysed and thus provide information about the
source. This led the French physicist Hippolyte Fizeau, in 1868, to suggest that it
should be possible to measure fine details with interferometry, such as the diameters
of stars (Monnier, 2003). Early examples, towards the end of the 19th century, demonstrated the validity of the idea. A first try at building such a telescope was undertaken in 1874 by Edouard Stephan at the Observatoire de Marseille (Léna, 2007)
and in 1920/21 the diameter of the (bright) red giant star Betelgeuse (α ­Orionis) was

243

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

determined with a stellar interferometer at the Mount Wilson Observatory. However, for practical astronomical purposes the concept was really developed in radio
astronomy, where the much longer wavelengths made it somewhat easier. Optical
interferometry, i.e. in the wavelength domains of visible and infrared light, remained
a challenge. And a daunting one, indeed. In the early 1970s, the French astronomer
Antoine Labeyrie breathed new life into the idea, with a set of interconnected optical telescopes on the plateau of Calern near Nice in France. The work of Labeyrie,
i.e. the idea that ultra-high image resolution could be achieved by combining light
from separate telescopes, came early enough to influence the ESO Conference at
CERN in 1977. Yet the magnitude of the challenges that had to be met to make
optical interferometry work in terms of controlling a complex dynamic system with
nanometre precision was clear and many people remained highly sceptical. Woltjer’s
remark at the beginning of this chapter reveals the low degree of expectation. Pierre
Léna recalls the substantial scepticism also expressed at the conference by Harry van
der Laan and Robert Hanbury-Brown, both scientists with considerable knowledge
in this field (Léna, 2008). Although everybody saw the promise held out by optical
interferometry, their confidence in its feasibility was limited. But somehow, Fizeau’s
spirit prevailed: in the European context it does not seem unreasonable to see the
technique of optical interferometry as a French preoccupation, but astronomers in
other countries — notably in Germany — also thought that it was worth following
up. Indeed it was.
But what is aperture synthesis? Recall that the larger the diameter of the primary
mirror of a telescope (its entrance pupil) is, the sharper the image it yields. Expressed
more technically, astronomers talk about the spatial resolution, rather than image
sharpness, because spatial resolution describes more precisely how fine details can
be discerned or how close objects can appear on the sky, and still be seen as distinct
objects. The spatial resolution of an interferometer, on the other hand, is not limited
by the size of the individual telescopes, but by the separation between them. However, in this case, the spatial information of an astronomical object is distributed over
the entire area — known to astronomers as the (u,v) plane — whether it is covered
by telescopes or not. Therefore, in order to obtain as much information as possible,
it is necessary to locate the individual telescopes in a way that allows for an optimal
sampling of the (u,v) plane, and then to fill the gaps by means of computational techniques generically known as image reconstruction. To improve the sampling, the telescopes can be physically moved in the course of an observational sequence, or simply, in time, the rotation of the Earth will do the job. Indeed, as the Earth rotates,
the telescopes (as seen from the sky) probe different parts of the (u,v) plane. The Very

244

Chapter III-4 ∙ From double-sight to supersight: Interferometry

Large Telescope Interferometer makes use of both possibilities, by enabling the combination of light from the main 8.2-metre Unit Telescopes (in their fixed locations)
and from a series of 1.8-metre Auxiliary Telescopes, mounted on tracks and thus
movable over the entire telescope platform.
≈
As we have seen in the past chapters, the notion of doing optical interferometry on
a large scale was around already in the early 1980s and the idea shaped quite a bit of
the thinking behind the VLT, in spite of much scepticism. As the detailed planning
of the VLT began in 1988, it was also time to address the issue of interferometry in
a serious way. To lead the interferometry programme, ESO hired Jacques ­Beckers,
who at the time worked at NOAO, the National Optical Astronomy Observatory
in the US. Before joining ESO, he had been involved in an abandoned NOAO project known as the 16-metre National New Technology Telescope (NNTT), for a
telescope with four 8-metre mirrors on a single mount 1. We have briefly alluded to
it in Chapter II-7. Beckers arrived in June 1988, charged not only with the interferometry programme, but also with the development of adaptive optics (which as we
have seen in the past was very much linked to the needs of interferometry) as well
as the site testing and thus, also to the selection of the site. This particular combination of tasks made sense, since “ it was completely clear that whether the interferometry was going to happen or not, the issue of interferometry had a major effect on the
site choice and on the design of the telescopes,” Jaques Beckers recalled in an interview
with the author. At the time this de facto meant a choice between Cerro ­Paranal and
Cerro Vizcachas, a peak close to La Silla and located within ESO’s territory. Because
of its natural shape Cerro Vizcachas would lend itself well to the linear telescope
array that was foreseen in the 1987 Blue Book proposal. P
­ aranal would not. ESO
sought advice from a tiger team of internationally renowned experts from the interferometry community 2 . The team comprised Tim Cornwell (National Radio Astronomy ­Observatory [NRAO]/VLA), Chris Haniff (­Cambridge/UK), Shri Kulkarni
(Caltech), Jean-Marie Mariotti (Meudon), Jan Noordam (NFRA/­D wingeloo),
1	

In early 1987 an informal meeting took place between John Jefferies, director of the NOAO, accompanied by
Jacques Beckers and Woltjer. The topic was possible cooperation between the NNTT, which was expected to
be placed at a northern hemisphere site, and the VLT.

2	

The tiger team supplemented the VLT Interferometry Panel, mentioned earlier, which consisted of scientists
from the ESO Member States: Robert Braun, Paolo di Benedetto, Dennis Downes, Renaud Foy, Reinhard
­Genzel, Laurent Koechlin, Antoine Labeyrie, Pierre Léna, Jean-Marie Mariotti and Gerd Weigelt, with Jacques
Beckers in the Chair. The tiger team, however, earned its name by taking the critical, but at the time not universally supported, decision about the configuration of the VLTI (Beckers, ibid.).

245

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

­Farrokh ­Vakilii (CERGA/Nice), Gerd Weigelt (Max-Planck-Institut für Radioastronomie [MPIfR]) and was chaired by Oskar von der Lühe (Beckers, 2003). The
outcome was to abandon the linear array and instead choose a trapezoidal configuration, much like the one that was finally constructed. In the language of interferometry this was described as a “2D, non-redundant” solution. This pointed to ­Paranal,
which had also proven to be superior on other accounts. P
­ aranal had better seeing
and the observing platform, which could be created, would allow for a change of
the array to improve coverage in the (u,v) plane. The change could be achieved with
small mobile telescopes, though at least one astronomer thought that the 8-metre
telescopes should be movable (!). A further change that happened in this early phase
was the decision to locate the point where the beams were combined in an underground system and not, as originally foreseen, above the surface.

The three drawings on the left image illustrate some of options considered for the VLTI. The cartoon with
the comment “ interferometrist’s feelings” to the right testifies to the agonising process that finally led to the
current configuration. (Courtesy: Oskar von der Lühe)

While ESO solicited the advice of the tiger team, it also assembled a powerful —
if small — in-house group of specialists, including Oskar von der Lühe, ­Bertrand
­Koehler, Fritz Merkle and Francesco Paresce, who later became VLTI project
scientist.
≈
Work on the VLTI was progressing. Now the configuration had been determined — the location of the individual 8.2-metre telescopes had been fixed with
two smaller auxiliary 1.8-metre telescopes moving on tracks and thus helping to

246

Chapter III-4 ∙ From double-sight to supersight: Interferometry

A happy moment at the ESO HQ: Daniel Enard (extreme left), Harry van der Laan, Fritz Merkle,
Massimo Tarenghi and Oskar von der Lühe. The photo was obtained after the signing of the tripartite
agreement between ESO, CNRS and MPG in 1992 for enhancing VLTI with a third auxiliary telescope.
(Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

fill in the (u,v) plane. With additional funding from Germany and France, a third
­Auxiliary T
­ elescope became possible3 . But as already mentioned, the VLT project
as a whole became engulfed in trouble, leading to the postponement of the interferometer as a result of the general project cost overrun. The March 1994 issue of The
ESO ­Messenger summarises the decision as follows: “In its October 4th and 5th 1993
meeting Council expressed its approval of the revised VLT/VLTI project … for content,
schedule and staff. Financial difficulties discussed in the Finance Committee meeting
of November 8th and 9th 1993, and recent expression of concern in a diplomatic note
from the French Government have led to reconsideration of this plan. Following the
presentation and discussion of different alternatives for cost reduction, Council adopts
further modifications to the VLT programme plan. This includes the postponement of
3	

This was a voluntary contribution by the CNRS of France and the German Max-Planck-Gesellschaft signed
on 18 December 1992. Originally the money had been set aside for an independent interferometry project, but
when the VLTI began to appear as a realistic project, the funds were relocated towards this purpose.

247

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the implementation of VLTI, VISA 4 , Coudé Train and associated adaptive optics for
all telescopes. In consultation with the Scientific Technical Committee a solution will
be sought to introduce adaptive optics at the Nasmyth foci at the earliest possible time.
Furthermore, the E
­ xecutive will endeavour to reintroduce full Coudé and interferometric capabilities at the earliest possible date. This will include provisions for continuing technological research and development programmes devoted to this end.” This was
a painful decision, indeed. Calls for tender, already issued, had to be cancelled. Key
people, who in various ways were associated with the interferometer project, ultimately left the organisation — Jacques Beckers, Oskar von der Lühe and Fritz Merkle. In Council, the French science delegate, Pierre Léna, himself an ardent advocate of VLTI, resigned in the face of what he perceived to be dwindling support for
interferometry, also in the community. The prospect for the realisation of this most
ambitious part of the VLT project looked decidedly bleak. However, Giacconi, who
had by then assumed the helm at ESO, decided to continue those activities that had
a direct bearing on the construction work at P
­ aranal. He clearly hoped that, with
time, it would be possible to reinstate the VLTI programme one way or the other
— as hinted in the Council declaration. And so, on P
­ aranal the tunnel system was
duly excavated, and in general the infrastructure prepared so as to be ready for better times. The loss of qualified staff was serious. The world of optical interferometry
is a small one in terms of experts. Those who stayed did so in the hope of a revival
of the project. One factor that contributed to maintaining a certain degree of hope
was that, at the time, quite promising discussions were ongoing between Australia
and ESO about membership. Australian membership would have brought financial
relief, but it would also have meant the involvement of the Australian scientific community that possessed considerable knowledge about interferometry, albeit mostly
from radio astronomy. Then, in early 1996, the talks with Australia collapsed.
On the other side of the Atlantic Ocean (or perhaps rather, the Pacific), things looked
much brighter. Since the early 1980s, US astronomers in California had worked on
plans for two 10-metre telescopes to be placed in Hawaii, what eventually became the
Keck telescopes. We have referred to the Keck telescopes several times already. Like
most other major projects, the original project (known as the Ten-Meter-Telescope,
or TMT5) had had a somewhat bumpy time, but in 1993, Keck I had seen first light
4	

The VLT Subarray, VISA, was the array of auxiliary telescopes. At the June 1994 meeting, the ESO Council
had already decided to continue with the development of the array, albeit with expected installation as late as
2003.

5	

Not to be confused with today’s TMT, the Thirty Meter Telescope!

248

Chapter III-4 ∙ From double-sight to supersight: Interferometry

and since then it had pointed its huge mirror to the sky every night. Furthermore,
at the beginning of the decade plans were being revived for building the second telescope, Keck II. It would then be possible to combine the light of the twin telescopes
and also include what the Americans called smaller outrigger telescopes, the equivalent of ESO’s Auxiliary Telescopes. In 1996, Keck II was ready and the interferometry programme could commence with support from NASA.
The VLT is a complex machine. In the previous chapters we have reviewed managerial and financial aspects. We have also looked at technical issues including scientific instrumentation. But the heart of any telescope is its mirrors. In the following
chapter, we shall follow the production of these optical masterpieces and the associated equipment.

249

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The first VLT primary mirror blank, Joe, on the
polishing table at REOSC. The photo was taken
from the top of the interferometric tower during the
acceptance tests. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

250

Chapter III-5

The Return of the Dalton Brothers
“Joe Dalton was delivered in time and well
within specifications… .”
Müller et al., The ESO Messenger, 73.

F

riends of late 20th century youth culture may associate the Dalton Brothers with
a famous rock band. Others will perhaps think of the — infamous — members
of the Dalton Gang who were killed in Kansas in 1887. Yet others will think of the
well-known cartoon series known as Lucky Luke, created by the Belgian cartoonist
Maurice De Bevere. With a Belgian optical engineer in charge of the VLT mirror
contracts (and someone who knew his cartoon classics), it is perhaps less of a surprise
that the Dalton Brothers — Joe, Jack, William and Averell — would also become
associated with these spectacular mirrors. The engineer was Philippe Dierickx, who
promptly assigned the names to the four blanks. He had joined ESO in 1986 after
submitting an unsolicited application. At the time he worked at REOSC and his
boss Jean Espiard, on learning that Dierickx might move to ESO, had commented:
“There you will meet the best telescope designer in the world — Ray Wilson!” Before
being accepted, Dierickx attended an interview at ESO, with Wilson as a member
of the interview panel. When Wilson heard that the young candidate was working
with Espiard, he remarked: “Then you’re working with the best telescope designer in
the world — Jean Espiard!”
In Chapter III-1, we mentioned that the contract for the provision of the four 8.2metre primary mirrors for the VLT was the first major contract to be concluded.
To produce the mirrors, the Schott Glassworks had to erect a new factory hall, and
this would become the centre of attention, not just for the Schott experts but, obviously also for the ESO team, notably Massimo Tarenghi, Philippe Dierickx and Ray
­Wilson. A detailed technical account of the manufacturing process is provided in
The ESO Messenger, 73 (Müller et al., ibid.).

251

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Schott had decided to use its new spin-casting technique, which meant spinning
the mould while the liquid glass was cooling down. The mould had a curved bottom and with centrifugal forces at play, the blank would assume a shape more or less
like the final mirror. In December 1990, the first pouring of glass — no less than
45 tonnes — occurred. Before the pouring, the glass was prepared in a huge vessel and heated. This process took 24 days. The temperature of the glass at the time
of the pouring was 1300 degrees Celsius. The pouring itself took four hours, after
which the mould, covered by an overhead heating system was moved to a different
position and the spinning process began. Perhaps the most spectacular moment was
the lifting of the cover with the heating system, exposing the glowing surface of the
glass — 50 square metres — to ambient air and enveloping the whole factory hall in
an intense heat wave that probably only those present will truly be able to imagine.
The power radiated was 20 megawatt. Gradually the glass began to cool. When the
temperature had dropped to 1100 degrees Celsius and the glass mass had assumed
the desired concave meniscus form, the mould stopped spinning and was moved
into a dedicated furnace for the annealing phase, which was scheduled to take four
months. After that the first machining of the concave and convex sides was done
with a diamond grinding tool, and then the glass again disappeared into a furnace,
to undergo the ceramisation process, transforming the glass into the glass ceramic
Zerodur. Then it was time for the drilling of the central hole and the fine grinding. With this completed, the blank was ready to undergo acceptance tests by ESO
and subsequently to be transferred to REOSC for the final, but critical production
stages. Put on paper many years hence, all of this seems like a fairly straightforward
process, but at the time, though the individual steps were clear, there were complications — and that was hardly surprising! According to the contract, Schott provided
a two-year warranty for the blanks. This de facto meant that Schott had to produce
six blanks, of which ESO would acquire four. However, considering the probability
of failures (we remind ourselves that such mirrors had never been produced before),
Schott was actually prepared to cast up to 12 mirrors, although in the end this was
not necessary. This could in principle have meant a production rate of one mirror per
month, but the requirements for space for the subsequent production processes were
such that this did not appear to be feasible. At the same time, the furnace could not
simply be turned off — the production of the raw glass material had to go on, uninterrupted, with 60 tonnes being produced every month. Much of this glass eventually was used for other purposes. But then another problem occurred. After a few
months of cooling in the annealing oven, the first blank broke. Soon afterwards, the

252

Chapter III-5 ∙ The Return of the Dalton Brothers

second one broke too 1. Schott mobilised some of its best engineers to find out what
was going on. They carefully traced the history of each crack and managed to reproduce the beginning of the cracks. The cause of the problem, it turned out, was chemical contamination between the mould and the first millimetres of glass, leading to
a crystalline layer with a different thermal expansion coefficient from the Zerodur.
Stresses built up while cooling, resulting in cracks (Dierickx, 1993). The solution
was to deploy a special alloy on the surface of the mould, reducing the crystalline
layer dramatically. With this problem solved, the production resumed without any
further serious mishaps. In July 1993, the first blank had completed the production
cycle and was carefully placed in a specially designed container that would protect it
during the subsequent journey, first to France and, four years later, on the long trip
across the Atlantic Ocean to South America. In the afternoon of 19 July 1993, the
journey began with a short drive to the Rhine port of Mainz. As if Heaven wanted
to carry out a test of its own, it happened in torrential rain.
≈
Close to midnight, the river barge Eldor left the port with the first VLT mirror blank
safely stored in its hold. The route foreseen took the vessel and its fragile cargo to
­Rotterdam, into the English Channel and up the Seine, passing through Paris during the night of 23 July, to arrive at Evry, its destination just south of Paris and just
a few kilometres from the REOSC plant. Not surprisingly, the passage of the mirror led to considerable attention by the local population as roads were blocked by the
slowly moving lorry carrying the 8.4-metre wide, and rather unusual-looking, mirror
container. It may have caused some traffic delays and, perhaps, some irritation among
motorists, but it also represented a chance to raise the visibility of the project in the
public mass media. Of course, ESO’s Information Service was on the spot, covering
the mirror’s journey with pictures and video footage, to be used for press releases and
other publicity materials. A great deal of planning had gone into this effort, and it
seemed that the passage through Paris would offer a unique chance to obtain a spectacular picture. The VLT represented the utmost in cutting-edge technology madein-Europe. Now the mirror would pass close by the Eiffel Tower, itself a powerful
symbol of Europe’s technological prowess, albeit from bygone days. And so the team
descended on Paris ahead of the vessel’s arrival. The photographers first found the best
location for their shot and then went out to the locks at Suresnes to meet the vessel.
Here ­Herbert Zodet, one of the photographers, boarded the vessel to film the passage
1	

The exact number of pourings is still considered confidential by Schott.

253

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

from the bridge of the ship, while the others went back through the Bois de Boulogne
to their chosen location near the Debilly footbridge to wait for the right moment,
which would occur around 11 pm. Shortly before the boat arrived, however, the lights
that had illuminated the Eiffel
Tower and every night provide
a spectacular view of this iconic
building were abruptly turned
off. To this very day the author
of this book, who accompanied the team, feels the sense
of despair as the Eldor passed
quietly in front of the darkened
Eiffel Tower and the photographers realised that they had just
The passage through Paris at night —the Eldor in front of the
Paris City Hall. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)
missed the shot of a lifetime!
≈

Archeological excavations continued even during the construction of the new REOSC facility in Saint Pierre du Perray.
(Courtesy: Roland Geyl, REOSC)

254

Like Schott, R EOSC had
built a new production facility,
which was located on a greenfield site at St. Pierre du Perray.
The original REOSC plant was
located in Ballainvilliers, a village some 20 kilometres south
of Paris and to the west of the
river Seine. Having signed the
mirror contract with ESO,
REOSC started to plan the necessary expansion of its original
facility. But, completely unexpectedly, it was denied a building permit by the local town
hall, which, according to the
local press “would rather lose
[the company] than their rural

Chapter III-5 ∙ The Return of the Dalton Brothers

environment” 2 . Since the problem could not be resolved, REOSC erected its new
plant at Saint Pierre du Perray, on the eastern side of the Seine and close to the harbour of Corbeil. Before construction started, however, the new site was inspected by
archaeologists, who quickly made a find of Merovingian remains, causing another
delay. Fortunately, after a few months, the exploration was completed and the construction work could continue. Despite these difficulties, the building was ready in
time to receive the first VLT mirror.
On 26 July, the mirror container was unloaded from the ship and, at midnight commenced the last leg of its first journey, on the N 104 dual carriageway and finally on
the local road leading to the plant. In the months to come, Joe — as the first blank
had now been dubbed — would undergo fine grinding and polishing with extensive,
continual testing, until the mirror had reached its final figure. The last, and most critical part, would be the polishing — from the point when the mirror blank was within
a few micrometres from its specified shape. The polishing machine was placed directly
underneath the test tower enabling in situ high-precision interferometric measurements of the surface. There can be no doubt that REOSC delivered a sterling performance and that the French engineers and technicians fully matched their colleagues
in Germany who had produced the blanks. Nonetheless, the polishing of the first
mirror did involve an incident. The grinding and polishing tables were fitted with a
robot arm, under which the grinding or polishing tool was mounted. The tool itself
comprised a set of carefully prepared ceramic tiles, glued onto a wooden mandrel.
The tool would normally be checked every 24 hours, before a new polishing sequence
began. As polishing involves sprays of water, the mandrel was protected by a coat of
varnish, but at some point the wood had nevertheless absorbed some humidity, causing a minute displacement of the tiles. On that day, since the 24-hour period had not
yet ended, the tool was used without further checking. The technician quickly discovered that something was wrong, but too late to prevent scratches. Fortunately, the
scratches could be removed by a slight change in the radius of curvature of the mirror.
As the mirror would remain within the stringent specifications, ESO agreed to this
and the subsequent mirror blanks were also polished to the slightly modified figure.
The acceptance tests, carried out by an ESO team involving Philippe D
­ ierickx, Ray
Wilson, Daniel Enard and Matthias Hess, gave testimony to the high quality of work
carried out by the French opticians: the surface roughness was 2 nm. A ­precision of
2	

Le Parisien, 27 November 1990. The position of the town hall caused quite a stir, as can be seen in the 22 November 1990 Essonne edition of Le Parisien: “Incroyable! La petite mairie bloque l’extension de l’enterprise de pointe
et risqué de lui faire perdre un contrat de 140 millions.” (The amount indicated is given in French francs, the currency still used at that time).

255

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

21 nm was achieved over the whole optical surface of the mirror form during the
polishing process, enabling a diffraction-limited resolution of 0.03 arcseconds in
the visual part of the electromagnetic spectrum. “For illustration, [it] corresponds to
an accuracy of only 1 millimetre deviation over a surface with a diameter of 165 kilo­metres (equivalent to the entire Paris area),” wrote Richard West in a press release
on 13 November 1995. The incident had caused a delay of three months, yet as it
turned out, this delay did not create problems for ESO. As other parts of the project were delayed as well, it was decided that the first mirror should remain in storage at REOSC until 30 October 1997. The delivery was thus in the first instance
simply to the designated storage area. This was nonetheless marked with a celebration on 21 November 1995. This also provided for a photo opportunity with the key
project managers lined up in front of the mirror: Giacconi, Tarenghi and Dierickx
from ESO, Dominique de Ponteves, Jean Espiard, Marc Cayrel and Jacques Paseri
from REOSC. The REOSC technicians watched quietly from behind the mirror.
­Dierickx noticed them, turned around and saluted the technicians. Giacconi immediately understood and clapped his hands, too. Then everybody joined in. “It lasted
quite a while — and was quite an emotional moment,” Dierickx later recalled.

The REOSC team and key people involved in the contract. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

256

Chapter III-5 ∙ The Return of the Dalton Brothers

Jack, VLT mirror number 2, was delivered by Schott in October 1994, William on 21
September 1995 and Averell, the final mirror, was formally handed over to REOSC
on 30 September 1996. REOSC, in turn, closed the order with the delivery of Averell
on 14 December 1999. It was not only a milestone for the VLT project, but also for
REOSC, whose technicians had outdone themselves. The fourth mirror far exceeded
ESO’s specifications by far. In fact, it was twice as good as the other mirrors 3 , arguably making it the most accurate large telescope mirror in the world.

The first 8.2-metre primary mirror in its specially designed transport container being loaded onto MV
Tarpon Santiago at the port of Le Havre in November 1997. (Photo: Philippe Dierickx)

≈
Much work obviously went into obtaining the highest possible optical quality of the
mirrors, but an equal degree of attentiveness was required to ensure the safe handling and transport of these fragile pieces. A broken mirror means seven years of
3	

Between working on William and Averell, REOSC took time out from the VLT project to polish the twin
8-metre mirrors for the Gemini telescopes. ESO accepted this because of the delays at the construction site and
ultimately the additional experience gained by REOSC benefitted ESO, as was clearly demonstrated by the
quality of the fourth mirror, Averell.

257

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

bad luck, some say. Astronomers would likely concur, though for them, the loss of
a mirror might have implications that could last much longer than seven years! The
development of some of the mirror handling tools and of the transport equipment
was also entrusted to REOSC 4 and tested in advance with a dummy mirror with the
same dimensions and weight as the originals, but made of reinforced concrete. The
first transport tests were carried out in the summer of 1992, i.e. one year before the
first blank became ready. The concrete “mirror” underwent a sea voyage, road transport and positioning on the grinding table at REOSC. It was also used for testing
the mirror cell, underwent a transatlantic voyage (again testing the container) and
was finally used in connection with the integration of the telescope in Chile. Today,
the concrete mirror rests on its laurels, in the shape of a support system, and is on
permanent display outside the interim visitors centre at P
­ aranal. But before it came
that far, the disc had to endure elaborate tests. Aside from the importance of assuring the safety and proper functioning of the handling equipment, the key issue was
of course to ensure the safety of the mirror during transport, whether exposed to
irregular movements in rough seas or subjected to the inevitable shocks incurred as
the river barge passed locks en route to its destination. Shocks might also occur on
the road, possibly in Europe, but certainly in Chile during the last stretch through
the desert. To test for this, the container was fitted with vibration sensors (accelerometers) and the data were carefully analysed. The tests included “high-speed” driving, at 25 km/h, full power acceleration followed by emergency braking, or acceleration while driving over a 5-centimetre-thick wooden beam. Reporting on the first
tests in the The ESO Messenger, characteristically, Dierickx couldn’t help remarking
“the beam is still O.K.!” (Dierickx & Ansorge, 1992).
At times like these, when there is an increased focus on fostering close links between
research and industry in support of innovation, it should be mentioned that the cooperation between ESO and its industrial contract partners for the VLT mirrors can
only be described as exemplary. Philippe Dierickx said: “Following the contracts was
a fantastic experience… . We were very lucky to work with professional, but also profoundly honest people… . If they had a problem they were putting their cards on the table
… it was clear who was on which side, but they were genuine and saying exactly what
they were doing.” Both Schott and REOSC also gained considerable experience in
the field of large mirrors (casting, handling, polishing with in situ control, etc.) enabling them to attract customers from elsewhere, including the US.

4	

Supplied by SOCOFRAM under subcontract to REOSC.

258

Chapter III-5 ∙ The Return of the Dalton Brothers

Philippe Dierickx is not only well acquainted with cartoon classics. Here he gives his own account of the
quality inspection of the first primary mirror. But, as with many cartoons, this lives from exaggeration.
In fact, the tests showed that the mirror was fully within specifications. (Illustration: Philippe Dierickx
and Ed Janssen)

≈
Fittingly, much effort went into the manufacture of the primary mirrors, giant discs
8.2 metres in diameter, but a with thickness of only 175 millimetres, i.e. an aspect
ratio of about 47, an incredibly high value for such a large mirror. This meant that
the support system would be at least as important as the mirrors themselves. The
mirror cell is a complex structure, featuring active support elements as well as the
interfaces to the tertiary mirror (M3) and the instruments at the Cassegrain focus.
Importantly, since weight matters, it was necessary to develop a lightweight system
that would possess the necessary stiffness and provided easy access to the 150 axial
supports, with their hydraulics and computer-controlled active force actuators, as
well as the 64 lateral supports located around the outer edge. The support structure
also had to accommodate a mirror cooling system and various safety features for the
primary mirror, including earthquake protection.
Stefano Stanghellini was responsible for this part of the design for the VLT Unit Tele­­scopes. Originally a nuclear engineer, he had also worked in the aerospace industry
and thus been exposed to the need for and challenges of lightweight construction.

259

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

This was valuable experience for telescope design as telescopes became ever larger.
The call for tender for the M1 cell was issued in early 1993, with many of Europe’s
high-tech industries responding.
Before approving the final contract, at the instigation of Giacconi, ESO gave design
contracts to two competing consortia, GIAT Industries together with SFIM (both
based in France) and to a consortium of Carl Zeiss and MAN GmbH. of Germany.
The companies were not only asked to deliver the complete design in the form of
drawings but also in the form of 1:1 mock-ups that were assembled in a tent behind
the ESO Headquarters as well as full size prototypes of the actuators. While the
German consortium was highly experienced in telescope manufacture, GIAT were
novices in the field. But GIAT brought valuable experience from the defence industry sector concerning lightweight products of high stiffness, based on laser cutting
and laser welding manufacturing technologies using thin metal sheets, and the partial use of super-high grade Swedish steels. Whereas a cell using conventional technologies would have weighed some 18–20 tonnes, GIAT’s proposed mirror cell had
a mass of only 11 tonnes, yet was able to support not just the 23-tonne mirror, but
also the complex equipment inside the mirror cell itself (including the support for

The first M1 cell, seen here at the GIAT factory in St. Etienne in 1997. The actuators for the active optics
and the earthquake protection system are clearly visible. (Photo: Herbert Zodet)

260

Chapter III-5 ∙ The Return of the Dalton Brothers

the mirror as well as an earthquake protection system), adding another 8 tonnes, as
well as the Cassegrain rotator and scientific instrumentation weighing 4.5 tonnes.
GIAT/SFIM, with their team of young, highly dedicated engineers and the backing of its management (which was then diversifying away from purely defence-oriented projects) dispelled all doubts and secured the final contract for the delivery of
the four M1 cells.
One of the problem areas revealed by the project review instigated by Giacconi
in 1993 was with the 1.2-metre convex hyperbolic secondary mirror, M2, that is
mounted high above the primary mirror and reflects the light to the Cassegrain focus
behind the primary — or via a flat tertiary mirror to one of the Nasmyth foci. The
secondary has other tasks as well, such as field stabilisation to compensate for wind
buffeting. It must also be able to switch rapidly between neighbouring parts of the
sky, a feature that is particularly important for infrared observations. It should be
what astronomers call a “wobbling mirror” (for the stabilisation) and a “chopping
secondary” for the continuous shift between target regions. It became clear that a
conventional mirror would not be able perform as required at high frequencies and
it was therefore necessary either to choose a light-weighted mirror or use new materials. The M2 would of also be an actively centred and focused mirror (in the sense
of Wilson’s active optics) and thus be housed in an M2 unit that would allow all the
necessary functions. Initially, the contract for the M2 units was awarded to MATRA
(of France), with MAN and REOSC as subcontractors. REOSC in turn chose a USbased company in Massachusetts, Carborundum, Inc. that offered a silicon carbide
substrate for the M2 blank. In the end, however, the company could not deliver and
the contract was cancelled. Since the initial solution could no longer be realised, in
November 1994 the German company Dornier Satellitensysteme took over as the
main contractor, but with REOSC still responsible for the optics. REOSC now
turned to another US company, Brush Wellman, Inc., specialising in beryllium.
Thanks to its combination of low density, high rigidity and advantageous thermal
characteristics, beryllium is often used in highly demanding aerospace applications.
In fact, beryllium had been considered by ESO, but initially thought to be too expensive. Furthermore, producing large beryllium mirrors is far from trivial. But it had
been done. The 0.5-metre secondary mirror for the first Keck telescope was a beryllium mirror, for example. However, since this was intended for infrared observations,
it was uncoated, made of “optical beryllium”. ESO’s requirements were tougher. They
needed “space-technology” beryllium with super-high strength and characteristics in
general. With the telescope covering both visible and infrared wavelengths, the mirror also had to be coated with nickel.

261

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Despite early production mishaps, from ESO’s perspective things went well initially.
Brush Wellman successfully performed the isostatic pressing of the first blank and
transferred it to Loral American Beryllium, Inc. in Florida for light-weighting and
machining. Then, a few weeks before delivery, the company filed for bankruptcy. In
a last-minute operation, ESO managed to secure the mirror blank and have it transferred to another company, Speedring, Inc. in Huntsville, Alabama. The aspherisation was then carried out by Tinsley, Inc. near San Francisco. The nickel coating was
then applied before the mirror was finally shipped to REOSC for polishing 5 . Luckily the production of secondary mirrors for the other Unit Telescopes went more
smoothly. At the time, the secondary mirrors for the VLT were the largest beryllium
mirrors ever produced for civilian applications.
By early October 1997, the first of the secondary mirrors was delivered to Dornier
for integration, and in December the first M2 unit arrived at ­Paranal just in time
for the first light preparations.
As already mentioned, the contract for the main mechanical structure had been
awarded to an Italian consortium under the name of AES.
≈
We will remember that the original VLT proposal envisaged operating the telescopes
in the open air, with giant inflatable domes to provide protection only when adverse
weather conditions interrupted observations. Open-air operation was a dream of telescope engineers and astronomers alike, as it would eliminate the need to combat the
dreaded effects of dome seeing, the degradation of observing conditions due to local
thermal effects. We shall revisit this topic later. However, once open-air operation
was jettisoned, ESO began to design appropriate enclosures, under the leadership of
Michael Schneermann, a German engineer. The shape of the proposed enclosures
looked like something between a classical dome and the avant-garde NTT building,
described in Chapter II-9. They comprised two cylindrical parts — a fixed part and
a rotating structure. The fixed lower part, of concrete and rising to the Nasmyth level
of the telescope, carried the large rotating part of the building. The upper part, a steel
structure covered by insulating plates, had a 9.5-metre-wide observing slit equipped
with a wind screen with variable wind protection and louvres to enable an optimal
5	

With its contractors ESO carried out pioneering work. The technologies developed under the ESO contract are
now expected to be used for the James Webb Space Telescope.

262

Chapter III-5 ∙ The Return of the Dalton Brothers

flow of air through the enclosure. The rotating part moved together with the telescope, but independently of it, enabling an unhindered view of the sky. An essential element of the enclosure would be the elaborate active thermal control system
to avoid dome-seeing effects.
The contract for the manufacture of the enclosures was awarded to a consortium
named SEBIS. SEBIS brought together two of the AES partners (SOIMI S.p.A. and
EIE s.r.l.) as well as other Italian companies.
Whether in Europe or on the site in Chile, work was going on to build the VLT. But
meanwhile, many other things happened in the world of astronomy. Let us therefore
take a break from the VLT tale and look at some important developments.

263

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Racing towards their own destruction: like pearls on a string,
the fragments of Comet Shoemaker-Levy 9, here observed with
the ESO Schmidt telescope, can just be detected in the 4 o’clock
position just outside the intense glare of Jupiter. The dark spikes
are caused by reflections in the telescope.

264

Chapter III-6

Bang for the Buck
“… it was the celestial drama of the century.”
Clark R. Chapman, New Scientist,
21 January 1995.

T

here is ample evidence that among the sciences, astronomy plays a special role
in capturing the interest and the imagination of the general public. Even so,
astronomical discoveries seldom reach the front pages of newspapers. However, when
rare events occur in the sky, astronomers and the public alike follow them with great
enthusiasm. The 1986 passage of Comet 1P/Halley is a good example, and eight years
later, another event generated similar interest worldwide: the collision of Comet
Shoemaker-Levy 9 with Jupiter. The periodic comet P/Shoemaker-Levy 9 (SL-9) was
discovered by Carolyn and Eugene Shoemaker and David Levy on 24 March 1993.
It was a very special comet as it seemed not to orbit the Sun, but the giant gas planet
Jupiter. Furthermore, presumably in an earlier close approach, the gravitational pull
from Jupiter had torn the comet’s nucleus to pieces and now 21 large chunks — each
estimated to be between a few hundred metres and a few kilometres in size — were
moving like pearls on a string. Most interestingly, the orbit was such that slightly
more than one year later, the fragments would collide with the planet. Since ­Jupiter is
a gaseous planet, the collisions were likely to have a major, if unknown, effect on the
planet, and it seemed reasonable that the observable outcome would provide important information, both about the comet itself and about the composition and structure of Jupiter, whose lower layers are shrouded by a dense atmosphere. The collisions
were predicted to occur sequentially between 16 and 22 July 1994.
≈
In a first planning meeting in November 1993, cometary and planetary experts from
Europe and the US met at ESO to discuss possible observations from La Silla and
develop a coordinated set of observing proposals. Southern hemisphere sites such
as La Silla were found to be favourable, since Jupiter would be 12 degrees south of

265

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the celestial equator at the time of the collision. But the observations would be difficult. Firstly, at least some of the impacts would happen during daylight. Secondly,
the impact site itself was expected to be right on the limb of Jupiter or in fact slightly
behind it. Also, the month of July is in the middle of the southern winter, with the
increased associated risk of bad weather, underscoring the need to use telescopes in
different locations, even on different continents. At an international meeting at the
University of Maryland1 in March 1994, it was agreed to establish a co-ordinated,
worldwide observing campaign, similar to what had been done in connection with
Halley’s comet. At La Silla ten telescopes — including the 3.6-metre telescope, the
NTT and the SEST — would be pointed towards Jupiter by the time of the impact.
They would follow their target for as long as possible until the end of the observing
campaign. Just about any observatory that could do so (a few at far northern latitudes
were excluded), was planning to observe this unique event and this ensured that the
entire sequence of impacts was well recorded. In addition, observations were planned
with the NASA/ESA Hubble Space Telescope, NASA’s Galileo spacecraft, itself en
route towards Jupiter, and other spacecraft. Nonetheless, the observations at ESO
constituted the largest coordinated effort of any observatory at the time.
As the time for the impacts approached, the excitement began to build, both among
the observers and in the media, who had been extensively briefed by ESO. Its information service had, however, tried to temper expectations, as nobody knew how
visible the event would turn out to be. Astrometric observations at La Silla began
in May with the Danish 1.54-metre telescope and other instruments including the
Schmidt telescope joined in during the last two weeks leading up to the impact.
The significance of precise astrometric measurements lay in determining the precise
exact impact locations and times, but the observations were far from easy as the faint
cometary fragments had to be picked up against the increasingly disturbing glare of
Jupiter. The Galileo spacecraft would be well placed to observe the event, but since
it had problems with its antenna, allowing only limited data transmission, and the
on-board recorders also had limited capacity, predicting the impact time as precisely
as possible was important in order to maximise the scientific gain.
≈

1	

It was clear that the US would play a major role in the observing programme. Orbit calculations were done both
by Don Yeomans at JPL and by Brian Marsden and his team at the IAU Minor Planet Center. Space satellites
would also observe the event.

266

Chapter III-6 ∙ Bang for the Buck

The first impact, “A”, occurred on 16 July at 20:11 UTC — i.e. during daytime in
Chile (but evening in Europe) — with the next some six hours later. At the 3.6-metre
telescope, fitted with the infrared imager TIMMI 2 , observations were possible right
from the beginning — the observers using Venus (and observing through clouds)
to initialise the telescope, before moving onto their target. Thus the first night (in
Europe) offered two impacts, of which the fragment A — hitting the planet’s atmosphere with a velocity of 60 km/s — left a spectacular imprint on the planet in the
shape of a large 10 000-degree hot plume rising from the planet’s troposphere. Based
on prior observations of the fragments, most scientists had expected the first impact
to be rather unspectacular, but they were in for a surprise. In fact, when the impact
was initially observed, several observers at La Silla thought that the bright spot they
saw was merely the Jovian moon Io crossing the face of Jupiter. These first results
were, in a sense, simply too good to be true! The thorough training that scientists
undergo to always be sceptical of first results, especially if they are spectacular, can at
times also be a handicap. At La Silla, one member of the observing team had brought
a laptop computer — a rarity in those days. It had a crude ephemeris programme
that seemed to confirm that Io should be in this position. However, the object was
too bright and when checking against the published high-precision ephemeris in the
Nautical Almanac, it became clear that it could not be Io. It had to be impact A. (In
fact the computer had been set at the wrong time — an oversight that caused embarrassment, but under the pressure of things is understandable). Yet the ESO observers were not alone in their scepticism. A very first report at the estimated time of the
first impact, coming from Sutherland in South Africa, had also been disappointing, with a non-sighting being reported. But it soon changed. The German–­Spanish
observatory at Calar Alto in southern Spain was first to claim a sighting publicly
(their result was also transmitted to ESO, and thus also to the media assembled at
the ESO Headquarters) and soon thereafter, the observers at La Silla realised their
initial mistake. Now with several confirmed sightings of the first impact, the adrenalin began to flow! Surprisingly, however, fragment B, which was expected to produce
a much stronger visible impact, turned out to be a disappointment. Jupiter seemed to
simply swallow the fragment. Nonetheless, it was clear that the time ahead would be
highly exciting for everyone. During the following days and nights, some 120 000
individual frames were obtained with TIMMI. The NTT followed the event with
its IRSPEC infrared spectrograph looking at the impact sites and with the SEST,
astronomers looked for interesting molecules in the plumes generated by the falling
cometary fragments. Unfortunately, in Chile bad weather set in during the last days
2	

TIMMI allowed both imaging and spectroscopy in the 10 µm atmospheric window.

267

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

and nights — after all no real surprise — but here the elaborate planning involving
a global network of observatories paid off.
The largest impact recorded occurred on 18 July at 07:32 UTC when fragment G
plunged into the Jovian atmosphere, leaving a giant dark pock mark of 12 000 kilometres in diameter, and it was estimated that the energy liberated in the atmosphere
of Jupiter amounted to the equivalent to six million megatonnes of TNT — or several hundred times the world’s nuclear arsenal. Indeed “bang for the buck”.
≈

Richard West during the all-night media event on Saturday 16 July 1994 attended by journalists from
the press, radio and ten television stations. Live broadcasts into the late evening news programmes were
made. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

Meanwhile, at ESO Headquarters, a bustling press centre had been established,
with daily news briefings — including a crowded all-night live event at the time of
the first impacts — with observers at La Silla participating by video link from the
control room of the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope, and masterfully orchestrated
by ­R ichard West. Background material, including broadcast quality video footage,
had been provided in advance, and during the “hot phase”, daily media bulletins,

268

Chapter III-6 ∙ Bang for the Buck

produced overnight, were distributed each morning together with coffee and soft
drinks en masse for the journalists and camera crew. It was the largest and longest lasting press event that ESO had ever organised and the media echo was overwhelming. So great was the public interest that ESO’s web server momentarily gave
up3 , causing some frustration as La Silla observers could not transfer their files to
­Garching. It also gave rise to a few witty comments by astute journalists. As one
said to this author: “Whoever claims that comets have no effect on the Earth, should
see what it does to the ESO Information Service!” But not all comments by journalists gave rise to smiles. One tabloid journalist, who felt that — in the middle of the
media onslaught — not enough attention had been given to him, published the telephone number of an assistant at ESO, writing that ESO had installed an information hotline for the public. During one day, her office received almost 5000 telephone
calls, while she was desperately trying to get on with her own work. The ESO Office
in Santiago also organised daily press meetings, and as mentioned in Chapter III-9,
this gave ESO a chance to present itself as an exciting place for science at a time when
ESO was facing considerable difficulties in Chile.
≈

Time-sequence TIMMI observations of impact H. (Courtesy:
Hans-Ulrich Käufl)
3	

What was the outcome of all
of this? Firstly, the scientific
results were expected to provide
new insights into the nature
and composition of Jupiter’s
atmosphere. It appeared that
the fragments disintegrated
rather high up in the atmosphere of Jupiter causing ejecta
to rise above the planet. It also
became clear that the parent
body of the cometary fragments
must have been fairly inhomogeneous. This is based on the
surprisingly different effects of

In The ESO Messenger, Fionn Murtagh explained that on the morning of Monday, 18 July, the ESO “www server
collapsed with 250 simultaneous users, compared to a more usual figure of ten before that.” Alas, this was in the
early days of the worldwide web! (Murtagh & Fendt, 1994). Indeed the first ESO web server was established at
the beginning of 1994, just six months before the SL-9 event.

269

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the individual impacts. Judged by the infrared emission, the fragments must have
been fairly big — ranging from several hundreds of metres to over one kilometre. It
also came as a surprise that the scars on Jupiter would remain visible for many weeks
after the impact. As Richard West formulated it: “Unique observations like these have
led to important new knowledge, but at the same time they do not fail to raise a host
of new and difficult questions.” As could be expected, spectroscopy showed the presence of many different elements, though it was difficult to determine their origin —
from the comet or from Jupiter. The observations revealed the presence of substantial amounts of molecular sulphur, due to the abundance believed to come from the
deeper layers of the Jovian atmosphere (West, 1994). Perhaps more mundanely, the
event provided a stress test for the international community of astronomers in terms
of the organisation and implementation of a global observing campaign, and in particular as regards the fast exchange of information between all observers. ESO, as the
largest southern hemisphere observatory, and as on later occasions, such as the Deep
Impact event in July 2005, clearly played a major role. Finally, ESO became known to
the European public at large in way that had never been achieved before. At the same
time, ESO provided both a good example to other organisiations and itself acquired
ample experience regarding large public outreach activities. Such experience would
stand ESO in good stead later on, e.g. on the occasion of the Deep Impact mission,
already mentioned, and the International Year of Astronomy in 2009.
Aside from the scientific results and the widespread, if short-term, public attention,
SL-9 occurred at a time of growing focus on the issue of near-Earth objects and the
potential threat they may pose to the Earth. In 1991, the IAU had established a working group on the topic. Today, our awareness about impacts on the Earth is much
improved. Our perception of the potential threat level may not have changed4 , but
SL-9 provided a vivid illustration that the Solar System is not necessarily a tranquil
place to reside in.

4	

Since 2007, ESO has participated in work of an Action Team on Near-Earth Objects established under the
­auspices of the United Nations Committee for the Peaceful Uses of Outer Space.

270

Chapter III-7

Paradigm Revisited
“Laßt uns ohne Vorurteil urteilen.”
Immanuel Kant, Allgemeine Naturgeschichte
und Theorie des Himmels (1755).

W

hile engineers and construction workers toiled under the harsh Sun at­­
Paranal, major discoveries had energised the scientific community and
undoubtedly also sharpened the desire for new and more powerful instruments.
One of the most fundamental questions that humankind has ever asked is whether
we are alone in the Universe. Is life, such as we know it, a unique feature associated
only with our tiny planet or might it exist in other places as well? The equally fundamental questions of what, in the first place, life really is and how it might have come
about on Earth are clearly associated. But there are also questions concerning the
conditions that must be fulfilled for life to emerge. This, in turn, brings us straight
to the issue of planets, and since our expectations of finding life on other planets (or
their satellites) in the Solar System are not high (though hopes may still exist!), it is
natural to ask whether planets might exist elsewhere in the vastness of the Universe.
Indeed this question has fascinated people for centuries with widespread speculation,
partly — for want of better information — assumptions based on statistical considerations, partly connected to our growing understanding of the formation processes
of stars. Somehow, it seemed unlikely that there would not be planets beyond the
Solar System. But nobody knew for sure.
In late 1995, however, all of this changed. In a paper in Nature with the title “A
­Jupiter-mass companion to a solar-type star”, two Swiss astronomers, Michel Mayor
and Didier Queloz of the Université de Genève, announced the first discovery of
an exoplanet orbiting an ordinary star — an otherwise rather inconspicious mainsequence (G-type) star in the northern constellation of Pegasus, 51 Pegasi (Mayor
& Queloz, 1995). As so often in science the discovery itself may have come as a surprise, yet this one somehow was already in the air. In 1986, Francesco Paresce, an

271

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Italian astronomer working at STScI, and his colleague Chris Burrows published an
image of the star Beta Pictoris, obtained with the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope
fitted with a coronograph built at STScI. The picture showed that this nearby and
apparently normal main sequence A-type star featured a warped circumstellar disc
of matter, 80 000 million kilometres across, and due to its peculiar shape it was suggested that we might be seeing a planet being formed. Beta Pictoris would soon also
be observed with other telescopes including the ESO 3.6-metre telescope during
one of the first test runs with the adaptive optics system and with the Hubble Space
Telescope 1. Planet hunting was becoming a hot topic in astronomy. What was new
about the observations by Mayor and Queloz, however, was their method. The discovery was based on observations at the Observatoire de Haute-Provence, with the
1.9-metre telescope and a spectrograph, ELODIE, that was able to measure radial
velocities with what at that time was a very high precision, “ better than 53 m/sec”
(Baranne, 1996)2 .
Exoplanets, as astronomers have dubbed planets outside of the Solar System, are
elusive beasts. Firstly, they are small, compared to their parent stars. Secondly, they
reside in orbits close to these stars, so that only telescopes with extremely high angular resolution stand any chance of seeing such a planet. What is more, the difference
in brightness between the star and the planet can be of the order of a billion, so that
the planet is normally lost in the glare of the star. With the telescopes available to
astronomers at the time, the chance of ever directly seeing an exoplanet was close
to zero. But astronomers are ingenious and they had worked out ways to detect the
presence of planet-size objects by studying the effects they would have on the parent
star. Basically this meant taking one of three different approaches. The first and most
successful method, and the one used by Mayor and Queloz, was to look for tiny periodic variations in the velocity of the star. The idea was simply that the gravitational
interaction between the star and the planet appear differently depending on where
1	

In 1996, observations with the Wide Field Planetary Camera 2 on Hubble strengthened this suggestion
(­Burrows, 2012). And in 2003, a French team led by Anne-Marie Lagrange carried out new observations of
Beta Pictoris with the adaptive optics instrument NACO on the VLT. After careful analysis, the team detected
an object, estimated to be eight times more massive than Jupiter (Lagrange et al., 2008). Follow-up observations in 2008 and 2009 also with NACO, confirmed that the object was not simply a background star, but is in
fact a planet in orbit around the star. This provides a nice illustration of how progress in observational astronomy is linked to progress in technology. The original observations simply showed a warped disc around the star.
­Moving beyond this stage required the resolving power of a much larger telescope and the application of adaptive optics.

2	

Over time the Observatoire de Haute-Provence has played an important role as a test observatory for advanced
instrumentation. This was the case for the CORAVEL spectrometer, for ELODIE, its successor, and also — as
we have seen — the test site for the first adaptive optics experiments.

272

Chapter III-7 ∙ Paradigm Revisited

the two objects are relative to us — e.g., the planet being either in front or behind
the star, as seen from the ground. To measure these variations required very highprecision spectrographs and with time, the Swiss astronomers and their colleagues
excelled in developing ever-more sophisticated equipment that brought about a true
bonanza in exoplanet research. Other methods could be used in rarer cases, where
a planet in its orbit passes in front of the surface of the star, as seen from the Earth.
In this case, the shadowing effect of the planet leads to a miniscule drop in measured brightness of the star during the planet’s passage. In even more exotic cases, the
opposite might be the case: the gravitational effect of a system with a planet orbiting a
star might enhance the light of background star, a phenomenon known as microlensing. Both of these phenomena have been studied from the ground, but the method
of measuring velocity variations has yielded the most results by far during the first
10–15 years of exoplanet research 3 .

This HARPS result shows the radial velocity changes of the
star Gliese 581, a red dwarf star at a distance of only 20 lightyears in the constellation of Libra. The star is now believed to
be surrounded by at least six planets, including one or more
in the habitable zone, i.e. theoretically able to sustain some
sort of life. Each of the planets exerts a gravitational effect on
the star. The graph, produced in 2005 on the basis of HARPS
observations, shows fluctuations in the radial velocity curve,
induced by the planets as they orbit the star.

The Swiss 1.2-metre Leonhard
Euler Telescope, named after
the famous mathematician, was
finished in 1998. It was fitted
with CORALIE 4 , an echelle
spectrograph that increased the
achievable precision in radial
velocity measurements to better than 7 m/s. But this would
not be the end of the story. The
High Accuracy Radial Velocity
Planetary Searcher (HARPS),
also developed by the Swiss,
initially achieved a precision
of 1 m/s, which corresponds to
the speed of a person walking.
Today it offers a performance of
a stunning 60 cm/s. HARPS is

3	

Beginning with the French COROT mission, launched in December 2006, telescopes in space now reap a rich
exoplanet harvest by studying transit events.

4	

Unlike the names of most other instruments, CORALIE is not an acronym. It was named after a mechanical
engineer and spectrograph specialist at the Observatoire de Genève (Mayor, 2012).

273

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

mounted on the 3.6-metre telescope, which not only has seen a second youth as a
formidable planet-hunting telescope, but also given ESO leading position in this
field of research.
And — how could it be any different? — plans now exist for even better instruments… .

HARPS was installed and commissioned at the 3.6-metre telescope in late 2003. Seen in the picture is
Francesco Pepe, the HARPS System Engineer from the Observatoire de Genève. (Photo: Herbert Zodet)

≈
It has been said that astronomy is now experiencing a second golden age. This appears
to be a reasonable statement, given the pace with which the science of astronomy progresses thanks to the application of ever more advanced technologies. Whereas, in
the past, major discoveries might have occurred a few times during a century, today
we see a flurry of new and exciting findings one after the other. Many seem to confirm our current worldview; others may challenge it. But, in 1998, astronomers were
confronted with thoroughly unsettling set of observational data.

274

Chapter III-7 ∙ Paradigm Revisited

A group of 20 scientists, including ESO staff astronomers Bruno Leibundgut and
Jason Spyromilio, published a meticulously prepared paper on spectral and photometric observations of ten Type Ia supernovae, which together with previous studies,
meant that the sample was “now large enough to yield interesting cosmological results of
high statistical significance,” as the group argued. The “interesting result”, as the paper
modestly said, however indicated nothing short of a revolution. Once more in the dry
style of the scientific paper, the authors wrote that “the results … suggest an eternally
expanding universe that is accelerated by energy in the vacuum.” (Riess et al., 1998).
Since the 1929 discovery of the expansion of the Universe by the American astronomer Edwin Hubble — a discovery that underpins the Big Bang theory — the
64-­million-dollar question had been how this expansion might change with time.
According to conventional wisdom, the expansion would either continue forever or
it would slow down, come to a halt and be reversed, with the Universe ending in a
Big Crunch. The decisive factor, it was surmised, would be the amount of mass in the
Universe — either enough for gravity to overcome the expansion — or not. Astronomers knew that the Universe contained much more mass than they could observe
directly with their telescopes — nebulae, stars, galaxies, etc. — and the additional
mass (which was by far the majority) was referred to as dark matter. The new observations, however, suggested a radically different scenario — that of a Universe with
an accelerating expansion.
In a funny twist of history, Einstein had actually considered such an option when
he developed his general theory of relativity. He had no knowledge of this phenomenon, but he had inserted a constant, which he called the cosmological constant, in
his equations simply as a mathematical tool to prevent the Universe from collapsing.
After Hubble’s seminal discovery of the expanding Universe, he discarded the cosmological constant, which appeared “unaesthetic” to him, famously describing it as
his biggest blunder. Prematurely, it would appear.
The new observations were of supernovae, the exploding stars that we discussed
already in Chapter II-6, although of a different type from 1987A. This kind, Type Ia,
is characterised by the fact that it has a specific intrinsic luminosity and can thus be
used as standard candles, providing the observer with precise information about their
relative distances. Furthermore supernovae are bright, so that they can be detected
over vast distances. The idea of using Type I supernovae for this kind of research was
not new. In fact it goes back to 1938 and is credited to Walter Baade, who, together
with Fritz Zwicky, was engaged in supernova research. In the mid-1980s a group of­

275

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

SN 1995K

Danish astronomers had conducted a search over many
years for these objects in distant clusters of galaxies, using
a tele­scope at La Silla. However, they had netted only a few
supernovae — enough to prove
24. April 1995
NTT/SUSI
the concept, but not enough to
justify its continuation amidst
the ever-present struggle of
prioritisation that individual researchers are confronted
28. May 1995
with. But the 1998 discovery of
NTT/SUSI
mysterious dark energy, a term
invoked to “explain” the acceleration observed by this group
(and also by a rival group), energised the worldwide astronomiSupernova 1995K, a Type 1a supernova, observed with the
NTT. It was one of the supernovae observations that led to the
cal community and set off specsuggestion of the accelerating expansion of the Universe. The
ulation on how to verify the
combination of observations with EMMI and SUSI, with its
idea. In 2011, the work of both
superb resolution, allowed the observers to quickly confirm the
character of the target (Leibundgut et al., 1995).
groups (the Supernova Cosmology Project and the High-z
Supernova Search Team) was acknowledged with the award of the Nobel Prize in
Physics to Saul Perlmutter, Brian Schmidt and Adam Riess. Dark energy raises dramatic questions. Where does this mysterious energy come from? If our ideas are correct and the Universe is continuously speeding up, will it eventually be ripped apart?
Or are our present ideas about physics perhaps wrong, after all? If so, are we literally
looking at completely new physics? Whatever the case, it once more showed us how
little we actually know about the Universe and it provided at least a hint that many
surprises lie in wait for us in our continuing quest to understand the world.
3. April 1995
NTT/EMMI

What was ESO’s role in this effort? ESO telescopes had taken part in the programme
and ESO astronomers had been members of both of the large and multinational
teams. It was an example of how astronomy was gradually being transformed from
the work of individual astronomers sitting patiently in their telescope domes and
studying the heavens to elaborate and orchestrated undertakings requiring many
different observations — either in different wavelength domains or with a number

276

Chapter III-7 ∙ Paradigm Revisited

of different, but complementary telescopes and instruments — and involving large
groups of scientists from many countries. Today it’s not unusual for astrophysics
papers in scientific journals to have a hundred or more authors, though the majority
of articles still have a rather smaller number of authors behind them.

277

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

La Silla in 1991. At the very bottom of the picture, the office building of the maintenance group is seen. Above it, the administration and the scientific library building
as well as the La Silla hotel. The buildings to the left are dormitories. Again from
bottom to top, the Swiss 0.7-metre telescope is seen, followed by the Danish 0.5-metre
telescope, the ESO 0.5-metre telescope, the Bochum 0.6-metre telescope and Dutch
0.9-metre telescope. In the middle: the ESO 1.52-metre, the ESO 1-metre, the GPO,
the Danish 1.54-metre, the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre and the ESO 1-metre Schmidt
telescopes. On the hill: the 3.5-metre NTT, the 1.4-metre Coudé Auxiliary Telescope
and the ESO 3.6-metre telescopes. Finally, on the right-hand flank, the 15-metre
SEST is seen. The small robotic telescopes are not visible in the picture but are located
between the NTT and the 3.6-metre telescope. The large building below the NTT is
the famous Astrotaller. (Photo by the author)

278

Chapter III-8

Upgrading, De-scoping
“In the VLT era, the functions and boundary conditions
of the La Silla observatory will no doubt see drastic changes… .”
Johannes Andersen, The ESO Messenger, 78.

W

hile ESO increasingly focused on the Very Large Telescope project, life at
La Silla continued. The previous chapters have offered an impression of some
of the scientific activities in which La Silla played a role. In the early 1990s a visitor to
La Silla would have seen something close to a perfect setup. Sixteen telescopes were
in operation every night, supported by an army of highly qualified technicians and
engineers, organised into what was known as the Technical Research Support (TRS),
headed by Daniel Hofstadt and with excellent optical and electronic test facilities.
The huge mechanical workshop, the Astrotaller, was considered the best equipped
workshop in all of Latin America. Astronomers would also find a large library and
other facilities needed for their research. Other departments were devoted to civil
construction and general maintenance of the infrastructure, from running a huge
warehouse with supplies to operating the hotel and dormitories. There was also a selfservice restaurant of some renown in the world of astronomy and leisure facilities for
off-duty staff. At the foot of the mountain, an airstrip allowed for smooth and efficient transport between the observatory and Santiago, while an office in La Serena
provided what one might call close support. La Silla was very much like a small buzzing town with white ESO cars everywhere, the pained sound of their oxygen-starved
engines echoing among the telescope domes. There was lots of activity. It was a hightech village in the middle of the desert. A self-contained world revolving around one
topic: science. Could this be done any better?
In 1994, Jorge Melnick was appointed as Director of La Silla. Before that, he had
been head of the astronomy department and a member of the management team in
charge of the observatory. As an astronomer, Melnick focussed on the science output, which he thought could and should be increased. The prevailing approach to
running the observatory, he found, was based on the (seemingly correct) assumption

279

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

In this cartoon by Herman Nuñez, the Technical Research Support is depicted as an entire ship crew, providing an illustration of the versatile yet interconnected services provided. The original drawing was no less
than two metres across, providing many details that cannot be properly reproduced here.

that because all telescopes are essentially prototypes, they break down from time to
time. When they did, the TRS would move in and solve the problem. That occurred
rather often. Melnick’s philosophy was simple: in his view, telescopes should not
normally break down. He therefore changed the local organisation and created telescope teams, each dedicated to — and responsible for — a particular telescope and
each headed by a scientist. Of course, the telescopes did still break down, but the
advantage of the dedicated teams was that they developed a very deep understanding
of the peculiarities of the telescopes and instruments for which they were responsible. That, in turn, opened up opportunities for a thorough refurbishment of the telescopes, looking at the root causes for whatever problems were encountered rather
than settling for quick fixes. This development was boosted firstly by the fact that the
technical departments at Garching were increasingly busy with the VLT and could
not devote as much attention to La Silla as in the past, and secondly, because there
had been a growing suspicion that the telescopes, but especially the 3.6-metre telescope, were not performing as well as they should. Perhaps the first indication that
the site offered better conditions than had long been assumed came with the commissioning of the Danish 1.54-metre telescope in late 1978. The MPG/ESO 2.2metre telescope also yielded an image quality that was pleasing, but increased suspicion further. At the other end of the scale, the small DIMM telescopes developed
by Marc Sarazin for site testing, also indicated that it should be possible to achieve

280

Chapter III-8 ∙ Upgrading, De-scoping

better image quality. However, if anything, the stunning first light images obtained
with the NTT confirmed the high quality of La Silla as a site for astronomical observations. Along with the NTT there were also much improved image analysis tools,
based on a Shack-Hartmann set-up with a CCD detector. It was no longer necessary to use photographic plates, which had to be sent by the weekly diplomatic bag
to Garching for analysis there, with the results communicated back by telex, at best.
A portable wavefront sensor, called Antares, became available and gave the optical
experts at La Silla the tool they needed to test the intrinsic quality of the telescopes.
In a brief article in the The ESO Messenger, Alain Gilliotte presented a sobering
result: “Almost all telescopes tested suffered from spherical aberration… . Discrepancies
between theoretical and real matching of primary and secondary mirrors produced the
spherical errors… .” (Gilliotte, 1992) In Chapters II-4 and II-9, we looked at the detrimental effects of spherical aberration, although in the cases of the Hubble and the
NTT, the original problems were of a different magnitude. The analysis also revealed
serious problems with dome seeing and mirror seeing caused by convection around
the telescope, e.g., by a warm primary mirror heating the colder ambient air during the night or by insufficient dome ventilation. Moreover, classical problems such
as tube flexure could now also be revisited, and so a targeted upgrade programme
for the 3.6-metre telescope started in 1995. The problems related to thermal effects
were addressed by removing heat sources in the dome, improving the ventilation and
introducing fans at the primary mirror. The spherical aberration was corrected by
lowering the focal plane by 166 millimetres. Certain aberrations had been found to
vary with telescope elevation so changes to the M1 cell, including modifications to
the astatic levers, were made. After improving the dome and the M1 mirror cell, the
team took a closer look at the secondary mirror (M2) and the top ring. A new top
ring was constructed by the Astrotaller as well as a new M2 unit, which was installed
in August 2004. With further fine-tuning of the telescope, the image quality turned
out to be better than 0.4 arcseconds, reaching values comparable to the external seeing monitors (Gilliotte et al., 2005). The 3.6-metre was now close to its best possible performance. In 2007 the control system of the lateral pads was upgraded and
the image quality of the telescope is now better than 0.2 arcseconds at zenith. Since
the telescope remained in service during the upgrade1, the project took considerable
time, but the problems were solved one by one and thus, when the HARPS instrument with its ultra-high performance (and correspondingly high requirements on the
1	

In early October 2006, the telescope had to be taken out of service following a serious breakdown of the rotating dome. Preliminary repairs allowed restricted operations as of November of that year. However, it was clear
that replacement of the bearings was necessary, a task that took half a year (Ihle et al., 2007).

281

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

telescope) arrived at La Silla 2 , the upgrade had almost been completed and the telescope was now able to deliver spectacular science results with the new spectrograph 3 .
Since April 2008 HARPS is the only instrument available at the 3.6-metre, removing yet another potential source of image degradation: frequent instrument changes.
It may seem surprising that it took so long for ESO’s long-standing primary telescope
to reach its full potential. However, as we have seen, the understanding of the many
technical aspects of telescope performance developed over time and was also subject to the development of better analytical tools. Also only with the advent of the
VLT with its huge capacity, did the changing scientific demands on the 3.6-metre
telescope allow for a drastic streamlining of its operation. Perhaps one of the most
important lessons is the value to science that lies in allocating sufficient resources to
maintenance and upgrades of telescopes over their entire lifetimes.
Not only the 3.6-metre telescope, also the other telescopes at La Silla were subject to
thorough scrutiny and many improvements were carried out. Thus motors, hydraulic systems and encoders of the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope were exchanged. The
telescope was being prepared for the installation of the Wide-Field Imager, which
would later deliver spectacular images of celestial objects. The guiding system of the
Schmidt telescope was changed, the adaptor for the Danish 1.54-metre telescope was
enhanced and many other upgrades were carried out.
≈
All of this work, together with activities that we shall describe below, yielded impressive results. La Silla became more of a scientific powerhouse than ever before. In
fact, in 1998, when the world of astronomy marvelled at the VLT first light images,
La Silla could take pride from the fact that in this year it had produced more scientific papers than any other ground-based observatory in the world (ESO Annual
Report, 1998) — 400 papers in total. By comparison, the Hubble Space Telescope
produced 514 papers, the mighty Keck telescopes, the largest in the world at that
time, 94 articles (Grothkopf, 2010). However, the upgrade project and the reorganisation in general also contributed considerably to raising and maintaining the motivation l­ evels of the La Silla staff at a time when it was clear that the observatory would
2



HARPS saw first light on 11 February 2003.

3	

The last part of the upgrade was completed after the installation of HARPS. According to Gilliotte et al. (2005)
the final modifications brought a considerable flux increase (40%), undoubtedly welcomed by the astronomers.

282

Chapter III-8 ∙ Upgrading, De-scoping

soon face substantial reductions and that the balance in terms of frontline science
would increasingly shift towards ­Paranal. Rightly, the staff at La Silla took pride in
their contribution to ESO and European astronomy in those years. And of course,
during the 1990s, La Silla was Europe’s observatory in the southern hemisphere.
We have already touched upon the importance of the NTT. We shall soon return
to this telescope in the context of the VLT development, but it is also worth mentioning the NTT’s role in supporting, in a sense fortifying the shift towards extragalactic research by European astronomers. The 3.6-metre provided the first step —
it had whetted astronomers’ appetites, but maybe more than anything, it was the
NTT ’s superior optical performance that opened the door to the deep Universe.
Thus in 1998, 60% of the observing time on the NTT was dedicated to that kind of
research (in addition to about 40% for the 3.6-metre). Many individual objects in the
­Magellanic Clouds were observed, but its programme also included spectral classification of galaxies, studies of Seyfert galaxies 4 , clusters of galaxies, the search for UVbright quasars, and studies of gravitationally-lensed quasars, etc. — the whole gamut
of extragalactic studies. And of course La Silla also played its role in the orchestrated
observing campaign that led to the seminal discovery of the accelerating expansion
of the Universe and dark energy, discussed in the previous chapter.
Studies of objects closer to home, i.e. in our own galaxy, also prospered. For example
a major investigation aiming at understanding the evolutionary history of our cosmic
home, the spiral galaxy that we call the Milky Way, by studying a large number of
individual solar-type stars, their composition, ages and motions in space. The study
took 20 years and involved more than 1000 observing nights by a Danish/Swedish/Swiss team of astronomers (Nordström et al., 2004). The idea was that detailed
studies of our galaxy would allow us to test the ideas about the evolution of spiral
galaxies in general. To use contemporary language, one could say that our current
knowledge in this area was subjected to a stress test. A necessary one, it would seem.
“Classical disc evolution models spectacularly fail every classical test when confronted
with our data,” the scientists concluded (Nordström et al., 2004b). Science is about
constructing new knowledge by constantly challenging conventional assumptions!
The main instruments used by the group were two high-precision CORAVEL spectrometers, mounted on the Danish 1.54-metre telescope at La Silla and on the Swiss
1-metre telescope at the Observatoire de Haute-Provence. Aside from the scientific merit of the project, we also note the Swiss preoccupation with high-precision
4	

A particular type of galaxy with a very bright core and hosting an active black hole at its centre.

283

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

spectrographs, which subsequently led to spectacular results in the search for
exoplanets.
≈
An area in which European astronomy and observations at La Silla played a major role
was that of star formation, which had evolved from a research niche to a major field
of activity. One of the leading scientists in this field was Bo Reipurth, who worked as
a staff astronomer at La Silla for eleven years. Stars are formed by the contraction of
matter. Unsurprisingly, in a Universe with a mean density of a few atoms per cubic
metre, stars form where matter is concentrated in clumps,
dense clouds of dust and gas,
such as we see them in our own
Milky Way. But this means that
the early phases of star formation happen behind a veil of
dust, impenetrable by light,
although increasingly transparent to longer wavelengths 5 .
However, from a certain point
in its lifecycle, a new-born star
may reveal its presence by ejecting streams of matter into interstellar space. These streams or
jets may become visible as they
break free of the parental cloud,
or when they collide with other
HH-111 in Orion, observed with the NTT. This is one of the
interstellar matter, ionising it in
most prominent examples of a jet streaming out from a new
star (located at the bottom of the image, but still hidden in
what are known as bowshocks.
its parental cloud). Further observations showed a somewhat
Astronomers call these phefainter jet in the opposite direction. The bowshock is also clearly
nomena Herbig–Haro objects 6
seen as a mushroom-shaped nebula near the upper edge of the
picture.
(HH). Finding HH objects
5	

The main observational problem, however, is that at long wavelengths, the resolution is insufficient to resolve
objects of small angular extension.

6	

After their discoverers George Herbig of the Lick Observatory (Mt. Hamilton, USA) and Guillermo Haro of
the Observatorio de Tonantzintla (Puebla, Mexico).

284

Chapter III-8 ∙ Upgrading, De-scoping

means finding the signposts to stellar nurseries, which can then be studied with
large telescopes and their full complement of infrared instruments. But detectors
at that time were small; hence precise pointing of the telescope to the appropriate
position was necessary. Reipurth therefore used the ESO Schmidt telescope with its
large field to first identify candidate targets (Reipurth & Madsen, 1989). Follow-up
observations were then made with the NTT, among other telescopes, to confirm the
nature of the objects and, over time, to study their evolution and motion in space.

Holger Pedersen checking one of the GMS telescopes. (Photo
by the author)

These studies provided examples of important scientific
work carried out with relatively small telescopes (at least
seen in the perspective of the
VLT) — studies requiring massive amounts of observing time
but of relatively bright sources,
thus not in need of the lightcollecting capacity of the new
large facilities. Important work
was done with even smaller
telescopes. Thus, since 1982,
La Silla has seen the arrival
of a succession of robotic telescopes with names like GMS 7,
TAROT-South8 and REM9, all
relatively small telescopes aimed
at detecting the optical components of gamma-ray bursts.

≈
Despite the impressive scientific achievements, the heyday of La Silla was coming
to an end. The financial pressure of maintaining two sites, La Silla and ­Paranal, at
7



8



9



Gamma-ray burst Monitoring System.
Télescope à Action Rapide pour les Objets Transitoires.
Rapid Eye Mount.

285

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

this level could not be sustained, a fact that had been clear at least since the decision
to develop ­Paranal had been taken. Furthermore, with the 8–10-metre class telescopes coming into service, it was obvious that the science at La Silla would change,
as Johannes Andersen expressed it: “… the work [at La Silla and other observatories
with 1-4-metre-class telescopes] will be largely conditioned by the research done at the
8-metre giants, and their tasks then will be different from now.” (Andersen, 1996).
Andersen presented a report by a working group set up in 1994 by Giacconi to consider the future of La Silla. Aside from himself (as Chairman), the working group
consisted of Sergio Ortolani, both members of the Scientific Technical Committee, Michel Dennefeld and Hans Schild, representing the Users Committee and
­Jacqueline Bergeron, Jim Crocker, and Jorge Melnick from ESO. The report recommended that ESO should concentrate its efforts at La Silla on maintaining a limited
number of four telescopes, obviously including the 3.6-metre and the NTT with
upgraded instrumentation, but that in general the observation programmes carried
out at La Silla should be seen as complementary to what would be done with the VLT.
An important follow-up report, prepared under the leadership of Birgitta Nordström
and entitled La Silla 2000+ appeared in 1999, listing the needs of ESO’s users in the
light of the first experience of the VLT operations 10 . The STC followed the recommendations, giving top priority to the operation of the 3.6-metre and NTT, followed
by the 2.2-metre and, as third priority, the continued ESO use of the Danish 1.54metre telescope. Whilst it endorsed an upgrade of SEST, it also requested that ESO
“ investigate the possibility to shift submm activities to Chajnantor as soon as possible,” 11
noting that were that to happen, SEST operation could cease.
La Silla was thus set to experience a period of decline, with telescopes closing 12 as well
as a reduction in staff and budget. This posed a huge challenge to the management
who had to keep up staff motivation levels and secure the necessary expertise to keep
the observatory running as a first-class scientific facility. Melnick and his lieutenant
Gaetano Andreoni were well aware of the potential problems and they introduced
a number of measures aimed at alleviating the situation. One was the introduction
10	

Further reductions were agreed in 2007 with the La Silla 2010 plan, leaving the 3.6-metre telescope with
HARPS as its only instrument and the NTT with EFOSC 2 and SOFI at the Nasmyth foci and finally continuing support for the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope following an extension of the agreement with the MaxPlanck-Gesellschaft (Saviane et al., 2009).

11	

STC recommendations, 10 November 1999.

12	

Some telescopes continued to be operated by national groups or through sharing arrangements. Thus already
in 1996, Brazil became a 50% partner in the ESO 1.52-metre telescope. This lasted until 2002. Between 2007
and 2010 Brazil also had access to the 2.2-metre telescope.

286

Chapter III-8 ∙ Upgrading, De-scoping

of the “La Silla University” as “an in-house institution devoted to find ways of embedding learning in a range of meaningful contexts where ESO staff members can learn
to use their knowledge and skills creatively, to make an impact on the world around
them.” 13 The University offered courses in a wide number of topics ranging from science and management training to social and arts activities, such as drama, music
and even the martial arts. The impact of this was considerable since La Silla was not
simply an observatory, but a small and isolated society, where people stayed together
day and night for periods of various lengths, but seldom less than a week and often
much longer. A further tool both to retain motivation and optimise operational processes, necessary as staff reductions became the order of the day, was the introduction of the ISO 9000 quality management system. The ISO 9000 family of standards is designed to assist systemic changes in enterprises. It is based on well-defined
service standards, with processes monitored by internal auditors and thus, in a sense,
devolves responsibilities to the staff at large. In 2003, La Silla was formally certified
as an ISO 9001 undertaking, quite possibly the only observatory in the world that
has been granted this status.
≈
As we return to the VLT story, we will still for a moment stay at La Silla and revisit
the NTT. We will remember that this telescope had delivered spectacular results
during its first period of operations, but later, things changed. Dietrich Baade formulated it this way: “Sufficiently many excellent observations have been obtained to
raise the expectations of the observers’ community substantially beyond the traditional
level. However these hopes have often been disappointed.” (Baade et al., 1994). There
may have been several reasons for this, as indicated by Baade and his colleagues:
“It has often been remarked that after the commissioning period the NTT apparently
never fully repeated this early performance. However, it deserves to be mentioned that
since the end of 1990 the average seeing recorded with DIMM2 kept deteriorating until
1993 when a dramatic improvement started… .” It also became evident that, under
the pressure from the VLT project, ESO had moved resources away from the NTT
too quickly and had not given itself time to eradicate the “childhood diseases” that
most new high-tech projects will display for some time. These problems, it would
appear, came as a blessing in disguise. ESO was of course focused on achieving first
light for the VLT according to schedule. Both the complexity of the telescope and
its software and the necessity of developing a plan for the science operations for the
13 

La Silla University Mission Statement.

287

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

VLT warranted substantial “live” testing ahead of the magical moment of first light.
In the summer of 1993 Giacconi had put Baade in charge of both developing the
science operations plan and of looking into the problems still plaguing the NTT,
which were mainly issues of reliability. Baade, in turn, put together a team, handpicking staff both from Garching and from La Silla. The idea of having a dedicated
NTT team of experts, which would operate with a high degree of autonomy, would
soon be taken over at La Silla in general. The original NTT team included La Silla
staff astronomer Gautier Mathys, Paul Le Saux, Anders Wallander, Domingo Gojak,
Riccardo Parra and Percy Glaves. Inside ESO they were seen as the Dream Team.
Roland Gredel, at the time also La Silla staff astronomer, worked with the team as
well, mostly on infrared instrumentation. One of the first problems that the group
saw was linked to the control software. There were issues of training and expertise
in using the software, but it also became clear that upgrades would be difficult and
it was decided to install the VLT control software, instead. However, to be compatible with the VLT, it would also be necessary to exchange the control electronics, and
all of this would effectively mean taking the telescope out of service for a while. The
NTT had always been seen as a testbed for VLT technologies, but in the meantime
— and despite its problems — it had become a user instrument and a highly coveted
one at that. Decommissioning it for a period of almost one year was not easy, but it
would prove to be a good investment. In October 1995, Baade passed the baton to
Jason ­Spyromilio, who carried out what became known as the NTT Big Bang, which
occurred between July 1996 and July 1997 — in time to gain experience with the
new operational environment before VLT first light.
One of the first observations with the upgraded telescope was — how could it be any
different? — another deep field, produced by combining a large number of relatively
short exposures (amounting to 32 hours of observing time in total) with the Super
Seeing Instrument and reaching objects of about 27th magnitude. “The image illustrates well the capability in deep imaging at good angular resolution at a 4-metre-class
ground-based telescope,” wrote the principal investigator, Sandro D’Odorico, in the
The ESO Messenger (D’Odorico, 1997). A few years before, a “4-metre-class” would
have meant one of the largest telescopes available. But his formulation lets us sense
that the astronomical community had now set its sights on greater things.
However, while astronomy was blossoming during the 1990s, boosted by new technologies and larger telescopes coming into service, more mundane issues began to
take centre stage at ESO.

288

Chapter III-9

Clouds on the Horizon
“It seems to me that ESO’s overall situation in Chile has
become more difficult than in the past… .”
Hans Peter Kunz-Hallstein, fax to Riccardo Giacconi
(undated, but apparently June 1994).

T

he change of Director General in January 1993 — in the middle of the VLT
project — signalled a crisis. But if ESO found itself in rough waters, it was nothing compared to what was still in store for the organisation.
As already mentioned, the original Convenio between ESO and Chile dated back to
1963. By the time the VLT project began to assume a firm form, much had changed
both at ESO and in Chile. Chile had implemented a peaceful transition from the
military regime of Augusto Pinochet to a democracy, led by President Patricio ­Aylwin
and backed by a broad coalition of political parties. The country was seeing the beginning of a strong economic upturn, and many well-educated people who had lived in
exile for many years had returned to their native country, bringing with them valuable experience from the outside world. The issue of installing the VLT in Chile, at a
new site, had of course not been foreseen in the 1963 accord and the wording of the
text could be considered somewhat ambiguous as regards the legal status of new facilities in different locations from the original one. For that reason, but in fact rather
more out of a fundamental wish to seek what it considered to be a more equitable relationship, on 11 November 1991, the Government of Chile requested a modification
to the 1963 agreement 1. ESO was not unwilling to consider this, but was struggling
with finding ways to do so that would be compatible with the principles upon which
the organisation rested. We shall return to the details below. Shortly afterwards,
in December 1991, Council met in Chile — its first official visit since 1972. A few
1	

Through its diplomatic channels, the Chilean government had begun to press for this as early as 1988, with the
first direct exchange with ESO occurring in 1989. At the same time, several Council members had also expressed
the view that the transition of government would constitute a good opportunity to put the relationship on a
new footing.

289

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

days before Council’s arrival, the then Director General van der Laan, ­accompanied
by Gerhard Bachmann and ESO’s lawyer in Chile, Antonio Urrutia 2 , met the new
Chilean government’s minister for science and education, Ricardo Lagos, for a first
exchange regarding the future relationship, including the growing labour issues and
the country’s wish to obtain guaranteed access for Chile’s astronomers. At the meeting, van der Laan held his ground, referring to the principles for granting observing
time and to the status of international organisations as regards national legislation.
However, after the meeting a worried Bachmann remarked to him: “You won the
argument, but [logical] arguments in politics don’t work!” Further meetings followed
with Edgardo Boeninger, Secretary General of the President’s Office and finally, on
9 December, with the President of the Republic, Patricio Aylwin. For the latter meeting, van der Laan was accompanied by Franco Pacini, President of the ESO Council, and Per-Olof Lindblad, member of the Council for Sweden.
At the suggestion of Minister Lagos it was decided to form a joint Chile–ESO working group to consider possible solutions. In parallel, ESO established its own working group, chaired by Henrik Grage and with participation by Peter Creola, Pierre
Léna and Gerhard Bachmann 3 . The deliberations of the internal working group led
to an invitation in June 1992 from ESO to Chile to join the organisation as a regular member.
On 19–20 April of the following year, an ESO delegation visited Santiago to discuss the situation with the Chilean Government, represented by Ambassador Mario
Ataza. The delay was partly due to the fact that in the meantime, ESO had a new
Director General (Riccardo Giacconi) and also because of forthcoming congressional elections in Chile. The delay, however, had not brought calm into the situation,
which was becoming increasingly political. Given the outside pressure, the discussions were not easy, with quite a bit of brinkmanship being exercised. It was evident
that in the prevailing political climate, the proposal for Chilean membership of
ESO could not be pursued further. On the contrary: later in April, the Chamber of
Deputies raised the stakes by adopting a resolution, which formally requested the
2	

Urrutia was a well-connected lawyer who had provided legal counsel to ESO since the early days. He had also
acted as a go-between vis-à-vis the military government. But with the changes in Chile at the beginning of the
decade, it became clear that ESO needed a more broadly based independent legal support to deal with a wide
range of problems. Following the visit of the negotiating team in 1994 (see p. 297), ESO therefore engaged the
prestigious Philippi law firm in Santiago. Laura Novoa, from this firm, became ESO’s new Counsel in legal
matters.

3	

From 1994 this group was comprised of Catherine Cesarsky, Franco Pacini, Gerhard Bachmann and Henrik
Grage (Chair).

290

Chapter III-9 ∙ Clouds on the Horizon

Government of Chile to re-negotiate the Treaty “and also mentioned the possibility
that the Chilean government could make use of its right to revoke the Treaty” 4 , a dramatic measure in international relations, should it finally be taken. However, negotiations continued in June, this time in a much more positive atmosphere and leading to
a shared understanding in principle of how the wishes expressed by the Chilean government could be accommodated. A document was now on the table and, in a joint
press release by the Chilean Ministry of Foreign Affairs and ESO on 23 June 1993,
it was stated that “the Agreement will be submitted for ratification to the Congress of
Chile and to the Council of the ESO.” It seemed that the problems had been solved.
The labour problems had built up over many years. When ESO came to Chile in
1963, finding qualified Chilean staff was difficult, and in many cases impossible.
Local staff were therefore only hired for menial work, leaving the specialised tasks
to ESO’s international, i.e. European, staff. But things had changed and gradually,
qualified Chilean staff began to work side by side with their European colleagues.
For Europeans, in turn, working in Chile meant uprooting families, settling far from
their home countries, accepting the undisputed hardship of working in the desert,
including the long periods of separation from spouses and children. This had to be
compensated by a premium on the salary and thus, with time, the situation led to dissatisfaction among the Chilean staff, who felt discriminated against5 . On the other
hand, introducing equal pay at a level that could still attract European staff, it was
feared, might have had a disruptive effect on the Chilean labour market. La Silla in
particular constituted a close-knit society with the staff living and working together
for weeks, while at the same time being in an isolated place. Given these conditions,
it is remarkable that both at the personal and professional level, relations between
local and international staff always remained cordial, but at the institutional level
the situation became increasingly tense.
≈
ESO is an international, intergovernmental (treaty-based) organisation in the sense
of Article 102 of the United Nations’ Charter. Such organisations are not subordinate
to national legislation and therefore are obliged to maintain their own regulations
4	

ESO Press Release, 14 May 1993.

5	

This view was shared by some Europeans, as Blaauw readily acknowledges in an article in the Annual Review
of Astronomy & Astrophysics (Blaauw, 2004), which also reveals that the problem had basically remained unresolved for 20 years.

291

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

including methodologies to determine staff pay, social security and pension schemes.
It was widely assumed that such systems were not suitable for trade union involvement, since trade unions normally work within, and use, national legal frameworks,
a view also held by the International Labour Organization. But ESO local staff saw a
larger role for their staff association, including its transformation into a formal trade
union and the introduction of collective bargaining, as a way to improve their conditions. Neither was foreseen within the ESO system.
The Chilean staff sought allies within the political parties of Chile, arguing that they
ought to work under Chilean law, and thus began to exert pressure on the organisation through the country’s political system, a system that was still trying to find its
feet after more than one and a half decades of forced inaction. They sent an enquiry
to the International Labour Organization and later also petitioned the European
Parliament, accusing ESO of violating Article 23 of the Universal Declaration of
Human Rights by not allowing trade unions 6 . For ESO, however, the situation was
less simple. It could not go against the basic tenets of its legal status as an international organisation. It was also clear to ESO that the demands of the union activists, should they be met, might de facto mean less favourable conditions for its local
staff than those under which they were already working 7. But national sentiments
were in play, and in any case, the conflict soon became one element of a potentially
lethal cocktail that was brewing.
≈
Chilean astronomers also aired grievances. During the 1970s and 1980s Spain had
established a large astronomical observatory in the Canary Islands with telescopes
on the islands of Tenerife and La Palma (Observatorio del Roque de los Muchachos).
Here a number of universities and national research organisations from many European countries had placed telescopes and in compensation — also for Spanish investments in infrastructure — provided Spanish astronomers with 20% of the available
observing time. This had been very important in developing Spanish astronomy to
its present high level. In Hawaii, observatories had made a similar concession to the
local astronomers. In Chile, AURA had ceded 10% of the observing time to ­Chilean
6	

ESO never objected to staff members being members of national trade unions, but for the reasons mentioned
could not agree to accord such unions with negotiating rights.

7	

Studies confirmed that ESO was among the top five best-paying employers in the country. Together with other
benefits working for the organisation meant enjoying a very attractive employment package.

292

Chapter III-9 ∙ Clouds on the Horizon

scientists. ESO, however, had not done so — and, at least for a while, did not consider
it part of its remit to deal specifically with Chilean astronomy, as Woltjer’s remark
on p. 94 makes clear. It is true that when ESO came to Chile, Chilean astronomy
was not sufficiently developed to take advantage of the ESO facilities, but meanwhile, a lot had happened in the country. There was, however, a more fundamental
issue in that ESO found it difficult to give guaranteed time to scientists from one
country, which was not even a Member State, while denying a similar, privileged
status to astronomers from its own Member States, i.e. those countries that actually funded the organisation. This touched upon a basic principle of ESO: telescope
time is granted on the basis of scientific quality, not passport. Astronomers wishing
to use ESO’s facilities apply for telescope time in competition with their colleagues.
Their proposals are subject to a peer review process, their applications being considered by the Observing Programmes Committee and the best are selected. Competition is tough since ESO receives many more applications than it can accommodate.
Hence, while ESO had certainly always welcomed Chilean observers 8 , there was considerable reluctance to grant them guaranteed time, which might be seen to subvert
the principle of scientific excellence based on peer review. The Chilean community
of astronomers saw this quite differently. The presence of the foreign observatories
with their continued traffic of observers from around the world had had an impact
on Chilean astronomy. The Chilean scientific community had grown in numbers
and the quality of their science had improved, too. Understandably, so had the ambitions of Chile’s astronomers. In 1966, the Universidad de Chile had established an
astronomy department. Graduates had often continued their studies overseas and,
upon their return, bred new life into the small community of astronomers. Over
time, the university had expanded its astronomy programme and other universities
had or were about to follow suit, including the Pontificia Universidad Católica de
Chile and Universidad de Concepción. The universities in the north of the country,
in La Serena and in Antofagasta, also aspired to engage in astronomy. The example
from Spain had shown how beneficial a privileged status for a national group could
be, at least in the phase of development in which Chilean astronomy then found
itself. In February 1988, when it was decided to build the VLT and it was thought
that it would most likely be placed at Cerro P
­ aranal, the Chilean government sought
formal access rights for Chilean astronomers, a suggestion that ESO turned down
for the above reasons. They therefore began to press their case via the International
Council of ­Scientific Unions (ICSU) and also through the Chilean Congress, where
8	

ESO had, in fact, also employed astronomers of Chilean nationality at its Headquarters in Europe since the
earliest days of the Science Division.

293

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

some members discussed a motion demanding a halt to the VLT project on P
­ aranal.
Evidently, the issue could not be contained and solved within the boundaries of the
scientific community, and — at least in the public sphere — it became fully intertwined with the labour problems. And if that were not enough, yet another conflict emerged — of a very different nature and, this time, as something of a surprise.

294

Chapter III-10

At the Brink
“Latorre issue a real problem!”
From a slide presentation by Riccardo Giacconi
to the ESO Council, 1 December 1993.

I

n October 1988, as it became increasingly clear that Cerro ­Paranal would be the
site of choice for the VLT, the Chilean Government donated 725 square kilometres of land around the mountain to ESO, on the condition that ESO would commence construction work within five years 1. The government had considered itself
the lawful owner of the land since 1987, following the implementation of a 1977
­Government Act, which had the aim of clarifying land claims and ownership in
Northern Chile, a vexed issue with a history that goes back to the time before the
Pacific War in the late 19th century 2 .
Following the decision by the ESO Council to place the VLT on ­Paranal and, in early
1990, the beginning of the actual construction work, ESO had formally fulfilled the
conditions of the donation, and hence the ownership, and expected no difficulties in
this respect. However, in April 1993, the Chilean Andrés Santa Cruz family sued
the Chilean government and ESO for damages, claiming that they were the rightful owners of ­Paranal 3 . The mountain, said the family, had been donated to their
1	

Law no. 643, published on 19 October 1988.

2	

The situation regarding land deeds had been complicated partly because the relevant archive, located in­
Copiapó, had been destroyed in a fire in the early part of the 20th century. With the 1977 Act, the Chilean
Treasury had regained the ownership of the land north of Taltal and incorporated it into its National Properties.
The Act requested possible claimants to land titles to register and present appropriate documentation of ownership to the authorities within a period of ten years. By failing to register, claimants would forfeit their ownership. By registering, however, the owners would be liable to property taxation — a consequence that may have
prevented some owners from coming forward. The Act was introduced in 1977, meaning that with the expiry
of the ten-year grace period, the ownership of ­Paranal had irreversibly gone to the Chilean State.

3	

Long forgotten, and unknown to ESO, was the fact that P
­ aranal had been the subject of a land dispute before
— back in 1905 — involving the Santa Cruz family and mineral prospectors wishing to open a nitrate mine in
the vicinity of the mountain.

295

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

ancestor, Vice-Admiral Juan José Latorre Benavente, in gratitude for his services to
the nation during the Pacific War. Allegedly, the heirs now “wanted their mountain
back” — or sought financial compensation in the form of several tens of million of
US dollars, an absurd amount from any reasonable point of view. Yet, ESO was ill
prepared for this situation.
Before the court, ESO claimed legal immunity in full accordance with the 1963
­Convenio. Surprisingly, the judiciary decided first to hear the case and only afterwards to consider the question of immunity. According to the judge, the fact that
ESO had appeared before the court (to claim immunity) meant that ESO acknowledged the jurisdiction of the court and thus, in a sense, had forfeited its protection.
Furthermore, in Parliament the argument was also made that the immunity might
not extend beyond the geographical locations where ESO had originally established
its facilities, disregarding an exchange of notes in 1983/1984 between the Government of Chile and ESO according the privileges and immunities which derive from
the 1963 Convenio to all future astronomical observatories which ESO would install
in Chile with the agreement of the Government. To the uninitiated reader all of this
may appear strange, but it must be understood that it happened in the aftermath of
the demise of the military dictatorship. Perhaps understandably, guarantees from the
former government seemed not to carry the same weight anymore — even in matters of international relations.
In March 1994 the lower chamber of the Parliament stepped in again, requesting the
Government to order ESO to halt construction at P
­ aranal, underscoring that this
was fundamentally a political issue. This notwithstanding, on 17 March 1994, the
Latorre party filed a request with the civil judge of Taltal (the provincial town nearest ­Paranal) aiming at a court injunction against ESO’s contractor Skanska-Belfi Ltd.
— charged with the construction work — for a prohibition to “effect new works” on
its alleged property. The conflict escalated quickly with court hearings and injunctions being issued, overturned and reissued. Some involved ESO directly, others the
main contractor. “Two weeks ago,” reported Allison Abott in Nature on 21 April
1994, “ different court members issued four contradictory judgments within days of each
other.” Following a court ruling, construction work ceased for a few weeks in what
ESO — maintaining its immunity — said was a gesture of goodwill. After that, work
resumed. Halts to construction were very costly. At the time they were estimated to
cost one million deutschmarks per month.

296

Chapter III-10 ∙ At the Brink

≈
While the court battles were fought, negotiations about changes to the Convenio
continued. From the outset Riccardo Giacconi sympathised with the wishes of the
Chilean astronomers. He thought that their demands were fair and he argued in their
favour in the ESO Council. Also, despite the tough rhetoric 4 , he had much understanding for the Chilean staff. Given his position, however, he could not possibly
condone some of the actions by the union activists, but he was committed to finding
a mutually agreeable solution. In late May 1994, he led a small delegation including
Peter Creola (President of the ESO Council), Catherine Cesarsky (Vice-President
of the Council) and Henrik Grage (Chairman of the Council ESO-Chile Working
Group) in a meeting with representatives of the Chilean Government, including a
visit to La Moneda to see the President of the Republic. To hedge his bets, Giacconi
also began to consider alternative sites for the VLT. To this end, in April he ordered
that a site-testing campaign in Namibia should be conducted, which began in August
and lasted for a full year. Nonetheless, the discussions seemed to have gone well and
by the autumn of 1994 a full understanding was reached between the ­Chilean government and ESO, leading to the initialling of an agreement by Ambassador Carlos
Ducci on behalf of the Chilean government and Peter Creola for ESO on 22 November. Despite this, pressure continued to build up in Chile. Some members of Congress remained highly critical of the Agreement and the Chilean M
­ inister of Foreign
Affairs and his collaborator, Ducci, both trying to resolve the conflict, even had to
fend off the threat of criminal proceedings against themselves for having initialled
the Agreement with ESO on the accusation that it “violated the ­Chilean constitution”. At the same time, imported items for the ­Paranal site were blocked by the customs authorities.
≈
The court cases over the land ownership also proceeded and ended at the Chilean
Supreme Court, which issued contradictory rulings on five occasions. The principal topic of legal dispute was the precedence of property rights over an international treaty or vice versa. Since no court ruling had been issued so far regarding the
property rights of the plaintiffs the Supreme Court decided in its last ruling to wait
4	

In one instant in 1993, however, he went beyond rhetoric, suspending (with pay) two local staff members for
gross disloyalty to the organisation. However justifiable the suspensions were, it temporarily poured oil on the
fire, since they were also elected as staff representatives. They were later reinstated.

297

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

until these rights were clarified before issuing its judgement. In late January 1995 a
Supreme Court ruling could be interpreted as an injunction to stop the construction at P
­ aranal. The situation was becoming explosive. Not surprisingly, ESO was
the focus of intense media attention. Daniel Hofstadt, who had been appointed
ESO Representative to Chile, had his hands full. Luckily, he had good help from his
­lieutenant, Rodrigo de Castro, a Chilean journalist, who had returned from exile in
Europe to his homeland to work for ESO. Daniel Hofstadt had joined ESO in 1972
and, as already mentioned, had headed the TRS Department at La Silla and later
served as head of the management team there. Perhaps aided by his Alsatian origin,
which had made him sensitive to the ways of different cultures, perhaps also by his
wide range of interests, from technology and science to the arts and philosophy, after
his appointment as ESO Representative he quickly developed into a highly successful diplomat, earning the respect of his Chilean counterparts who rightly came to
see him as an honest and dedicated interlocutor 5 . Yet, if anything, this was his battle
test. In a dramatic press conference in February 1995 Hofstadt explained that ESO
“was not in Chile to handle court cases but to do science. It was for the Chilean government and its State Defence Council to settle the issue. ESO could only work in good faith
and with the commitment of the Government to safeguard its projects” 6, 7. Luckily, at
Foreign Affairs, (then) Undersecretary José Miguel Insulza began to take an interest in the case 8 . Hofstadt and Insulza went on to develop a close relationship, which
helped to solve the problems.
But then things went from bad to worse: a ruling by an Antofagasta court on
20 March again ordered ESO to halt construction work at ­Paranal and sent a court
official to inspect the site. Referring to its immunity, ESO denied him access, while,
at the same time, the Chilean government — in support of ESO — had launched
an appeal against the Antofagasta verdict in the Supreme Court. But on 28 March,
the Supreme Court in Chile upheld the injunction to stop construction and decided
to send the visiting judge back again to ­Paranal. The conflict was spinning out of
5	

Hofstadt was later awarded the Bernardo O’Higgins Medal, on honour bestowed on selected foreign citizens
in recognition of their outstanding services and contributions to Chile.

6	

El Mercurio sharpened the statement somewhat by writing “La entidad está en Chile para hacer ciencia, no para
participar en polémicas o litigios” (El Mercurio, 14 February 1995).

7	

Hofstadt had to face the press on many occasions in this period, but at least in one case, science came to his
rescue. The collision between Jupiter and Comet Shoemaker-Levy 9 (see Chapter III-6), which also became a
media event in Chile, gave ESO a welcome opportunity to present a very different image in the Chilean press
than the negative one that had dominated for a while.

8	

Insulza was appointed Minister of Foreign Affairs in September 1994.

298

Chapter III-10 ∙ At the Brink

control. By then the various issues had become completely interlocked, involving
not just ESO, its staff and the Chilean astronomical community, but also the three
branches of state in Chile: the judicial, the legislative and the executive, and this at
a time when the democratic system was still trying to find its way within a new and
untested constitution. Of course the media covered the conflict extensively 9 . Thus,
on 30 March, it came to a showdown as the Supreme Court decided to show its teeth
with the arrival of the visiting magistrate. Immediately before, Italy’s foreign minister Susanna Agnelli, who was on an official visit to Chile, had discussed the matter
with the Chilean president 10 . The president had assured Agnelli that the Government
supported ESO. However, it could not defy a ruling by the Supreme Court, and so
events took their course. ESO’s official press statement, issued on the following day,
makes no bones about it: “… at 12:40 h Chilean time, a Chilean court official, Mr.
Javier Jimenez, Receptor Judicial, accompanied by Chilean Carabineros, forced an
entry to the premises of ESO on Cerro P
­ aranal without permission of ESO and without agreement between the Chilean Government and ESO, although warned that this
act was in violation of the status of ESO as an international organisation on the basis
of the 1963 Convention and subsequent agreements between the Government of Chile
and ESO.” The ESO area around ­Paranal is a desert area without fences or any other
clearly visible demarcation. But where the lone road from the B-70 desert road — the
old Panamericana — leads to the observatory camp, there is a gate with a barrier. This
was where, on 30 March, the magistrate accompanied by police and the ESO representatives met. The barrier was fixed with a metal chain. ESO had received advance
warning of the impending court action and key representatives of the organisation
including Daniel Hofstadt and the Head of Administration, Willy Buschmeier, were
present. Given the legal nature of the event it followed rather strict rules; one could
almost describe it as being carefully scripted. The magistrate was expected to arrive
at the gate and demand access. ESO would not grant this. On the other side of the
barrier, the ESO representatives were then supposed to read out an official protest
when the magistrate crossed the gate after cutting the chain in a symbol of forced
entry. Of course ESO staff had strict orders not to use any physical force. But for a
moment the magistrate, surrounded by running television cameras (and almost certainly without experience in handling court actions of such magnitude and with
clear international implications), seemed to have forgotten the script. Arriving at the
9	

El Mercurio alone published 49 articles between 1 February and 25 April 1995. Other newspapers in Chile were
equally active.

10	

Shortly before the President had paid a visit to Europe, where the topic had been raised in political discussions
in several ESO Member States.

299

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

chained barrier, he did what any sensible person would do: he simply went around it.
A young ESO staff member panicked, fearing that the carefully foreseen sequence
— an adherence to which was deemed of legal importance — would be endangered.
He laid his hands on the magistrate’s shoulders, exclaiming “No, no! You can’t simply do this!” For a moment, everybody froze. Did this completely unintended incident constitute an act of violence? Luckily, a sober-minded police officer intervened,
calmly explaining to the magistrate that he needed to retreat to the other side of
the barrier and first read out his court order. He did. Upon making his demand, he
cut the chain and walked in, unhindered, to inspect the site. The visit lasted longer
than planned. When the magistrate had completed his job and returned to his car,
which an assistant in the meantime had parked on the site he saw that the car had
a flat tyre — the effect of driving into the construction site with its rugged terrain
and many sharp pieces of metal lying around. To his relief ESO staff came to help
and changed the wheel. In this way, the day ended on a more conciliatory note — at
least at the human level, and in spite of the somewhat farcical air, it symbolised that
now the time had come to defuse the conflict.

Daniel Hofstadt (to the right) reading out his declaration facing the magistrate (to the left) and surrounded by media representatives. (Photo: from El Mercurio)

In the media, it also seemed
that the gravity of the situation
had begun to sink in. Thus,
Las Ultimas Noticias used the
headline: “The Incident at
­Paranal Affects the Image of
Chile.” 11 The daily La Tercera
was equally concerned, stating
that “When cutting the chains of
the observatory, we have undermined our respect for an institution consecrated by an international agreement to which Chile
subscribed.” 12 At the same time,
in an organisation-wide video

11	

“Lo ocurrido en P
­ aranal afecta la imagen de Chile” (Las Ultimas Noticias, 1 April 1995).

12	

“Al cortar las cadenas del observatorio, hemos puesto en entredicho nuestro respeto a una institución consagrada por
un convenio international que Chile suscrito.” (La Tercera, 2 April 1995).

300

Chapter III-10 ∙ At the Brink

conference for all ESO staff, Riccardo Giacconi unequivocally declared that “ if ESO
cannot continue on P
­ aranal, it can operate nowhere in Chile.” The stakes could be
raised no higher.
≈
What had now become a major diplomatic incident of course also involved the representations of ESO’s Member States, and on the following day, 31 March, the ambassadors13 met with Chile’s Minister of Foreign Affairs. Since the President of the ESO
Council, Peter Creola, was Swiss, the Swiss ambassador, Bernard Freymond, acted as
an unofficial spokesperson for the Member States. On 1 April Daniel Hofstadt visited the Chilean Ministry of Foreign Affairs to deliver an official protest.
Shortly thereafter, Giacconi arrived in Santiago. In a breach of normal customs, his
arrival had not been announced in advance in order to enable the necessary talks to
take place without public attention — and heavy press coverage.

Teitelboim, Giacconi and Hofstadt leaving the meeting at the
Centro de Estudios Científicos. The meeting was supposed to
have been confidential, but the press had caught wind of it
and the picture was taken by a photographer from the Chilean
broadsheet newspaper El Mercurio. Though smiling to the
press, the three realised the seriousness of the situation.

13	

On Friday 7 April, Giacconi,
accompanied by ­Hofstadt and
de Castro, met with Insulza and
Claudio ­Teitelboim (­Bunster),
the science advisor to the
President, at a lunch at the
­Centro de Estudios Científicos, ­Teitelboim’s private institute. However, the press had
found out and was waiting.
Giacconi was uneasy, fearing
that too much media attention
might complicate the search for
a solution. Nonetheless over the
weekend, the final details of the

Michel Delfosse (Belgium), Ole Wøhlers (Denmark), Gerard Cros (France), Werner Reichenbaum (Germany),
Emanuelle Costa (Italy), Steven Ramondt (the Netherlands), Bernard Freymond (Switzerland) and Teppo
­Tauriainem (first secretary, Sweden).

301

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

agreement were hammered out between Hofstadt and Ducci, with the text being
translated on the Monday. Everybody understood that speed was essential to avoid
further complications. But the Chilean Government still needed more time to
secure enough political support. On the Wednesday morning, 12 April, Hofstadt
and G
­ iacconi were invited to breakfast at the home of President Frei, together with
Insulza. “It was helpful that both [Chilean Minister of Foreign Affairs] Insulza and
[President] Frei had been refugees in Italy — Frei working at the Politecnico di Milano
and Insulza in Rome,” ­Giacconi later recalled. He felt that it helped them to establish
common ground. After the encounter, both Frei and Giacconi spoke to the waiting
journalists. The President assured Giacconi in public of his full support in resolving
the crisis. This was an important gesture and a signal to the ESO Member States.
A few days later, Giacconi’s apprehension about the media turned out to be justified. A newspaper published an interview with him, obtained before the agreement
was reached, in which he had aired a certain degree of frustration under the enduring pressure. Given the developments in the meantime, his remarks had, in a sense,
become outdated, but the article made for a good story, though it also threatened to
re-ignite the conflict. Quick, concerted action on the part of ESO, the government
and Teitelboim, quenched the fire.
Finally the way lay open for the finalisation of the last version of the new agreement
which would be termed the “Interpretative, Supplementary and Amending Agreement” to the 1963 Convention between the Government of Chile and the European
Southern Observatory. Although much haggling had taken place over the fine print,
the broad lines of the agreement remained as in the 1994 draft accord. It set out to
“confirm and regulate the application” of the existing Convention. With the agreement ESO committed itself to “ harmonise its [staff rules for local staff] with the principles and objectives of Chilean labour law” including freedom of association for workers
and collective bargaining. This notwithstanding, it would be implemented in a way
which was compatible with international law and thus respecting ESO’s immunities
and privileges as an international organisation. ESO also agreed to guarantee 10%
of the available telescope time to scientifically meritorious proposals from Chilean
astronomers. This would apply to all telescopes, with the stipulation that for the VLT,
half of that time would require projects involving astronomers from ESO’s Member
States. Applications for telescope time would be subject to the same evaluation procedure and criteria as those from Member State astronomers, i.e. dealt with by the
Observing Programmes Committee. Finally, ESO agreed to financially support the
development of astronomy in Chile with a Joint ESO/Chile Committee to manage

302

Chapter III-10 ∙ At the Brink

the funds. Chile, in turn, reconfirmed its commitment to ESO and to respecting its
international status and extended it to possible future sites in the country. The government also agreed to increase its own investment in Chilean astronomy “with the
objective of promoting the efficient use of the installations of ESO by Chilean scientists.”
Finally, Chile accepted an obligation to compensate ESO with respect to immovable installations should Chile terminate the agreement leading to a cessation of
ESO activities in that country, thus providing a reasonable reassurance to ESO that
it could safely proceed with its investments.
On 18 April 1995, Roberto Cifuentes, an emissary of the Chilean Government,
and the ESO Director General met at the ESO Headquarters to sign the new agreement, which as is customary for such accords, would subsequently be submitted to
the Chilean Congress (and the ESO Council) for ratification. But the crisis was not
yet over, as the ESO press release, issued the following day, made clear: “There still
exist a number of problems which impede ESO’s activities in Chile, including the issue
of ESO’s immunity from national jurisdiction, financial damage incurred to ESO and
its VLT project, and the practical implementation of custom clearance and accreditation procedures to permit the continuation of work. Consequently, Council has directed
the ESO Management to continue direct negotiations with the Chilean Government to
resolve all pending issues, to continue work on P
­ aranal, and also to convene an ad hoc
Working Group to propose alternatives for the possible placement of one VLT telescope
or of the entire VLT/VLTI.”
Towards the end of the year, however, closure was in sight. The Chilean government
had acknowledged its responsibility in dealing with the Latorre claim and had agreed
to pay a sum of money to settle the case out of court14 . Nonetheless, the government
was wary of a claim for damages from ESO. After all, the work stoppages had led to
a significant financial loss on ESO’s side — estimated at the time to be of the order
of eight million deutschmarks (or roughly four million euros). At the Council meeting in Milan in November, it was decided, though, not to press any claims and with
14	

The resolution came in the form of an out of court settlement between the Government and the plaintiffs. As
the ­Paranal case became more explosive the claim for the land prize had escalated to 130 million US dollars.
For a piece of desert without any mineral riches this was totally out of scale with commercial land prices. An
assessment report from the Universidad Catolica had determined that P
­ aranal was a unique place for astronomy, and therefore it should be valued accordingly. Probably for the first time in human history the price of a
piece of land was valued according to the quality of its atmosphere for astronomical observations. In any event,
the negotiations came down quickly to 33 million US dollars but this amount was still not acceptable for the
Government. It took some time to reach an agreement for the 8.8 million US dollars, which was paid by the
Chilean Treasury to the Santa Cruz family to close the court cases.

303

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

this, communicated in a Nota Verbal to the Chilean Foreign Ministry on 4 December 1995, the final hurdle was cleared. On 16 January 1996, the government submitted the Acuerdo to the parliamentary ratification process.
In Chile, the Chamber of Deputies approved the agreement on 4 June 1996 with a
huge majority, followed by the Senate on 5 September, clearing the way for a meeting of the ESO Council in Santiago in early December of that year, on which occasion the documents, or instruments as they are properly called, of ratification could
be exchanged. A six-year conflict, which had thrown ESO into its gravest crisis, had
been brought to a satisfactory close 15 .
In the end, level-headed people had prevailed. There were many and they were found
at all levels. Nonetheless, a few names stand out and deserve to be particularly mentioned. The President of the Republic, Frei, and his Foreign Minister, Insulza, had
given their full support to ESO. More than that: Insulza had gone to great lengths
to enable the final outcome. As mentioned, the science advisor to the President,
­Claudio Teitelboim, had played an important role in defusing the conflict. In Congress, the senator for Antofagasta, Arturo Allessandri — the nephew of President
Jorge Allesandri with whom Heckmann had negotiated — defended ESO and the
agreement against opposition and helped its passage through the legislative assembly.
On ESO’s side, the Council President Peter Creola and the incoming Council President Henrik Grage had worked hard together with the Director General. Still, there
is no doubt about the decisive role played by Daniel Hofstadt, who became ESO’s
front man in this diplomatic, political and public imbroglio. We have also mentioned his close collaborator Rodrigo de Castro, who thanks to his background was
uniquely placed to bridge the gap, clear up the misunderstandings and rebuild trust
and good will between the parties. He later assumed high posts in Chile, including
editor-in-chief of La Nación, the government newspaper. The diplomatic representatives of ESO’s Member States in Chile were involved and the Swiss ambassador,
­Bernard Freymond, in particular played a constructive role.

15	

The full implementation of the agreement, proved to be complicated, not the least as regards the labour issues.
Thus this part was only completed during the term of the next ESO Director General, Catherine Cesarsky.

304

Chapter III-11

Tranquillity in Chile, Icy Winds in Europe
“The deliberations, notably in the financial domain,
were not always easy as most of the member countries
were striving to stabilise their national budgets
and had to prioritise their expenses.”
Riccardo Giacconi, ESO Annual Report 1997.

W

ith the formal exchange of the ratification documents on 2 December 1996
and the subsequent Foundation Ceremony at ­Paranal two days later, the door
was finally closed on this difficult period1. The Chilean President used the ceremony
to reinforce his message that good relations had been fully restored. In his introduction, welcoming the participants (including the Royal Couple of Sweden 2 , Foreign Minister Insulza and the ESO Council), he explicitly added: “Profesor ­Riccardo
­Giacconi, Director General, estimado amigo.” An important gesture and one that
did not go unnoticed. He said: “… I would like to take this occasion to publicly express
our appreciation to the ESO Member States, to the Organisation itself, its executives
and to all those in Chile who have contributed in this task and to say that when I took
office there were not only stones, but rocks on the path, but there was also the political
will to overcome them, since we could not allow hindrances in the construction of this
great enterprise.”
The foundation ceremony had been intended to happen back in 1994, but — understandably — the conflict had prevented it. Finally, the time had come to celebrate
the VLT project. To mark this unique moment, it was decided to insert a time capsule in a cavity in the outer concrete wall at ground level of Unit Telescope 1. The
1	

Ten years later in a joint publication, the fruits of the new cooperation in terms of astronomy projects in Chile
were presented at a press conference in Santiago.

2	

The royal visit, although to some extent coincidental, was certainly welcome, for at the time, the Swedish government was critically reviewing Sweden’s participation in European research projects, looking for savings. The
press, however, looked at ESO with different eyes, with almost poetic press headlines such as “The Royal ­Couple
looked into eternity” (“Kungaparet såg in i evigheten”).

305

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

time capsule was an aluminium cylinder 15 centimetres in diameter and 45 centimetres in length, sealed hermetically and containing a document signed by President
Frei on the occasion, a copy of the Acuerdo between ESO and Chile, one outstanding scientific paper from each of ESO’s Member States and Chile, a copy of the day’s
issues of the ­Chilean newspapers El Mercurio and La Época, the texts of the official
speeches delivered on the occasion, and various other pieces of information about
the VLT project.

The President of the Republic of Chile, Frei, with the time capsule. On the left, Peter Creola (President of
the ESO Council) is seen, to the right the Archbishop of Antofagasta, Monsignore Patricio Infante Alfonso.
(Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

The President and his guests, the King and Queen of Sweden, had flown into a specially prepared airstrip at the foot of the mountain and the empty enclosure of Unit
Telescope 1 had been transformed into a festive environment. ESO staff had worked
hand in hand with government officials, security forces, technicians, caterers and
many others to create a successful high-level event for the 250 invited guests in what
was still a rough building site in the middle of the desert. In his memoirs, Riccardo
Giacconi describes the feeling of hosting a formal luncheon with such an audience
in these unusual surroundings as “eerie”, but everybody was happy. Of course, much
work remained to be done before the VLT could begin to observe, but now the road
lay open. Or so they thought. A few months later, and this time in Europe, a chill
would set in. And it was not because of the impending winter.

306

Chapter III-11 ∙ Tranquillity in Chile, Icy Winds in Europe

Preserved for the future — The Time Capsule
The Time Capsule, inserted into the wall of UT1, contained a collection of outstanding papers by scientists from ESO’s Member States and Chile, as well as by
the scientific group at ESO itself. They were:
Belgium: Magain P., Surdej J., Swings J.-P., Borgeest U., Kayser R., Kuehr H.,
Refsdal S. & Remy M. 1988, Discovery of a quadruply lensed quasar: the “clover
leaf ” H1413+117, Nature, 334, 325
Chile: Ruiz M. T., Maza J., Wischnjewski M. & Gonzales L.E. 1986, ER 8: A
very low luminosity degenerate star, ApJ, 304, L25
Denmark: Nørgaard-Nielsen H. U., Hansen L., Jørgensen H. E., Aragón
­Salamanca A., Ellis R. S., & Couch W. J. 1989, The discovery of a type Ia supernova at a redshift of 0.31, Nature, 339, 523
France: Aubourg E., Bareyre P., Brahin S., Gros M., Lachieze-Rey M., Laurent
B., Lesquoy E., Magneville C., Milsztajn A., Moscoso L., Queinnec F., Rich J.,
Spiro M., Vigroux L., Zylberajch S., Ansari R., Cavalier F., Moniez M., Beaulieu
J.-P., Ferlet R., Grison Ph., Vidal-Madjar A., Guibert J., Moreau O., Tajahmady
F., Maurice E., Prevot L. & Gry C. 1993, Evidence for gravitational microlensing
by dark objects in the Galactic halo, Nature, 365, 623
Germany: Eckart A. & Genzel R. 1996, Observations of stellar proper motions
near the Galactic Centre, Nature, 383, 415
Italy: Vaiana G. S., Casinelli J. P., Fabbiano G., Giacconi R., Golub L., ­Gorenstein
P., Haisch B. M., Harnden Jr. F. R., Johnson H. M., Linsky J. L., Maxson C. W.,
Mewe R., Rosner R., Seward F., Topka K.& Zwaan C. 1981, Results from an
Extensive Einstein Stellar Survey, ApJ, 245, 163
The Netherlands: Mathewson D. S., van der Kruit P. C. & Brouw W. N. 1972, A
High Resolution Radio Continuum Survey of M51 and NGC 5195 at 1415 MHz,
A&A, 17, 468

307

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Sweden: Edvardsson B., Andersen J., Gustafsson B., Lambert D. L., Nissen P.
E. & Tomkin J. 1993, The chemical evolution of the galactic disk, A&A, 275, 101
Switzerland: Mayor M. & Queloz D. 1995, A Jupiter-mass companion to a solartype star, Nature, 378, 355
ESO: Danziger I. J., Bouchet P., Fosbury R. A. E., Gouiffes C., Lucy, Moorwood
A. F. M., Oliva E. & Rufener F. 1988, SN 1987A: Observational Results Obtained
at ESO, in Kafatos M. & Michalitsianos A. G. (eds.), Supernova 1987A in the
Large Magellanic Cloud, Proceedings of the 4th George Mason Astrophysics
Workshop, Cambridge University Press;
Danziger I. J., Gouiffes C., Bouchet P. & Lucy L. B. 1989, Supernova 1987A in
the Large Magellanic Cloud, IAU Circular No. 4746
≈
An icy wind was blowing from Paris. In June 1997, Lionel Jospin, a French socialist, had assumed the position of Prime Minister under President Jacques Chirac. As
Minister of Education he had chosen Claude Allègre, an accomplished geophysicist
and also an energetic, but strident politician. At a meeting among the Research Ministers of the EU on 10 November of the same year, Allègre proposed a considerable
cut in the budgets of the major intergovernmental organisations such as ESA, CERN
and ESO, “to obtain a ‘right’ balance between research carried out in national laboratories and in the international organisations”. His proposal was reiterated in a formal letter to some of his counterparts in the other countries, shortly before the ESO
Council Meeting on 1–2 December 19973 . The proposal, which implied a budget cut
of about 25%, could hardly have hit ESO at a worse moment. The VLT was coming
close to completion, which also meant that the organisation had to shoulder a peak
in construction costs as well as mustering all its reserves to adhere to the timeline set
for the project. Delays would only increase the cost and other savings, such as those
that were believed to be feasible by closing La Silla (as the Minister seemed to suggest) were clearly unacceptable to Europe’s community of astronomers and would in
any case be associated with increased costs for a while. Aware of the political initiative, Riccardo Giacconi had travelled to Paris ahead of the Council meeting in the
3	

One of the most important, recurrent tasks for the December Council meetings is to decide on the budget for
the coming year.

308

Chapter III-11 ∙ Tranquillity in Chile, Icy Winds in Europe

hope of establishing a dialogue with the Minister. However, Allègre had excused
himself, leaving a representative to talk to the ESO Director General. Still, G
­ iacconi
had gone along with the meeting anyway and argued that ESO was already in the
process of reducing costs and underlined the advantages for France stemming from
its membership. Furthermore, a unilateral request to reduce the French contribution was difficult to reconcile with the obligations set out in the Convention. But
the meeting ended with the assistant simply declaring that whilst he “showed understanding for [the] situation [he] confirmed that Minister Allègre would expect that his
policy guidelines would be followed… .” Despite the considerable problems this would
cause ESO, Allègre’s demand dovetailed with the overall obligation to reduce government spending deficits in preparation for Phase 3 of European Monetary Union
— commonly known as the introduction of the euro — in which five of ESO’s Member States participated, including its largest contributors.
In his arguments for reducing the contributions to the European organisations,
Allègre had invoked the principle of subsidiarity. Subsidiarity basically means that
tasks should be dealt with at the lowest appropriate level — be it local, regional,
national or international. This is often described as “a central principle” in the EU
context and it was enshrined in the Maastricht Treaty signed in 1992. It was thus
part of the dominant political thinking and vocabulary of the time. However, it also
reflected the traditional French position that ESO should function as an O
­ bservatoire
4
de Mission, a view that has emerged again and again . But it undoubtedly threw ESO
into a serious crisis. The immediate effect was that Council, caught by surprise, postponed the approval of the budget for 1998.
In the end, on 18 February 1998, the budget was approved. It foresaw a much smaller
cut, but to maintain the balance between the Member States, their contributions
were reduced equally. It hurt, but ESO could live with this solution. The Great Financial Scare was over. Fairness dictates that we stress that the situation that had arisen
was exceptional. Of course, ESO does not exist in isolation. It is dependent on its
Member States and their economies. And whilst there will always be a certain tension between the budgetary interests of each of the Member States and the interests
of an organisation like ESO, the Member States have indeed maintained a decidedly
benevolent attitude towards the organisation over the years, supported its financial
requests, paid their dues — sometimes ahead of time — and occasionally even made
additional voluntary contributions to enable specific projects to proceed.
4	

The model of the observatoire de mission had been applied in France for the Observatoire de Haute-Provence.

309

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

≈
Giacconi reacted swiftly and forcefully. In February 1998 he presented a paper to
Council entitled “The Role of ESO in European Astronomy”. Having summarised
the development of the organisation so far, he drew parallels with the situation in
the US, showing that ESO’s role as provider of observational facilities was crucial for
European astronomy. Including the VLT, he stated that “approximately three quarters of all telescope area available to European 5 astronomers will be provided through
ESO.” 6 In the US, only some 20% came from public observatories, such as those operated by AURA. The majority was operated by what he called independent observatories, mainly private universities and institutions.
Citing the recommendations of a recent visiting committee, he argued cogently why
the Member States should continue to support ESO at a level commensurate with its
tasks. He also demonstrated that a strengthening of ESO did not imply that national
institutes would be disadvantaged or lose influence, thus addressing the subsidiarity
argument head on7. But he went a step further, presenting an exciting perspective
for the further evolution of the organisation, including some quite bold suggestions
to which we shall return. Among the key points he made was the need for “a strategic plan for European astronomy, which unfortunately does not yet exist”, an analogue
to the US Decadal Survey prepared by the National Academy of Sciences. For want
of an overall plan in Europe, he implied, ESO had developed its own mid-term and
long-range plan, fully supported by its various committees with representatives of
the scientific community 8 . As for the future, and using the ESA/ESO ST-ECF as
an example, he emphasised close cooperation with ESA to exploit obvious synergies between ground-based and space-borne observational facilities. In the field of

5	

In the paper, the term European was used as being congruent with the ESO Member States. Since at the time
neither the UK nor Spain, both important actors, were not yet members, this was certainly a bit of a stretch at
that time. Today, however, it would have been more appropriate.

6	

According to Giacconi’s calculation, professional astronomers in the ESO Member States had access to a
total light-collecting area of about 306 square metres compared to the 511 square metres available to to US
astronomers.

7	

He also addressed the issue of cost, showing that from a perspective of effectiveness and in considering its tasks,
ESO did not need to shy away from comparison with other institutions.

8	

He did not, however, draw a clear distinction between a general strategic plan and ESO’s plan. Later, his successor as Director General, Catherine Cesarsky, again pressed for an overall plan. In the end, in 2007–8, it was
realised by the ASTRONET consortium — ten years after the Giacconi paper. In an ESO context, the first
considerations about a European plan, go back to discussions in the ESO Scientific Technical Committee in
the mid-1980s.

310

Chapter III-11 ∙ Tranquillity in Chile, Icy Winds in Europe

international relations, he thought that ESO should “represent European interests
in negotiation with the US and Japan”. He continued: “It is clear that in the future
even larger facilities that will be needed in astronomy will require transcontinental scientific collaborations and ESO can play a unique role in these developments.” For an
organisation under immediate threat of a significant budget cut this may have been
seen simply as a bold attempt of forward defence. Yet it was hard to deny the correctness of his analysis. The document was a true tour de force leading logically to
a new mission statement — simple, yet sweeping — that ESO should be “an institution which will provide an important, continued contribution to European astronomy in providing technology and ground-based facilities beyond the reach of national
groups.” The inescapable conclusion, then, was that “ESO’s activities must reach the
critical mass required to carry out those programmes which are beyond the capabilities of
single nations, but are essential to maintain a competitive research level in the international context.” 9 Having been endorsed by the ESO Council in June 1998, this document has informed the thinking and the organisational ethos up to the present day.
≈
In following these important political developments, we have moved forward in time,
but many other things happened during those years — both at ESO and within the
world of astronomy. We shall consider some of them individually.
After the ambassadors’ meeting in Santiago, construction work continued. Precious
time had been lost, but things looked brighter now. In Europe, the first 8.2-metre
primary mirror was undergoing acceptance tests at the REOSC plant just south of
Paris, while the test assembly of the first main mechanical structure had begun in
Milan. In Chile, the difficulties with imports had been removed and the construction of the enclosures was proceeding. By the end of July 1995 the concrete foundations and support for the rotating enclosure of UT1 had been completed, and the
other telescope buildings were also progressing, although the steel structures carrying the ring upon which the enclosures would rotate had not yet been mounted at
the other UTs. The concrete works for the interferometric tunnel had largely been
finished, as they had for the interferometric laboratory building.

9	

The politically oriented reader will note that this was not only logical, but in fact fully concordant with the subsidiarity principle.

311

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Then, on Sunday 30 July 1995, at 01:15, a major earthquake struck the region. The
earthquake was measured at 7.8 10 on the Richter scale. The epicentre lay 30 ­kilometres
west of Tocopilla, i.e. in the Pacific Ocean, about 250 kilometres from ­Paranal. “I
woke up as my bed seemed to move sideways, back and forth, in a funny, yet soft movement,” explained Jörg Eschwey, who was in charge of the construction on site. “Then
it changed into a series of hard shocks, as if one was driving over a poor dirt track. Everything was moving horizontally. This was clearly a major earthquake. The generators,
however, kept working, but my first worries were about gas. We used gas for the kitchen
and also for heating the water. Every container had a gas heater, and my worry was that
sparks from a severed electricity cable might cause a gas explosion. When the quake was
over — it felt like a long time, although it probably lasted no more than a minute or so
— I first went into the office. Everything had come down. Shelves had fallen over; monitors were lying on the floor — smashed. The telephones were still working, so I called
Massimo Tarenghi, who was in Europe and told him about it. Then I went up to the
platform expecting to see cranes turned over and collapsed scaffolding. The air was filled
with dust. You couldn’t see it for it was of course dark, but you sensed the sweet smell
of it everywhere. The road was partly blocked by a two-metre boulder that had fallen
down from the top, but I managed to get around it. I first stopped at the interferometric
tunnel, where workers doing the night shift were busy. To my surprise, they were still
working, seemingly unaffected. Also on the platform, as far as I could tell, no serious
damage had occurred. It was moonlight, so that at least a first assessment was possible.”
He went back to the base camp, 3.5 kilometres away and took a look at the situation
there. Fortunately, no one had been hurt11 and the damage in the camp was minimal.
As daylight returned, a thorough inspection of the site was carried out. Practically
no damage could be seen, no cracks whatsoever could be found in the concrete walls
and, as they measured the foundations, they too were fully intact and had not even
moved. Naturally, everybody was relieved, but for the engineers it was also a confirmation that their structural calculations had been correct.
≈

10	

This was a local estimate. The US Geological Survey lists this earthquake as a grade 8 on the Richter scale, and
thus among the top 30 on the list of large earthquakes in the 20th century.

11	

Others had been less fortunate. In the region three people had perished and 130 buildings had been seriously
damaged, including the cathedral in Antofagasta. ESO subsequently donated a sum of approximately 100 000
deutschmarks towards the reconstruction effort. ESO has several times made special donations in connection
with natural disasters in Chile.

312

Chapter III-11 ∙ Tranquillity in Chile, Icy Winds in Europe

To anyone who is familiar with Chile, the fact that strong earthquakes occur in
that country comes as no surprise, and had been taken into consideration when
ESO decided in favour of Chile in the first place. In fact the largest earthquake ever
recorded had happened on 22 May 1960 — with the epicentre between Concepción
and Temuco — only two and a half years before ESO began to look more seriously in
the direction of this South American country. The South American continent sits on
a giant tectonic plate, which moves westwards, away from the Mid-Atlantic Ridge,
and thus from Europe. However, as it moves, it collides with the Pacific Nazca Plate,
which is moving eastwards. This creates what geologists call a convergent boundary and, thus, a subduction zone: the Nazca Plate, so to speak, “crawls under” the
South American Plate, creating enormous tension in the lithosphere. This is the reason for the existence of the Andes mountain range and the many volcanoes found
in the western part of South America, and also for the recurrent earthquakes, some
of which can be very severe. Satellite imagery of northern Chile reveals a number of
fault lines. One such line runs in north–south, 500 metres east of P
­ aranal. A small
fault line even runs directly under one of the Unit Telescopes of the VLT. How on
Earth could one decide to put an astronomical telescope — such a hugely expensive
high-precision instrument — in a place like this? “No problem!” Jörg Eschwey would
say. Who could provide a better answer than Eschwey, the immensely experienced
engineer, who had worked for ESO back in the 1970s, then spent a long time in the
US, only to be called back at the start of the VLT project? “No problem. You simply
have to build accordingly,” was his straightforward reply to the author in 1991 during a visit to ­Paranal. Indeed, the VLT specifications were written with an eye to the
geological conditions found in Chile. The requirements are that a VLT Unit Telescope (and its enclosure) should be able to continue operations, without any damage
at all, following earthquakes up to 7.75 on the Richter scale. This is what ESO calls
an OBE — an Operating Basis Earthquake. Should an MLE, a Maximum Likely
Earthquake, occur (defined as 8.5 on the Richter scale, at a distance of 150 kilometres), the observatory must be able to survive this too. In this case, however, minor
cosmetic damage (but no structural damage) to the buildings is considered acceptable. Statistically, an MLE can be expected with a frequency of one in a hundred
years, twice the foreseen lifetime of the VLT. This performance is achieved through
damping and shock-absorbing elements in the telescope foundations as well as an
intricate system to protect components, and especially the primary mirror, against
shocks, among other things.
≈

313

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

As already mentioned, the political problems had repercussions on the construction
work. But the delays were not simply a result of the difficulties arising from those
problems. A scathing report to the ESO STC by the VLT Project Manager in 1995
describes serious difficulties in the area of civil engineering. The contractor seemed
to have underestimated the work and was losing money. In the end, ESO relieved
the company of its contractual responsibilities prematurely and invited the company that had originally come second in the bidding process, the French firm SPIEBatignolles, to complete the work. SPIE-Batignolles, however, had lost interest in
the project and so, SOIMI was charged with the completion of the work. Alas, further delays occurred and so, ESO decided also to end this contract and to take the
remaining work into its own hands.
In other technical areas, however, the progress was very noticeable. In Milan, the
test assembly of the main mechanical structure of one of the telescopes had begun.
At GIAT in France, the work on the mirror cells was also going according to plan.

The Council and the telescope: the ESO Council members during their visit to the Ansaldo plant in Milan on 8
November 1995: (From left to right): Philippe Brosser,
Bernard Fort, Bengt Gustafsson, Johannes Andersen (STC
Chairman), Joachim Krautter (OPC Chairman), Edwin
van Dessel, Stephane Berthet, Jean-Pierre Swings (Council
Vice-President), Peter Creola (Council President), Emil
Broesterhuizen, Riccardo Giacconi (ESO Director General),
Dieter Reimers, Guglielmo Castro, Poul Erik Nissen, Gerhard
Bachmann (Head of the ESO Administration), Gustav
Tammann, Arno Freytag, Franco Pacini and Francesco Bello
(observer for Portugal). The original picture caption from
the 1995 Annual Report notes “Johannes Andersen (on his
heels…)” but no pun was intended. The photo provides a good
impression of the size of the new telescope, standing 24 metres
high and with a moving mass of 430 tonnes. (Photo: Hans
Hermann Heyer)

314

Chapter III-11 ∙ Tranquillity in Chile, Icy Winds in Europe

315

Chapter III-12

Tuning a Formidable Science Machine
“ESO has revolutionized the operations
of ground-based astronomical observatories
with a new end-to-end data flow system, designed
to improve the transmission and management
of astronomical observations and data
over transcontinental distances.”
Computer World, 2005.

T

he VLT was gradually taking shape. But, as ESO developed this wonderful new
tool, the VLT also transformed the organisation itself. New terminology had
entered into the institutional language, such as cost to completion, full-time equivalents and work packages. Another term that became prevalent was end to end, which
was used in several contexts, but basically described a holistic view of a subject. For
the VLT it could mean an integrated view of design, construction and operation. It
could also mean an integrated view of the scientific process of proposal formulation,
observation and utilisation of data. The VLT lent itself well to this kind of thinking
because the entire facility was designed as a whole, rather than the organic growth
exhibited by most other observatories that had expanded over time. As an operational concept, integrated thinking was introduced at ESO by Giacconi who was
used to such an approach from his background in space projects. However, it was not
customary among ground-based facilities and projects and ESO’s embrace of these
ideas marked a radical break from many long-established traditions.
The traditional operational concept for ground-based observatories roughly consisted of the following steps. Having been granted the coveted telescope time, the
astronomer would travel to the observatory, take charge of the telescope for the allocated time, carry out the observations (which often involved making photoelectric
measurements or taking images, either on photographic plates or, increasingly, using
electronic means). Upon completion of the observing run he or she would return
to the home institute, happy if the run had been successful, less happy if technical

317

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

problems or bad weather had hampered the observations. Back home, the plates
would be scanned, transforming the analogue images into numerical digital information and the data processed to obtain physically meaningful information about
the observed object. The end point of the process would be a paper in a refereed journal. This was, and had been, the normal procedure at observatories all over the world,
but by the early 1990s, a revolution was in progress. Several factors came together:
firstly, with the new large telescopes, observing time had become both an extremely
costly and valuable commodity. Expensive, because of the considerable investment
in capital; valuable, because the number of large telescopes was small and therefore,
the requirement to use the observing time in the most efficient manner was an obligation towards science 1. Secondly, silicon-based technologies had ushered in highly
efficient detectors with digital output, and this, coupled with the information technology revolution that had opened up entirely new ways of communicating even
across huge geographical distances, enabled a much more efficient use of the scarce
commodity that was telescope time. Thirdly, this new generation of telescopes and
instruments were exceedingly complex systems that could only be operated safely
and efficiently by highly trained specialists and, fourthly, at least at ESO, there was
a growing awareness of the importance of operational issues — the continued maintenance and upgrading of telescopes and their instruments. All of these considerations came together, driving a new operational concept for the VLT — a concept that
would make it the most efficient astronomical observatory on the planet.
In 1988, an ESO internal working group, chaired by Peter Shaver, began to consider some of the operational aspects. In September 1989, the group presented its
thoughts on the matter. “In order to preserve the flexibility inherent in the VLT concept, it was considered imperative that no operational mode be ‘ designed out’,” wrote
Shaver. “In particular all the major observational modes — classical (astronomer at
telescope), remote (astronomer in Europe) and service (by ESO staff in Chile or Europe)
— [should] be fully accommodated in the design of telescope and infrastructure. Flexible scheduling, however, was seen as a major objective from the outset.” (Shaver, 1989).
He ended the article rather cautiously: “These are just the summary recommendations
… written comments from members of the community are most welcome.” Any suggestion that astronomers should not themselves be present at the telescope or not carry
out their own observations was likely to invoke strong reactions. However, things
1	

This was nowhere more strongly pronounced than in the case of the NASA/ESA Hubble Space Telescope, which
was not just a truly unique facility in itself, but also, because of its deployment in space, had to be operated in a
remote mode. It was therefore no coincidence that the seeds of an operational paradigm change were laid at the
Space Telescope Science Institute, led by Riccardo Giacconi.

318

Chapter III-12 ∙ Tuning a Formidable Science Machine

had begun to change. We recall the successful trial runs in 1984 regarding remote
control of the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope. At that time the tests had been carried out locally in Chile, but first tests from Europe had been undertaken in March
1986. The results had been encouraging and so, in July 1987, regular observations
from Garching began. A couple of months later, the 1.4-metre Coudé Auxiliary
Telescope also became remotely controlled from Garching. In February 1991, ESO
leased a 64 kbps satellite link for remote observations with its newest addition: the
NTT, and in June 1992, a test was made with remote control of the NTT from the
Osservatorio Astronomico di Trieste. The NTT was well suited for this kind of operation and it was also fitted with versatile multi-purpose instruments that could be
controlled by computer. This kind of operation was called second-level remote control, because the link went via the ESO Headquarters in Garching. The test was successful: “During the three nights of the final tests over 30 hours were devoted to astronomical observations and, as can be inferred by the users’ comments, the system proved
to be very easy and flexible to operate, considering also that most of the observers had
no experience in the use of EMMI,” concluded the team in an article in the The ESO
Messenger (­Balestra et al., 1992). The astronomers carried out a wide range of observations, including studies of a T Tauri star, the abundance of lithium in dwarf stars,
planetary nebulae candidates in galaxies of the Virgo Cluster, as well as more distant
objects including Seyfert galaxies and clusters of galaxies 2 .
The dream was to make remote observing available to many institutes in Europe and
to maintain this option for the VLT as well. While ultimately this was not realised,
it provided the first element of a comprehensive operational paradigm for the VLT.
Astronomers did not have to travel to South America to observe. This might have
made observations less romantic, but the expected savings in time and cost were seen
as a blessing, especially for very short observing runs.
The NTT provided another illustration of the need to rethink existing observing
practices. As we recall, the telescope had already demonstrated its true capabilities
during the night of first light, delivering images with a resolution of 0.33 arcseconds. This not only showed how good the telescope was, but also how good the site
was in terms of seeing. Such good seeing did not occur all the time. In fact, it happens only during a few days — or rather nights — each year. Looking at the many
observing proposals, on the other hand, it is equally true that while some are critically dependent on optimal seeing conditions, others are much less so. But how could
2	

A preliminary account is provided in The ESO Messenger by Franchini et al. (1992).

319

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

those observations that needed optimal conditions be scheduled for nights when such
conditions prevailed? In the classical mode, where astronomers were allocated tele­
scope time on specific dates, often determined many months in advance (and they
then travelled to Chile to be there for these nights), there was no way that observations could be scheduled to match the actual atmospheric conditions. On the other
hand, the extensive campaign of site testing that Marc Sarazin had undertaken for
a decade had an important byproduct: a much better understanding of the behaviour of the atmosphere, the frequency and time variations, which began to enable
observers to predict the observational conditions, albeit on the time-scale of a day or
so. All of these constituted strong arguments in favour of flexible scheduling. With
these new opportunities, it became possible to plan a night’s observations optimally,
ensuring maximum utilisation of the telescopes and matching the observations to
the prevailing weather conditions. The huge advantage for the scientists was the
marked improvement in the chance of getting good data 3 , but the inevitable downside was that under this new operational regime, astronomers would apply for telescope time, but not themselves carry out the observations. Instead, the observations
would be made by a dedicated team of astronomers at P
­ aranal, who would then send
the observational data to the proposers. This was more than just a technical change:
it was fundamental. Previously ESO’s main “product” had been telescope time, now
the main product became scientifically useful data. This had a number of consequences: observations had to be planned more comprehensively in advance, and in
a standardised way. Observers lost a freedom they had so far cherished; to use the
allocated telescope time as they thought fit. Now the programme had to be defined
(using dedicated software provided by ESO) so that others (service observers) were
able to execute the observations. The required observing conditions also had to be
clearly specified. Whilst putting new demands on those applying for observing time,
the new operational regime meant concentrating a lot of the effort at ESO4 rather
3	

An early example of this was a project by a research group led by Yannick Mellier of the Institut d’Astrophysique
de Paris to measure something called cosmic shear. This means investigating the weak distortion of the images
of faraway galaxies induced by gravitational effects, in other words gravitational lensing. With a reasonable sample of observations, it is possible to assess the amount of matter in the entire Universe, which is why this method
has sometimes been described as “weighing the Universe”. But such observations require extremely high image
quality, which translates into using the best telescope under the best atmospheric conditions. Since it is necessary to observe some of the most remote galaxies, a large telescope is necessary, and finally to study many galaxies, one needs enough observing time. In fact, the group needed about 100 hours of excellent seeing, allowing observations of some 50 individual fields, providing image data of more than 70 000 galaxies (Mellier et al.,
2000). Such a mammoth programme is only realistic with flexible scheduling of observing time.

4	

By 2006, the staff complement of the Data Management Division (DMD, see next page) had grown to 130 people. Subsequently the division was split into two, one for Data Management and Operations and one for Software Development, led by Fernando Comeron and Michèle Péron, respectively.

320

Chapter III-12 ∙ Tuning a Formidable Science Machine

than with the individual researchers, but it also entailed significant advantages for
science. For example, it would now be possible to maintain a central archive and with
the new IT-based tools that could be expected, such an archive could be made widely
accessible to the scientific community. Data mining — re-using observational data
that had been collected already and possibly for other purposes — became feasible.
There would be other advantages too, to which we shall shortly return.
≈
In 1991, ESO began experimenting with flexible scheduling on the NTT (­Breysacher
& Tarenghi, 1991). However, the first step towards a more compehensive system —
into this promising new world, so to say — was taken with the establishment of the
Data Management Division in January 1994. Initially — on an interim basis — it
was led by Piero Benvenuti, who remained Head of the ST-ECF and who was obviously well acquainted with Hubble’s observational procedures as well as the archive.
At the suggestion of Dietrich Baade, Benvenuti set up an internal working group to
consider the issue of an online data flow system for the VLT. The group, which was
led by Preben Grosbøl, with Bruno Leibundgut, Jason Spyromilio, Joe Wampler, Bob
Fosbury and Dietrich Baade as members, presented its report in the spring of 1995.
The introduction justifiably warned: “Some of the … concepts may be new and unfamiliar to astronomers… .” It was in fact an outline of the operational changes to come.
In the same year, the new head of the division was found: Peter Quinn, an Australian astronomer, who had previously worked at Caltech and afterwards at the Space
Telescope Science Institute in Baltimore. Meanwhile he had returned to his native
Australia to work on the MACHO project. This was a research project to test the
suggestion that a part of the dark matter in the halo of the Milky Way could be made
up of small, dark objects — such as brown dwarfs or planets — or as they were called
Massive Compact Halo Objects, or MACHOs. The research tool was the world’s
then largest CCD camera mounted on a telescope at the Mount Stromlo observatory. This camera delivered huge amounts of data, so both from his time at the STScI
and in the context of the MACHO project, Quinn was acquainted with the issue
of managing scientific data on a large scale. In August 1995, he arrived in Garching.
At ESO, Quinn found fertile ground. As already indicated, several people had
already worked on the ideas and solutions that would tie into the idea of a seamless data flow within an overall data management system. All in all the group comprised a dozen or so people, each of whom had dealt with individual aspects of data

321

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

handling and processing. The new Data Management Division would develop its
activities on this basis.
At the time when Quinn and his team set out to realise their thoughts about an integrated end-to-end system for science users, the VLT software had already been developed. The end-to-end operating system, for which only rudimentary ideas existed at
the time, had to be put on top of this. How would this work?
In this situation, Joe Schwarz proposed that the NTT could be used to test VLT
software, de facto turning the NTT into a UT0. In the course of time, the entire
system could be tested and de-bugged and valuable experience gained in an operational environment5 .
Matching the telescope software with the end-to-end system was not an easy task.
Whilst discussions about how to do this and how the various requirements should
be balanced against each other were unavoidable, the two people in charge, Peter
Quinn and Jason Spyromilio, agreed that both systems would have to fit together.
One night, over pizzas and beer, they came up with what might appear as an unholy
analogy: the Shark’s Teeth. The meaning was that the two systems should interlock
exactly like the teeth of a shark when the jaws close. Whatever people thought of
this comparison it was adopted as a guiding idea, also perhaps because it implied that
implementing the overall system would involve pain. The Shark’s Teeth became part
of the logo used internally by the Data Management Division in the years to come.
Another analogy was invoked in illustrating how the end-to-end system would actually work. The data would flow from the original observing proposal and, when
approved, be packed into Observing Blocks — or OBs as they became known — and
sent to the staff astronomers and telescope operators at ­Paranal. After observing the
results would be sent back, now in the form of astronomical data, passing through an
elaborate system of quality control, to end up on the user’s desk in a science-ready format, as well as being stored in a rapidly growing science archive. Peter Quinn adopted
a circular flow chart, which because of its shape, became known as the Egg. The Egg

5	

Of course, there were a few odd — and innocent — surprises. When the team started to test the software they
immediately noted that something was wrong. They discovered that the software was based on the geographical coordinates of P
­ aranal and not La Silla. After changing these parameters, it worked well.

322

Chapter III-12 ∙ Tuning a Formidable Science Machine

A proud ESO team receiving the Computer World 21st Century Achievement Award for Science: (From
left to right) Preben Grosbøl, Michèle Péron, Peter Quinn and David Silva.

of Columbus? In any case, the paradigm change was not just about efficiency 6 . It also
enabled new science to be done. Furthermore, aside from the delivery of science-ready
data, the associated technical data, such as instrument calibration data, made it possible for ESO to continuously monitor the performance of the various instruments
and provide timely feedback to the maintenance crew at Paranal,
­­
as well as to the
6	

The development of this new system began in 1996, initially in cooperation with the Canadian Astronomy Data
Centre that had also worked with the Gemini telescope project. For the science archive, the work involved the
ST-ECF and the Centre de Données Astronomiques de Strasbourg (CDS), France.

323

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

scientific users. Provision of these data is crucial for the scientific users to be able to
reduce the observational data and interpret them in a physically meaningful way. In
2005 ESO was awarded the prestigious (US) Computer World Prize in recognition
of the contribution to science of this end-to-end system.

OB
Observation Handling

Long-term Schedule
Observing Programmes

OB

Phase II proposals
ST/MT Scheduler
ObsBlock repository

Observation Blocks
Ambient data
Configuration
Status

VLT Control System

OB
Programme Handling
Phase I proposals
Long-Term Scheduler

OB

OB

Data Frames
ObsBlocks

Quality status
Cal ObsBlocks
Science Archive
Technical
Programmes

Reduced CalFrames

Quality Control
Calibration Plan
Simulators
Quality Monitor
Quality Scheduler

Reduced frames

Recipes

Pipeline
Data Organizer
Reduction Scheduler
Reduction Block

Catalogue server
On-line Archive
Storage & Data DIstribution

Data Frames
Calibration Data

OB

The data flow system, here depicted as “an egg” became a core element of the VLT operating paradigm.

≈
With the introduction of new and highly efficient observational modes a comprehensive digital archive of scientific data was becoming a reality. ESO’s Science Archive
Facility would eventually store all raw data obtained at ESO in Chile, as well as those
obtained with the Hubble Space Telescope and, upon the entry of the United Kingdom, the raw data from the UKIRT Infrared Deep Sky Survey (UKIDSS). In the
earliest phase, however, it basically covered observations with the NTT. During the
first year, in 1991, it contained 1.6 gigabytes (GB) of data, at the time a respectable
number. The archive at ESO grew quickly. By 1998, the data holdings had grown to
0.2 terabytes (TB). Three years later, it had grown to 9 TB. Hardly surprisingly, this
was nothing compared to what would happen when P
­ aranal reached its full observing capacity. In 2005, ESO decided to open the archive to users worldwide. By 2007,
the archive held 70 TB of data. According to the ESO Annual Report, during this
year, the archive received 11 000 unique requests from scientists involving 16 TB of
data. Of those requests, almost 9000 related to observations with ESO telescopes,

324

Chapter III-12 ∙ Tuning a Formidable Science Machine

comprising “12.3 TB in nearly three quarters of a million files”. The addition of the
two survey telescopes at P
­ aranal would, however, completely dwarf these numbers,
with VISTA alone adding some 150 TB per year to the data collection. The dramatic
increase in data volume not only meant a constant race in terms of increasing the
data storage capacity but also that the available space at the Garching Headquarters
would no longer suffice. In June 2007, ESO therefore opened a new data centre 7 in
rented rooms at the nearby Max-Planck-Institut für Plasmaphysik.
The next step would be to connect the scientific archives in different places to enable astronomers to obtain and compare multi-wavelength data, and to do so over the
internet. Projects to facilitate this became known in Europe as the Astrophysical Virtual Observatory (AVO) and in the US as the National Virtual Observatory. Cofunded by the European Commission, the European project was led by Peter Quinn
at ESO, but also involved ESA, the AstroGrid consortium (in the UK), the CDS at
the Université Louis-Pasteur in Strasbourg, the TERAPIX astronomical data centre at the Institut d’Astrophysique de Paris and the Jodrell Bank Observatory in the
UK. The AVO project was launched in 2001 and in June 2002, a conference jointly
organised by ESO, ESA, NASA and the National Science Foundation (NSF) took
place at the ESO Headquarters with the title “Towards the International Virtual
Observatory”. Tying together archives obviously entails a host of technical and scientific problems, for the objective is to be able to access instantly scientifically comparable data from different facilities. Together with their colleagues from particle
physics, astrophysicists were among the first to embrace the idea of “e-science”, with
its new vocabulary of federated archives, grid and cloud computing, etc. using highcapacity data networks spanning continents and evolving at a breathtaking pace. At
the time of writing, astronomy is on the verge of yet another revolution… .

7	

The current holdings comprise 265 TB (status May 2012).

325

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

270 days before VLT first light — members of the AIV
Team gathered in front of the office container next to UT1
on ­Paranal. From left to right: Peter Gray, behind Gerhard
Kretschmer, in front of him Krister Wirenstrand, Toomas
Erm, Juan Osorio, Mauricio Pilleux, Marc Sbaihi, Erich
Bugueno. (Photo: Gerd Hüdepohl)

326

Chapter III-13

The Countdown
“Everything went according to plan… .”
Richard West,
ESO Press Release, 12 December 1997.

I

n the early afternoon of 6 December 1997 the cargo vessel MV Tarpon ­Santiago
approached the port of Antofagasta. In its hold: the first VLT primary mirror.
The mirror was loaded onto the ship on 11 November at the port of Le Havre. Under
the command of Captain Dimitris Pangalos, the vessel had crossed the Atlantic
Ocean on a route 220 nautical miles longer than normal, but one that provided the
best chances of calm seas, passed through the Panama Canal and down the western shores of the South American continent. It had made a brief call in Iquique1,
the Chilean port close to the Peruvian border, before the final overnight voyage to
Antofagasta. In the afternoon, preparations for the unloading began and, around
21:30, the container was lowered onto the transporter that was waiting on the pier.
Unloading a 43-tonne container swinging back and forth on the steel cables from
the ship’s crane is not a simple task, especially if the set-down is supposed to be shockfree. It wasn’t. For the last few centimetres it came down with a hard, nerve wrecking bump. Had the mirror, inside the specially designed container, survived? How
many bumps had it already been exposed to on the high seas? And what lay in store
for the 130-­k ilometre road trip to P
­ aranal? The assembled people will have thought
about that — the ESO staff from Garching and Chile, the members of the company
in charge of the transport, Gondrand (of France), the representatives of the insurance company and the media people. But they could take comfort from the fact that
even if this was a first — in a way it actually wasn’t!
As mentioned in Chapter III-5, ESO had used a dummy mirror, made of concrete,
for testing. On 31 October, just five weeks before, a test journey had been carried
1	

A small team from ESO’s Education and Public Relations Department had boarded the ship there, while European television crews from Deutsche Welle and the Swiss SF Television were waiting in Antofagasta.

327

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

out with the dummy mirror 2 . The test had included the sea voyage and thus also the
unloading sequence, just as had happened with the real mirror. And as now, the container had been fitted with accelerometers to detect and measure any shock to which
it might be exposed during the entire voyage. While the precise data were continuously recorded, an interim check was possible with the help of small lamps, indicating the general status. On arrival at the port of Antofagasta, all the warning indicators were shining a bright, ominous red. The test trip, however, continued to its
final destination at P
­ aranal, after which the data from the accelerometers were downloaded and analysed. The first glance was sobering: at some point during the voyage,
the dummy mirror appeared to have been exposed to a one-millisecond-long acceleration of a staggering 10g in three axes, a puzzling measurement. What on earth
had happened? An initial inspection of the ship’s logbook did not reveal any unusual
occurrences. On the contrary: at the time of the incident, the vessel had been several hours out of the port of Havana in calm seas. Was the reading faulty? Eventually the cause of the problem was discovered: radio interference from walkie talkies
used by the sailors on board the vessel. Both ESO and the insurance company were
relieved! As in Europe, the test journey of the dummy mirror had provided proof
that the procedure was safe, and thus could go ahead. But this time it was the real
thing and everybody knew, there would be no room for mistakes!
On the Sunday morning, 7 December, the heavy-duty transporter was set in motion,
escorted by local police and a retinue of cars. It moved at walking pace through the
streets of Antofagasta, taking the coastal road and then, just south of the town, the
steep uphill road towards the Pan-American Highway. The accelerometer readings
provide precise indications: the lorry started to move at 08:25 and stopped at 18:30
after reaching what was then the dirt road B70. It was time for the overnight stop. It
had been an exciting day. The drive through Antofagasta had been followed eagerly
by its citizens, who had lined the streets as if had it been a state visit. Even when driving through the sparse countryside after La Negra, people — seemingly coming out
of the desert — assembled along the roadside, waving and cheering, as the convoy
passed by. There was an air of joy and anticipation, but ahead lay 60 kilometres of
rough, unpaved desert road.
The next morning the convoy started again, moving forward at a speed of
5 ­k m/hour. Three heavy-duty bulldozers were now in front of the lorry, levelling
what was hardly more than a dirt track. Where the inclination of the road was too
2	

At the same time the first real mirror cell had been transported to ­Paranal.

328

Chapter III-13 ∙ The Countdown

The first VLT primary mirror arriving at P
­ aranal.

great, the transporter would make use of its special lifting device, tilting the container
(± 10 degrees) to keep the mirror as level as possible. A further night was spent en
route, and on 9 December, at 17:00 hours, the convoy reached the gate at P
­ aranal. It
was then time for a first visual inspection of the mirror, again followed by a careful
analysis of the accelerometer data by Matthias Hess, the ESO engineer in charge of
transporting the mirror. Everything was fine. Shortly afterwards, the M2 unit and
M2 beryllium secondary mirror arrived as well.
Clearly, for the citizens of Antofagasta the VLT meant the passage of heavy loads.
Back in August 1997, the mirror coating vessel had also arrived in Chile. Manufactured by the German company Linde A.G., this huge vacuum vessel had a diametre
of 9.4 metres and the load had a total weight of 100 tonnes.

329

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Max Kraus, the “man moving things”, sticks his head out through a hole in the protective plate at the
Nasmyth focus of UT1, during the installation of the encoders. Kraus has been the engineer responsible for
a wide variety of equipment for the VLT, e.g., the mirror transport and handling equipment (the M1 air
cushion carriage, the M1 lifting platform and the M1 handling tool in the mirror maintenance building),
the VLT Cassegrain instrument carriage, the mechanical part of the Auxiliary Telescopes and the transport system, the ALMA antenna transporters and many other big and small projects. (Photo: Peter Gray)

With the arrival of the mirrors, the countdown towards first light had begun.
Tarenghi had put together a very able and experienced team to help him. The AIV
team, led by Peter Gray and among others including Marc Sbaihi, Gerd Hüdepohl
and Toomas Erm, had already arrived at ­Paranal a year earlier. AIV stands for assembly, integration and verification, meaning that the team would be responsible for the
on-site telescope assembly and would also ensure that everything was done according to plan and fulfilling specifications. The group was installed in containers next
to the enclosure of Unit Telescope 1, the first to be completed. Gray had joined
ESO from the Steward Observatory in Arizona, where he had been involved in the
MMT, LBT and the Magellan telescope projects. With a good-natured demeanour
and a broad Australian accent, he seemed a perfect fit for the job of chief troubleshooter, working with many different kinds of people and transforming what was
still a rough building site into a sophisticated science facility. Due to various delays
in the project, the AIV phase had to be compressed and only really began after the

330

Chapter III-13 ∙ The Countdown

M1 cell and the primary mirror arrived (Gray, 2000). At that time, more people from
Garching began to arrive. Like Tarenghi himself, several had been associated with
the NTT project, including Jason Spyromilio, who had overseen the NTT Big Bang
project and Lothar Noethe, who had worked closely with Ray Wilson in developing active optics. Naturally, the team included the key people who had brought the
VLT forward. A detailed account is provided in the September 1998 issue of The
ESO ­Messenger (Tarenghi et al., 1998).

Adjusting the enclosure doors on UT1 — Cristian Juica and Erich Bugueno, both members of the VLT
AIV team. (Photo: Peter Gray)

The first tests were conducted from an interim control room that had been set up in
a container at the base camp. During the months of January and February, the testing of the telescope’s mechanical structure took place, initially with the dummy mirror and a dummy mirror cell mounted to balance the telescope. The tests went well
and the advantages of using the same control software as on NTT, and tested during the NTT Big Bang, became clear. As expected, the test phase also revealed residual problems that had to be tackled. These included oscillations in altitude tracking
and stronger than anticipated wind effects on the mechanical structure. Wind effects
were expected and were to be compensated by a field stabilisation system involving the secondary mirror, but originally the implementation had not been foreseen
before later in the year. Now it was decided to try to implement it from the outset.

331

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

In March, the secondary mirror unit and the primary mirror cell were installed,
though still with the dummy mirror. Telescope control was now carried out from
a console inside a small hut inside the telescope enclosure, so that the telescope
remained in sight of the operating team. By mid-May, the telescope control moved
again, now to the proper control room, located in the separate building below the
telescope enclosures on the southern side of the mountain.
While attention was concentrated on the telescope tests, a major problem occurred at
the base camp, or rather in the mirror maintenance building. Here, the first primary
mirror was waiting for the final process before it could be mounted on the telescope:
the application of the thin aluminium layer that would transform it to a highly reflective mirror. The aluminium layer on VLT mirrors is applied by a process known as
sputtering. The base material is a bar of aluminium with a very high degree of purity
(99.995% pure). With the help of a magnetron, a tube able to create intense heat by
means of electric and magnetic currents (most commonly used in microwave ovens),
an argon plasma is created in the vacuum chamber. Positively charged atoms (ions)
bombard the aluminium target causing atoms from the target to be ejected and reach
the mirror surface. With the mirror rotating, it is possible to deposit a thin film of
aluminium with a very high degree of uniformity across the entire surface. The thickness of the resulting aluminium layer is in the order of 80 nanometres3 .
Before the mirror coating began, a test firing of the system was conducted. The result
was disastrous. Due to a magnetron failure the aluminium target was badly damaged and could no longer be used for a real coating run. Obtaining a new aluminium
target from Europe in time appeared not to be possible. Instead, Michael Schneermann, the engineer responsible, located a company in Reno, Nevada, that might be
able to step in at short notice. He flew to San Francisco and negotiated a quick delivery. It looked as if it might be delivered to Chile in time, but the clock was ticking 4 .
Meanwhile, the secondary mirror was coated at La Silla. With a diameter of 1.1 me­­
tres, this could easily be handled by the mirror coating facility there. By mid-April,
the mirror cell was dismounted from the telescope and brought down to the mirror maintenance building. The real primary mirror, still uncoated and protected by
3	

Readers interested in the technical details will find a full description is given in The ESO Messenger (Ettlinger
et al., 1999).

4	

An alternative solution that was considered was to spray a thin silver layer onto the surface of the mirror blank,
but in the end, the idea was given up.

332

Chapter III-13 ∙ The Countdown

a plastic film, was mounted in the cell and brought up to the telescope. On 21 April
everything was in place, but it appeared that first light would have to be done with
an uncoated mirror.
≈
The VLT story is a fascinating mixture of meticulous planning, often years in
advance, expressed in numerous charts, documents and even detailed operational
manuals, reminiscent of the checklist used by airline pilots, and quick ad hoc decisions, taken on the spot if necessary. Even if the primary mirror was uncoated, and
thus de facto offered a light-collecting capability similar only to that of a much smaller
telescope, it could still be used for tests. Tarenghi, therefore, took the decision on the
spot to try out the telescope. On the same night the optical engineers Paul Giordano
and Francis Franza carefully removed the protective cover of the 53 square metre
surface. When the first photons struck the polished surface of the mirror, technical
first light was achieved. Now the telescope performance could be tested under reallife conditions: the pointing, the tracking, the active optics system and so forth. The
first target was a globular cluster. It was quickly found, but the image was lousy. As
so often, when dealing with exceedingly complex systems, we see that the human
factor still plays a crucial role and that includes the propensity for errors. The globular cluster image was obtained with a custom-built VLT test camera, placed underneath the primary mirror at the Cassegrain focus. The test team, for the first time
operating the VLT under real-life conditions, were, however, operating the telescope
in the Nasmyth configuration! Once the mistake was recognised, the result looked
very different. Buoyed by their success, the team moved the telescope to observe a
single star. But they saw nothing. Initially the pointing model, which had been elaborated by Krister Wirenstrand, had been verified with an 8-inch Celestron telescope
riding piggyback on the VLT telescope structure. So why was it not working now?
Then the team realised that the test telescope had been fixed on the side of the top
ring and was therefore not precisely centred, or as opticians would express it, on-axis.
Furthermore, in this position, it did not correct for the field rotation associated with
the alt-azimuth telescope mount. Again, once the error had been recognised, everything worked. To everyone’s delight, the active optics system worked flawlessly and by
the third night, images with a resolution of 0.4 arcseconds were obtained. As part of
the tests, the mirror was deformed in several ways, producing odd images of the star
and then corrected again. A proud Tarenghi called the Director General to report
this success. But Giacconi, undoubtedly happy that things were going well, did not

333

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

lose his focus: “Stop playing with the telescope,” he barked through the telephone at
Tarenghi, “And do something sensible with it!”
≈
By mid-May, Tarenghi made what was hardly more than a pitstop at the ESO Headquarters in Garching for last-minute meetings. Meanwhile the new aluminium target
had been flown in from the US, and Tarenghi took a gamble: we coat the mirror! On
18 May the mirror cell was taken down to the mirror maintenance building, the mirror itself was detached overnight and inserted into the vacuum chamber the following day. With the target date for the official first light just a few days away, this had
become a real race against time. Conducting another test ahead of the real aluminisation was out of the question. Peter Gray was requesting authorisation to go ahead
and fire the magnetron. He reached Tarenghi at Frankfurt Airport and got the go
ahead. The trip from Frankfurt to São Paolo is a 13-hour flight. Tarenghi was used
to it, but this particular one will have appeared unbearably long to him, yearning as
he was to learn about the outcome of the first coating. Landing in the early morning
hours at Guarulhos International Airport, he received the news he had hoped and
longed for: the coating had been successful. Everything had worked as foreseen and
on 21 May the mirror was back at the telescope.

The primary mirror with its cell is brought up to UT1 after the successful aluminisation on 21 May. In his
logbook, Peter Gray noted: “Started operation at 5 am this morning. Moved outside on air cushions 20
min, loaded onto trailer and rigged 40 min. Departed MMB [Mirror Maintenance Building] at 6 am
as planned. 1.5 hr transport, arrived UT1 at 7:30 am.” (Photo: Peter Gray)

334

Chapter III-13 ∙ The Countdown

We have seen that by 25 May, the telescope had already been working for some
weeks, albeit with an uncoated mirror. So when did first light really occur and how
is it defined? At ESO (and in many other places), first light is defined as the moment
when the scientifically meaningful observations can be made. Before a new telescope reaches that stage, many tests and much fine-tuning is usually required, but the
amount of fine-tuning needed for the first of the VLT Unit Telescopes was sensationally small — even to the disbelief of many inside ESO. As we have seen already in the
case of the Hubble Space Telescope, first light is the crucial moment when the transition from engineering to science begins. The images produced at first light obviously
are testimonials of the potential of the new telescope and everyone will look at these
images accordingly. For funders of a telescope, first light images are also important to
justify the investment vis-à-vis the public. Perhaps surprising to lay people, first light
is not about science — despite the criterion already mentioned. Why is that? When a
new telescope comes into service, especially with such a capability as the VLT, lots of
scientists will stand ready to use it and, in the highly competitive world of astrophysics, who would not like to be the one to publish the first scientific paper? First light
images are therefore often selected in such a way that they fulfil the requirements for
a technical assessment, demonstrate the potential for capturing stunning images, but
not so that they can immediately be used for real scientific analysis. The first light
event, however, is normally followed by a period known as commissioning. This is
the phase where the telescope begins to produce science data, while still undergoing
final adjustments and characterisation. The data obtained during this time are normally made available in an open, but orderly, way to the entire scientific community.

335

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Obtained on 16 May — i.e. with an uncoated mirror — this
10-minute exposure of a small part of the globular cluster
Omega Centauri demonstrated well the qualities of the VLT.
This object was also chosen for the NTT first light (see p. 192)
and seems to be a favourite among telescope builders for testing. As the other early images, this pictures was obtained with
the VLT Test Camera developed by Martin Cullum.

336

Chapter III-14

Clear Skies, at Last
“A Great Moment for Astronomy!”
ESO Press Release, 27 May 1998.

I

t looked like it would be a lousy day. When Massimo Tarenghi glanced out of the
window of his simple steel container abode, he saw a sky covered with clouds. Not
a sight cherished by astronomers. Yet it was not necessarily the biggest of his problems that day.
As if he had needed any reminder, the calendar told him that this was the date that
had been set, months in advance, for VLT first light. During the early phase of the
project, serious delays had accumulated. But with a revised project plan, the management had tied itself to a strict construction schedule, with first light in the first
half of 1998. Monday, 25 May, had been chosen. This was the day.
During the previous night the telescope had undergone its last tests, and things had
looked good, until an earthquake detector activated the mirror protection system.
There had been no earthquake, so the sensor had seemingly gone off at random.
Returning to an observational mode, which required repositioning of the mirror, had
taken several hours. Then, as the night neared its end and the night shift prepared to
close down, the mirror cover, designed to protect M1 during the day, jammed. The
operator, undoubtedly exhausted after an intense period of work, pressed the button again; and again. Then with a sudden jerk the cover came loose, jumping out of
its tracks and pulling down with it a heavy metal beam. The beam dropped a couple
of metres and came to a halt just millimetres above the primary mirror.
The cover was now hanging down, fixed only on one side and dangerously close
to the primary mirror. Observing in this state was obviously out of the question.
Should they postpone first light? After a brief telephone conversation with Giacconi,
Tarenghi and a small team decided to try to keep to the deadline. Working from the
morning hours and through the day the team rolled back the cover bit by bit, working

337

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

a few centimetres above the delicate mirror. They succeeded. By 6 pm the cover had
been pulled back. Miraculously as the Sun began to set, the cloud layer also began
to lift. The telescope systems were started and the ventilation louvres opened. Soon
the first stars appeared in the evening sky.

During the day of first light, a thick layer of clouds covered the sky at ­Paranal, but as night fell, the clouds
disappeared. (Photo: Peter Gray)

In the control room, located in the separate building below the telescope platform, the atmosphere was intense. At the consoles were Roberto Gilmozzi, Krister
­Wirenstrand, Jason Spyromilio, Anders Wallander and of course Massimo Tarenghi.
Looking over their shoulders were Peter Gray and Jörg Eschwey, the old ESO hand
responsible for the site construction, two representatives from ESO’s information
service, Herbert Zodet and the author, and — like flies on the wall — the camera
teams from two European television channels, Deutsche Welle and Swiss Television, SF. To outsiders, this hardly looked like a festive occasion. The members of the
observing team looked tired, unshaven, and with black rings under their eyes. They
had clearly not slept for a long, long time. But now was the moment of truth. The

338

Chapter III-14 ∙ Clear Skies, at Last

VLT project had been underway for 20 years. The project had been given green light
11 years ago and since then, an estimated 5000 people had, in some way or other,
been involved in this project. For few, this had been a job like any other. Most had
been caught by the deep fascination of the potential of this telescope and had worked
accordingly, whether scientists, engineers, opticians, technicians, shipping people,
drivers or administrative clerks 1. Site testers had endured incredible hardship over the
years, construction workers had toiled amidst swathes of thick dust from the blasting
under the merciless Sun at P
­ aranal. In completely different circumstances, administrators and policy makers had fought for this project with governments and even
in the courts. ESO’s management had shepherded the project through harsh storms
and, when in such storms, individual staff members gave up, had managed to replace
them with new talent. And even for people who had not been directly involved, this
was something very special. We will remember, how people had gathered along the
desert stretch of Pan-American Highway, waving and clapping their hands as they
watched the first primary mirror rolling past them in its container. But with the
world as onlooker, this was the moment of truth. Would the VLT really pass the test,
and stress, of its world premiere? Would this exceedingly complicated machine with
its multitude of subsystems, with parts manufactured in so many different places in

Photo left: The first image appearing on the computer screen (left to right): Herbert Zodet, Krister
Wirenstrand, Massimo Tarenghi and Jason Spyromilio. Photo right: An elated Peter Gray in the VLT
Control Room. (Photos courtesy: Peter Gray)
1	

An interview with Dimitris Pangalos, captain of the ship that brought the first primary mirror to South America is surely representative of the feelings of many people outside the astronomical community, who had been
involved in the project: “As captain, many times I have used the stars to establish our position, and now I am glad to
carry this mirror that brings the stars closer to us. I feel fantastic thinking that by carrying this mirror, I am part of
this great undertaking.” The interview was conducted by the author on the day of the ship’s arrival to Antofagasta.

339

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Europe, be able to live up to the hopes and expectations of the astronomers, who were
eagerly waiting for results back at Headquarters in Garching? Would ESO’s Director
General — who had witnessed the drama of the Hubble Space Telescope’s entrance
into the world of science first hand and who now carried the ultimate responsibility
for the VLT — this time be satisfied? Would this be as good as the spectacularly successful NTT first light? Or would it be a sign, as many people outside ESO believed,
that this was after all too big a challenge for this organisation? As darkness enveloped P
­ aranal, the shutter on the VLT test camera, fixed at the Cassegrain focus, was
opened for the first time. Shortly afterwards, the first image appeared on the monitor, to be scrutinised by some very critical eyes. They were not disappointed.
≈
In Europe, serious preparations for the first light event began several months before
the magical date. The preparations included the production of comprehensive background materials for use by the media (photos, texts, broadcast-quality video footage), the organisation of a symposium for European science writers with some 40
professional science journalists, agreements with selected television channels about
coverage of the event including provision of a feed to the EBU2 satellite-based news
exchange, and, of course, involving the astronomical communities in the member
countries.
More technical, and more complete, background information was provided in the
form of the 200-page VLT White Book, published on the web and in printed form
just before the first light event.
As the day came near, at the Garching Headquarters and under the leadership of
Richard West a small task force of young astronomers — the first light image processing team — was put together to handle the scientific data as they were transmitted from Chile and turn them into real images for use by the media.
First light formally occurred on Monday, 25 May, but in Europe it was past midnight,
and so, Tuesday 26 May. In the late afternoon of that day, when the data had been
carefully reviewed, it was decided which images should be included in the series of
first light photos that was to be released the following day. Nine were selected and
2	

The European Broadcasting Union, the cooperation organisation of the European public service television
channels.

340

Chapter III-14 ∙ Clear Skies, at Last

One of the first light images was this picure of NGC 6302, a planetary nebula that also has become known
as the Bug Nebula. It was a 10-minute exposure and had a resolution better than 0.6 arcseconds.

mass production of the prints began and continued during the night. Some of the
pictures demonstrated the excellent optical and mechanical performance of the telescope, as is one of the purposes of first light. Others were simply pretty pictures,
such as the image of the Bug Nebula that instantaneously became a worldwide hit.
Once the pictures were ready, in the early morning hours of 27 May, astronomers
travelled to same-day press conferences in each of ESO’s eight Member States as well
as ­Portugal 3 and Chile, organised with the help of ESO’s Council delegates and in
many places attended by ministers or high-level civil servants from the national ministries. In Germany, the press conference was held at the ESO Headquarters, with a
3	

Portugal had a sort of associated status at the time. See also Chapter IV-8.

341

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

proud Giacconi declaring: “This is a great day for world astronomy. The new concept
that is embodied in this telescope is that of active control of a thin, monolithic large mirror that has been developed at ESO, tested at the NTT and then embodied in the VLT,
permits us to observe the sky … in the optical infrared with unprecedented angular resolution and sensitivity.” In a videoconference from ­Paranal, Massimo Tarenghi cast
aside his tempered reaction, exclaiming: “You will have to come to P
­ aranal and spend
the night with us and I can tell you that you will have a beautiful night — one of the
best nights of your life!” It was as if, in one moment, he also shed the tremendous burden of stress that he had felt during the preceding months and years.

The conference room was full during the first light press conference at ESO in Garching. (Photos: Hans
Hermann Heyer)

There was a resounding response from the press. “The Universe is coming closer,” 4
wrote Hansjörg Heinrich and Ulrich Schnabel in Die Zeit, the German weekly.
Dieter Reimers was quoted in the Darmstädter Echo for saying “[This is] the beginning
of a new century” 5 . The Danish newspaper Jyllandsposten carried the headline “Dream
Voyage into Space” 6 . Many papers simply focussed on the achievement and saw it as a
reason for celebration. Limburg Dagblad, for example, carried the title “Pictures from
Giant Telescope Received with Champagne” 7, while others saw the VLT as a cause for
national pride. Thus Corriere della Sera brought a headline saying “World’s ­Largest

4	

“Das All rückt näher”.

5	

“Der Beginn eines neuen Jahrhunderts”.

6	

“Drømmerejse ud i rummet”.

7	

“Beelden reuzentelescoop met champagne ontvangen”.

342

Chapter III-14 ∙ Clear Skies, at Last

Telescope speaks Italian” 8 , referring to the admittedly strong Italian signature on the
VLT project. Some papers also saw the triumph of the VLT in the context of American–European rivalry: “Europe’s answer to Hubble,” 9 or spoke of “The European
Conquest” 10 . The latter issue gained a somewhat sharper edge in some papers. The reason was that on 28 May, the day after the ESO press conferences, NASA announced
what, from the media’s point of view, amounted to nothing less than a scientific sensation — allegedly the first-ever direct photo of an extrasolar planet, obtained with
the Hubble Space Telescope (NASA, 1998). The announcement was not based on
a peer-reviewed paper, as is normally the practice for serious science news, but the
result was going to be announced at the American Astronomical Society meeting
that took place at the same time. Even if the announcement was received with some
degree of scepticism, at least in the US media, it was obviously better news than a
story about a European telescope. In Europe, conversely, widespread speculation suggested that this was a deliberate ploy to outdo the Europeans. Again, Die Zeit (in a
free translation) wrote “the suspicion is not far away that this exciting announcement
was carefully timed.” 11 Deutsche Welle, the German television channel, which had
followed the VLT project over quite some time, chipped in with similar comments.
Even the Financial Times commented: “Not to be upstaged, however, NASA’s Origins
Programme … announced on the same day ESO released the news and images of its first
light that NASA astronomers had observed what they believe may be a ‘possible planet’
outside the Solar System.” Alas, we may never know if this was indeed a case of what
would later be colloquially known as press spin — or a pure coincidence. When the
object was shown simply to be a star, NASA later withdrew the story quietly, and
ESO took away a lesson or two of its own from the episode12 .
Just three days after first light, on 29 May, a major astronomy exhibition opened at
the Paris landmark, Cité de la Science et d’Industrie. ESO’s public relations department had outdone itself, mounting a large stand with the first light images. And during the exhibition, key VLT people gave talks to a large and excited audience mostly
of amateur astronomers.
8	

“Parla italiano il più grande telescopio del mondo”.

9	

“Heet Europese antwoord op Hubble”.

10	

“La conquête européenne”.

11	

“… liegt der Verdacht nicht fern, daß die aufsehenerregende Veröffentlichung zeitlich abgestimmt war.”

12	

Interested readers are referred to an article by Ray Villard, “Publicising a Science Discovery: It’s All in the Timing — Two Case Studies”, Communicating Astronomy to the Public, May 2008. When, in 2004, ESO went public with what it thought could be the first direct picture of an extrasolar planet, based on an accepted scientific
paper, it was careful not to make any definitive statements.

343

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

≈
Sixteen days after first light, Council met for its regular summer meeting. Here too
the satisfaction was very visible. Regarding the VLT, so often the subject of concern,
this time, it was smiles all round! As is customary for Council, it expressed this formally by a resolution:
“The ESO Council,
recognising the great dedication, resolution and competence with which ESO staff has
worked to realise the VLT Project over a period of more than a decade,
acknowledging the excellent results that have been achieved already at the moment of
first light, which show great promise for the years to come,
expresses its profound gratitude and admiration to all ESO staff at all levels in Garching, ­Paranal, La Silla and Santiago for having contributed to placing ESO at the forefront of astronomy and establishing this organisation and its mission as a model of successful European collaboration in the minds of the people in the member countries and
elsewhere,
conveys to the management and the staff its best wishes for the successful continuation of
the VLT project and other endeavours to be undertaken by ESO in the future.”
In spite of the NASA skirmish, the VLT first light had also been noticed by a wider
audience in the US. Popular Science included it as one of winners of the Best of
What’s New Prize, awarded every year. The award ceremony took place on 13 November 1998 at the Tavern on the Green in New York’s Central Park. Massimo Tarenghi
received the prize on behalf of ESO, with the author of this book accompanying him.
Popular Science had invited all winners to display their products at the event. In the
case of ESO, this could of course only be in the shape of photos, and since any spectacular astronomical photo put on display in the US would almost certainly be taken
for a Hubble picture, ESO printed a slogan on its pictures. It said: “ESO. Astronomy made in Europe”. This became ESO’s institutional by-line for almost ten years,
both signifying the importance of European cooperation if Europe wants to play in
the top league and, of course, as a sign of the quality of work originating from ESO.

344

Chapter III-14 ∙ Clear Skies, at Last

José Mariano Gago at the VLT Control Room. (Photo: Peter
Gray)

A visit to P
­ aranal by Portugal’s
science minister, José ­Mariano
Gago, himself a particle physicist coincided with the VLT
first light period. Gago’s visit,
on 19 July, was not simply
inspired by his scientific interests, but also because Portugal was preparing to become a
member of ESO. The success of
the VLT would soon stimulate
the interest of many other countries in joining, a topic that we
shall deal with in Chapter IV-8.

≈
The ­Paranal Observatory was inaugurated eight months and ten days later, on
5 March 1999. During the previous night, the first Unit Telescope had produced
images with a resolution of an impressive 0.25 arcseconds, while the second Unit Tele­scope had entered into its first light sequence, with technical first light achieved on
1 March. The inauguration ceremony was attended by the President of Chile, Eduardo
Frei Ruiz-Tagle, and high ranking representatives of the ESO Member States and
Chile as well as of their scientific communities. For President Frei, this must have
been a special occasion. In 1969 his father, Eduardo Frei Montalva, at the time President of the Republic, had inaugurated the La Silla Observatory together with Olof
Palme, representing the ESO Member States. Following speeches by ­Henrik Grage
in his function as ESO Council President and of President Frei, the particle physicist and Nobel laureate Carlo Rubbia gave a challenging scientific lecture13 before the
President and the invited audience, and afterwards, ESO’s Director ­General gave a
prize to Jorssy Albanez Castilla, a 17-year old school girl from Chuquicamata near
the town of Calama. The prize, consisting of a 6-inch telescope was awarded for the
successful proposal of names for the four 8.2-metre Unit Telescopes that became
Antu, Kueyen, Melipal and Yepun, meaning the Sun, the Moon, the Southern Cross,
and Venus in the indigenous Mapoche language spoken in parts of Chile.
13	

In Riccardo Giacconi’s candid memoirs “though not understood was warmly applauded by the assembled and
rather stunned dignitaries” (Giacconi, 2006).

345

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The days are long gone when astronomers peered through telescopes themselves. Nonetheless, for the benefits of the guests at the inauguration of the P
­ aranal Observatory, a large screen had been mounted at the
Nasmyth focus of UT1 to allow visual observing. (Photo: Gerd Hüdepohl)

The many visitors, most of whom had come from afar, were shown around the observatory and the central control room was filled with people, as the telescope controllers demonstrated the power of active optics by changing the figure of the primary
mirror in such a way that the image of a star morphed into the letters V, L and finally
T. Among the visitors in the crowded control room was Catherine Cesarsky, who had
been designated to take over as ESO’s sixth Director General only a few months later.

From the inauguration of the P
­ aranal Observatory. Photo left: Massimo Tarenghi, Henrik Grage, Marta
Larraechea Bolívar, wife of the Chilean President, Mirella Giacconi and Eduardo Frei Ruiz-Tagle. Photo
right: Jason Spyromilio and Massimo Tarenghi demonstrate the capabilities of active optics to the inauguration guests in the VLT Control Room.

346

Chapter III-14 ∙ Clear Skies, at Last

Like Riccardo Giacconi, Catherine Cesarsky had a wide-ranging background, rather
than one focussed on optical astronomy. She had, among other things, headed the
theoretical group of the Service d’Astrophysique of the Commissariat à l’Energie
Atomique (CEA), and then been director of its Direction des Sciences de la Matière
(DSM), covering physics, chemistry, astrophysics and earth sciences. As already mentioned, she had also been involved in infrared astronomy as the principal investigator
of the ISOCAM camera onboard the Infrared Space Observatory of the European
Space Agency. She had furthermore served as French delegate to the ESO Council14 and, later as a member of the International Visiting Group that reviewed the
organisation. Thanks to her upbringing in Argentina, she speaks fluent Spanish and
­naturally also has a good understanding of South American issues. At the same time,
she is a keen follower of European affairs in general and of European science policies in particular, and, as it turned out, she proved to be a formidable political operator. In joining ESO as Director General, her focus was obviously on c­ ompleting the

The inauguration of ­Paranal was followed by a visit to the ALMA site at Chajnantor. En route to
Chajnantor, the guests made a stop at the Tropic of Capricorn. Seen here are Lodewijk Woltjer, Catherine
Cesarsky, Michel Dennefeld, Pierre Léna and Gustav Tammann. (Courtesy: Pierre Léna)
14	

And had also, in 1994, been Vice President of the Council.

347

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

VLT and the VLTI. With ALMA on the horizon, a key challenge was to secure the
funding, which almost inevitably meant convincing additional countries to join the
organisation. Very much on her mind was the desire to strengthen the links between
ESO and the scientific community, to drive home the idea (again, perhaps) that ESO
belonged to the astronomers of Europe. Also on her agenda was the aim of building up relations with the European Union and improving ESO’s standing in Chile,
which in spite of the turnaround in 1995/96, still needed to be carefully nurtured.
≈

In connection with the VLT Inauguration, ESO organised a symposium entitled Science in the VLT Era
and Beyond at Universidad Católica del Norte in Antofagasta with 200 participants. The photo shows
Immo Appenzeller presenting the early science results with FORS.

Whilst we shall look at this period in the coming chapters, we should finish this
chapter with a note about the people who put together the VLT. The prologue of
this book records the author’s personal impression of the VLT first light achievement. It is clear that what we saw was without exception an example of outstanding
professionalism. Yet, those who achieved this incredible triumph were not just hardworking nerds. They were also “boys” who, despite the tremendous pressure on them
found ways to express a freewheeling humour. In the VLT control room, a Walter
Cronkite-like voice is occasionally heard with the solemn announcement “There’s

348

Chapter III-14 ∙ Clear Skies, at Last

no cause for alarm. But there probably will be!” This is not an earthquake warning or
anything similarly serious, but simply occurs when a particular set of computer commands are given15 . And this was not the only example. When a VLTI delay line (see
Chapter I­ II-15) moved, a recording of the underground train arriving in ­Garching
was played. And should a delay line run into a limit, there was a sound of breaking
glass and on the visualisation on the screen the delay line turned upside down.

Antu began regular science operations on 1 April 1999. From then on, for the VLT staff at ­Paranal, it was
about living up to the challenges of an on-going operation, with as little downtime as possible. Herman
Nuñez, who made this cartoon, suggests that some may have felt struck with awe at this thought. But of
course, they managed!

15	

The sound file was borrowed from Pinky and the Brain, an American television cartoon.

349

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Aligning the first tracks of the VLTI delay lines in the underground tunnel at P
­ aranal. From left to right: Pablo Vergara,
Jorge Perez and Carlos Bolados. (Photo: Peter Gray)

350

Chapter III-15

First Fringes of the Phoenix
“I have little doubt that interferometric observations will
in due time become as common and easy to perform
as normal observations are now at the VLT… .”
Catherine Cesarsky, upon the announcement
of the successful first observations with the VLTI,
The ESO Messenger, 2001.

I

n Chapter III-4, we followed the early history of the VLTI, from the 1977 ESO
conference at CERN through the launch of the formal programme led by Jacques
Beckers to the decisions taken in 1993 by the ESO Council to postpone the implementation of the VLTI for financial reasons. ESO had, however, continued with preparing the infrastructure so that the VLTI could be put back on track as soon as it
became financially feasible. In the first instance this meant constructing the delayline tunnel and the other underground tunnels as well as the building intended for
the coherent (and incoherent) focus. Keeping key personnel, all of whom were eager
to realise their dream of a large-scale interferometer, had proved to be much more difficult. Some had left, others decided to stay, hoping for better times. As mentioned,
this hope was in part linked to the prospects of Australian membership of ESO. In
January 1996, however, it became clear that this would not materialise. In the meantime, the VLTI group had used its enforced break for additional studies to be better prepared for a relaunch. This included investigations of thermal effects, as they
could be expected in the interferometric tunnels, of the effect of telescope vibrations
at the level of nanometres as well as of microseismic activities of the site. It would
prove to be time well spent. In addition, an Interferometry Science Advisory Committee with “astronomers who have a background in high angular resolution astrophysics and interferometry, was established … to review the development of, to define a key
science programme for, and to recommend necessary conceptual changes to, the VLTI.”
(von der Lühe et al., 1997)

351

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

In late 1995, Giacconi had begun to realise that the Australian bid might not lead
anywhere. Even so, at the time the financial pressure on ESO had eased somewhat,
allowing him to “borrow” a sum of ten million deutschmarks from the VLT instrumentation budget, thereby enabling a modest restart of the VLTI programme, at first
with two delay lines and two siderostats. The additional contributions by CNRS and
the Max-Planck-Gesellschaft remained at ESO’s disposal, but uncertainty existed
as to whether the amount would suffice to cover a third delay line and a telescope.
≈
In broad terms, the VLTI consists of the four large Unit Telescopes, the Auxiliary
Telescopes and instrumentation placed at the combined (coherent) focus. The light
from the different telescopes is fed into the combined focus via an elaborate tunnel
system that lies under the surface of the telescope platform. The delay lines constitute the prime optical element that allows light beams to be combined coherently.
During an observation with the VLTI array, light from a celestial source will not
arrive at exactly the same time at the various telescopes. The time difference is obviously minute, typically of the order of 0.2 microseconds (equivalent to light travelling a distance of 60 metres). Furthermore, with the diurnal rotation of the Earth,
this time difference changes continuously. The purpose of the delay lines is, quite
simply, to equalise this constantly changing time difference, so that the light arrives
at the common focus at exactly the same time, irrespective of which telescope it has
been relayed through. Rather than talking about a time difference, interferometry
experts normally talk about an optical path difference: the difference in distance
that light taking the various paths has to travel before reaching the detector. The
delay lines are an opto-mechanical system comprised of a set of mirrors, mounted
in carriages that move along a 60-metre-long track in the main tunnel. The light is
bounced back and forth between the mirrors, until the optical path difference is
equalised. As already alluded to, the path difference changes with the rotation of
the Earth, the distance between these mirrors must also change. This requires an
incredible precision in both the absolute position of the carriages and their motion
along the track (at a speed of 5 millimetres per second) to stabilise the optical path.
Thus the carriages must keep their position with an accuracy of 5 µm and the stability of the optical path must reach 14 nm1 over a period of 15 milliseconds. The position of the carriages is controlled by means of a laser. Equally stringent requirements
are put on the rails. In fact, the rails are laid in such a way that they compensate for
1	

50 nm root mean square (RMS) allowed for infrared observations.

352

Chapter III-15 ∙ First Fringes of the Phoenix

the curvature of the Earth over the track length of 60 metres. What ESO needed,
immodestly, could quite reasonably be described as the world’s most advanced (and
highest precision) electrical train!
≈
In March 1998, the contract for the delay lines was awarded to Fokker Space, originally a subsidiary of the renowned Dutch airplane manufacturer, while the optics were
done by the Netherlands Organisation for Applied Scientific Research (­Nederlandse
Organisatie voor toegepast-natuurwetenschappelijk onderzoek, TNO) Institute of
Applied Physics (TPD). In a very literal way, the VLTI was now put on track. Then, in
July, the head of the project team at ESO, Jean-Marie Mariotti, suffered an untimely
death after a short illness at the age of only 43. There is little doubt that, perhaps more
than anyone else, Mariotti would have wanted the VLTI project to succeed without
further delays, and so, shortly after this sad moment, ESO awarded its second major
contract for the VLTI for the delivery of two 1.8-metre movable Auxiliary Telescopes 2 to AMOS in Belgium3 . In the course of the VLT project AMOS had become
almost a “house supplier” to ESO, providing much highly specialised equipment.
AMOS stands for Advanced Mechanical and Optical Systems, but it had evolved
out of an old Liège company, Ateliers de la Meuse, in ­Belgium’s coal and steel heartland. Under the direction of Bill Collin since 1983, the company has worked with a
wide range of aerospace and astronomy projects and has built up considerable, and
possibly unique, expertise. As in the case of Schott and REOSC, the working relationship with ESO was excellent. It was driven by a high degree of professionalism,
openness — and, quite plainly — a great deal of enthusiasm, from Collin himself,
key members of his staff, such as Jean-Pierre Chisogne and Carlo Flebus, and all the
way to the factory floor. Even so, the 1.8-metre telescopes were undoubtedly a huge
and challenging task for this relatively small company. Readers will remember the
early days of La Silla, when the largest telescope was a 1.5-metre telescope. It was
housed in a huge building, several storeys high, topped by an impressive white dome.
The telescopes that AMOS were to deliver were not only quite a bit larger than this,
they would be extremely compact and able to move on tracks criss-crossing the telescope platform atop ­Paranal. They would carry with them the entire control electronics, service modules for cooling, air conditioning, auxiliary power, compressed air,
2	

The contract included an option for a third telescope, which was subsequently delivered. Eventually, in 2006 a
fourth telescope was delivered to ESO, thanks to a special contribution by Belgium, Italy and Switzerland.

3	

The original conceptual study had been carried out by IRAM in Grenoble.

353

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

etc. as well as the coudé optical systems; they were like snails, on the move with their
houses on their backs. But much faster. ­Repositioning a telescope would take less than
three hours. Thirty docking stations across the P
­ aranal platform offered access to the
underground tunnel system with its delay lines, allowing the telescope configuration
to be changed almost at will. Delivery in Europe of the first telescope was foreseen for
June 2001 with the first observations with two Auxiliary Telescopes (ATs) at P
­ aranal
to happen in early 2002 (Koehler, 1998). Optimism had returned to the VLTI project. In the end, perhaps there was a bit too much optimism. The final testing phase
in Europe took longer than anticipated. The treacherous issue of spherical aberration
that had plagued the Hubble Space Telescope was fresh in everyone’s memory. Elaborate matching tests were therefore caried out, but with an 11-mirror optical system
they obviously took time. Concerns regarding the optical path length stability had to
be addressed, and finally, the contract included tests “on the sky”. For that purpose
AMOS built a track on the factory premises, allowing a telescope to be rolled out for
observations. When that happened for the first time, the test team was in for a shock.
The telescope appeared to be dramatically out of the specifications in terms of image
quality. A visual inspection by Flebus and Koehler brought reassurance. After rolling
out the telescope, the operator had simply forgotten to disconnect the safety system
used during transport and to protect the primary mirror in case of earthquakes. Four
pads were holding the mirror, albeit in this safety position, not in the observational
mode. This was a benign reminder, so often necessary in complex, high-tech operations, of the importance of never letting the human factor get out of sight.
In March 2003, the preliminary acceptance of the first telescope happened in Europe
with delivery to P
­ aranal in October. By January 2004 the telescope was ready, but
awaiting its twin, which arrived towards the end of that year. During the night of
2–3 February 2005, they carried out their first observation. However, by that time,
the VLTI had already seen first light. First light? Without telescopes?
Aside from the work at AMOS and Fokker other activities had happened in Europe
relating to the project. A test camera, the VLTI Commissioning Instrument
(VINCI), had been built by the Observatoire de Paris-Meudon and software had
been written at the Observatoire de Toulouse. At the beginning of 2001 the camera
was in place at P
­ aranal, ready for the first fringes.
Meanwhile, the delay lines and other equipment were installed in the underground
tunnels and in the interferometric laboratory. Above ground, where the auxiliary telescopes would eventually be placed, two 40-centimetre siderostats placed 16 metres

354

Chapter III-15 ∙ First Fringes of the Phoenix

One of the VLTI siderostats. (Photo: Herbert Zodet)

apart, were used to collect the light and so, on 17 March 2001, at 22:00 local time,
the VLT Interferometer was used for the first time to carry out an astronomical
observation. The target was Sirius (Alpha Canis Majoris), which is the brightest star
in the sky, although it is in reality a double star, or binary as astronomers call them.
Considering the ups and downs of the VLTI project, it would be tempting to invoke
grandiose language, for it was — literally — the light at the end of the tunnel. Interferometry people, however, are more down to earth. In their world, it was merely
“first fringes”, which is not to suggest that they did not enjoy their triumph. Andreas
­Glindemann, who had succeeded Mariotti as head of the VLTI programme wrote:
“The tension was intense when starlight was guided for the first time from the primary
mirror of the siderostats, through the light ducts, the tunnel and the beam combination laboratory to the detector of VINCI. And, after a few nights, the result was spectacular. The very first result, the fringe pattern of Sirius… . This was a joyful moment
and the champagne corks were popping. But it was also a touching moment when we
kept a minute of silence remembering Jean-Marie Mariotti who was one of the fathers
of the VLTI and who died much too early three years ago.” (Glindemann et al., 2001).

355

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Celebrating the first fringes at the VLTI. From left to right: Pierre Kervella, Vincent Coudé du Foresto,
Philippe Gitton, Andreas Glindemann, Massimo Tarenghi, Anders Wallander, Roberto Gilmozzi,
Markus Schöller and Bill Cotton. (Photo: Bertrand Koehler)

In October, light from two of the Unit Telescopes (Antu and Melipal) was fed into
the coherent focus in an observation of Achernar (Alpha Eridani), a first magnitude
star. Critics may say that using two 8.2-metre telescopes to observe such a bright
object is curious, but it was the first time that the real VLTI came into operation,
and it was a success. Indeed, it seemed that now the time was ripe for the VLTI to
rise as a shining phoenix. One and a half years later, interferometric measurements
were conducted with different pairs of the four Unit Telescopes. This permitted the
use of different baselines and thus expanded the capability of the system. Towards
the end of 2002, MIDI, the MID-infrared Interferometric instrument (8–13 µm)
was also installed, allowing the combination of two beams, i.e. telescopes, but either
from the UTs — or from the Auxiliary Telescopes, although, as we have seen, at
the time they were still in the factory in Liège. November 2004 saw the first article
in Nature based on VLTI data. It was a study, performed with MIDI, of the innermost parts of protoplanetary discs around three very young stars, i.e. stars with ages
of less than 10 million years. Mere babies by astronomers’ standards. “The light from
two [VLT] 8.2-metre Unit Telescopes separated by 103 metres on the ground was combined, providing a spatial resolution of about 20 milliarcseconds. This corresponds to
1–2 astronomical units (AU) at the distance of the observed stars; an improvement of
more than a factor of ten in spatial resolution compared to the largest modern-day telescopes, in this wavelength regime.” the authors wrote (R. van Boekel et al., 2004).

356

Chapter III-15 ∙ First Fringes of the Phoenix

≈
In the preceding years, working in Nice, Serge Menardi had developed a prototype
fringe sensor unit, from which the FINITO fringe tracker emerged4 . A fringe tracker
is required for “long” integration times, i.e. beyond a few milliseconds. Observations
of faint objects, where collecting sufficient photons takes some time can only be done
with such a corrective system. The fringe tracker measures the optical path difference (OPD) to ensure the required stability of the system and thus reduces fringe
blur (Bonnet et al., 2006). It has been compared to a telescope autoguider or, perhaps
more appropriately, to an adaptive optics system5 that reduces image blur. When it
was installed in 2003, FINITO marked an important step forward in observational
capability. But it was a step that created major challenges. In fact, with FINITO came
the crisis, though not because it was a poor instrument. The ESO Annual Report of
2005 simply states that “FINITO was delivered in 2003, but fringe tracking could not
be demonstrated at commissioning.” Behind this simple, factual statement lay many
headaches. The problem was due to vibrations. For one and a half years, members
of the VLTI team, notably Martin Dümmler, Bertrand Bouvier and Henri B
­ onnet
worked on the issue. Furthermore, in 2005, ESO put together a tiger team to identify the sources of the vibrations. Step by step they located and removed the culprits:
high frequency vibrations from hydraulic pumps at the telescopes and instrument
ventilation systems. Other corrective actions included the elimination of minute
alignment errors of the delay line rails 6 .
While these problems were being dealt with, the VLTI instrumentation programme
continued. AMBER, the Astronomical Multiple BEam Recombiner, was delivered in
2003 and saw its first fringes in March 2004 with two Unit Telescopes. And by June,
a third Unit Telescope was added, following the installation of another delay line.
In February 2007, a section dedicated to AMBER science and featuring eleven articles, appeared in Astronomy & Astrophysics. The topics covered included observations of circumstellar discs around stars (in which planets may exist or be in formation) and studies of stars in their late evolutionary stages, amongst them Eta Carinae,
a star in the southern Milky Way that has held astronomers spellbound for decades and which, astronomers believe, may one day develop into a supernova. Optical
4



FINITO was originally supposed to become the first light instrument.

5	

Correcting for the first Zernike mode (piston), though not for higher-order distortion.

6



FINITO was finally offered for visiting astronomers in April 2007.

357

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

inteferometry had clearly moved out of the niche of measuring the diameters of a
few bright stars.
The last of the first generation VLTI instruments, PRIMA, the Phase Referenced
Imaging and Microarcsecond Astrometry facility, was delivered to ­­Paranal in July
2008 (van Belle et al., 2008) after eight years of development in an ESO-led collaboration with the Max-Planck-Institut für Extraterrestrische Physik and Max-PlanckInstitut für Astronomie, the Landessternwarte Heidelberg, the Observatoire de
Genève, the École Polytechnique Fédérale de Lausanne, the Institute of Microtechnology of N
­ euchâtel, the Laboratoire d’Astrophysique de l’Observatoire de Grenoble, and Leiden University (Universiteit Leiden). Other participants included TNO
and Thales Alenia Space. This list of partners illustrates not simply the complexity of
this technology and ESO’s role in harnessing expertise wherever it may be found, but
also how know-how from such highly specialised R&D efforts can percolate through
partnerships, thereby potentially finding new applications in other areas. PRIMA,
allows observations of much fainter objects and the simultaneous observations of two
objects separated in the sky, but perhaps most interesting, it would now become possible to reconstruct high-resolution images of objects in the sky by a technique that
astronomers call phase-referenced imaging. Obvious targets for PRIMA are detailed
studies of exoplanets that have been detected by radial velocity measurements, but
active galactic nuclei constitute an equally interesting area, as indeed do all areas in
need of ultra-high resolution imaging in the infrared domain.
We shall end our account of the VLTI here, but this does not mean that the VLTI
had reached a steady state. On the contrary, in 2005 two second generation VLTI
instruments were chosen at a workshop at ESO. As tradition has it, they will become
known by their acronyms, MATISSE and GRAVITY (General Relativity Analysis
via Vlt InTerferometrY), but there is every reason to believe that they will become
famous for the scientific results they will deliver 7.
Before we close this chapter, let us take a step back from technical details of our story.
Two statements mark the progression of the VLTI and both appear to be rather accurate. The first one is the remark by Woltjer, cited in Chapter III-11, about his low
7



MATISSE, the AperTure mid-Infrared SpectroScopic Experiment, is a second-generation version of MIDI
with extended wavelength coverage. Gravity could be seen as the successor to PRIMA, with a smaller field of
view, but a much improved resolution. This will make it ideal for detailed observations, e.g., of the innermost
regions surrounding the black hole at the centre of the Galaxy (Gillessen, 2010), where the gravitational field is
exremely intense, hence the name.

358

Chapter III-15 ∙ First Fringes of the Phoenix

“confidence in its early realisation” and the second one by Cesarsky at the beginning of
this chapter. The realisation of the VLTI was undoubtedly a major challenge, but it
also proved to be more than the icing on the cake or simply an elusive dream. First of
all it comes close to the ultimate engineering challenge. But this has been solved with
bravura, and the VLTI is delivering frontline science and the future plans show that
it is supported by a vibrant and enthusiastic research community. It may still not be
a routine mode of operation in the plug-and-play sense. But it has made great strides
forward towards that goal, and it has done so because of the systematic approach
that is enabled by the long-term funding and long-term planning that ESO can offer.
Andrea Richichi and Alan Moorwood expressed it this way: “It took the work of dozens of engineers and astronomers, a decade of planning, design and testing, hundreds of
thousands of lines of code, the (occasionally unorthodox) use of telescopes from 40 centimetres to 8.2 metres in diameter, and a lot of sweat in the dry P
­ aranal air… . It is
undeniable that the VLTI constitutes today the term of reference for interferometry, in
terms of sensitivity, angular resolution and accuracy.” (Richichi & Moorwood, 2006).

359

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Aerial view of ­Paranal. The volcano in the background is Llullaillaco. (Photo: Gerd Hüdepohl)

360

Chapter III-16

Not just a Telescope, an Observatory;
Not just an Observatory, a Home
“Although ideal for astronomical observations,
the site is hostile to human habitation
in that it is totally void of flora and fauna,
it is subjected to earthquakes and high wind velocities,
and the nearest water source is 130 km away.”
Report by COWI Consult, 1992.

O

ne of the more delightful aspects of flying from Santiago de Chile to ­Antofagasta
is the possibility of grabbing a right-hand side window seat, allowing an unforgettable view of the Andes chain including the Aconcagua, the highest mountain
in the Americas. Further north, just a few minutes before reaching Antofagasta, the
plane passes over the ­Paranal Observatory. The four enclosures that protect the 8.2metre Unit Telescopes stand out clearly against the desert background, their aluminium shielding sharply reflecting the rays from the Sun. Glittering jewels on the mountaintop indeed. A little to the southeast, the ­Paranal base camp can be seen. It is less
spectacular than the telescope buildings, yet it remains clearly visible in the crisp air.
Today, the telescopes are at the centre of everybody’s attention. But for many years,
the base camp was the place where things happened. As we have mentioned, P
­ aranal
lies in a deserted area. Before ESO’s site search began, few people, if any, will have
walked the slopes or rested at the top to enjoy the breathtaking view of the Pacific
Ocean, or perhaps looked towards the east, where the towering volcano Llullaillaco
resides, 200 kilometres away, on the Argentine border. Establishing an astronomical observatory in this location was a dream, but also a logistical nightmare. Everything, including water, had to be brought to the site — normally from Antofagasta
— over a primitive desert track.
The civil engineering planning for the observatory began in 1990. For the purpose,
ESO placed a contract with COWI Consulting Engineers in Denmark to develop

361

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the concept for the entire infrastructure. Clearly a functional observatory comprises
much more than telescopes and advanced instruments such as those that we have
previously described in this book. The facilities included mechanical and electronic
workshops; facilities for the supply of electrical power, compressed air, cooling liquid, and communications; a mirror maintenance building; a large warehouse (in the
Spanish-tinged ESO tradition described as the Bodega), accommodation for staff
and, of course, the necessary roads1. Jens Kierstein Hansen led the work for COWI,
while the ESO team comprised Lorenzo Zago, Marco Quattri, Jörg Eschwey and
Peter de Jonge. Sustainable energy sources were originally considered for the power
supply: after all, it is hard to find any place on the surface of this planet with more
sunshine than P
­ aranal. Wind is also abundant. However, the solution turned out to
be too expensive for ESO and consequently the idea of “the Green Observatory in
the Desert”, as it was described, was abandoned. Early plans for a hotel also had to
be shelved due to the budget problems that emerged around 1993.
As mentioned in Chapter III-I, on-site work began in September 1991. At the time,
the base camp, 300 metres below the summit, comprised a mere nine containers
including two bathrooms. With time the camp was first expanded and then supplemented by a separate camp for the contractor staff. At its peak the work force
reached about 600 people.
By 1997 the financial situation at ESO, though still strained, allowed the issue of
accommodation at ­Paranal to be revisited. Clearly, the conditions of the container
village were not such that this could be permanent solution, even if it had been the
only option for many years. The idea of a hotel — or Residencia as ESO preferred to
call it 2 — which had been part of the original plan for P
­ aranal was revived. In late
1997, following a pre-selection process involving more than 30 architectural companies, ESO invited nine companies to present their proposals for adequate accommodation facilities at ­Paranal. One of the companies that decided to respond to ESO’s
call for proposals was Auer+Weber in Munich. Like the other invited bidders, the
company sent an architect, in this case Dominik Schenkirz, to Chile shortly before
Christmas 1997.

1	

In addition, around 1996/97, a visitors’ centre for the public was added to the observatory.

2	

ESO had traditionally spoken about its hotel at La Silla, only to see it entered into various popular tourist guides
and, consequently, having to deal with the understandable disappointment of tourists trying to book rooms at
La Silla.

362

Chapter III-16 ∙ Not just a Telescope, an Observatory;
Not just an Observatory, a Home

The ­Paranal base camp, photographed in December 1997. The tall building to the left is the mirror maintenance building with the aluminising plant. To the right of the MMB is the warehouse. The low container
complex in the front is the power plant. Note also the VLT M1 transport container. (Photo: Herbert Zodet)

Schenkirz was fascinated by the pristine landscape and felt that any conventional
multi-storey building would look awkward and ill-placed in this meagre environment with its stark, almost graphical contours and intense colours. Returning to
Munich, in just three weeks he and Phillip Auer came up with an astounding solution: bury the building in the ground. The result was an L-shaped building that effectively only has a single façade, overlooking a depression in the landscape, but also
offering a view towards the Pacific Ocean. There were several advantages to this concept: the underground placement made the building energy-friendly, offered protection from the wind and addressed the problem of light pollution — the old enemy
of optical astronomy — while at the same time creating a completely self-contained
environment, agreeable to human beings. The raw concrete walls coloured with an
iron-oxide pigmentation, created a gentle, yet desert-like sensation. In contrast, an
internal tropical garden under a 35-metre glass dome overlooked a blue swimming
pool, as an attractive optical centrepiece, but also an effective means of keeping the

363

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

humidity at an acceptable level of 35%, as opposed to the extreme dryness of the outside. The shallow glass dome, the only feature of the Residencia visible on arrival at
­Paranal, led the thoughts in the direction of an observatory. The building both stood
in contrast to the harsh desert environment (and therefore offered mental relief for
its inhabitants), yet was in complete harmony with the surroundings. It was both a
signature building and a low-cost project, providing attractive living quarters of 108
individual bedrooms, meeting facilities, a restaurant, recreational areas and, in general, a place for social interaction amidst the natural isolation dictated by the desert.
It was, in short, a winning proposal. This was at least what the selection team, comprised of Massimo Tarenghi, Daniel Hofstadt and José Manuel Soares, a Portuguese
architect and advisor, felt. Giacconi went along with the proposal and in June 1999,
Council gave its blessing to the project. Construction began towards the end of the
year and the building was completed in 2001. Fittingly, for a building that aims to
be a self-contained oasis in the Atacama Desert, the unique interior furnishing and
decoration was done by the Chilean architect Paula Gutierrez. The reception area
also features two mixographias by Roberto Matta, the Chilean painter, philosopher
and poet.

The 167-metre-long façade of the Residencia faces the Pacific Ocean with its impressive sunsets that makes
the ferrous oxide pigmented concrete walls glow. The building covers a total of 12 000 square metres. It was
constructed by the Chilean company Vial y Vives at a total cost of 12 million euros. (Photo: Gerd Hüdepohl)

364

Chapter III-16 ∙ Not just a Telescope, an Observatory;
Not just an Observatory, a Home

As time would show, it fulfilled its purpose perfectly. More surprising, perhaps,
was that the building, so isolated and available exclusively to ESO staff and official visitors, would catch the attention of the outside world. But it did. In 2004, the
architects received the Premio Internazionale Dedalo Minosse alla Commitenza di
Achittetura, and the Leaf award in two categories (“New Buildings” and “Overall”).
In 2009, Jonathan Glancey,
architecture and design writer
for the UK broadsheet newspaper The Guardian, placed
it on the list of top ten buildings of the decade. Numerous
articles in professional journals
and popular magazines — from
­Wallpaper, Casabella, Bauwelt,
Via Arquitectura, Opus C to
BMW ­Magazin, the ­Lufthansa
in-flight magazine and many
others — reported on the ESO
Residencia and, as we shall
return to in Chapter IV-10, the
The cupola covering the tropical garden stands out against the
building featured in the 2008
sunset sky. The rectangular structure provided a huge design
James Bond movie under the
challenge in view of the requirements for earthquake resistance. (Photo: Peter Gray)
name La Perla de las Dunas.

365

Part IV:
Towards New Horizons

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Artist’s impression, created in 2003, of ALMA.
(Image by Herbert Zodet)

368

Chapter IV-1

ALMA
“It is the observation of [the] southern molecular clouds
that have shaped much of the millimetre radio astronomy,
yet we persist in observing them from the northern hemisphere
through many air masses of atmospheric attenuation.”
Roy Booth, 1994.

A

t the beginning of this book we briefly reviewed the status of astronomy in the
mid-1950s. Since then — and now approaching the turn of the millennium —
much had happened. One of the most important developments in the meantime was
the “opening” of the electromagnetic spectrum, i.e. the possibility to observe celestial
objects at practically all wavelengths. For example, observing an object in the shortwavelength high-energy domain yields different information from looking at it in
the optical band of visible light or in the infrared. Each waveband is like one chapter
of a book: to understand the book as a whole, one needs to read all the chapters. In
this case, the information gathered would constitute what could be called the Great
Book of the Universe. The opening up of the spectrum was greatly facilitated by the
possibility of using space-borne observing platforms, as the Earth’s atmosphere is
opaque to much of the radiation that arrives from deep space. This is fortuitous, since
much of this radiation — gamma rays, X-rays and ultraviolet radiation is dangerous
for life. In this sense the terrestrial atmosphere acts as a protective wall for us. At the
same time, this wall has windows that also allow us to peer into the depths of space
from the ground. Conveniently, one such window is in the wavelength domain that
we call visible light. Other windows allow longer wavelengths to reach us, notably
in the radio domain. In between, there are further rather narrow windows, which
nonetheless provide interesting possibilities for the study of celestial objects and help
enrich our understanding of their nature and the physical processes that go on inside
them. Astronomers call one such window submillimetre and millimetre astronomy
(itself divided into a number of subwindows), after the wavelengths in question, i.e.
from about 0.3 millimetres to 3.5 millimetres. The domain is also described by the

369

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

frequency range 84–960 GHz1. Submillimetre and millimetre astronomy has often
been described as the astronomy of the cold Universe.
Thermal emission from all cold objects is at far infrared or submillimetre wavelengths.
But in a wider context, it is the study of origins. There are a number of particularly
interesting research areas linked to this specific wavelength domain. At the near end
of the cosmic distance scale, trying to understand the formation of stars and planets
still raises many questions. Stars are formed inside dense clouds of gas and dust that
literally shroud the birth process. Visible light cannot penetrate these dense clouds.
Infrared radiation can do so to some extent, but even longer wavelengths allow us to
see right into the heart of the clouds and thus to study what happens on these stellar
maternity wards. In Chapter III-8, we have already alluded to this. Submillimetre
and millimetre wavelengths are also suitable for mapping clouds of complex molecules, the presence of which has
been verified in the interstellar
medium in the Milky Way. At
the far end of the distance scale,
submillimetre and millimetre
astronomy enable us to observe
distant galaxies in their early
stages. As these remote galaxies formed after the Big Bang
strong ultraviolet radiation
from young stars heated the
interstellar dust. This energy
was subsequently re-emitted
This drawing shows the transparency/opaqueness of the atmosin the infrared, but due to the
phere to electromagnetic radiation from outer space. The border indicates the 50% transparency level. The atmospheric
redshift, the wavelengths have
windows that can be explored from the ground are clearly visstretched and this ancient sigible in the optical, near infared, submillimetre and millimetre
nal can now be observed in the
wavelengths as well as in the longer frequency radio domain
(after Pasachoff, 1979).
millimetre domain.
VISIBLE LIGHT

ULTRAVIOLET
X RAYS

GAMMA RAYS

INFRARED

RADIO WAVES

ALTITUDE (KILOMETRES)

150
140
130
120
110
100
90
80
70

60
50
40
30
20

10
0

10–4 10–3 10–2 10–1

1

101

102

103

10–4 10–3 10–2 10–1

WAVELENGTH (ANGSTROMS)

1

10

102

103 104

WAVELENGTH (CENTIMETRES)

≈
In the late 1960s and early 1970s, there were relatively few astronomers interested in
submillimetre astronomy and this research area was most certainly a niche a­ ctivity.
1	

The frequency coverage of ALMA.

370

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

Lacking dedicated telescopes for this wavelength domain, submillimetre astronomers
in the southern hemisphere had therefore to resort to using optical telescopes. As early
as 1978 Thijs de Graauw had used a 1 millimetre receiver on the 3.6-metre telescope.
Later, in 1981–1983, de Graauw’s group used CAT for millimetre-wave observations 2 .
Tom Wilson had also measured carbon monoxide (CO) at a wavelength of 2.6 millimetres using the 3.6-metre telescope. The 1-metre telescope has also been used in this
way. It was obvious that this hardly constituted an optimal way of using these telescopes as can be seen in a 1985 article in The ESO Messenger, appearing under the title
“Of Pearls and Swine”: “Who would play a Stradivari violin at a country dance? Or who
would mix very old Scotch with Coca-Cola? Not us. But we do things that look equally
improper in the eyes of many astronomers… .” (Krügel & Schulz, 1985) But relief was
on the way. Back in 1986/1987, ESO had expanded its telescope park at La Silla to
include a submillimetre telescope, the 15-metre Swedish–ESO Submillimetre Telescope (SEST), which we have already mentioned. Among other things, it had mapped
CO emission in the Magellanic Clouds3 , observed carbon monoxide molecules in the
expanding shells around carbon stars and scanned low-mass star-­forming regions. Sitting at the far end of the southern flank of La Silla, this telescope had rendered good
service to the scientific community but given the rapid expansion of the research field,
it was slowly becoming dated. More importantly, the move towards larger optical telescopes with their improved imaging capabilities drove forward the development of
submillimetre telescopes that would give a similar performance. But we once again
remember that image resolution depends not only on the size of the telescope mirror
but also on the wavelength. Achieving the same resolving power in the longer wavelength domain would therefore require significantly larger telescopes — or antennas
as they are also called. This could not realistically be achieved with a single dish, but
called for an array of several, interconnected telescopes.
In 1991 the SEST community began to think about an interferometer. The original idea focussed on placing an additional telescope on a hill adjacent to the SEST
site at La Silla, an idea that was discussed at a meeting of the SEST User Group at
ESO in May. According to the subsequent report in The ESO Messenger, “a lively
2	

These observations also allowed the sky transmission in this wavelength domain to be assessed and paved the
way for the later deployment of the SEST. “La Silla appears to be a good site for millimetre-wave observations, with
230 GHz transmissions very often between 80% and 90%,” a report in The ESO Messenger said (Brand, 1982).
As it turned out, La Silla was also a good site for higher frequency (shorter wavelength) observations down to
about 1 millimetre (299 GHz).

3	

A key programme carried out by Marc Kutner, Monica Rubio, Roy Booth, François Boulanger, Thijs de Graauw,
Guido Garay, Frank Israel, Lars Johansson, James Lequeux and Lars-Åke Nyman.

371

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

d­ iscussion … followed on the idea of a millimetre-wave interferometer at P
­ aranal, introduced and stimulated by a talk by R. Booth which outlined a possible concept consisting of 10 metre × 8 metre antennas… . He considered that such an array could be built
for about 50 million deutschmarks and suggested that we in Europe should consider
ways of raising money in order to achieve a useful millimetre array on ­Paranal as soon
as possible.” (Shaver & Booth, 1991). Booth and his colleagues contacted Harry van
der Laan, who had taken over as Director General of ESO. Van der Laan reacted
positively, but cautiously, to their ideas suggesting that a study group, with Booth as
chairman, should be established to consider the issue. The first meeting of the group
took place at IRAM in December of that year. During the meeting, news broke of the
detection by American astronomers 4 of carbon monoxide with a redshift of 2.3. The
news was a bombshell. Never before had CO been detected at this distance. The prospect was that it might be possible to study CO emission (and other kinds of atomic
and molecular emission), not just from the Milky Way, but also from distant objects.
This would give new insights into the conditions in the early Universe, including star
formation and chemical enrichment of the interstellar medium in early epoch galaxies. It would, however, require much more collecting area and also better resolution
than hitherto envisaged — inspiring the participants to think along grander lines,
notably in terms of an array with a collecting area of 7000–10 000 square metres.
New facilities in the millimetre domain were not only on the wish list of European
astronomers. US plans for a major new millimetre array (MMA) began in the early
1980s, but in the course of developing ideas for the project, it became clear that the
funding body (NSF) wished to see international partners involved. In Japan astronomers also began to make plans for a similar facility.
In Europe, Booth’s working group began to draw up plans for what they called the
Large Southern Array (LSA). In May 1994 the ESO STC gave its blessing to ESO
involvement, leading to a collaboration between ESO, IRAM, the Onsala Space
Observatory and the Netherlands Foundation for Research in Astronomy (Shaver
& Booth, 1998)5 . The agreement led to the establishment of a formal LSA Study
Group that presented its findings in 1997. The report suggested either an array of
40 8-metre antennas and 25 to 35 15-metre antennas or an homogeneous array of 50
4	

Bob Brown and Paul Vanden Bout.

5	

Later, CNRS, the Max-Planck-Gesellschaft, the Nederlandse Onderzoekschool Voor Astronomie (NOVA), the
UK Particle Physics and Astronomy Research Council (PPARC), the Swedish Natural Science Research Council (Naturvetenskapliga forskningsrådet, NFR) and, finally, the Instituto Geográfico Nacional of Spain joined
the European partnership.

372

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

to 60 antennas of about 12 metres in diameter (Grewing & Guilloteau, 1997). But
why in Chile? Of course the involvement of ESO might seem to make this a natural
choice, but, as for optical ground-based astronomy, the selection of the right site is
critical to scientific success. The southern hemisphere provided observational access
to the centre of the Milky Way — a key reason for ESO’s presence in the first place
— but the dryness of the Atacama Desert, especially the options of high sites with
sufficient space, would prove to be even more decisive in choosing a location for millimetre astronomy than for the optical case.
And so, the search for a site began. La Silla was no longer under consideration, and
neither was P
­ aranal. The choice was also linked to progress in receiver technology,
which made it realistic to study the sky at frequencies approaching 1 THz, albeit
only from a high altitude site. The ambitions of the community, keen to observe in
the high frequency bands, had been awakened. Because of the relationship between
atmospheric transparency and elevation in this wavelength domain, there are rather
stiff requirements for a ground-based observational site. A dry (in terms of column
density water vapour above the telescopes), high altitude site with a flat area for
extended array deployment was needed and, for obvious logistical reasons, so was reasonably easy access to the area. This pointed towards sites on the Altiplano, the area
that straddles the borders between Chile, Peru, Argentina and Bolivia.
One person at ESO had a particularly well-developed knowledge of Chile’s II Region,
Angel Otárola. He had trained as an engineer and joined the SEST team in September 1990 as a SEST operator. Before that, however, as a student he had worked
with German geodesists in establishing the very first GPS network in Chile to study
the dynamics of the Andes range. Together with Lars Baath (of the Onsala Space
Observatory), he undertook a first exploration to the area in 1991. He also assisted
the early Japanese site search conducted by the Nobeyama Radio Observatory and
led by N
­ aomasa Nakai. These early efforts also involved Wolfgang Wild and Nick
­W hyborn. In May 1993, a small team comprising Kimiaki Kawara, Nagayoshi
Ohashi from Japan, Whyborn and Otárola, reached the Chajnantor area, although
snow prevented them from fully exploring the site.
US astronomers had already looked at sites in the southwest of the continental USA,
Hawaii (Mauna Kea), and then in Chile 6 . In April 1994, a search party from the US
6	

They were not alone. Since 1992 Japanese astronomers had carried out tests at various sites in northern Chile for
their Large Millimeter Array. By 1997, Chajnantor had also emerged as the site of choice for the Japanese project.

373

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

National Radio Astronomy Observatory visited the highest sites surveyed by the
Harvard Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics (CfA) for the SMA 7. The most remote
of the sites visited by the team, and the only site close to comparable to Chajnantor,
was near the border town of Ollagüe, “where the train once stopped as it went from
Calama, Chile, to La Paz, Bolivia”, as Paul Vanden Bout, director of the NRAO, later
recalled. Chajnantor was not on the list. The high ground near Chajnantor was visited at the end of the trip, “partly by intent and partly as an excuse to see San Pedro de
Atacama”. Otárola, who was part of the team, had suggested a closer look at Chajnantor area. It appeared to be a good place, offering a huge plain for the array and an elevation that would allow observations in the high frequency (submillimetre) domain.
Following further trips to the area NRAO therefore began site testing in 1995.

Site testing at Pampa de Pajonales. Standing in front of the container and the photovoltaic modules that
provided power to the interferometer and 183 GHz water vapour radiometer (left to right): Lars-Åke
Nyman, Daniel Hofstadt, Angel Otárola and Peter Shaver. (Courtesy: Angel Otárola)

ESO had considered a site at a somewhat lower elevation of 3800 metres above sea
level (msl) at Pampa Pajonales, southeast of the Llullaillaco volcano. This site met
7	

The Submillimeter Array (SMA) is a radio interferometer with eight antennas, operated by the Smithsonian
Astrophysical Observatory and the Academia Sinica Institute of Astronomy and Astrophysics. It was eventually placed on Mauna Kea in Hawaii.

374

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

the requirements for observations in the millimetre domain, but was problematic for
higher frequencies. The site-testing team included Angel Otárola, Roberto Rivera
Maita, Guillermo Delgado and Lars-Åke Nyman. By 1998, it had become clear that
the American and European (as well as the Japanese) projects were likely to merge
and that a site would be needed that allowed for higher frequency observations. The
partners homed in on the plateau at Chajnantor.

For a while, La Casa de Don Tomás, a typical hotel in San Pedro de Atacama, became the central operating point for ALMA activities. This picture, taken in 1997, shows preparations for a visit to the Chajnantor
Plateau. (Courtesy: Lars-Åke Nyman)

At the beginning of June 1998, the joint Onsala–ESO site-testing group deployed a
weather station, two interferometers and water vapour radiometers on Chajnantor
to test its suitability for submillimetre astronomy (Otárola et al., 1998).
≈
The prospect of major ESO involvement in a non-optical ground-based astronomy
project was not welcomed by everyone in the ESO community. Although the ESO
Convention simply uses the term astronomy — thus enabling the organisation to
undertake activities in all spectral domains that can be exploited from Earth —
many had come to perceive ESO as an optical astronomers’ club and saw this development as a paradigm shift. While many saw the new initiative as an important
and very positive step, others considered it as a distraction from what they thought
should be ESO’s focus. For Giacconi, the case was clear: he had himself been involved
with X-ray astronomy, gamma-ray astronomy and optical astronomy…, “For me, it’s
all astronomy,” he said, but there were other reasons as well. It would certainly take

375

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

a while before the next optical project reached maturity and ESO wanted to retain
the unique project expertise it had acquired in the course of VLT project. Furthermore, Giacconi realised that a joint US/Japanese project might become a reality and
he did not want Europe to be excluded. At the summer meeting of the ESO Council
on 4–5 June 1997 the topic of ESO participation in the LSA and options for international cooperation were discussed. The meeting concluded that ESO should continue with “exploratory talks … on an international level”.
Giacconi did not sit on his hands. On 25–26 June 1997, with a European delegation8 — he and Paul Vanden Bout, also with a delegation, met at the NRAO headquarters in Charlottesville, Virginia, to discuss the possibility of merging the two
projects. The advantages seemed clear and by the coffee break the major items were
resolved, paving the way for a joint document. The basic elements of the paper were
to work towards a joint project of 64 12-metre antennas, located at a high (submillimetre-friendly) Chilean site, funded on a 50/50 basis by Europe and the US. There
was also a pledge to begin negotiations with Japan and an understanding that ESO
and NRAO would do the job, hence no new organisation was to be created. Given
the somewhat ad hoc nature of the meeting, however, it wasn’t clear whether the document could be signed on the spot and both realised that the difficulty. Giacconi
said: “Paul, I don’t know if you can sign this paper, but I am almost certain that I can’t.
So why don’t we do it!” And so they did. ALMA had been conceived 9, 10 . Surely not
the first child to be conceived without the explicit prior consent of its grandparents!
The ESO Council acquiesced. The LSA and MMA projects established joint working groups to set out the basic parameters, including the issue of wavelength (or frequency) coverage, the question of a homogeneous or an inhomogeneous antenna
array, how the project could be organised, and finally, a costing. Their proposals
were endorsed by NRAO and the LSA consortium in November 1997. In June 1998,
at the meeting that also celebrated the VLT first light, the ESO Council endorsed
the outcome of the LSA/MMA studies and “request[ed] the executive to continue
8	

The delegation comprised Torben Andersen, Roy Booth, Riccardo Giacconi, Michael Grewing, Stephane
­Guilloteau, Karl Menten, Dietmar Plathner, Peter Shaver, and François Viallefond.

9	

After the meeting, one of the American participants, Ed Churchwell, noted: “Although there are outstanding
unresolved questions, I believe that this was a watershed meeting… .”

10	

The name, however, was only decided in March 1999 at a meeting at ESO between NSF, ESO and a UK
­delegation. It concluded an elaborate selection process, with more than 30 options, organised by Bob Brown.
He also presented the choices to the participants. “The committee, in silence, stared at the list on the projector
screen for what seemed to me to be several minutes. Finally, Ian Corbett said ‘A LMA is the best. I like acronyms I
can pronounce’,” Brown later recalled. The committee agreed.

376

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

LSA/MMA studies and develop a proposal for the design and implementation ‘of a large
­mm/sub-mm array’ in Chile to be submitted to Council in June 1999.” It also appointed
a negotiating team “to enter into discussions with NRAO and NSF to study the conditions of a union of the LSA and MMA into a single common project… .”
≈
The European LSA project, now expected to merge with the MMA, was supported
by several organisations in Europe, rather than just by ESO. The European scientific
community of millimetre/submillimetre astronomers were somewhat fragmented
at this time. France, Germany and Spain had come together in support for IRAM
and naturally saw this organisation as their main facility. British and Dutch astronomers used the James Clerk Maxwell Telescope (JCMT) in Hawaii and had strong
links with the US, which had facilities such as the Owens Valley Radio Observatory in California, at the time with an array of six ten-metre antennas. It is therefore
not surprising that discussions took place at several levels and in several groupings,
sometimes even in parallel. With the UK still not a member of ESO, Ian Corbett of
PPARC coordinated a series of meetings among funding agencies at INSU in Paris.
The meetings began in 1998, but ceased with the formation of the European ALMA
Coordination Committee and the ALMA Committees with the US and Canada
(Corbett, 2011). This notwithstanding, at the extraordinary ESO Council meeting
in September 1998, it became clear that several countries 11 had made their support for
the new project conditional on it being implemented through ESO. At the meeting,
the ESO Member States made a commitment to channel the funds for their participation into a possible joint project through ESO. At a follow-up meeting in September, a European Co-ordination Committee (ECC) “to direct the European effort” as
well as European Negotiating Team (representing the prospective funding partners)
were established. Furthermore a European Science Advisory Committee, chaired by
Karl Menten, was set up, and the first key personnel were recruited (Shaver & Kurz,
1999). Stephane Guilloteau became the European project scientist and ­R ichard
Kurz, who had joined ESO in March 1998 from a position as project manager of
the Gemini project, became the European project manager. On his watch work began
in preparation for the initial phase of the joint project together with his US counterpart Bob Brown. At the same time, the European effort had to be streamlined.
Many institutes were keen to participate in the project. At one point, the number
approached 25, but the individual contributions were almost exclusively in-kind and
11	

Belgium, Denmark, the Netherlands, Sweden and Switzerland.

377

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

varied considerably in scope. Patchwork solutions, it seems, are often the ­outcome
in European scientific collaborations and they can be very successful. Nonetheless
for a joint project of this scale and scope, this was hardly a sustainable solution.
In the end, the agreement for the three-year design and development phase (Phase
One) was signed by only seven European organisations, whilst NSF signed for the
American side. The agreement was sealed at a ceremony at the NSF Headquarters in­
Arlington, Virginia, on 10 June 199912 .
≈
Before we move on, we need to address the issue of terminology. So far this book has
used the language of optical astronomers. Optical astronomers use telescopes, radio
astronomers usually talk about antennas, optical astronomers observe in wavelength
domains or bands, radio astronomers prefer to talk about frequencies. Unsurprisingly, when dealing with ALMA, we encounter new technical terms. The main components of ALMA are the antennas, the “front ends”, the “back ends” and the correlator. The front ends include the receivers and the associated cryogenic casings — in
other words what optical astronomers would call the detectors. The back ends are
the systems that digitise (and otherwise process) the radio signals before they are fed
into the correlator, which is effectively a supercomputer. In simple terms the correlator has the same function as the coherent focus of the VLTI — it is where the signals
from all the telescopes (or antennas) are brought together in phase.
≈
One of the key elements of the development phase was the procurement of two prototype antennas, with each partner ordering one. Even uninitiated readers will be
aware that radio dishes are hardly a new and untested developments. But, just as we
have seen in the case of optical telescopes, because ALMA was about doing new science, the requirements for the ALMA antennas were much stricter than for existing
telescopes. This pertained to the accuracy of the surface of the antenna dish, to the
precise pointing accuracy of the antenna, and to the ability to carry out fast switching

12	

Astronomers in Japan had also been thinking about a major project, called the Large Millimetre and Submillimetre Array (LMSA). In 1998, they decided to work towards a merger with the LSA/MMA projects. In parallel
to the ALMA Phase One Agreement, a joint Europe-US-Japan resolution was therefore signed at the meeting.
At the time, it was thought that this would lead to an array of no less than 96 antennas. In a separate development Canada joined the partnership in 2002 under the umbrella of the NSF.

378

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

between the source being observed and a calibration field13 , among other things. Furthermore — since the antennas were supposed to operate in the open air without a
protecting dome — it was also clear that the extreme conditions to be expected at the
Chajnantor Plateau with intense solar irradiation, strong winds, swift temperature
changes and so forth placed demanding technical requirements on the telescope. For
their prototype, the Americans selected Vertex RSI as the contractor. Established in
1963 in Duisburg (Germany) as Krupp Antennentechnik 14 , it had been taken over
by Vertex RSI, an American company, in 1993. It was undoubtedly a prudent choice,
since Vertex RSI was considered not just a very experienced company, but certainly
one of the world-leaders in the antenna market.
Like the Americans, ESO issued a call for tender. At ESO, Torben Andersen15 , who
had also been involved in the 32-metre EISCAT antenna at Spitsbergen, had developed a first design back in 1997. His suggestions were complemented by contributions from IRAM, notably by Dietmar Plathner (who had worked for ESO in the
1970s), but also by David Woody from Caltech. All this work resulted in a pre-design
that served to guide the bidders. Among these was the Italian company EIE 16 in
­Mestre. EIE had not built antennas before, but their proposal was innovative, making
extensive use of carbon fibre and also proposing direct drive systems for the antennas,
similar to those that had been successfully used for the NTT and VLT projects. EIE
had been involved in both projects and ESO had confidence in the company and its
engineering skills. The estimated weight of the antenna was 43 tonnes17, considerably less than half of the Vertex antenna and possibly with better dynamical characteristics. Selecting them would provide a real technological alternative to the Vertex
antenna. It is worth pointing out that the thinking behind the choice of two prototypes was not simply that one might prove superior to the other, but rather that it
might be possible to combine the best of both solutions for the full array. Both contracts were awarded in February 2000.
13	

We have already seen this mode of observation used in the infrared, with a chopping secondary. In the case of
the ALMA antennas the requirement was that the antenna dish should be able to move two degrees and settle
down again, ready for observations within just 1.5 seconds.

14	

The location of this company is hardly a coincidence, given the presence of the Max-Planck-Institut für
­R adioastronomie in the region. Over the years, Vertex had supplied a number of antennas to radio astronomy
observatories (Effelsberg, Pico Valeta, etc.) (Menten, 2009).

15	

Together with Franz Koch and Niels Jessen (from the Risø National Laboratory).

16	

In partnership with the company Costamasnaga s.r.l..

17	

The final mass of the antenna after design modifications grew to about 78 tonnes, still significantly less than the
competing design.

379

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Another key aspect of Phase One was to put together the European contribution
to the project beyond the development of a prototype antenna. Important elements
were software development — the primary software development was done by ESO
but important contributions were made by the UK Astronomy Technology Centre
and IRAM — and the assignment of receiver bands. As we have mentioned the wavelength domain offers a number of narrow windows — or bands — in which observations can be conducted from the ground. The ALMA project aimed at covering
no less than ten bands, although not all would be available to astronomers from the
start. The individual receiver bands were given numbers. Accordingly, band 1 covers
31–45 GHz, band 2 67–90 GHz, band 3 covers the frequency range 84–119 GHz
(3.5–2.5 mm wavelength)18 , band 4 125–163 GHz, band 5 163–211 GHz, band
6 211–275 GHz, band 7 275–370 GHz, band 8 385–500 GHz, band 9 602–720
GHz and band 10 787–950 GHz. The European participants agreed to cover bands
7 (1.1–0.8 mm wavelength) and 9 (0.5–0.4 mm wavelength), reflecting the scientific
interests of the European scientific community. The Rutherford Appleton Laboratory in Didcot, UK (RAL) and Chalmers later agreed to also cover band 519 . IRAM
was tasked with developing the receiver for band 7; NOVA/SRON took on band 9,
while RAL developed the cryostat. Important work under Phase One also included
correlator development activities carried out by Alain Baudry and his team at the
Université de Bordeaux together with the Dutch ASTRON.
≈
In parallel, preparations for the construction phase, Phase Two, were going forward.
At the June 2002 meeting in London, the ESO Council formally approved “European participation through ESO in the baseline Bilateral ALMA Phase II at the 50%
level”. It was not common practice at ESO to move from one project phase to the
next before the first finished. But speed was of the essence because of the character
of the ALMA partnership.

18	

The lowest frequency band to be implemented initially. The other early bands are 5, 6, 7 and 9.

19	

This frequency band is rather difficult because of atmospheric water vapour, but ALMA observations in this
band offer interesting synergies with the ESA cornerstone mission Herschel, flying at the same time as the
early operational phase of ALMA. Because of its experimental nature, but also because it was not part of the
rebaselined ALMA, only six receivers were foreseen in the so-called ALMA enhancement programme, financed
through the European Commission’s 6th Framework Programme. Later it was decided to equip all antennas
with band 5 receivers.

380

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

On 25 February 2003, Catherine Cesarsky and Rita Colwell 20 , signed the agreement
on behalf of ESO and Spain, and the US National Science Foundation (NSF) and the
National Research Council of Canada, respectively 21. The third partner, Japan, was
not able to join the agreement at the time and so within the ALMA community this
historic document became known simply as the bilateral agreement. The joint ESO/
NSF press release was naturally more upbeat: “Green Light for World’s Most Powerful
Radio Observatory” it announced. The cost of “650 million euros (or US d­ ollars),” as
the text said (reflecting the euro/dollar exchange rate at the time), “ is shared equally
between the two partners”. It is worth reflecting on this. There had been many scientific collaborations between Europe and the US, but this may have been the first
major project — at least in astronomy — in which Europe was not the junior partner.
As already foreseen in the original concept, the antennas could be moved between
225 stations 22 . They could be placed in different configurations, either spreading
out over a distance of 16 kilometres on the Chajnantor Plateau or in more compact
mode23 , with the signals being sent by fibre optic links to the correlator. We recognise the idea of movable telescopes from the VLTI Auxiliary Telescopes, though in
the case of ALMA, the concept is taken to a much larger scale24 . The ALMA Observatory would be operated from the ALMA Operations Support Facility (OSF) at an
elevation of 2900 metres. ESO committed itself to providing half of the antennas, the
cryostats for all the front ends, the receivers for two bands, substantial work on the
back end as well as software. Further ESO deliverables included computers, parts of
the correlator, the antenna transporters, the preliminary base camp, the OSF and the
power station as well as sufficiently wide access roads from the public road between
San Pedro de Atacama and Toconao and between the OSF and the high site, all in
all a distance of 47 kilometres.
The testing of the first prototype started in April 2003. The site in Socorro, New
­Mexico, is well known to radio astronomers. It is the home of the Very Large Array
radio telescope (VLA). To the ALMA project it became known as the ALMA test
20	

By proxy.

21	

The agreement foresaw that ESO would act as the sole European partner, although it would work with the institutes in Europe that had been involved so far. On the North American side, the practical implementation would
be entrusted to the NRAO, which itself was managed by Associated Universities Inc. (AUI). In 2006 Japan
(with Taiwan) became full members of the partnership with the signing of a tri-partite agreement.

22	

The number was reduced to 196 as part of the descoping that also led to a reduction in the number of antennas.

23	

In the compact configuration, the antennas are located with separations of only 15 metres.

24	

Of course movable antennas were nothing new in radio astronomy.

381

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

facility (ATF). The first antenna to be mounted at the ATF was the Vertex antenna.
What had by now become known as the “European antenna” 25 was running late;
some necessary design changes had become apparent and the original EIE partner
company Costamasnaga had been forced to file for bankruptcy. Finding a new partner and finalising the necessary agreements had taken the better part of a year, but
a new consortium was eventually established between EIE and Alcatel Space Industries of France. In May 2003, the European antenna was finally ready for shipment
to the US. In order to save time it was decided to ship key parts of it by plane into
New Mexico. There aren’t many freight planes that can cope with such a large piece
of equipment, but a solution was found: the converted Airbus A300 transporter
(with the fitting nickname Beluga), originally built to ferry large aircraft components between the Airbus manufacturing sites in Germany,
France, Spain and the UK, was
able to accommodate a structure of roughly half the size of
an ALMA antenna dish; and
so, the receiver cabin and reflector backup structure (the socalled BUS) were assembled in
two halves and loaded onto the
plane. On 16 May 2003 it took
off from Milan’s Malpensa airport, to arrive at Albuquerque
four days later. After assembly
on site, the antenna was ready
Loading the prototype antenna into the Airbus Beluga transporter. (Photo: Massimo Tarenghi)
for testing in January 2004.
The prototype test phase turned out to be more difficult than anticipated. Since the
test phase had to be completed within a predefined period of time for cost reasons,
the late delivery of the antennas was clearly problematic. Furthermore, testing antennas with the accuracy required for ALMA had not been done before. To some extent
the test techniques had to be further developed to verify the performance of the
25	

Perhaps unavoidably, the two different antennas became known as the “American” and the “European”antennas.
This was unfortunate, firstly because it had political connotations, but even more so because it was not entirely
correct. Thus, the Vertex (“American”) antenna had been developed in Germany and major components such
as carbon fibre structures, the antenna control systems, computer systems and drive systems, of the production
antennas were also manufactured in Europe.

382

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

antennas at the level of the ALMA specifications. And finally, the ATF site choice
had been a compromise: the great advantage of the VLA site was that it offered the
full technical infrastructure necessary. The disadvantage, however, was that the site
was far from optimal when it came to testing the antennas at higher frequencies.
The first set of tests was concluded in April 2004, but they were inconclusive. In its
report, the Antenna Evaluation Group executive stated that “ it was not able to definitely confirm that the designs would satisfy the ALMA technical specifications”. (van
der Kruit, 2012). More tests would be needed. This was a major problem. The North
American side feared that a delay could jeopardise the project since the US Congress
might raise objections. A cost increase could also be expected, although as we shall
see shortly, this had probably already become inevitable at that time. They therefore
pushed for a quick decision.
Despite these difficulties, the ALMA partners took the next step by the end of 2003,
moving towards the procurement of the full set of antennas. According to the bilateral agreement, each partner would deliver half of the total number of antennas.
There would, in other words, be two separate contracts to industry. Though not
aimed for, it entailed the possibility also of two different types of antennas, albeit
with the same performance. In the following chapter, we shall briefly address the
governance issues that led to this decision. Here, it suffices to note that on both sides
of the Atlantic bids were received for consideration by the respective partners. The
tenders opened in May 2004, however, were alarming if perhaps not totally unexpected. Over the preceding years, commodity prices had increased considerably and
by much more than expected 26 . Even more so, because of the boom, the labour market in Chile, a major exporter of commodities, was under pressure, leading to substantially higher site development costs. Implementing the full programme, as foreseen in the bilateral agreement, appeared to be no longer financially feasible. Savings
could be made either by reducing the number of antennas or the number of receiver
bands. From a scientific point of view, the latter option appeared decidedly unattractive. Fewer antennas, on the other hand, would in the first instance mean a loss in
sensitivity that in principle could — at least partly — be compensated for by longer
integration times and fine tuning of operational modes.

26	

Although discussions about ALMA had begun earlier the official cost estimate was based on US dollars at their
2000 value. However, in the early years of the new millennium, the world economy was booming. The rapid
growth in demand in the emerging economies had sent commodity prices skyrocketing. For example steel prices
rose from about 350 US dollars/tonne in the year 2000 to a peak of 760 US dollars/tonne in late 2004 (Source:
Purchasing Magazine).

383

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The result was a re-baselining exercise that examined how a reduction in the number of antennas might impact the science, and established the minimum number
of antennas thought to be needed to achieve the primary science goals. At a meeting in October 2005 in Garmisch-Partenkirchen, the idyllic Alpine ski resort, the
project was redefined. It would now comprise 50 12-metre antennas, 25 to be delivered by each party, at an estimated cost of 750 million US dollars27. However, Japan
had joined the project in September 2004, bringing in its own plans for an array of
four 12-metre antennas and 12 8-metre antennas. The bilateral ALMA project thus
became Enhanced ALMA, with a total of 66 antennas, about the same number as
the original European/North American project had foreseen.
In parallel, in April 2005, a joint antenna evaluation group concluded that both
the proposals by Vertex RSI and EIE/Alcatel Space/MT Mechatronics, submitted
in response to the call for tender, were technically acceptable. The companies that
had built the prototype antennas had of course also followed the testing at Socorro
themselves. The results of the performance tests were obviously relevant for the industrial bidders, but the tests were, as we have seen, only concluded during the tendering phase. The slowing of the procurement due to the prolonged testing at the ATF
in Socorro beyond 2004 brought the need for renewed negotiations with the bidders, whose offers were only valid for a certain period of time.
For the North American side, the situation was becoming critical, but it was no easier
for the Europeans. Among the issues at stake were different opinions on industrial
policy questions, such as how to ensure the required performance of the antennas.
The ESO procurement system demands industrial contracts with strict compliance
criteria and associated penalties if specifications are not met. The US procurement
rules were somewhat different, based on the principle of best effort. The two partners also had differing views on how the expected maintenance costs should be factored into the selection, with American rules seeing a fairly sharp division between
construction and operation costs. On the other hand, the geographical distribution
of subcontractors to the main supplier was perhaps more of an issue for the European countries. And finally, company mergers during this phase complicated matters.
Vertex RSI was taken over by General Dynamics, while Alcatel Space and Alenia had
merged 28 . Taken together, this made for a complex procurement process and because
27	

This also meant an increase in cost of about 90 million euros (albeit with a considerable contingency) to each
of the principal partners, ESO and NSF. Though it was painful, both parties accepted this.

28	

Only to be absorbed by Thales, the French industrial giant, a little later.

384

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

of the fluid situation, the bidders to the ESO contract were allowed to amend their
offers before the final decision was taken.
Whereas the North American ALMA partner had already selected its supplier,
­Vertex RSI, placing its contract in June 2005, ESO needed more time. Several ESO
Member States had become nervous about the cost and requested a cost review to
ensure that the project was still deemed affordable. By the late summer, the issue had
been resolved and ESO, too, could now move towards an industrial contract for its
share of the antennas. The contract would be the largest ever signed in ground-based
astronomy in Europe. The ESO management, the Finance Committee and Council had their focus on this crucial decision. At the same time, the two main bidders
to the ESO call put up a dogfight with few holds barred — as is often the case with
large industrial contracts. In the end, the partnership that had developed the European antenna emerged as the winner, with the lowest bid. On 7 December 2005,
ESO signed the 147 million euro deal with the consortium led by Alcatel ­A lenia
Space and including EIE and MT Aerospace (Germany). The contract foresaw the
delivery of 25 antennas, but contained an option for an additional seven antennas,
as did the North American contract with Vertex RSI.

Signing of the antenna contract between ESO and the AEM Consortium. It was the largest individual
contract with industry ever signed by ESO. From left to right: Thomas Zimmerer (MT-Mechatronics),
Hans Steininger (MT-Aerospace), Patrick Mauté (Thales Alenia Space), Catherine Cesarsky, Gianpietro
Marchiori (EIE), Vincenzo Giorgio (Thales Alenia Space) and Ian Corbett. (Photo: Mafalda Martins)

385

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

≈
Just two weeks later, ESO signed another important industrial contract, this
time with the German specialist vehicle maker Scheuerle Fahrzeugfabrik GmbH,
“a world-leader in the design and production of custom-built heavy-duty transporters.” 29
According to this contract, Scheuerle would build two giant transporters to move the
ALMA antennas around on the Chajnantor Plateau as well as between the observing
site and the operations facility at 2900 metres altitude. Like the antennas they carry,
the transporters are technical masterpieces. Each transporter is 10 metres wide, 20
metres long and 6 metres high and weighs 130 tonnes. It is powered by two 500 kW
diesel engines, as powerful as Formula One racing engines. Unlike Formula One
cars, however, the ALMA transporters move at no more than 12 km/hour when
carrying their payloads. The altitude takes it toll: because of the lower oxygen level
at 5000 metres, the engines lose about half of their power, but what is more critical is controlling the vehicle during its descent from the high site. To ensure safety,
several brake systems are installed. The suspension system, designed partly by ESO,
is also unique. Since the transporters must be able to move with extreme precision,

The first ALMA transporter during a dance with a Smart car at the official presentation at the factory on
5 October 2007. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)
29	

ESO Press Release, 22 December 2005.

386

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

both between the antennas and in deploying individual antennas on their respective pads, they have advanced sideways steering, positioning lasers, an anti-collision
system and cameras to aid the driver. Finally, the specially trained drivers have their
own oxygen supply, when they operate the vehicles. The first of the twin transporters was presented to the media at an event at the factory on 5 October 2007. It gave
a very memorable demonstration of its impressive maneuverability, performing a
remarkable dance to music!
Whilst the antenna contract clearly constituted a major and highly visible milestone
in the ALMA project, work had also begun in many other areas. On 6 November
2003, a groundbreaking event for the ALMA observatory took place at the future
location of the Operational Support Facility, following the acquisition of the one
square kilometre of land that would be jointly owned by ESO and AUI.

Breaking the ground for ALMA: in November 2003 a formal ceremony marked the start of the construction at the Chajnantor site. Seen are Piet van der Kruit (ESO Council President), Wayne VanCitters
(Director of the Astronomy Division at NSF) and Massimo Tarenghi, the new ALMA Director.

Much discussion had also focussed on the development of the necessary electronics, including the front ends with the receivers and cryogenic systems. It was decided
that each partner would establish a regional Front-End Integration Centre (FEIC),
i.e. one in the US, one in Europe and one in Taiwan, which had become a partner of

387

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Japan. The Rutherford Appleton Laboratory was awarded the contract as the European FEIC.
Since a lot of the technological development took place in different regions of the
world, it was vital to ensure that ALMA would remain a single, coherent programme.
Cohesion was achieved by setting up integrated product teams with members from
each partner. Teams were established in all the major activities: management, site,
antennas, front ends, back ends, correlator, computing, system engineering and integration, and science, as well as outreach. Furthermore, in early 2003 a Joint ALMA
Office was established in Chile, with staff from all partners. Although ESO was willing to host the office, the initial decision was to place the office in a separate location
and thus office space was found on the 18th floor of the prestigious El Golf building 30
in Santiago. In 2010, however, the office moved to a newly constructed building, covering 7000 square metres including car parking, on the ESO premises in Vitacura.
Another element to be delivered by ESO was the OSF, which comprises 6000 square
metres of buildings, equivalent to a soccer field. The OSF is the place where antennas are assembled and tested, and maintenance is carried out, and from where the
telescopes on the high site will be operated. It also includes an 8 MW multi-fuel 31
power station, adequate living quarters for the ALMA staff as well as a visitors’ centre. The access roads were completed in 2006.
≈
While construction was proceeding, planning had begun for the operational phase.
To aid the worldwide user community, it was decided to establish ALMA regional
centres (ARCs) in each of the regions participating in the project (Asia, Europe and
North America). In a manner reminiscent of the tasks of the ST-ECF (see Chapter II-4) these centres would form the interface between the astronomers and the
ALMA observatory and support the entire process from proposal submission to the
delivery of observation data. In Europe further decentralisation was foreseen so the
European ARC is comprised of geographically distributed nodes coordinated by an
ARC manager at ESO in Garching. The coordination centre at ESO started operations in 2006, led by Paola Andreani.

30	

As more space was needed, ALMA subsequently rented additional rooms in the nearby Alsacia Building.

31	

Using either diesel or liquefied petroleum gas.

388

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

In March 2007, the first observations were carried out with two ALMA antennas,
not from Chajnantor, but using two prototypes at the ALMA test site in New Mexico. The first of the transporters arrived in Chile in February 2008 and the first
ALMA antenna, from Japan, was moved up to the high site in September 2009. By
March 2009 all components for the first AEM (European) antenna had arrived in
Chile and integration could start. The antenna was accepted in early 2011. ALMA
was becoming a reality.
≈
The very first antennas on the high site, though, were not ALMA antennas. In 2000,
the US Cosmic Microwave Background Imager, an interferometer that measured
fluctuations in the cosmic microwave background was installed, followed in 2002
by a single 10-metre Japanese dish, ASTE 32, 33 . The third was European, although
also not forming part of the ALMA array. As mentioned, by 2003, the SEST was
facing closure. However, as the ALMA prototypes were built, one of which by Vertex Antennentechnik, this created a possibility for acquiring a copy of the prototype at a very reasonable price. The option to place this as a successor telescope to
SEST at Chajnantor, at twice the elevation of La Silla, was clearly interesting. This
project was instigated by Karl Menten and the outcome was a joint project between
the Max-Planck-Institut für Radioastronomie, the Astronomisches Institut der
Ruhr-Universität Bochum in Germany, the Onsala Space Observatory and ESO
to place a 12-metre single-dish antenna at Chajnantor34 . In June 2001, the partners signed a Memorandum of Understanding, followed shortly afterwards by an
order to Vertex for the antenna. Since ESO was becoming involved in a giant array
of submillimetre/­millimetre-wavelength telescopes, what could justify the installation of a single antenna? Firstly, the new antenna was foreseen to combine a relatively
wide field of view with a new and powerful bolometer. This would allow for early
studies of the submillimetre/millimetre sky and help to prepare the scientific community for ALMA. In a sense, it could be compared to the survey telescopes often
used in conjunction with large optical telescopes. Secondly, having an ALMA prototype antenna at C
­ hajnantor early on would enable ESO to gain operational experience with the antenna under the prevailing conditions. Thirdly, the new antenna
32	

Atacama Submillimeter Telescope Experiment.

33	

Albeit at the adjacent Pampa La Bola, at a slightly lower altitude.

34	

The antenna was purchased by MPIfR, with OSO and MPIfR providing instrumentation and ESO being in
charge of operations.

389

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

would use the control software developed for ALMA. This provided an opportunity
to test the software over a period of years, before the ALMA array became active.
And finally, perhaps as a byproduct, the telescope team would build up a significant
body of knowledge about the observing conditions, including all relevant meteorological data, which would be of great value to ALMA. Service-mode operation, in
the manner of the VLT, was foreseen for ALMA to allow for flexibility in the execution of observation programmes. But this is greatly facilitated by a good understanding of the weather patterns and their fluctuations. Given all these reasons, the
new project could hardly have been given a better name: APEX, the Atacama Pathfinder Experiment.
Since APEX is a stand-alone telescope, i.e. not part of any array, some design modifications from the original (“American”) ALMA antenna were necessary. As a result
APEX features Nasmyth foci (in addition to its Cassegrain focus) and a chopping
secondary mirror. These modifications were required for single-dish operation for
the array receivers and bolometers. Thus the antenna has a total of three instrument
stations, one at the Cassegrain focus and two at the Nasmyth foci. The main instruments foreseen were basically heterodyne receivers and bolometers. Because of technical limitations in heterodyne instruments, the original (high frequency) signals
are converted to lower frequencies by combining them with a local oscillator, before
they are amplified. Heterodyne instruments can detect individual spectral lines of
interest to astronomers. Bolometers, on the other hand, have been described as little more than extremely sensitive thermometers and are therefore used for observations of the electromagnetic continuum.
As the originally foreseen instrumentation was delayed, instruments were transferred
from SEST to be used for the early performance tests. The commissioning instrument, however, was the new FLASH two-channel heterodyne instrument developed in Bonn that covered the frequency ranges 420–500 and 790–830 GHz. Furthermore, during the early years, APEX 2b, a 350 GHz heterodyne receiver built by
Chalmers Tekniska Högskolan in Sweden was used. CHAMP+ was another heterodyne instrument, built by the Max-Planck-Institut für Radioastronomie together
with the Dutch NOVA/SRON and JPL in the US. But the workhorse instrument of
APEX is the Large APEX BOlometer CAmera (LABOCA), a 300-element bolometer array operating at 870 µm and covering a field of 11 arcminutes — especially
suited to detecting high-redshift dust emission, i.e. the study of distant galaxies.
LABOCA was developed jointly by the APEX partners in Bonn and Bochum but
also with involvement from the Friedrich-Schiller-Universität Jena.

390

Chapter IV-1 ∙ ALMA

The APEX antenna at Chajnantor. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

The first project manager was Rolf Güsten from the Max-Planck-Institut für
­R adioastronomie, with Jorge Melnick acting as the ESO interface. Carlos de Breuck
became ESO project scientist and, in 2003, Lars-Åke Nyman, who had previously
been station manager for SEST, became station manager and thus responsible for
the operations of APEX.
Telescope installation began in 2003. A hard winter, not to be disregarded at 5000
metres above sea level, caused some delay, but by October the telescope had passed
the preliminary tests35 . First science observations were carried out in 2005 and the
formal inauguration took place on 25 September 2005. As early as July 2006, the
first 26 scientific papers based on APEX observations appeared in a special Letter
issue of the European journal Astronomy and Astrophysics. Among the early results
was the first detection of CF+ (fluoromethylidynium) (Neufeld et al., 2006); adding
this to the growing list of complex molecules that have been found in space in the
past, using telescopes including SEST. Other papers presented results from studies
of dense clouds in the Milky Way, some of which were known to be star-forming
regions, providing new information both on interstellar chemistry and star formation processes.
35	

ESO Annual Report 2003.

391

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

LABOCA saw first light in August 2007. One of the most spectacular early science
results was a joint 300-hour ESO–MPG survey of a 30 × 30 arcminute region that
was named the LABOCA Survey of the Extended Chandra Deep Field South, with
the somewhat curious, and perhaps slightly misleading, acronym LESS. Certainly,
the old saying of “less is more” seems entirely appropriate here. The survey became
the reference work in this area for quite some time. We shall encounter the ­Chandra
Deep Field again later in the book.

Jörg Eschwey and Juan de Mella at the ALMA OSF construction site in December 2004. (Photo: Hans
Hermann Heyer)

Along with the construction work on Chajnantor, work began on a base camp at
Sequitor on the southern outskirts of San Pedro de Atacama. The base camp is a
small compound with a control room, offices and laboratory facilities, and 16 dormitories and leisure facilities. The buildings are generally low adobe-style structures,
in the traditional style of the village, with the exception of the control-room building, which is a small tower on top of which is mounted a microwave antenna that is
used as a link with the APEX antenna on the high site.

392

Chapter IV-2

Into New Territory
“Caminante, no hay camino;
se hace camino al andar.”
Antonio Machado in Proverbios y Cantares, 1912.

I

t is difficult to overestimate the impact of the ALMA project on ESO and on the
European scientific community in the field. Far from being just an addition to the
normal ESO programme it changed the character of ESO as an organisation, transforming it into a multi-programme organisation and integrating what for ESO was
a new area of science and technology with its own specific culture. At the same time,
at the European level, the structuring effect on the scientific community was considerable, bringing together the entire community into a system similar to the one for
optical astronomy, i.e. with ESO and the national institutes 1 forming partnerships
and working towards a common goal. Last but certainly not least, ALMA exposed
ESO to the challenges of being a partner in a global project that was far more complex than anything it had done in a European context. The issues included the bringing together of vastly different cultures and traditions as well as administrative and
legislative frameworks — well established, but rigid — that were difficult to reconcile. These factors affected all aspects of the project from funding to construction
and operation.
One of the fundamental reasons behind the success of ESO is that the organisation
functions as a framework for the implementation of activities that the Member States
wish to carry out together. Because the organisation exists and possesses a legal personality, Member States can transfer funds to it and the organisation can use these
funds both for procuring equipment and for its operation. This may sound trivial, but
it is important to understand, because there are other models for international cooperation as well. When it comes to global, or quasi-global (as in the case of ALMA),
projects, it can be extremely difficult, if not impossible, to create a common pot, from
1	

And, of course, IRAM.

393

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

which a joint project can be financed. But other ways of working together offer themselves as possibilities. One solution is that each partner retains the power over its
own purse strings, i.e. a system in which no money is normally transferred between
the partners. This in turn almost inevitably leads to a scenario where the partners
deliver equipment and services to the central project: in-kind contributions, as they
are called. The basis of such a system is a set of items to be delivered, based on their
commonly agreed value to the project. Since value and cost are not necessarily congruent, it remains for each partner to control its costs. The advantage of this approach
is that it is easier to handle politically by the individual partners, but — aside from
the aspect of cost control — it puts stringent requirements on coordination so that
in the end the project functions as a single entity. It also poses management questions that the partners must address, such as: how is coordination organised and who
is responsible? How will the operations be implemented? And how does the project
interact with third parties? There is nothing unusual about these questions, but at
the same time, there have been few scientific collaborations on this scale and there
is certainly no commonly established rulebook for such undertakings. It is therefore
not surprising that the original idea for the ALMA partnership had to develop into a
more sophisticated model. The first step in that direction occurred in 2002 when the
agreement about Phase Two was being prepared. To ensure coherence, it was decided
to establish a dedicated ALMA Board 2 comprising representatives of the partners,
along with some independent members, as well as a Science Advisory Committee.
At a meeting in Venice, the partners also decided to set up a Joint ALMA Office
(JAO) to coordinate the project. Paul Vanden Bout was appointed interim ALMA
Director with Massimo Tarenghi as project manager. With the signing of the bilateral agreement, in 2003 the JAO was installed in Santiago and Massimo Tarenghi
assumed the post of ALMA Director, Tony Beasley became project manager and
Richard M
­ urinowski the project engineer. Further coordination measures followed
with the establishment of the Integrated Product Teams. With time, this governance structure would be tested: the balance between the partners, who were responsible for the deliverables and the joint structures, put in place to ensure coordination
and coherence, was a fine one and it was not always easy. For example, all major procurements, although paid for by the individual partners, had to be approved by the
full ALMA Board, potentially raising issues over the sovereignty of the executives.
Despite unavoidable difficulties, however, the system delivered what it was supposed
2	

From the European perspective, since Spain at the time was a partner of ALMA but not a member of ESO,
a European ALMA Board was also established to coordinate Europe’s position in the project. Naturally this
forum would also serve to discuss ALMA matters in much greater detail than it would be possible at the level
of the ESO Council.

394

Chapter IV-2 ∙ Into New Territory

to, underpinned as it was by a shared desire to achieve the goals of the project and in
many cases strong bonds of friendship between the scientists involved.
Yet for a while, important questions remained open: which operational model should
be chosen for the observatory? What would be the legal conditions for operating the
joint facility in Chile? And who should act as employer for the staff?

The first meeting of the ALMA Science Advisory Committee was held in Chile, on 10 September 2001.
Seen from left to right: Rafael Bachiller, Al Wootten, Yasuo Fukui, Richard Crutcher, Neal Evans, Robert
Brown, Leonardo Bronfman, Mark Gurwell, Pierre Cox, Christine Wilson, John Richer, Geoffrey Blake,
Peter Shaver, Jack Welch, Ewine van Dishoeck, Richard Kurz, Arnold Benz, Yoshihiro Chikada and
Naomasa Nakai.

≈
For ESO, it would seem obvious that the existing Convenio with the Government
of the Republic of Chile constituted a suitable solution. It had withstood the test of
time, and with the 1995 amendments was put on a new footing. AUI, for its part,
had signed an agreement with the Universidad de Chile3 and thus operated within a
different, if largely similar, legal framework. It is hard to avoid a sense of déjà vu. In
Chapter I-3 we saw how different operating conditions played a role in 1963, when
3	

The AUI agreement with the Universidad de Chile was similar to those of the Carnegie Foundation (operator
of the Las Campanas Observatory) and AURA for the CTIO at Cerro Tololo. Furthermore, the In 1963 foreign observatories had become subject to a national law, regulating the conditions for their activities in Chile.

395

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

d­ iscussions took place between ESO and AURA about sharing a site in Chile. In
1963, the differences led to a decision to go separate ways. Now, with a new international partnership, with its specific characteristics and requirements, an innovative solution was needed. In any event, Insulza, who had been so helpful in past, had
left the Foreign Ministry and the new team had to be convinced of the importance
of the new project and its benefits for the Antofagasta region as well as the scientific community in Chile. On ESO’s side, the key person was Daniel Hofstadt, the
experienced ESO representative in Chile, whereas AUI was represented by Eduardo
Hardy. They were backed up by their respective superiors, Catherine Cesarsky as
ESO Director General and Riccardo Giacconi, who, after his term as ESO Director
General, had become head of AUI. Thus, in June 1999, ESO and AUI approached
the Chilean government regarding support for a joint venture to establish ALMA
and obtain access to the land needed on the Chajnantor Plateau. The Foreign Ministry, it appeared, was of the opinion that a new and specific agreement would be
required for ALMA.
In April 2001, things appeared to begin to move, not least thanks to the then Assistant Foreign Minister of Chile, Christian Barros. The Chilean government established an inter-ministerial team comprised of representatives of the Ministries of
Science, National Properties, Foreign Affairs, the regional authorities, the Environmental Agency, and others, to negotiate with the ALMA partners. For the land
acquisition, the outcome of the talks was that the partners would be granted a renewable concession for 50 years for the use of the land. The recipient of the concession,
however, would have to be a Chilean company 4 . It was important to note that the
Chilean Government accepted the principle (albeit implicitly) that both ESO and
AUI would be able to construct and operate ALMA under their current status and
no further mention was made of the need to establish a separate legal entity for
ALMA in Chile. From the Chilean side, the project was sanctioned by the President of the Republic, Ricardo Lagos, who welcomed ALMA. Even so, progress at
the lower levels took time. Encouragement came in the form of a visit by the German
Foreign Minister, Joschka Fischer, who paid a visit to the ­Paranal Observatory on
6–7 March 2002. In bilateral discussions with the Chilean authorities, he stressed
the importance that Germany attributed to the new project, also in the context of
Chile’s broader relations with Europe. However, whilst undoubtedly still in favour
of the project, in May 2002, the Chilean government had come to the conclusion
4	

The company was established and is the owner of the one square kilometre of land at the OSF and the concessionaire for the Array Operations Site (AOS) and road corridor between the sites.

396

Chapter IV-2 ∙ Into New Territory

that the ALMA project required an amendment to the respective accords with ESO
and the AUI.
In July 2002, the discussions began and covered all the pertinent issues including
collaboration programmes with the II Region and the science agency, C
­ ONICYT,
the access of astronomers in Chilean Universities as well as the environmental
impact procedure. Later that month the amendment to the Convenio was drafted.
It was signed by the ESO Director General and the Chilean Foreign Minister María
­Soledad Alvear on 21 October 2002. It enabled ESO to “open a new centre of observation” within the framework of its existing legal status and specified 10% of observation time for Chilean scientists in as well as the cooperation commitments with
the Antofagasta Region and CONICYT. The amendment would, however, need
parliamentary ratification.
≈

In 2006, ESO established a small site museum next to the
road leading up to the ALMA high site on Chajnantor. Two
shepherds used to live at this site with their stock of animals.
Their dwellings, long since abandoned, were restored by ESO
and descriptive panels were installed that portray the life of the
people in this high altitude environment. Seen here are (from
left to right): Pedro Cruz, representative of the community of
Cucuter, Marcela Hernando Pérez, at the time Intendente
of the II Region, the Mayor of San Pedro de Atacama, Doña
Sandra Berna, and Felix Mirabel, then ESO’s representative
in Chile.
5	

In parallel, both the ESO5 and
the AUI representatives were
extensively involved in building smooth links with the scientific, the regional and the
indigenous communities who
were concerned about the
ALMA project. Working with
these communities was new for
ESO since, in the desert sites of
La Silla and ­Paranal, the local
population had at most comprised a few families engaged in
small-scale mining. The ALMA
site and its nearby oasis village
of San Pedro were different. The
area is home to the Lican Antai
people, who like many other
indigenous peoples display a

Daniel Hofstadt was ably assisted in this task by a small, but immensely dedicated team comprising Esteban
Illanes, Laura Novoa and Mary Bauerle, all ESO staff members in Santiago.

397

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

growing readiness to assert themselves and their culture vis-à-vis the surrounding
society. A number of anthropological and archaeological artefacts were found on the
site along the access roads to the Chajnantor Plateau. This was, and remains, a sensitive issue. ESO contracted specialised assistance for it, and made a number of mitigation commitments for the preservation of these archaeological items.
Furthermore, the Altiplano, with its stunning natural beauty, is a delicate ecosystem with a unique, yet threatened, population of fauna and flora. Environmental
protection was clearly very important. A number of endemic and unique plant species such as the giant cactus, echinopsis chilensis, grow in the slightly less dry region
below Chajnantor, at between 2700 and 4500 metres elevation. Viscacha rabbits and
other mammals, such as llamas, vicũnas and guanacos, the native South American
camelids, roam the area. Furthermore, the road leading up to the ALMA site crosses
a national flamingo reserve.
For this reason, ESO and AUI agreed to carry out an environmental impact evaluation as part of the negotiations. ESO took the lead in the process, which proved
to be rather complex, requiring a number of specific authorisations and the building of political goodwill through public diplomacy. On the Chilean side 13 different administrative entities were involved in the procedure, including the municipality of San Pedro de Atacama, the local indigenous communities, the health, public
works, national parks and road authorities and the tourism authority. ESO solicited expert help, for example to monitor the high altitude wildlife and to assess the
impact of road activities on their behaviour, a task that was carried out by an archaeologist, Ana Maria Baron from San Pedro and a German biologist, Michaela Heisig 6 .
By March 2003 the environmental validation resolution was granted within the
framework of Chilean environmental law. A major obstacle for the access to the
Chajnantor land was removed. In March the land concession was also granted
through a Public Property Ministerial decree and ESO/AUI were now able to sign
the land concession contract.
As mentioned, the amendment of the ESO agreement for ALMA had to be ratified at the Chilean parliament and a new round of lobbying had to be carried out
6	

ESO went to extraordinary lengths to meet the stringent environmental requirements, including carefully moving and replanting cacti and refraining from blasting activities in connection with the road in order to protect
the wildlife, such as the viscachas, already mentioned. Later studies confirmed that these efforts had borne fruit:
if anything, the population of these animals has increased.

398

Chapter IV-2 ∙ Into New Territory

at the parliament. At the recommendation of its Foreign Relations Committee, the
lower chamber (the House of Deputies) approved the amendment on 8 May 2003,
followed on 10 June by the Senate. With the subsequent signing of the cooperation
contract with the Antofagasta Region and CONICYT — after four years of patient
negotiations and preparations — the road was now open to formally initiate ALMA
activities in Chile.
On the final question of the ALMA staff, after much discussion, the partners in 2006
agreed that local ALMA staff in Chile would be hired by AUI. At the same time, it
was decided to move the ALMA offices to the ESO compound in Santiago, where
today they form an integral part of a vibrant scientific community.

The Chajnantor site, photographed in 2005. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

399

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The VISTA telescope with ­Paranal in the background with the VLT and the VST. (Photo: Gerd
Hüdepohl)

400

Chapter IV-3

Buds at P
­ aranal
“… the advent of a new generation of wide-field digital
detectors and dedicated telescopes has started
what can be considered the ‘renaissance’ of optical surveys.”
Massimo Capaccioli in
Questions of Modern Cosmology – Galileo’s legacy
(D’Onofrio & Burigana, 2009).

I

f you stand on top of a nearby mountain and let your eyes glide over the La Silla
mountain ridge, you will see a chain of white, eggshell buildings — the telescope
domes. The view is interrupted only by the box-like structure of the NTT, bearing
witness to the traditional evolution of an observatory: after an initial surge of telescopes, as time went by, new ideas came up and as money became available, more tele­
scopes were added to the observatory. The growth of the telescope park is the result of
years, sometimes decades, of development in astronomy and is typical of most 20th
century astronomical observatories. But there are exceptions, and P
­ aranal is one.
One of the unique features of P
­ aranal, i.e. of the VLT, is that everything was conceived as one complete, fully integrated and self-contained facility. That is, almost.
Chapter I-7 discussed the classic combination of a large telescope with a survey telescope, seen at Palomar, Calar Alto, Siding Spring and La Silla, and so on. The survey telescopes would, among other tasks, act as pathfinders, enabling astronomers to
identify particularly interesting objects for study with the larger telescopes. However,
the 8–10-metre-class telescopes that were entering into service could easily see objects
that were 100 or more times fainter than the previous 4-metre-class telescopes. No
similar increase in the capability of survey telescopes had occurred. In fact, for all the
accomplishments of the VLT, and the pride that Europe’s astronomers could justifiably feel, when it came to the systematic mapping of large parts of the sky, ESO was
doing less well. In 1996, as Chairman of the working group looking at the future of
La Silla, Johannes Andersen, wrote in The ESO Messenger, “It is … one of the findings
of the [Working Group] that ESO does not possess a truly competitive wide-field imaging

401

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

telescope.” (Andersen, 1996). The 1-metre Schmidt telescope at La Silla, which still
used classical photographic materials, closed in 1998 and the only other telescope
with some wide-field capacity was the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope fitted with
WFI, the wide-field camera mentioned in Chapter II-1. At ESO the WFI had been
strongly pushed by Alvio Renzini, the VLT project scientist. For all its qualities, however, the WFI would not be sufficient either.
Luckily, plans were under way to address the problem. The solution came in the shape
of two new telescopes, one covering the visible part of the spectrum and one the infrared: the VLT Survey Telescope (VST) and the Visible and Infrared Survey Telescope
for Astronomy (VISTA). Neither initiative came from ESO, which had its hands full
with the VLT. The VST was an Italian initiative, instigated by ­Massimo ­Capaccioli
of the Osservatorio Astronomico di Capodimonte, in Naples, and strongly supported
by Renzini. And VISTA came from a country that at the time was not even a member of the organisation, the United Kingdom.
Capaccioli took up the directorship of the Naples Observatory in 1993. His scientific interest in galaxies had brought him into contact with the world of wide-field
imaging and he had been associated with Schmidt telescopes, especially the Italian
Schmidt tele­scope at the Osservatorio Astrofisico di Asiago in the Dolomites. As
director of the Naples Observatory, he was supposed to drive forward a project for a
1.5-metre telescope, to be placed at the Toppo di Castelgrande Observatory. However, Capaccioli had larger plans.
Despite its charm and its rich history going back almost 3000 years — not least as
an outstanding centre of culture in the ancient world — the Naples of today is situated in a region of chronic economic depression. As such, it receives financial support
from the Italian government and the European Union to foster new growth in the
region. The support by the Italian government included “existing centres of excellence
in science and technology” (Arnaboldi et al., 1998). In this context a special grant of
nine million euros was made available in 1995/96, half of which was originally earmarked for a new telescope. With this grant, Capaccioli saw an opportunity to build
a major survey telescope, but he also realised that the grant was a one-off allocation,
and it was therefore important to integrate this new telescope into an operational
environment that would ensure its long-term efficient scientific use and the necessary
maintenance. Along with a team of engineers, led by Dario Mancini, he set out to
prepare a proposal to ESO — the VST. The VST was planned to be ten times better

402

Chapter IV-3 ∙ Buds at Paranal

overall than the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre with WFI, because of its better resolution,
the slightly larger aperture, the much wider field and the better site.
Constructing such a telescope would seem to be a huge task both for the small Naples
team and for a region that is not renowned for its high-tech industry, but the Naples
Observatory had already been a partner in the development of the WFI for the
MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope 1. In any event, the proposal was carefully reviewed by
ESO, which led to a number of changes to the original project including the requirement for active optics, and in June 1998, an agreement was reached and endorsed by
the ESO Council. According to the agreement Naples would deliver the telescope,
whilst ESO would be in charge of the enclosure.
As had now become customary, it would be an alt-azimuth telescope, housed in a
compact building. It was even possible to find a place for the telescope at ­Paranal
itself — on the northwestern edge of the platform. At the time of planning of the
VLT, much thought had gone into the positioning of the individual Unit Telescopes.
This was partly driven by the needs of the interferometer, but was also to avoid the
adverse effects on the wind flow caused by the buildings themselves. Luckily, it would
be possible to place the somewhat lower and smaller VST building in the chosen location without causing undesirable wind effects. The idea was to build a 2.6-metre telescope with a field of view of at least 1 degree × 1 degree, and fitted with just one
instrument, a 32-CCD mosaic camera. The camera would be developed under separate funding following a call for expressions of interest. The camera featured a staggering 256 mega­pixels (compared to 67 megapixels for the WFI on the 2.2-metre),
and with a larger mirror and active optics, the telescope would both collect more
light and focus it more precisely. According to the specifications, the telescope should
be able to detect objects of magnitude 25.5 in 30 minutes of integration time and
achieve an image resolution of 0.7 arcseconds. If this looked exciting, the timescale
was even better: According to the original plan, the VST should be ready by 2001.
But problems lay ahead.
As the project started, a call for tender was issued for the optics. Carl Zeiss Jena won
the contract. However, the Zeiss bid foresaw that the primary and the secondary mirrors would actually be produced in Russia, by the Lytkarino Optical Glass Factory,

1	

Also, at least one company in the Naples region, the Tecnologie Metallurgiche Avanzate s.r.l., had produced
parts for the azimuth tracks for the VLT Unit Telescopes.

403

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

also known as LZOS 2 . This was at a time when Russia was opening up commercially
and beginning to offer her impressive technological know-how on world markets3 .
LZOS did a sterling job and in the spring of 2002, the mirrors were ready for shipment. To speed up the delivery they were shipped by air cargo from Moscow into
Frankfurt airport, then transported by lorry to Hamburg and loaded onto a ship
bound for South America. In early May, the ship docked at the port of Antofagasta
and the boxes were put on a truck for the final leg of the journey to ­Paranal. Then,
on 6 May, the boxes were opened. The mirror had shattered4 — the worst nightmare
of any telescope builder. Obviously, telephone lines were buzzing between P
­ aranal,
the ESO Headquarters, the Naples Observatory — and Moscow. Capaccioli showed
a photograph of the broken mirror to Anatoly Samouilov, the president of LZOS.
Although hardly a soft-hearted soul, the sight brought tears to his eyes. This reaction should not come as a surprise to anyone. As we saw it in the case of the VLT,
developing instrumentation for astronomy is an enormous professional challenge.
But the fascination of astronomy itself is an equally strong driver and true professionals, as cool-headed as they may appear, often develop an almost emotional relationship with the object of their task. In any event, in just 40 days, a contract for the
delivery of a replacement mirror was signed with LZOS 5 . Even so, it was now clear
that a long delay would be unavoidable 6 .

Meanwhile, the VST camera, OmegaCAM, was being built by a consortium of
Dutch7, German8 and Italian9 institutes with funds from the Dutch Organization
for Research in Astronomy, the ­German Federal Ministry of Education, Science,
Research and Technology and the I­ talian Consorzio Nazionale per l’Astronomia e
l’Astrofisica (CNAA) and Istituto Nazionale di Astrofisica (INAF) (Kuijken et al.,
2002). ESO’s optical detector team provided the detector system. The work progressed according to plan, and by 2008, the new camera was delivered to ­Paranal.
2	

The lenses for the wide-field correctors and the prismatic lenses for the atmospheric dispersion corrector were
made by Schott.

3	

The primary mirror was made of Astrosital, a glass-ceramic similar to Zerodur.

4	

It appeared that the box had been affected by a rescue operation in connection with a fatal accident in a port of
call between Hamburg and Antofagasta.

5	

The secondary mirror had survived the trip, but it had slight defects. Luckily, they could be repaired by LZOS.

6	

The new mirror was ready in the spring of 2006 and was airlifted directly to Chile.

7	

The Kapteyn Institute (Kapteyn Instituut), Groningen and Leiden Observatory.

8	

University Observatories of Munich, Göttingen and Bonn.

9	

Padua and Naples observatories.

404

Chapter IV-3 ∙ Buds at Paranal

During the wait for the VST to
be ready, it was assembled and
stored under vacuum conditions until it could be mounted
on the telescope.

The delay also led to a loss of
momentum in the project. It
became difficult for Capaccioli
Preparing OmegaCAM: Olaf Iwert, Christoph Geimer and
Sebastian Deiries. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)
to retain the project team and
to keep spirits high amongst his
staff. The project was floundering. After a troubled time, help
was given, partly by other INAF
facilities (notably the observatory in Padua, Capaccioli’s old
institute) and partly by ESO,
especially Jason S­pyromilio,
Roberto Tamai and Stefano
Stanghellini. Additional industrial partners were also brought
in and the way forward slowly
emerged. A number of problems, especially with the active
optics, led first to a redesign,
and later a decision was taken to
separate the construction of the
The main mechanical structure and the mirror cell, in Naples
in 2005. (Photo: Massimo Capaccioli)
M1 cell and M2 unit from that
of the main mechanical structure. As a result, following an audit by ESO in October 2006, those large mechanical
parts that were already finished left Salerno in June 2007 to be assembled at P
­ aranal.
However, the cell for the primary mirror and the M2 units were still pending. Finally,
just before Easter 2009 they were shipped to Chile. Unlike the other mechanical
parts, the mirror cell was assembled in Italy, complete with actuators and all other
necessary subsystems and shipped in one piece. En route, the vessel suffered a major
breakdown at sea and anchored off the port of Toulon for several weeks for repairs.
When the precious cargo finally arrived in Chile, there was yet another shock: the

405

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

assembled mirror cell had been flooded with salt water and was red with rust. There
was little choice but to return the structure to Europe for a total overhaul. On completion of this work, everything was sent to Chile again, this time without mishap.
In June 2011, the impressive first images from the telescope started to appear, giving
some consolation to those who had struggled for so long to enhance the capabilities
of the VLT with a wide-field imager.
Building telescopes, the reader will have realised, is no simple task; astronomers are
always trying to catch more photons and exploit them better so they work at the very
cutting edge of technology. Dealing with sophisticated equipment and making it
work under tough conditions is a huge challenge. So delays are not rare occurrences,
whether the reasons are rooted in tricky high-tech issues or in more mundane problems. The second telescope that we shall describe here would be no exception, either.
≈
When it came to wide-field astronomy, the UK has a proud tradition, notably with
the UK Schmidt Telescope at Siding Spring in Australia as its strongest manifestation. But towards the end of 1990s, like the ESO Schmidt telescope, the UKST was
becoming dated and UK astronomers interested in this area had begun to consider
a next generation survey telescope. Initial ideas focused on a 2.5-metre telescope,
possibly to be operated in a partnership with NOAO. A consortium of a large number of universities had coalesced around the project, but perhaps the two key people
at the time were Jim Emerson (as member of PPARC’s wide-field survey panel) and
Mark Casali, in charge of new projects at the UK Astronomy Technology Centre
(ATC) in Edinburgh. In 1998, the UK government established a one-off fund for
research infrastructures. We shall return to the significance of the fund in Chapter
IV-8. Here is suffices to note that a senior PPARC manager, Ian Corbett, not only
encouraged Emerson and Casali to apply to the fund for money for the new survey
telescope, but also to develop a much more ambitious project. The core team quickly
expanded to include Andrew Lawrence (for the science case) and Adrian R
­ ussell (UK
ATC Director). To meet the deadline for applications, the team only had a couple of
weeks. Developing a new telescope project on such a timescale is obviously impossible, so they decided to submit a proposal based on a design recycled from the 4.2metre William Herschel telescope in the Canary Islands. The application was successful, but it became clear that simply building the telescope as proposed was out
of the question for several reasons, including the amount of available funds. So, a
major redesign was carried out that ultimately led to a completely different telescope.

406

Chapter IV-3 ∙ Buds at Paranal

Before we continue the story of the telescope, we shall briefly address the issue
of siting. As mentioned, some discussions had taken place regarding cooperation
between the UK and AURA in the context of the Gemini telescope project. With
Gemini South destined for Cerro Pachon, close to the Cerro Tololo Interamerican ­Observatory in Chile, this would seem to be a logical choice of site for the new
survey telescope. However, in parallel, the relations between the UK and ESO had
developed, opening up the possibility of choosing the P
­ aranal area instead. P
­ aranal
itself would not be able to accommodate yet another telescope, but 1.5 kilometres
north of the mountain, what in ESO language was colloquially known as the NTT
Peak10 was empty and seemed to be an almost ideal home for the new telescope. Talks
between ESO and PPARC led to a decision in February 2000 to place the telescope
“at ­­Paranal” (meaning, of course, the adjacent hill), but with the understanding that
operationally it would be considered as a part of the P
­ aranal Observatory.
Initially, Massimo Tarenghi provided the key interface between ESO and the VISTA
project, to be succeeded first by Jason Spyromilio and later by Martin Cullum. The
link with ESO also meant that not only ESO was willing to provide considerable
help to the project, but it also took a keen interest in ensuring that it was designed
according to ESO standards or was at least integrable into the operational environment of P
­ aranal. After years of painful budget cuts to UK astronomy the shortage of
qualified system engineers had become acute. From ESO Stefano Stanghellini, who
had just finished his main tasks regarding the last VLT Unit Telescope, agreed to
move to Edinburgh and work with the ATC project team. His arrival led to major
changes in the project. The telescope had originally been conceived as a classical tele­
scope with passive optics. Stanghellini, however, brought with him his experience
from the VLT: the concept of a modern lightweight telescope with a thin meniscus
mirror. This meant choosing an active optics system rather than a traditional thick
primary mirror. In early 2001 another major change in the design was the decision
to go to an extremely fast primary mirror with a focal ratio of f/1. This led to a much
more compact telescope with the advantages that go with it in terms of savings on
the mechanical structure and the enclosure. However, producing a large f/1 mirror
is far from trivial because the mirror is highly aspheric and polishing it is extremely
difficult and time-consuming. In retrospect, there is no doubt that it was the right
decision, but there was definitely a price to pay. The new design also created space
problems for the infrared camera, but these problems were overcome by an ingenious design solution.
10	

See p. 180.

407

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

As part of the design process, Stanghellini proposed involving European industry
by contracting out feasibility studies (to AMOS and to EIE s.r.l.) and undertaking
a cost estimate. He also helped by drafting the first set of technical specifications
for the telescope. In April 2001 Alistair McPherson joined as project manager and
helped to bring the project from Phase A to the construction stage.
At the end of Phase A, VISTA appeared to be a state-of-the-art telescope with a
potentially very attractive performance. But it was also one with a cost overrun. As
we recall, the name VISTA stands for Visible and Infrared Survey Telescope for
Astronomy, but one cost-cutting solution was to scrap the camera for the visible part
of the spectrum. ESO did not find it difficult to accept this idea. After all the VST
was expected to cover this and in any case, there certainly was an increased focus on
the infrared, which was profiting from the rapid advances in the field of detectors.
Alan Moorwood, admitably an infrared astronomy diehard, put it rather bluntly:
“If you’re going to produce the best infrared camera in the world, why waste your time
on a visible camera?”
≈
Towards the end of 2001 the project moved into construction, and procurement
became the issue. After calls for tender, the contract for the optics went to LZOS in
Russia, and for the main mechanical structure to Vertex in the US. The latter choice
raised a few eyebrows in the ESO Member States, who felt that European companies
should have benefitted from this order. By that time, the UK accession to ESO had
been agreed, but the VISTA telescope had been defined as an in-kind contribution
and therefore remained the responsibility of the UK. The UK, however, was bound
by European Union (EU) procurement rules and since Vertex was the lowest bidder, it received the contract. The enclosure was contracted to EIE, the company that
had been involved in many ESO projects in the past (as well as the VST). The other
major component, the infrared camera VIRCAM, was built by a consortium in the
UK comprised of the Rutherford Appleton Laboratory, the ATC and Durham University. The telescope now being built promised to be an awesome science machine.
It is important to note that VISTA, like the VST, is conceived as a single-purpose
telescope. Just like the classical Schmidt telescopes, it is fundamentally a huge camera, though with the three-tonne camera unit mounted at the Cassegrain focus. The
heart of the camera — with the biggest infrared focal plane ever used in astronomy
— is an array of 16 2048 × 2048 Raytheon CCDs (67 million pixels), cooled to a

408

Chapter IV-3 ∙ Buds at Paranal

temperature of 70 K. The entrance window has a diameter of almost one metre and
it was a major challenge to prevent the window misting up due to the huge temperature difference between the cool camera and the ambient air. Success was achieved
by fitting a baffle with a coating that is non-reflective at the science wavelengths,
but highly reflective in the thermal infrared and thus helping to keep the window
clear. In terms of its science capability VISTA covers a field with a diameter of 1.65
degrees. The pixel size of the detectors equals 0.34 arcseconds, meaning that the telescope will utilise the best seeing conditions found at ­Paranal. With VIRCAM, the
telecope will undertake six surveys, including a full-hemisphere survey some 25 times
more sensitive than the Two Micron All Sky Survey (2MASS) undertaken towards
the end of 1990s, and a survey of 0.75 square degrees of sky to exceptional depths11.
The potential performance of VIRCAM is truly mind-blowing. In a typical night, it
will collect a staggering 315 gigabytes (GB) of data. But all of this comes at a price:
VIRCAM constitutes about one third of the entire cost of the VISTA telescope.

The VISTA building during construction in December 2004. P
­ aranal is seen in the distance. (Photo:
Hans Hermann Heyer)
11	

To magnitude 24 in the K-band.

409

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

There is no doubt that Europe’s astronomers were looking forward to sifting through
the VISTA data, but this project was also hit by severe delays. Both the main mechanical structure and the enclosure saw delays, but the primary mirror in particular took
much longer to produce than expected. In the end, it was only delivered from the
Moscow factory to Chile in April 2008, onboard an Antonov freighter. Final integration and commissioning then went rather smoothly, with technical first light
achieved by the middle of 200812 .
With the addition of the two survey telescopes, P
­ aranal has become a mature observatory and closed the gap with respect to up-to-date survey telescopes. Night after
night the telescopes are now producing a real flood of high quality science data, posing new challenges in terms of data storage and curation, not to mention the capacity of the scientific community to exploit the data. Yet with the ESO dataflow system and its ever-growing archive, open to scientists all over the world, ESO was well
prepared for this development — more so than many other research institutes. But
it is a continuing challenge and one that will keep growing in magnitude.

12	

ESO Annual Report 2008.

410

Chapter IV-4

Of Eponymous Birds and Euros
“Permit me to ask a ‘provocative’ question?
The VLT is now almost a reality and it
would be interesting to look into the more distant future… .
Have you had any ideas about what might come after the VLT?”
Richard West at the Venice VLT conference,
October 1986.

A

mong the main strands in the history of astronomy is the interdependence
between technology and science. As Martin Harwit expressed it in his book
Cosmic Discovery: “The most important observational discoveries result from substantial technological innovation in observational astronomy”. As far as telescope development is concerned, over the last century we have seen something like an astronomical equivalent of Moore’s law, i.e. a doubling of the telescope size every few decades,
from the 2.5-metre (100-inch) Hooker Telescope in 1917, to the 5-metre (200-inch)
Hale Tele­scope in 1948, to the 10-metre Keck telescopes in 1993 (Gilmozzi, ibid.).
Of course the VLT plays its own part in this evolution. In the discussion of the NTT
and the VLT, we touched on the “5-metre barrier”, the fact that — for a number of
reasons — telescopes with mirrors much beyond 5-metre in diameter were not feasible with conventional technology. Luckily, a number of new ideas had emerged that
opened up the possibility of much larger telescopes. The main elements were the fact
that alt-azimuth mounts became feasible (due to the rapid advances in computer technology), the introduction of actively controlled mirrors (pioneered at ESO with the
NTT, and also heavily reliant on computer technology) and the idea of using mirrors composed of many individual segments instead of a monolith. The latter is normally credited to a suggestion in the 1930s by the Italian astronomer Guido Horn
d’Arturo 1, 2 , but it was not implemented for large optical telescopes until 1993 with
the Keck telescope on Hawaii. But if it were now technically possible to build much
1	

After World War II, Horn d’Arturo actually built a 1.8-metre telescope with a segmented mirror.

2	

Seeds may already have been planted by William Parsons, the 3rd Earl of Rosse, in the 19th century.

411

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

larger telescopes, and if — in principle — there was no apparent limit on how large,
what would that mean for astronomy? Or, putting the question the other way round:
how big a telescope would astronomers wish to have in order to tackle decisively some
of the nagging questions that they could now ask, but not answer? One of the astronomers who began to think more seriously about this was Roberto Gilmozzi 3 , an Italian scientist who joined ESO in 1994. Before that he had been responsible for science operations at the International Ultraviolet Explorer, the astronomical satellite
operated between 1978 and 1996 by the European Space Agency and the UK Science Research Council together with NASA. After that, he had worked at the Space
Telescope Science Institute in Baltimore. At ESO, as department head, he became
involved in VLT instrumentation projects such as FORS and UVES, enabling him
to complement his scientific and operational expertise with experience in managing
complex technological projects.
At the time, discussions took place about what was then called the Next Generation Space Telescope (NGST)4 , an 8-metre optical telescope to be deployed in space 5 .
Gilmozzi’s thoughts increasingly focused on what complementary science could, or
should, be done from the ground, once the NGST was launched. One might expect
to discover a host of faint galaxies at the edge of the Universe, but to investigate them
spectroscopically, a large ground-based telescope would be necessary. Another prospect would be to get a better understanding of whether exoplanets were ubiquitous or
not. Once again, to probe a sufficiently large number of stars in search of faint signs
of possible planets around them, would also require a large telescope. Other scientific questions, such as how we might improve our understanding of the formation
history of galaxies by studying individual stars in a representative sample of galaxies and the study of so-called “turn-off” stars — the so-called “Virgo or bust!” science case — came to mind, not to mention the possibility of directly measuring the
expansion of the Universe.

3	

At a 1996 conference in Landskrona, Sweden, Matt Mountain presented a paper on the scientific requirements
for the next generation of telescopes. As a starting point he looked at what it would take to obtain spectra of
the faintest objects in the Hubble Deep Field. Gilmozzi, went one step further — thinking of what would be
needed to do spectroscopy on the faintest objects that would become observable with what was then called the
Next Generation Space Telescope.

4	

The proposal was the outcome of a meeting at STScI, organised by Riccardo Giacconi in 1989.

5	

The NGST ultimately became the James Webb Space Telescope, a 6.5-metre telescope, which, at the time of
writing is scheduled to be launched in 2018.

412

Chapter IV-4 ∙ Of Eponymous Birds and Euros

Gilmozzi’s thoughts led him to conclude that a next generation ground-based tele­
scope should have a size of around 100 metres. He began to ask the engineers at
ESO about this. He later recalled what happened: “They sent me away, telling me
that I was crazy!” But rather than accepting that his proposition was impossible, he
returned with questions so that he could understand just why this would not be possible. “What really changed was that the engineers started to talk among themselves
and one day in the autumn of 1997, Philippe Dierickx, the optical engineer in charge
of the VLT mirrors, came to me and said: I think this can be done! … And then things
really started. It was a magic moment like the collapse of the wave function…” A small
group of interested people — boffins one might say — started to meet after working hours, typically in the congenial surroundings of a Bavarian beer-garden (appropriately, these informal get-togethers became known as the 100-beers meetings). By
the end of the year, the group had developed a general concept and a rough science
case, although they did not yet feel ready to go public with their thoughts. The project even had a name. The first was WTT, meaning the Wide Terrestrial Telescope
— although the joke about the Wishful Thinking Telescope could hardly be avoided.
Philippe Dierickx then came up with the name of OWL, for OverWhelmingly Large
Telescope, but also to associate it with the “the eponymous bird’s keen night vision”,
as he expressed it.
The excitement began to spread. It is therefore not surprising that news of this soon
reached the ears of the Director General. Giacconi was not amused. To be sure, he
had fought hard to keep everyone at ESO focussed on the task at hand: the completion of the VLT. In doing so — and with the single-mindedness that was characteristic for him — he had exhorted “his people” to work day and night. And he
had himself put up with more than a fair share of serious problems — internally
and externally — as we have already seen. Even so, he was quietly preparing ESO’s
engagement in what could become a global astronomy project — ALMA. And now
some of his own staff seemed to have begun to stray off course and into new territory. He summoned Gilmozzi to a hearing of a kind that any normal staff member
would have hoped never to experience. But as Gilmozzi started to explain the idea,
it kindled Giacconi’s scientific curiosity. The meeting ended indecisively. Somewhat
later, while preparing for a conference in Hawaii on Astronomical Telescopes and
Instrumentation organised in March 1998 by SPIE, Gilmozzi asked if he could present his ideas there. Giacconi agreed, provided that the ideas were to be presented
exclusively as Gilmozzi’s private ideas. “But then a day or two later Giacconi called
me back and said: I’ve thought about it. You should present this as an ESO project.”
From then on, ESO would work towards the development of an Extremely Large

413

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Telescope programme. Soon, a small project office was established with Gilmozzi as
principal investigator and Dierickx as project engineer. Other members were Guy
Monnet, Enzo Brunetto, Marco Quattri, Bernard Delabre, Norbert Hubin, Franz
Koch and François Rigaut.
Gilmozzi’s driving idea could be described under the headline “Size Matters”. Perhaps more fittingly “Size is Everything”. He was prepared to sacrifice elegance in
the design, even some performance, in favour of light grasp, reflecting his scientific
dreams. This approach was based on the idea that for a diffraction-limited telescope,
the science gain is proportional to fourth power of the growth in telescope size. This,
in turn, meant that the telescope would have to rely completely on the efficacy of
adaptive optics.
≈
Gilmozzi was not the only one who had given thought to this, but his approach was
more daring than anybody else’s. We shall look at the details on p. 420 in this manuscript. Among the other scientists who had long thought about the next generation
telescopes was Arne Ardeberg. Ardeberg had served as Director of the La Silla Observatory until 1984 and been strongly involved in the search for a site for the VLT.
Meanwhile, he was back at Lund University (Lunds Universitet) in Sweden, where,
since 1991, he had begun to think about a new large telescope, originally of 20-metre
aperture, then 25-metre, then with 40-metre and ultimately, with a mirror 50 metres
across. In 1993, he had set up a “telescope group”6 to work on these ideas and, in 1996,
he helped to organise an international SPIE conference on large telescopes in Landskrona, Sweden, where some initial ideas about the 25-metre project were presented.
His ideas included what he called a “live optics” system, a kind of intermediate stage
between active and adaptive optics, correcting not only for gravitationally induced
deformations of the primary mirror, but also for higher frequency wind effects on
the telescope (Ardeberg, 1996). By 1998, the ideas had not simply matured, but
changed. For example, the original idea of a spherical primary mirror had been abandoned. The project had also grown. It was now for a 50-metre telescope, first called
the Swedish Extremely Large Telescope 7, before — a couple of years later — adopting
6	

One of his collaborators was Torben Andersen, the engineer who had worked at the ESO Telescope Project division in Geneva and, after a stint at the Nordic Optical Telescope, served as systems engineer on the VLT project. We met Andersen in this book in connection with the Coudé Auxiliary Telescope at La Silla and, later,
ALMA.

7	

Presented at a joint ESO/Lund University workshop at Bäckaskog Castle in June 1999.

414

Chapter IV-4 ∙ Of Eponymous Birds and Euros

the name Euro-50. Apart from Lund University, Euro-50 involved scientists from
the Tuorla Observatory (Tuorlan Observatorio, Finland), the National University
of Ireland, University College ­London and the National Physical Laboratory, UK 8 .
It also had strong support from the Instituto de Astrofísica de Canarias (IAC). In
this form, i.e., as ­Euro-50, the telescope was foreseen as a Gregorian telescope with a
segmented f/0.85 primary mirror and a large deformable secondary mirror. A Gregorian telescope, named after its inventor James Gregory (1639–1675), is a classical
two-mirror telescope with an intermediate focus between the primary and secondary mirrors. With the introduction of Cassegrain-type telescopes, the Gregorian was
largely abandoned. That it now seemed to re-emerge, shows how telescope designers
had begun to cast off established preconceptions and not only embrace new ideas,
but were also revisiting ideas of the past 9 .
But ESO harboured serious reservations about the Euro-50 design. The requirements
for the precise centring of the optical elements are considerable. The Gregorian telescope design also needs a long tube, 85 metres in the case of Euro-50, imposing strong
requirements regarding stiffness. There were also concerns about having a deformable secondary of the size proposed for the telescope. The potential costs were also
not as clear as for OWL, for which the estimated costs had been verified in close
collaboration with industry 10 throughout the planning phase. This may have been
caused by the fact that the Euro-50 project group was much smaller than OWL’s and
working on a much more restricted budget. Finally, the early and seemingly unconditional selection of a particular site raised a number of questions, at least as seen
from ESO’s perspective 11.
But Euro-50 had its followers. To some, OWL was an engineers’ project; to some it
was too ambitious. The mere thought of a 100-metre telescope may have made some
more than a little hesitant. Because of the particular circumstances under which
the OWL project had emerged — within ESO and somewhat overshadowed by the
VLT and the ALMA project — it had not been discussed widely in the scientific
community, and the broader community had not bought into the project the way
they had done in the past for the VLT. But in any case, European astronomy now
8	

We note that, apart from Sweden, the institutes all came from countries that were not (yet) members of ESO.

9	

Other modern telescopes that have reintroduced the Gregorian design include the Magellan Telescopes and the
Large Binocular Telescope at Mount Graham in Arizona, USA.

10	

Some companies had actually carried out studies for free.

11	

ESO carried out detailed tests over several years in a number of carefully selected locations, including La Palma,
before choosing a site for the E-ELT. The choice was only made in 2010.

415

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

had two alternative ideas on the table — would that also mean two telescopes? Not
even the most enthusiastic astronomy diehard could consider this a realistic option.
For a while, the astronomical community seemed split and some feared that this
might seriously jeopardise any attempt to obtain public funds for a next generation
telescope worthy of the name. Hoping for a solution to the impasse, a meeting was
organised in early May 2002 in Turku, Finland.
What was then the European Community had, since the early 1980s, become
engaged in the funding of R&D. The political instrument, which became known as
the Framework Programme, had started very modestly, both in terms of budget and
scope, focussing on very specific areas of technology development. Subsequent editions of the Framework Programme expanded their reach, and, the sixth version in
2002 also contained funds for developing new research infrastructures, even with
some limited funds for construction12 . The Euro-50 project team planned to apply,
while ESO, at least for while, remained undecided. ESO is of course funded directly
by its Member States and obtaining EC funding, with possible strings attached, was
not necessarily part of ESO’s operational model. Since the fifth Framework Programme funds had also provided for “networks” of science institutes in Europe13 ,
including two for mainstream astronomy — OPTICON (for optical astronomy)
and RadioNet (for radio astronomy). The Turku conference, was organised by
­OPTICON. The meeting brought together astronomers from all over Europe including, of course, representatives of both ESO and the Euro-50 project. No decisions
were taken, but it became clear that additional studies of many of the technological
aspects of both projects were needed. This seemed to provide a way forward.
A follow-up meeting was therefore organised in Bologna on 12 July 2002. The participants were ESO representatives (Catherine Cesarsky, Roberto Gilmozzi and
Guy Monnet), from Euro-50 (Arne Ardeberg, José-Miguel Rodriguez Espinosa and
­Torben Andersen) as well as Giancarlo Setti, Roland Bacon, Rafael Rebolo, Tim de
Zeeuw and Gerry Gilmore (chair of OPTICON). Firstly it was decided that both
projects should continue for a period of 18 months, followed by a review. Secondly,
both parties would come together in a joint proposal to the European Commission,

12	

The programme enabled European Commission (EC) funding covering up to 10% of the project cost, however
capped at 15 million euros, and therefore clearly a minor contribution to a project that would cost somewhere
between 500 and 1000 million euros.

13	

In EC parlance, OPTICON was a so-called “an integrated infrastructure initiative”.

416

Chapter IV-4 ∙ Of Eponymous Birds and Euros

seeking funds for studies of the generic technologies that would be needed by both
projects.
The joint proposal — for “an ELT Design Study” — was submitted to the EC in
2004. It had no less than 39 partners and a budget of 42 million euros, of which
22 million were requested from the EC. Most partners therefore added their own
contributions. Not surprisingly, ESO’s contribution was the largest at 8.5 million
euros. The main areas of activity were adaptive optics, wavefront control, optical
fabrication, mechanics, system layout, site characterisation and instrumentation —
clearly all of major importance for the next generation optical telescopes. As it happened, the proposal was chosen for funding, albeit with a much reduced contribution from the EU (8.4 million euros), causing a number of partners to drop out. In
the end, about 25 institutes took part, with ESO hosting the project office. The study
was completed in 200914 . By that time, the situation had become much clearer regarding Europe’s aspirations in the field of ground-based optical astronomy. The steps on
the way involved important decisions by the ESO Council, the international review
of the OWL project, the actions undertaken in the wake of this review and finally,
a major conference in Marseille in December 2006, leading to the agreement by the
ESO Council to give the green light for a Phase B study for Europe’s forthcoming
Extremely Large Telescope (ELT).
≈
Both Council and the Scientific Technical Committee had of course followed the
evolution of the OWL project. There was no doubt that from a scientific point of view
an Extremely Large Telescope would be the next logical step. Others saw this in the
same way, especially in the US. The project was presented at an OECD (Organisation
for Economic Co-operation and Development) Global Science meeting in Munich
during the first days of December 2003, together with other large astronomy projects
worldwide. Yet ESO had its hands full with the completion of the VLT/VLTI and
was gearing up to full participation in the construction phase of the ALMA project
(see also Chapter IV-1), and these re­quired massive resources. In the December 2003
Council meeting, a Council working group on Scientific Strategy, chaired by Ralf
Bender, presented its thoughts, recommending that ESO should “reduce La Silla to
a minimum scientifically viable level to free resources, continue the planned upgrading
14	

Although followed by an additional, if smaller, EC-funded (ELT PREP) study under the 7th Framework Programme. The budget was six million euros with five million from the EU.

417

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

of VLT, complete the VLTI instrumentation programme to allow imaging with UTs,
construct and bring ALMA into operation, carry out a detailed design study for OWL
and ultimately build an ELT, alone or in partnership.” Gradually, a consensus was
building in Council that “ESO should seek to lead the development of an ELT on the
shortest possible timescale” 15 . At the same time, Council discussed the possible implications of the establishment of the European Strategy Forum for Research Infrastructures (ESFRI), a new body set up at the request of the European Council, in
partnership between the European Commission and the Member States and associated states of the EU, to identify the next generation of large research facilities of
pan-European interest. ESO’s Member States slowly edged towards a decision, and
in December 2004, the ESO Council passed a milestone resolution. It said:
“[The] ESO Council … agrees that
…
– over the last decade, the continued investment of ESO and its community into the
improvement of ground-based astronomical facilities has finally allowed Europe to reach
international competitiveness and leadership in ground-based astronomical research,
– the prime goal of ESO is to secure this status by developing powerful facilities in order
to enable important scientific discoveries in the future, …
…
adopts the following principles for its scientific strategy:
…
– ESO’s highest priority strategic goal must be the European retention of astronomical
leadership and excellence into the era of Extremely Large Telescopes by carefully balancing its investment in its most important programmes and projects,
– the construction of an Extremely Large Telescope on a competitive time scale will be
addressed by radical strategic planning, especially with respect to the development of
enabling technologies and the exploration of all options, including seeking additional
funds, for fast implementation… .”
In March 2005, ESFRI published an embryonic list of European projects with the
Extremely Large Telescope included, thanks to the intervention of several Council
delegates. Even if the European list did not release major funds, this was an important
political step, since the list developed into a roadmap for European research infrastructure projects with the EU member states being encouraged to produce national

15	

Council minutes, December 2003.

418

Chapter IV-4 ∙ Of Eponymous Birds and Euros

roadmaps, aligned with the European one16 . In the same month, after a six-year stint
as Director of the P
­ aranal Observatory, Gilmozzi returned to Europe to become
head of the ESO Telescope Division, and lead the new project. Together with his
colleagues he prepared a 700-page project proposal, the OWL Blue Book, ­analogous
to the 1987 VLT Blue Book. For the telescope itself, the proposal was largely based
on in-house work, with the involvement of European industry. However, the scientific community had been heavily involved in both the development of the science
case and the first ideas about instrumentation. The OWL proposal represented both
a radically new approach to telescope design and a continuation of the experience
gained so far with the current 10-metre-class telescopes, e.g., as regards active and
adaptive optics, the use of segmented mirrors and low-cost structures.

Artist’s impression of the OWL telescope. (Illustration by Herbert Zodet)
16	

Large telescopes were not only the dream of European astronomers, but also of their American colleagues. In
the US two projects emerged, the Thirty Meter Telescope and the Giant Magellan Telescope (GMT) of the Carnegie Foundation. To discuss issues of common interest, informal meetings of senior executives, typically at
international airports such as Heathrow or Amsterdam, were organised in that period. Among the ideas considered were the sharing of technologies and a possible division of scientific tasks, implying developing complementary instrumentation (perhaps even mutually compatible) and the sharing or exchange of telescope time.
The first of these meetings took place in 2004. The meetings, however, also discussed non-optical astronomy
projects such as the Square Kilometre Array (SKA).

419

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The 100-metre OWL primary mirror (i.e. a light-collecting surface of an impressive
6000 square metres) was to be a spherical surface, made up of more than 3000 identical hexagonal segments, each 1.6 metres in size. The secondary mirror, no less than
25.6 metres across, would have been made up of more than 200 flat 1.6-metre segments. Low-expansion glass-ceramics or silicon carbide was foreseen for the mirror
elements. To compensate for the unavoidable severe spherical aberration, a four-element corrector would be located mid-way in the telescope structure, with two flexible
8-metre-class active mirrors (similar to the VLT primary mirror), a 4.2-metre focusing mirror and a 2.3-metre flat, fast steering adaptive mirror for first stage adaptive
correction. In line with the idea of already identifying upgrade paths at the earliest
stage, it was thought that the 4.2-metre mirror might be exchanged for an adaptive
one at some point. The telescope tube assembly would be a steel structure of 15 000
tonnes on an alt-azimuth mount. Active optics, the particular optical design and the
use of standardised elements, both for the primary mirror and for the mechanical
structure, would all contribute to reducing cost and thus, it was thought, it would
become possible to build this giant for the price of one billion euros.

The OWL project generated considerable interest in European
industry. This picture shows Jean-Pierre Swings, Roberto
Gilmozzi and Philippe Dierickx presenting the project at a
meeting of the Walloon Space Cluster (of industries). (Photo:
Hans Hermann Heyer)
17	

In November 2005, an international review panel17 worked
its way through all the aspects
of the project. The panel concluded “that the team has demonstrated a plausible case that
OWL is feasible and that a 100metre telescope can be built and
operated… . However, the committee has identified several
areas where the risks involved in
pursuing a 100-metre diameter
telescope are sufficiently serious
that the likelihood of significant
schedule slip is high and there is
a significant probability that the

Chaired by Roger Davies (Oxford) and with Jean Gabriel Cuby (L’Observatoire Astronomique MarseilleProvence [LAM]), Brent Ellerbroek (TMT), Daniel Enard, Reinhard Genzel (MPE), Jim Oschmann (Ball
­Aerospace), Larry Ramsey (Pennsylvania State University), ­Roberto Ragazzoni (INAF), Stephen Shectman
(­Carnegie Observatories) and Larry Stepp (TMT) as members.

420

Chapter IV-4 ∙ Of Eponymous Birds and Euros

required scientific performance will not be achieved. The estimate of the cost to successfully achieve the 100 metre goal remains substantially uncertain… .”
OWL was, essentially, found to be a step too far. Yet both the science case for an
extremely large telescope and the conviction that, within Europe, ESO would be
the right organisation to realise it, remained. The committee therefore also recommended “that the project [should] proceed to Phase B, which should start with a thorough re-evaluation as described above.” This meant moving towards a smaller telescope
that was less complex, and technologically less risky, and, in particular, discarding
the idea of a segmented secondary mirror in favour of a monolith, as well as aiming
for a solution that would be more instrument-friendly. The reality of this, however,
was a complete redesign of the telescope. The OWL review was clearly a milestone
event, but it would have been easy to stumble over this stone. The challenge was now
to retain the momentum, to keep up the enthusiasm and dedication of the project
team, and to secure the full participation of the scientific community. As Director
General, Catherine Cesarsky had long been concerned about what she considered
to be insufficient community involvement. And she understood fully the need for
speedy and decisive action. She therefore immediately rolled out a set of blitz actions
on a breathtaking schedule, involving five joint ESO/community working groups on
the key themes of science, telescope design, instrumentation, adaptive optics and site
selection. The working groups were asked “to synthesise and collate ELT capabilities
in the specified topic area, noting existing community studies and ongoing efforts and to
propose a basis for prioritising capabilities in the specified topic area, a list of key tradeoffs
and an initial prioritisation of an ESO ELT capabilities.” The reference to “existing
community studies and ongoing efforts” was of course a clear signal to consider good
ideas regardless of their origin, but also that the project should now move on. The
first meetings were supposed to occur as soon as mid-January 2006 with the groups
delivering their reports by April. A consolidated report by May would form the basis
for the next phase, to last until the end of the year, during which period a Reference
Baseline Design would be elaborated by an E-ELT Project Office to be established
at ESO and led by Jason Spyromilio, then Director of the ­Paranal Observatory. The
process towards a final proposal would be accompanied by a core ELT Science and
Engineering working group (ESE), comprised of the chairs of the five subgroups, an
ELT External Advisory Board (EEAB) and, of course, the STC. Following the regular December Council meeting, in which the Science Strategy Working Group18
(SSWG) was requested to support the effort, the SSWG chair, Tim de Zeeuw, set up
18	

We shall return to this body in Chapters IV-7 and IV-9.

421

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

a meeting on 21 December. By the end of that day, the invitations to the prospective
chairs of the working groups went out19 . Following their acceptance, already on the
next day, invitations went out to those who had been identified as possible members
of the respective working groups. Cesarsky’s initiative was received with overwhelming enthusiasm by the scientific community. Although the invitations to participate
in the working groups had only been issued just before Christmas and the meetings
were to commence in mid-January, virtually everybody accepted the invitation —
and the challenge. Keeping up the momentum, in January 2006 Cesarsky presented
the plan to the ESO staff, who were just returning after the Christmas recess. She
ended her presentation with a bold statement: “We have the brains, we have the knowhow, we have the means — let’s do it! (with the Community)”. Just two days later,
on 13 January, the first working group met. As planned, the draft reports were ready
by the end of February 2006. The first meeting of the core ESE took place on 21
March and a second meeting on 21 April. The core group was co-chaired by Daniel Enard and Guy Monnet. This was followed by a workshop with all the working
group participants on 27–28 April. By that time, major changes to the project had
already been defined: the size of the primary mirror was set at 42 metres and a novel
optical design by Bernard Delabre, to be known as “the five-mirror telescope” was
proposed 20 . Within the same timeframe, ESO set up an ELT Standing Review Committee (ESRC), chaired by Roger Davies and with Bob Williams, Bengt Gustafsson,
Matt Mountain, Jean-Loup Puget, Monica Tosi and Reinhard Genzel as members.
The first meeting took place on 19 May. The recovery action had electrified the scientific community, and thus at a conference in Marseille from 27 November–1 December 2006, ESO was ready to present and discuss its idea with the wider community
in the shape of some 250 participants. In a sense, this conference was reminiscent of
the 1986 Venice Conference that preceded the VLT decision.

19	

Daniel Enard (Telescope Design), Marijn Franx (Science), Colin Cunningham, Gérard Rousset (Adaptive
Optics) and Roland Gredel (Site Selection). The groups were co-chaired by ESO staff.

20	

Given the differences of opinion about the telescope design, the choice of the chair of the telescope working
group was clearly critical. It fell on Daniel Enard. Enard was highly respected in the entire community. Furthermore, as he had left ESO in 1996 to work on the VIRGO gravitational wave detector project in Italy, he was
rightly perceived as a neutral arbiter, and expected to forge a consensus in the group. He did. His seminal work
at ESO on instrumentation and his contribution to the VLT notwithstanding, achieving consensus in this ELT
working group while at the same time helping to launch a truly innovative design was perhaps the greatest service he rendered to ESO. It would also be his last, as less than two years after the decision to move to the ELT
Phase B study, in August 2008, he died, aged 68.

422

Chapter IV-4 ∙ Of Eponymous Birds and Euros

The participants of the Marseille meeting on the E-ELT.

Anyone present in Marseille who might also have attended the 1986 Venice conference would have realised how the VLT project evolved after that meeting. Wisely,
therefore, the aim of the Marseille meeting was not to settle on one single design
solution. Rather the aim was to achieve consensus on some basic design requirements, embodied in two different design solutions, and to enable the ELT project
office to elaborate on both solutions with the understanding that in the end, a definite choice had to be made. In their report from the meeting, Roberto Gilmozzi and
Jason Spyromilio, described the starting point for the next phase: “The telescope to
be built should have a primary mirror of order 40 metres in diameter (42 metres was
thought to be a good compromise between ambition and timeliness), should not be based
on spherical mirrors, should have adaptive optics built into it and deliver a science field
of view of at least five arcminutes diameter with a strong preference for larger fields.
Furthermore the telescope was to provide multiple stable observing platforms while
maintaining a focal ratio that would be favourable to instrumentation.” (­Gilmozzi
& ­Spyromilio, 2007). At the time, the question of the optical layout was left open
— either a G
­ regorian telescope or the five-mirror design, which had evolved in the
course of the preceding months and soon turned out to be the winning option 21. So,
21	

The ESO 2006 Annual Report provides the reasoning: “While the Gregorian design had advantages in a better
theoretical performance in adaptive optics, a smaller mirror count and smaller central obstruction, the five-mirror
design was considered to have advantages in the image quality across the focal plane, the control of the wavefront
using laser guide stars, the flexibility of the focal stations, the deployment of atmospheric dispersion compensators,
the smaller dome and the relative ease with which it could be upgraded to follow the development of technology in
the future. Most critically, however, the five-mirror design was considered to have much lower risk in the area of
adaptive optics by virtue of the separation of the field-stabilisation and adaptive-optics functions, a key recommendation of the OWL review.”

423

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

by early 2007 the p­ referred solution was for a 42-metre telescope with a segmented
primary mirror 22 comprised of 906 elements, each 1.45 metres wide, and with a
6-metre secondary mirror. With the five-mirror design the M3 was a 4.2-metre mirror relaying the light to a double system of mirrors providing for the adaptive optics.
The quaternary (M4) 2.5-metre mirror was fully flexible, with at least 5000 actuators operating at a frequency of 1000 Hz and finally the M5 was a 2.7-metre mirror
that would correct for lower-order disturbances.

Given the importance of the
E-ELT as the observational
facility for optical astronomers
for a long time to come, it is not
surprising that Europe’s astronomers engaged strongly in the
discussions about the definition of this telescope. After all,
what was at stake was their very
professional future as scienA major scientific driver for the ELT generation of teletists. With no lack of competscopes has been exoplanet research. In this cartoon from 1997,
ing ideas and wishes that were
Philippe Dierickx adds his own comment on the prospects in
that area.
passionately fought over, these
discussions were not always
straightforward. The outcome of the Marseille conference was therefore a major
diplomatic victory for Cesarsky — bringing together a unified scientific community behind the revised E-ELT proposal. With this outcome, at its December meeting, the ESO Council approved the proposal to move into the detailed design study
phase with the aim of completing it by December 2009. Much work and many difficult decisions lay ahead, including the critical choice of site, but the way forward had
been cleared. In August 2007, when her term of office expired, Cesarsky could look
back on an impressive set of achievements: the last and technically most challenging
part of the VLT project, the VLT Interferometer, had been put on track, literally and
also scientifically, the ALMA project had been approved and the major industrial
contracts awarded, the OWL conceptual study had been converted into a concrete
22	

Unlike the US, Europe had little experience with segmented mirror technologies. However, at the time the
10-metre Gran Telescopio Canarias (GTC) was under construction in Spain. Once Spain joined the organisation, ESO’s engineers gained access to this facility (see also Chapter IV-8).

424

Chapter IV-4 ∙ Of Eponymous Birds and Euros

Roberto Gilmozzi presents the E-ELT reference design at the Council meeting in December 2006. (Photo:
Hans Hermann Heyer)

project for an extremely large telescope with the backing of the scientific community, and ESO had seen the largest influx of new Member States since its foundation
in 1962. We shall look at the latter shortly, but also note that for a dynamic organisation like ESO, plenty of work
of course awaited her successor, Tim de Zeeuw — the completion of the ALMA project,
the challenge of transforming
the E-ELT design study into
a real, fully financed, project
while also maintaining P
­ aranal
as Europe’s foremost astronomy
base. Yet it will be for another
chronicler, in due time, to
describe this part of ESO’s conIt belongs to the traditions at ­Paranal that, after every M1
tinuing history.
recoating, a photo of the team is taken. This particular one, in
July 2007, also marked the farewell to Catherine Cesarsky,
here surrounded by the team members, as Director General
of ESO. (Photo: Gerd Hüdepohl)

425

An ISAAC observation from 2001 of Messier 16 (M16), a
star-forming region in the constellation of Serpens. Also called
the Eagle Nebula, the object is probably even better known
as the Pillars of Creation thanks to the spectacular Hubble
image. This VLT image, however, shows a much larger area
in the sky, including the cluster of hot stars (NGC 6611, at
the top of the picture), which gives the pillars their shape.
(Observation by Mark McCaughrean and Morten Andersen)

Chapter IV-5

The VLT in Retrospect
“Astronomy is once again leading physics
in posing the most profound questions
on the nature of the universe we live in.”
Riccardo Giacconi in his book
Secrets of the Hoary Deep.

A

t the time of writing, the VLT is approaching its 15th anniversary. Over the
many years of the project it has been the centre of attention and it remains the
main facility of ESO today. In this chapter, we will try to summarise the impact of
the VLT. Before we look at what the VLT has given us, however, we will look at the
cost and in particular how it increased over the years. We saw that the original proposal cost of 382 million deutschmarks grew to something close to 1000 million
deutschmarks (or roughly 500 million euros) and how both the Council and ESO
as an organisation struggled under this burden. But what were the realities behind
the increase? A closer look reveals a much less dramatic situation than the numbers
above seem to suggest. Firstly, different accounting methods were used, and secondly inflation, over a period of more than ten years, took its toll. Additions to the
programme did affect the final price, but as we have discussed, these additions were
crucially important in ensuring the scientific output of the VLT. According to a
calculation made in 1999, the year when the ­Paranal Observatory was inaugurated
and the first Unit Telescope handed over to the scientific community, the total sum
of external contracts amounted to 577 million deutschmarks. These contracts were
awarded between 1989 and 2003. If the contract value of all of them were to be converted to 1999 values, the final number would be 612 million deutschmarks. This
included the four 8.2-metre Unit Telescopes, the first generation of instruments,
the first VLTI phase including two of the Auxiliary Telescopes, the site development and construction. This number must be compared to the cost estimate in the
original proposal, which, if also updated to its 1998/99 value, would be 524 million
deutschmarks, meaning that the real, net increase was in the 15–17% range, caused
by scientifically justifiable additions.

427

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

But it is important to note that the estimated cost contained in the Blue Book proposal included neither manpower nor operation costs1. By 1999, 142 full-time equivalent personnel were occupied with the VLT. Including manpower, operations (until
2003) and general overheads, the cumulative cost at 1999 prices became 990 million deutschmarks. What may have been underestimated in the original proposal,
therefore, was the personnel effort required. But readers are reminded of the dramatic changes that occurred in that period in the way astronomical research was
conducted — enabled by new technologies but also with manpower implications.
Although the cost rose, the scientific gains were, simply speaking, enormous. Building a telescope like the VLT without ensuring its optimum use for science would
have been indefensible.
≈
The VLT cemented the position of both Schott and REOSC as world leaders in the
field of telescopes. Schott has supplied its products to customers across the world,
including NASA (the Chandra X-ray satellite and Constellation X), the airborne
Stratospheric Observatory for Infrared Astronomy (SOFIA), the 10.4-metre GTC
telescope on La Palma in the Canary Islands, the Chinese Large Sky Area MultiObject Fibre Spectroscopic Telescope (LAMOST) and the 6.5-metre Magellan Tele­
scope. REOSC polished the mirrors of the twin 8-metre Gemini telescopes and the
mirror segments for the GTC, among others. AMOS, the Belgian company, grew
into a major supplier of astronomical telescopes and instruments. And of course
many of the technologies that the VLT required found their way into other areas as
well. For example, the Shack–Hartmann wavefront sensors, with their lenslet arrays,
found applications far beyond astronomy, in areas such as eye surgery and laser beam
profile measurements.
≈
But the VLT was of course not built to develop new technologies, however interesting
they may be. It was built to do science. So how has the VLT contributed to astronomy?
It has become a truism that astronomy, probably the oldest of the sciences, is currently experiencing another golden age. To a large degree, the reason is that technology opens up new avenues of enquiry. Thanks to the incredible advances in technology that have occurred during the last 100 years or so, astronomy has entered a phase
1	

These costs were estimated seperately.

428

Chapter IV-5 ∙ The VLT in Retrospect

where it is not just asking questions, but can actually aspire to
provide real answers to some of
these most fundamental questions. How old is the Universe?
How did it evolve? How did the
stars and planets form? Might
this immense space that we call
the Universe harbour life elsewhere than on our tiny planet?
Such questions are unlikely to
be answered by individual scientists or by using one particular telescope. The research
The first 8.2-metre blank at the Schott Glassworks being preenterprise is instead more like a
pared for shipment to France in June 1993. Understandably
symphony orchestra with every
the proud Schott team had placed a large banner behind the
instrument contributing to the
blank, saying “Größter Spiegelträger der Welt”. (Photo: Hans
Hermann Heyer)
whole. The VLT has occupied a
significant place in the current
concert of astronomy and it has contributed to most areas within this science. If we
look more closely at the numbers we find that, since the start of science operations
and up until early 2012, observations with the VLT have formed the basis of more
than 4200 research papers. It is therefore impossible to provide a synopsis of the
research activities that will do any justice to the scientists and to the VLT itself in just
a few pages. Nonetheless, the following paragraphs may convey both a sense of the
importance of the work done with the VLT and the breadth of the research topics.
Fundamental constants constitute the numerical values of basic physical parameters such as the gravitational constant, the elementary charge, the mass of the electron, or the speed of light (in vacuum). We don’t know why they have these particular values, but we realise that, were they any different, the world that we know would
not exist. In a famous quote from Einstein, he resorted to almost poetic language,
to discuss the mystery surrounding the fundamental constants: “[They] are genuine
numbers which God had to choose arbitrarily, as it were, when He deigned to create
this world.” 2 . Constants, unsurprisingly, are not supposed to change, but how firm
is this rule? From an astrophysical point of view, the Universe constitutes not ­simply
2	

Letter of 13 May 1945 from Einstein to Mrs Use Rosenthal-Schneider, cited in Mehra (1973).

429

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

a giant physics laboratory, but one that allows us to look back in time to the earliest epochs of the Universe. It follows that astronomy lends itself naturally to studying some of the fundamental constants, including the question of possible time variations in the value of the fine structure constant, which defines the strength of the
electromagnetic interaction. Might it have changed over this huge timespan, as some
scientists have suggested?
In astrophysics, spectroscopy is often the almost magical tool with which astronomers probe the depths of space to investigate the nature of the distant objects of
their study. In this case, however, the object was the huge expanse between some
of most distant and brightest objects known — the quasars — and us. Because of
their brightness, quasars can be used as searchlights, literally shining their powerful light through intergalactic space and onto the matter found there. By revealing
the wavelengths of atomic transitions in the high-redshift (or high-z), i.e. distant,
Universe, spectra of quasars also show the physical conditions of matter at different
epochs. Using the UVES spectrograph mounted on Kueyen over a total of 34 nights,
­R aghunathan Srianand, Patrick Petitjean and their collaborators explored 50 ab­­
sorption systems (interstellar clouds of gas) at distances of between six and eleven
billion light-years to test the suggestion that the fine structure constant might have
changed over time. Their results provided a strong constraint on any variation of
this constant over the last ten billion years (Srianand, et al., 2004; and ESO Press
Release 31 March 2004). But it is unlikely to be the last word on this subject 3 . As
observational techniques improve, the question will undoubtedly be revisited, for
science with its ­Mertonian norms is an evolutionary process with continuous checks
on results as we try to construct an evermore comprehensive edifice of knowledge.
As readers will know, our current thinking regarding the evolution of the Universe
is based on the idea of a Big Bang, which goes back to theoretical work carried out
in Europe and observational results first obtained in the late 1920s in the US. The
observational evidence rested on the fact that when spectra of stars and galaxies are
obtained, spectral lines, which can be associated with specific elements, are displaced
relative to where they are located in a laboratory spectrum. Mostly, these spectral
lines are shifted towards longer wavelengths, a phenomenon that astronomers call
redshift. This phenomenon is traditionally explained by the Doppler effect, known
from everyday life — for example — by the change in pitch from an approaching or
3	

Based on data obtained with the Keck I telescope and the VLT, in 2010 John Webb and colleagues suggested that
there could be spatial variations of the fine structure constant. Their findings are as yet unconfirmed, however.

430

Chapter IV-5 ∙ The VLT in Retrospect

receding vehicle, say a train or a car. In astronomy the Doppler effect is observable,
for example, in studies of binary stars or extrasolar planets. However, in cosmology
the underlying mechanism is different; cosmological redshift is a manifestation of
a stretching of wavelengths because the very fabric of space has expanded over the
travel time of the light. The higher the redshift (and thus the recession velocity), the
larger the distance to the source, and, because the speed of light is finite, the greater
the so-called lookback time. We see objects in the sky not as they are now, but as they
were at a certain time in the past. But how far do we look back in time and how old
is the Universe? The link between what is now called the redshift velocity and the
distance (and therefore, the lookback time) is the Hubble constant. Determining the
Hubble constant has arguably been one of the greatest challenges faced by astronomers in the 20th century. In Chapter I-1, we mentioned that just a few decades ago
estimates of the age of the Universe ranged from 10 to 20 billion years, depending
on the value assigned to the Hubble constant.
The main tools to determine distances in astronomy have been triangulation (for
the nearest objects only) and the identification of stars that could serve as “standard candles” (see Chapter III-7). An alternative and independent way to constrain
the age of the Universe — as astronomers would express it — is by measuring the
abundances of rare elements in stars. By considering the natural decay of radioactive isotopes with sufficiently long half lives, it is possible to estimate the ages of the
stars. This technique is similar to the long-established practice of carbon-14 dating,
used in archaeology. Given the timescales involved, this would suggest searching for
either the isotope thorium-232, with a half life of about 14 billion years, or — even
better — uranium-238, which has a half life close to 4.5 billion years. In one such
study, astronomers observed a series of extremely metal-poor stars, assuming that
they must have formed during the earliest phases of the Milky Way. The observations were carried out in 2000–2001 with the Kueyen Unit Telescope and UVES,
the high-­dispersion spectrograph. The astronomers clearly hoped that the resolving
power and efficiency of UVES, together with the light-gathering power of the telescope would enable them to detect the extremely weak fingerprint, or spectral line,
of U-238 in the stars. They were not disappointed. This first observation led to an age
estimate of 12.5 billion years for a particular star and provided an important clue, as
well, regarding the age of the Universe 4 (Cayrel et al., 2001; ESO Press release 7 February 2001). The result also demonstrated the power of the VLT. Yet astronomers
knew that there was more to come. Much more.
4	

The current estimate of the age of the Universe is 13.7 billion years.

431

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The observations had focussed on the oldest stars in the Milky Way. Yet, in spite
of their impressive age, these stars could not have been the first generation of stars.
This was because they contained elements that must have been created in preceding
supernovae. So when did the first stars in the Milky Way form? In 2003, VLT observations led to a new estimate. Once more, astronomers used the presence of chemical abundances in stars to answer this question. But instead of looking at the decay
of heavy, unstable elements, they now looked at the gradual build up of a light element, beryllium-9.
It is thought that beryllium-9 is produced by the fragmentation of heavier atomic
nuclei from supernova explosions when they collide with hydrogen and helium
nuclei. The concentration of beryllium in the interstellar medium will therefore
increase with time. As new stars are born in interstellar clouds, they will also contain beryllium and the later these stars begin to form the more beryllium they will
contain. Studying the oldest stars that we can find and looking at their beryllium
content will therefore provide information about the time elapsed between the first
supernova explosions and the formation of the first of the second-generation stars.
And since stars that end their lives as supernovae are short-lived, we will begin to
understand when the very first stars in the Milky Way were born. The idea was simple but, needless to say, these observations were difficult to carry out. As was the case
with the uranium measurements, the overall amount of beryllium is small, and the
spectral lines are very weak. Furthermore, they fall in the part of the electromagnetic spectrum close to the ultraviolet cut-off of the atmosphere. Even so, a group of
astronomers using UVES managed to carry out the first-ever such observations of
two stars in NGC 6397, a globular star cluster located 7200 light-years away in the
southern constellation of Ara. The results suggested an age for the Milky Way of
about 13.6 billion years, which, considering the uncertainties, is in agreement with
the current estimate of the age of the Universe (Pasquini et al., 2004 and ESO Press
Release 17 August 2004).
The Big Bang theory received perhaps its most impressive confirmation in 1992 with
the mapping of the afterglow of the Big Bang — the cosmic microwave background
radiation (CMB) — by NASA’s Cosmic Background Explorer (COBE). The observations showed minute fluctuations in the background temperature of 2.7 K, precisely
as predicted by theory. Scientists speak about the CMB anisotropy, meaning that it is
not exactly the same in all directions. Later measurements have been carried out with
much improved resolution first by NASA’s Wilkinson Microwave Anisotropy Probe
(WMAP) and slightly later by ESA’s Planck satellites, with results appearing in 2010.

432

Chapter IV-5 ∙ The VLT in Retrospect

But science is about constantly questioning established assumptions and testing them
with new experiments or observations. In 2008, a team of scientists used UVES to
perform a unique measurement of the cosmic background temperature at a more
recent epoch. To do so, they looked for molecular hydrogen in a galaxy seen 11 billion years in the past. The galaxy itself can hardly be seen, but behind it is a quasar.
With this quasar conveniently acting as a searchlight, as we have already seen in the
study regarding the fundamental fine-structure constant, it is possible to investigate
the galaxy and its chemical composition through the imprint it leaves on the spectrum of the quasar. As well as hydrogen and its heavy form deuterium, the group
also noted the presence of molecular carbon monoxide (Srianand et al., 2008). This
allowed them to determine the temperature of the background radiation. According
to the theory, the CMB temperature should have been around 9.3 K at this particular early point in the Universe’s history. The measurements suggested a temperature
of 9.15 K ± 0.7 K — a good match. The observations also showed that the physical
conditions of the interstellar gas in this remote galaxy are similar to those seen in
our own galaxy, the Milky Way.
As mentioned, modern astrophysics sees the Universe as a giant physics laboratory.
Here we find the most extreme conditions that we can imagine — the emptiest of
vacuums, the most densely compressed matter, the lowest and the highest temperatures. Undeniably interesting, but it is hard to describe the Universe as a friendly
place. Occasionally parts of it are doused with high-energy radiation, such as gamma
rays. The phenomenon was first discovered during the Cold War, as the US military
launched satellites to monitor Soviet compliance with the ban on nuclear tests in the
atmosphere5 . While no sign of a Soviet violation of the agreement was found, the satellites instead detected bursts of gamma rays coming from space. This led to attempts
to identify the objects from which the radiation emanated and thus a search for the
cause. Once a burst had been detected, one approach was to train ground-based telescopes on the particular part of the sky from which the radiation came and search for
the possible source. But gamma-ray bursts are unpredictable and short-lived events
and catching them needs quick reactions. Dedicated small telescopes across the globe
are used for this purpose, including telescopes at La Silla. But larger telescopes, such
as the VLT also have an important role to play. By now, we know that most bursts
— or GRBs as astronomers call them — are located at very large distances from us,
5	

This is reminiscent of the chance discovery of radio waves from space by Karl Jansky, and the advent of radio
astronomy, following investigations of static that caused disturbances to short-wave transatlantic voice
transmissions.

433

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

billions of l­ ight-years away. In fact, observations of a GRB detected on 23 April 2009
using the VLT and the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope at La Silla revealed a source
seen as it was 13 billion years ago — in other words seen as when the Universe was
no more than 700 million years old. This is the object with the greatest measured distance (Tanvir et al., 2009). Given the amount of energy that we measure, the energy
released in a few seconds during such an event must exceed that of the Sun during its
entire ten-billion-year lifetime. During the late 1990s, astronomers began to believe
that these dramatic bursts were somehow associated with supernova explosions, but
GRBs remained shrouded in mystery.
On 29 March 2003 — at 11:37:14.67 UT — a NASA satellite detected a very bright
gamma-ray burst. Optical identification was achieved with a 1-metre telescope at
the Siding Spring Observatory in Australia, enabling VLT astronomers at P
­ aranal
to point the Kueyen telescope fitted with the UVES spectrograph at the source 6 .
They determined the distance to the object, now given the unspectacular designation GRB 030329, to be an estimated 2650 million light-years — the closest GRB
ever detected. Even for astronomers, used to studying the most distant objects in the
Universe, proximity counts, as we will remember from SN1987A. This particular
GRB therefore provided an unprecedented opportunity to gain further insights into
the origin of the phenomenon. The first detection of an optical afterglow was that
made by the Dutch astronomer Jan van Paradijs and his collaborators following the
80-second gamma-ray burst (GRB 970228) in February 1997. But GRB 030329 was
nonetheless the event that established the connection between long-duration GRBs
and the death of a massive star. Over a period of one month spectra were obtained
with the FORS1 and FORS2 instruments — on Antu and Kueyen, respectively —
while the object rapidly faded. The result showed convincingly that GRBs occur in
connection with the kind of supernova explosions that astronomers now call hypernovae, the deaths of stars with 25 or more times the mass of the Sun. The XXL version of a supernova, one might say.
Gamma-ray bursts, however, come in two kinds — long bursts (lasting more than
two seconds) and short ones. Short bursts also emit higher energy photons than
the long ones. It therefore seemed clear that the physical processes leading to these
two types of events might differ. It had also not been possible to detect an afterglow
6	

Gamma-ray bursts are short-lived and it is therefore important to react immediately once a flash is detected by
a space-borne observatory. For this reason, in 2004 ESO implemented a rapid response mode for the VLT, by
which the regular observations are interrupted and the telescope automatically carries out observations of the
GRB source, shortly after detection (Vreeswijk et al., 2010).

434

Chapter IV-5 ∙ The VLT in Retrospect

3 April 2003

1 May 2003

GRB030329

GRB030329

FORS observations showing the optical afterglow of GRB 030329.

after any short bursts, and thus to determine the exact position of objects, which was
necessary for follow-up studies with ground-based telescopes. However, two short
gamma-ray bursts, on 9 May 2005 and 9 July 2005 respectively, changed this. In the
first case the observers used the VLT’s Antu and Kueyen Unit Telescopes — once
again with the twin FORS instruments. On 9 May, the Swift satellite7 registered a
burst of 40 milliseconds duration. This time it also detected an afterglow, which enabled the observers to obtain images of the area in question with FORS2. The object,
known as GRB 050509B, was believed to be associated with an elliptical galaxy at a
distance of 2700 million light-years (Gehrels et al., 2005). Star formation does not
take place in such an environment, and hypernovae, which are associated with highmass precursors with short stellar lifetimes, are therefore also not expected to occur.
Not surprisingly, there were no traces of a supernova explosion during the weeks after
the burst. This gave support to the assumption of different causes for the long- and
short-duration GRBs. The second event was a 70-millisecond duration burst. This
time, the scientists — a team led by the Danish astronomer Jens Hjorth — were
successful in identifying the fading source using the Danish 1.54-metre telescope
at La Silla (Hjorth et al., 2005). So what might be the origin of the short-duration
bursts? Current speculation focuses on the merger of two of the most exotic objects
in the sky — neutron stars. A neutron star is the remnant of a supernova explosion.

7	

Operated by NASA/ASI/PPARC.

435

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

It is an ­extraordinarily compact and dense object with a diameter of just some 10–20
kilometres, but a mass similar to that of the Sun or even larger.
Astronomers often speak about the cosmic zoo because of the many “species” of
astronomical objects, some of which are truly strange. Neutron stars belong in this
category. And so do black holes. But black holes are not just found in distant galaxies — as it turns out, we have one in our own stellar system, as well. So to study
black holes, we are lucky enough to have a prime example in our own backyard. To
be more precise, there is one at the centre of the Milky Way that is amenable to highresolution studies with telescopes such as the VLT. As the scientists wrote in their
research paper: “The [Galactic Centre] is a uniquely accessible laboratory for exploring
the interactions between a massive black hole … and its stellar environment.” (Gillesen
et al., 2009). In that connection it should be remembered that one of the reasons
why Europe’s astronomers placed their observatory in the southern hemisphere was
precisely to study the centre of the Milky Way in the most efficient way.
Black holes cannot be seen directly. However, their presence can be inferred by study­
ing the surrounding region, including the behaviour of objects that are affected by
the presence of this cosmic monster. Perhaps one of the most impressive studies that
has ever been carried out in astronomy is that of the stars located at the centre of our
galaxy. The study was undertaken by a team of astronomers led by Reinhard Genzel
from the Max-Planck-Institut für Extraterrestrische Physik in Garching. Pinpointing
and following stars at the densely populated centre of the Milky Way places extraordinary requirements on the telescope. Furthermore, since large swathes of dust that
obscure the stars are found in this region, observations had to be made in the infrared, which allowed the scientists to peer through the dust. The team went to great
lengths to carry out their study. We recall that they developed the SHARP instrument and, realising the potential of the newly commissioned NTT, convinced ESO
to mount it on this telescope, although it was really not meant to accommodate such
visitor instruments. The observations that were initiated with SHARP marked the
beginning of a 16-year-long study, using some 50 nights of observations to meticulously map the motions of a number of stars close to the centre of our galaxy. From
2002 onwards 8 , observations were undertaken with the VLT and two adaptive optics
instruments, NACO and SINFONI, the integral field spectrograph covering the
spectral range of 1.1–2.45 µm.

8	

Before that observations were also conducted with the 10-metre Keck telescope on Mauna Kea, Hawaii.

436

Chapter IV-5 ∙ The VLT in Retrospect

The observations revealed stars orbiting an invisible central object, associated with
the radio source Sgr A*, in a very particular way. Out of the 28 stars observed, one,
known as S2, completed its orbit in 15 years, i.e. within the period of the study. At a
certain point in its orbit it comes as close as 17 light-hours to the central object. The
observations enabled the astronomers to calculate the mass of the central object and
it was found to be no less than four million solar masses. The conclusion is that our
galaxy features a massive black hole at its heart. The study of this region has, if anything, intensified. Readers are advised to stay tuned for exciting updates!
In 2008, Genzel was awarded the Shaw Prize for his research on the black hole in
the Milky Way 9 .

The central region of the Milky Way seen with the VLT.
9	

Followed in 2012 by the Crafoord Prize, shared with Andrea Ghez from UCLA.

437

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The Milky Way, our cosmic home, is undeniably an exciting place. One topic that
scores high on the list of fascinating topics is, naturally, the study of planets outside the Solar System. In Chapter III-7 we discussed the breakthrough in exoplanet
research in 1995 with the pioneering work of Michel Mayor and Didier Queloz. But
the detection of extrasolar planets by means of radial velocity measurements was an
indirect one. Actually seeing such a planet, i.e. obtaining a direct image, had eluded
the astronomers. In fact, many considered this to be impossible with existing telescopes. Nonetheless attempts were made and some early claims of success reported,
although they could not be confirmed. In Chapter III-14, we mentioned such a case.
However, in 2004, ESO published the first direct image of an exoplanet obtained with
the VLT. It was based on a research paper by a group of mainly French astronomers 10
led by Anne-Marie Lagrange and with Gael Chauvin, a young astronomer working at
ESO ­Paranal, as first author (Chauvin et al., 2004). Two main problems arise in connection with directly imaging such objects: the small angular separation of the planet
from its parent star and the enormous difference in brightness between the star and
the planet, which reflects only a tiny amount of the starlight. It is a little like detecting the radiation from the face
of the lighthouse keeper in
the glare of a lighthouse beam
from a great distance11 . Consequently, the search for exoplanets has focused on intrinsically faint stars, of the kind that
astronomers call brown dwarfs,
where the difference in brightness would be within the range
that could be managed, if still
requiring extraordinarily good
telescopes and advanced imaging systems. In this case, the
object was surmised to be in
orbit around a brown dwarf
star, known as 2M1207, 230
The brown dwarf and its “Giant Planet Candidate Com­
panion”, as the astronomers chose to call it.
light-years away in the s­ outhern
10	

The team also included three American astronomers.

11	

Planets in an early phase of formation may emit infrared light and thus be detectable in this wavelength domain.
This was the case for the object associated with 2M1207.

438

Chapter IV-5 ∙ The VLT in Retrospect

constellation of Hydra. The planet itself, 2M1207b, was separated from its star by less
than 0.8 arcseconds, corresponding to 55 AU at the distance of the star. It is therefore
not surprising that it required adaptive optics to detect it. The image was obtained
on 27 April 2004 with the NACO adaptive optics camera mounted on the fourth
VLT Unit Telescope, Yepun. Alhough ESO had not made such a claim before, given
the past history of first images of exoplanets, it was cautious in its first press release,
which carried the headline “Is This Speck of Light an Exoplanet?” (ESO/CNRS press
release 10 September 2004).
The question now was whether the observed object was gravitationally bound to the
star. Subsequent observations with the Hubble Space Telescope followed too soon to
provide the answer. However, based on new observations with the VLT and NACO
in 2005, confidence grew, leading to a much more assertive science paper and press
release (“Yes, it is the image of an Exoplanet”, ESO press release 30 April 2005, coordinated with UCLA). Five times as heavy as Jupiter, the largest planet in the Solar
System, this distant exoplanet is a cold place, suggested by the presence of water molecules detected by means of spectroscopy. Later observations have confirmed the
initial findings, although there is still some argument about whether this is a real
planet, because it is likely to have formed in a different way from the planets in the
Solar System (i.e. from fragmentation of the initial cloud rather than by accretion).
NACO has been used to image other large planets, including the one in orbit around
the star Beta Pictoris, as already mentioned in Chapter III-712 .
Looking at the hundreds of exoplanets that have been found since 1995 it is striking, if not unexpected, that most of them are heavy objects 13 . Some find themselves
in extremely close orbits around their parent stars. Others, as the example above suggests, may have formed in a different way from “normal planets”. Indeed, few planets come near to what Earthlings would consider normal in terms of looking like
the terrestrial planets of the Solar System and being able to host any form of imaginable life. So is Planet Earth — and possibly even life — really an exception? Most
astronomers would argue that the reason for the difference between what we see in
the Solar System and what we find elsewhere in the Milky Way is simply due to the
fact that our current search methods introduce a natural bias. Today’s telescopes
12	

Understandably, there was a race to obtain the first image of an exoplanet. A group of scientists at the FriedrichSchiller-Universität Jena, using NACO, identified an object in orbit around the star GQ Lupi. There was much
uncertainty about the nature of this object, so the image of 2M1207 is still regarded as the first direct image of
an exoplanet.

13	

This is a natural outcome of the still limited observational capabilities at our disposal.

439

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

have managed the incredible feat of confirming that other planets do exist, but they
are not able to let us study a representative sample of the planet population to make
definitive statements about the distribution of different classes, let alone to study the
chemical composition of individual objects. This is a task for the next generation of
telescopes that may allow us to provide such answers. But, as we have seen, the current studies have also opened up new questions about planet formation itself. Do all
planets form in the same way? Or do we have to revise our current ideas of planet
formation? This is perhaps largely a rhetorical question, for such a revision is ongoing as we collect ever more information enabling us to challenge and test these ideas.
We will finish this section on science with the VLT with an example, perhaps not of
the most spectacular kind in terms of new science, but which nonetheless provides an
impression of the awesome capabilities of the VLT. As we know, cometary nuclei are
small bodies in the Solar System, comprised of ice and dust. The American astronomer Fred Whipple famously described them as dirty snowballs. When they get close
to the Sun they heat up and gas and dust grains are ejected into the surrounding space
forming the comet’s coma and the tail. These are the parts that we occasionally see
in the sky when a bright comet passes by — such as Comet West in 1976, Comet
Halley in 1986, Comet Hyakutake in 1996, Comet Hale-Bopp in 1997 or Comet
McNaught in 2007. The spectacular f ly-bys of cometary
nuclei by ESA’s Giotto space­­
probe stimulated the appetite
for space missions to comets and
in the early 1990s, ESA decided
to send a probe, named Rosetta,
to intercept a comet and to
land on it to extract samples of
the comet’s pristine material.
The target comet selected was
Comet 46P/­Wirtanen, and to
prepare the mission and following a proposal by a joint team
from ESO and the Space Science Department of ESA, VLT
observations were carried out
FORS2 observation of Comet Wirtanen (the blue spot in the
to study the comet. On 17 May
middle). At the time the comet was about six million times
1999, while the telescope was
fainter than can be perceived with the unaided eye.

440

Chapter IV-5 ∙ The VLT in Retrospect

still in its commissioning phase, a series of short exposures was obtained with the
VLT Test Camera mounted on Kueyen. At the time the comet was 600 million kilometres (4 AU) from the Earth and 745 million kilometres (5 AU) from the Sun.
As the launch date came closer, further observations were made.
On 9 December 2001, several new exposures were made. The comet was now at about
the same distance from the Sun as at the time foreseen for executing the landing, i.e.
at a distance of 435 million kilometres. Since, by the time of the observations in 2001,
the comet was low in the sky and — to be seen at all — had to be observed in twilight, the observations were highly demanding. However, the images, obtained with
FORS2 on Yepun, provided a good basis for the mission planners, both by determining precisely the size — barely more than one kilometre — and shape of the target.
They also revealed a reassuringly low level of activity on the comet’s surface, suggesting that this was not likely to create problems for the lander. Alas, due to launcher
problems and the resulting delay, ESA eventually had to move to another target14 , but
the example is yet another illustration of the how space missions and ground-based
activities can complement each other.
The examples given here offer a kaleidoscopic, if certainly limited and snapshotlike, overview of a few of the important results emanating from research with the
VLT. A quantitative assessment is provided by the publication data, collated and
analysed by the ESO library and provided every year in ESO’s Annual Reports. In
1999, the first publications from the VLT began to appear in the scientific journals.
Twenty-nine articles based on VLT observations were registered that year. The number almost doubled during the following year and continued to grow, reaching a peak
in 2007 with 494 publications. These numbers must be seen against the total number of publications based on observations at ESO — 348 in 1999 rising to 720 in
2007, where it reached an interim peak (Grothkopf, 2010). After a slight decline in
2008–9, the number of VLT-based papers and ESO-based papers rose again, reaching 783 in 2011.
Let us try to approach the question of the influence of ESO and the VLT on European astronomy in a different way. We will remember that one of the aims was to further extragalactic studies in Europe. For Observing Period 62 (ending March 1999),
the last period before the first VLT Unit Telescope was opened to the users, ESO
14	

Instead, ESA selected Comet 67P/Churyumov-Gerasimenko, which was imaged by the ESO NTT on 26 February 2004.

441

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

received 250 applications for observing time in the relevant areas (cosmology, galaxies and active galactic nuclei). This was a typical tally in those days and constituted
roughly half of the total number of applications. In Period 63, this number rose to
289, in Period 65 to 343. Since then, it has remained at that level, albeit with the
usual fluctuations from period to period. These numbers, however, are for ESO as a
whole. It is hardly surprising, though, that the overwhelming majority of applications
are for VLT time. This is an expression of the attractiveness of the VLT of course,
but it is also a result of the lower capacity, and capability, of La Silla. Thus about ¾
of all applications are for the VLT. Perhaps surprisingly, there is a rise in applications
for observations in the classical areas of stars and the interstellar medium, in some
periods reaching twice the numbers for galaxies and cosmology. The VLT is beyond
doubt the observing facility of choice for the ESO community of astronomers.
Some of the examples above have illustrated the importance of coordinating and
combining observations with the VLT with those from space observatories or space
missions to enable a multi-wavelength study of a specific target. The Great Observatories Origins Deep Survey (GOODS) survey is perhaps the ultimate example
in this respect. It covered two fields, each of 150 square arcminutes, around the socalled Hubble Deep Field15 North and the Chandra Deep Field South (CDFS). We
will remember the NTT Deep Field image, produced in 1991. In December 1995,
the Hubble Space Telescope was used for ten days to observe a tiny patch of sky
in the constellation of Ursa Major with a total of 150 hours of exposure time and
combining 342 individual exposures. Deep fields, it seemed, were in vogue. Later,
in 1999–2000, after his departure as Director General from ESO, Riccardo Giacconi led a team that produced the Chandra Deep Field in Fornax, a small southern
sky constellation, based on a staggering total exposure time of more than 277 hours
(one million seconds). The observations were conducted with the Chandra X-ray
Observatory, which had been launched in July 1999. These were augmented by optical observations from the VLT, the NTT and the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope
at La Silla to enable optical identification of the X-ray sources. Other observatories
later carried out further deep observations and so GOODS became possible, as a
coordinated attempt to survey the most distant parts of the Universe to detect and
study the faintest objects possible and covering a wide range of wavelengths across

15	

Initiated by STScI Director Bob Williams.

442

Chapter IV-5 ∙ The VLT in Retrospect

the electromagnetic ­spectrum16 . In a sense, the GOODS project unified most of the
major observational facilities in a common scientific project. Astronomy, perhaps
the most international of all sciences, had not only mustered facilities worldwide,
but also brought the full multi-wavelength arsenal available to astronomers to bear
on a major scientific question.

16	

GOODS brings together observational data obtained with the Hubble Space Telescope, the NASA satellites
Chandra and Spitzer, ESA’s XMM-Newton satellite as well as the VLT on Cerro ­Paranal, the Keck and ­Gemini
telescopes on Hawaii and the Very Large Array Radio Telescope in Socorro, New Mexico and others. It was
completed in 2009.

443

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

On 9–10 December 2004, the President of the Republic of
Chile, Ricardo Lagos, and his wife visited ­Paranal. During
this private visit, the President took the time to stay overnight and seized the opportunity to observe with the VLT. In
the early 1990s, as Minister of Education, Lagos had been
involved in the political turmoil surrounding ESO. Now, he
had a chance to familiarise himself with the ESO staff and
to see for himself the improvement in relations between the
host state and ESO. Here, the President is seen with Jason
Spyromilio, at the time Director of ­Paranal.The picture is a
strong testimony to the change in atmosphere. (Photo: Hans
Hermann Heyer)

444

Chapter IV-6

A Love Affair
“The commitment of ESO is and will continue to be
the development of astronomy and scientific culture
in the country hosting our observatories.”
Catherine Cesarsky, on the occasion of the celebration
of the 10th anniversary of the Interpretative,
Supplementary and Amending Agreement
between ESO and Chile.

I

n the previous chapter, we have looked at what the VLT brought both to ESO’s
Member States and to the science of astronomy. But the VLT also impacted relations between ESO and its South American host state. Back in 1963, Heckmann had
been warmly welcomed in what to Europeans appeared to be a remote country. “The
friendliness with which we were received was unique,” he wrote (Heckmann, ibid.).
Naturally, over the years, both ESO and Chile underwent great changes and it was
unavoidable that this would occasionally result in diverging interests. The crisis in
the first half of the 1990s, however, proved a healthy shock, forcing both parties
to review their partnership and create a new framework in which their legitimate
interests could be brought together constructively. There is no doubt that the Interpretative, Supplementary and Amending Agreement of 1996 has played a crucially
important role in fostering continued good relations between ESO and Chile. As
we have mentioned in Chapter III-10, the agreement included guaranteed access to
the ESO telescopes for Chilean astronomers. To enable them to fully exploit this,
it also established a fund overseen by a joint ESO–Chilean committee, which simply became known as the Comité Mixto. It disbursed around 400 000 euros per
annum. The money was used to support postdoctoral fellowships and professorial
positions at the universities, some technical equipment and other smaller items. It
also enabled support for the primary and secondary education system, including
teacher-training activities, student scholarships and general outreach. In addition,
through the ALMA project, Chile receives more than 500 000 US dollars per year

445

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

for regional and scientific support activities. This support was bound to have a considerable impact on Chilean science and academic life. On 19 June 2006, high-level
representatives of ESO and Chile came together in Santiago to take stock of the
effects of the Agreement.
Between 1985 and 2005 the number of Chilean astronomers doubled. However, the
number of publications increased eightfold and Chilean astronomers were able to
use the full amount of telescope time granted. Several concrete examples illustrate
the role of the Agreement. At the Universidad de Chile five of the six faculty members received substantial support. Grants enabled lively postdoctoral activity at the
institute, as well as supporting the establishment of an instrumentation laboratory
for students at the Cerro Calán Observatory. At the Pontificia Universidad Católica
de Chile, also located in the capital, Committee support enabled a new faculty position and part of the postdoctoral programme. Funds were furthermore made available for a collaboration in the field of scientific instrumentation with the Department of Astronomy and Astrophysics and the Department of Electrical Engineering.
The Católica del Norte University in Antofagasta, located in the same region as the
­Paranal Observatory, also benefitted from ESO’s presence. Firstly, the university used
an observing site near Cerro Armazones, prepared by ESO. Secondly, funds allocated
by the Comité Mixto enabled the university to engage three academic staff and to
conduct an extensive outreach programme. In the southern part of the country, the
Universidad de Concepción was able to hire academic staff, acquire up-to-date IT
equipment and create a postdoctoral programme of its own. Finally, the ­Universidad
de La Serena had benefitted from the programme, in this case focussing on the training of teachers (ESO/Government of Chile Joint Committee for the Development
of Astronomy, 2006).
Chilean astronomy was clearly blossoming. At the same time ESO was increasing
its own scientific presence in Santiago. As major administrative and scientific functions returned to the capital in the mid-1990s and the VLT operations got underway
towards the end of the decade, the scientific staff at the Vitacura office doubled. The
development of an astronomical centre was first overseen by Bo Reipurth, then by
Danielle Alloin and, later, by Felix Mirabel1. With such a concentration of astronomers, both at Vitacura and at the Chilean institutes, joint seminars and workshops
were organised, contributing further to creating an integrated scientific community. The first event was a three-day workshop entitled “Astronomy in Chile” held in
1	

The current leader is Michael West.

446

Chapter IV-6 ∙ A Love Affair

From the press meeting in Santiago on 19 June 2006, on the occasion of the tenth anniversary of the
Supplementary Agreement. Seen from left to right: Felix Mirabel, who succeeded Daniel Hofstadt as
ESO Representative in 2004, Catherine Cesarsky and Leonardo Bronfman, Professor at Universidad
de Chile. Speaking is Ambassador Luis Winter, Director of Special Policy for the Chilean Ministry of
Foreign Affairs.

April 1995 (Reipurth, 1995). Another example was the Interferometry Week in January 2002. Vitacura became a centre of attraction far beyond ESO, just as the VLT
attracted astronomers from all over the world. More than ever, Chile had become a
mecca for astronomy. Let us, however, dwell a little more on the importance of the
VLT for Chile. The VLT confirmed the outstanding quality of the observing sites
in northern Chile, while showing how the substantial logistical challenges could be
addressed. Thus, in the relationship between ESO and Chile, the VLT also cast its
shadow forwards, leading to the decision in 2010 to place the next-generation optical telescope the E-ELT, on Cerro Armazones, in sight of the VLT.
≈
As the relationship grew in intensity, some began to see it not simply in terms of
European scientists using the observational facilities to do their own science, but to
value the intellectual exchange and ESO’s role as a cultural bridge between Chile
and Europe. Of course, in the contemporary Chilean discourse, ESO often stood as
a symbol of Europe, but sometimes it was the other way around. In 1999, the year
after the VLT first light, Chile was chosen as the international partner country for
the ­Hanover Fair in Germany. This is the world’s largest industrial fair with more
than 300 000 visitors strolling through 30 large exhibition halls. Being chosen as

447

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the partner country is a special honour and Chile understandably wished to use this
opportunity to showcase the very best of the country, its companies and products
and its attractiveness in terms of foreign investments and tourism. But the Chilean
government also wished to highlight cultural and scientific aspects and therefore
kindly invited ESO to fit out the entrance part of the 1700 square metre stand. The
author worked on this project, together with representatives of the Chilean Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the Chilean Foreign Trade Organisation (ProChile). The
result was a 26-metre-long entrance corridor with an inclined floor, leading up to a
first-floor cinema area. Giant pictures of the ESO facilities graced one wall and and
on the opposite side there were pictures and texts describing the climate and geology of Chile, and relating these to their effects on observational conditions. Three-­
dimensional exhibits included a model of the VLT. Videos provided information
about the telescope and astronomy in general. Visitors entered this corridor and
walked beneath a huge backlit mosaic photograph of the Milky Way, before leaving
this part of the exhibition. The Chilean pavilion was formally opened on 19 April
by the President of Chile, Eduardo Frei. An engineer by background, and as we have
seen, personally familiar with the VLT, he clearly took pride in explaining the project to his German hosts.

From the opening of the Chilean Pavilion at the Hanover Fair on 19 April 1999: (From left to right)
Rodrigo de Castro, President Eduardo Frei Ruiz-Tagle, Marta Larraechea Bolívar and Massimo
Tarenghi. Photo right: The exhibition corridor. (Photos by the author)

The Chilean pavilion presented a modern, forward-looking country, eager to interact with the rest of the world. And it is true that regular visitors to Chile cannot
but be deeply impressed by the progress that has occurred in that country, especially
since 1990. With an average economic growth of 5.6% per annum, Chile outpaced

448

Chapter IV-6 ∙ A Love Affair

all other countries in Latin America during the period 1990–2006. The boom created a new middle class and cut poverty, the scourge of most third-world countries.
Whilst in 1990, 40% of the population lived below the poverty line, by 2006, it had
fallen to 13% (Muños, 2008) This notwithstanding, it is apparent that historically,
large social differences — with their potential for tension and conflict — have had a
huge impact on the societies of South America. Chile has had its share of problems.
It is beyond the scope of this book to deal with these issues, but it is worthwhile looking at the interaction between ESO and its staff and Chilean society, as it evolved
over the years, and particularly over the last one and a half decades.
≈
Many European ESO staff members have come to see Chile as their second homeland and in quite a few cases it has actually become the first. While admiring the
progress the country was making, they could not ignore the need for help in some
places. In the early 1990s, a group of ESO staff came together to organise a charity effort. About 35 ESO personnel agreed to voluntarily support a charity scheme,
which set itself the goal of providing help, especially to street children and orphans
in Chile. The main beneficiaries of this effort were the SOS Children’s Village in
Antofagasta, the Kindernothilfe projects in Santiago and the Hogar Santa Clara,
a charity in Santiago that supports HIV/AIDS victims. Contributions from staff
members, together with money raised through a number of activities, have over the
years netted a sum of about 100 000 euros in support of these organisations. To this
should be added voluntary work by ESO staff in Chile, not least in connection with
the relief efforts after earthquakes, a curse that relatively often strikes this country
with force. A report by Arno van Kesteren about the work of the group after the
27 February 2010 earthquake, which reached 8.8 on the Richter scale and hit the
area south of Santiago, serves as an illustration of the dedication and vigour of those
involved: “In the village of Cumpeo (located 300 kilometres south of Santiago), six families who had lost their homes have been ‘adopted’ by our group. The primary purpose
was to build new houses. We first selected and bought the construction material. Then
a group of ESO volunteers generously donated several of their supposedly ‘off-shift weekends’ to initiate the construction work. At the time of writing, four families have already
moved into their new houses while two others are about to do so. In the area of Doñihue
(located 120 kilometres south of Santiago), another group of ESO volunteers worked to
improve the thermal insulation of the temporary houses in April. Some complementary
construction material has been recently distributed to persons in need.”

449

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Thus what began in 1961 with Jürgen Stock’s colour slides and his enthusiasm about
the observational qualities of the Chilean desert sites has evolved into a multifaceted
relationship with strong bonds of friendship at the professional 2 as well as at the personal level. For some, it has even become a love affair.

2	

As mentioned, in 2005 Daniel Hofstadt was awarded the Order of Bernardo O’Higgins. In 2011, the same honour was bestowed on Hans-Emil Schuster.

450

Chapter IV-7
A Growing Organisation
“Now being an astronomer in Europe, it is a must to cooperate
with ESO, as it is a must for particle physicists to cooperate with CERN,
as it is a must for a space scientist to cooperate with ESA.
We needed some organisations in Europe, we now have this
and we are very happy to see how efficient they are… .”
Hubert Curien, French Minister of Science and Technology,
speech at the 1990 NTT Inauguration Ceremony in Garching.

I

n Chapter I-5, we saw how ESO began to organise itself in order to serve the
scientific community. Among other things, this implied the establishment of a
coherent system of governance. The Council and the Finance Committee were both
stipulated in the Convention and the Financial Protocol. These important committees were supplemented by the Scientific Technical Committee, the Observing Programmes Committee and the Users Committee. The latter two committees serve
the Director General and the STC is linked to Council as a parallel body to the
Finance Committee. In addition, over time many ad hoc committees and working
groups have dealt with particular issues, mostly related to specific projects. All this
has provided a robust system from which ESO and its user community has profited
ever since. But adjustments have had to be made along the way, both as regards operations and governance. In a sense, one can say that ESO became a victim of its own
success. In such cases, reform is called for.
The growth in the number of telescopes and their attractiveness to an increasingly
vibrant scientific community brought with it a growth in the number of applications for telescope time. In the late 1980s, the number of observing applications
had reached about 350 per semester, too many for the members of the Observing
Programme Committee to deal with. Like the other ESO Committees, the OPC
comprised representatives of the Member States, but in 1988 additional members
were appointed, described as members at large, to alleviate the pressure on the proposal reviewers. The respite did not last long. By 1993, the number of proposals had

451

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

reached 500. Thus, under the chairmanship of Joachim Krautter, it was decided to
introduce a two-step selection process with discipline-oriented panels to evaluate the
proposals before they were discussed at the OPC. Six panels were established, covering the main categories of research — “(i) Galaxies, clusters of galaxies, and cosmology; (ii) Active galactic nuclei and quasars; (iii) Intergalactic and interstellar mediums;
(iv) High-mass and/or hot stars; (v) Low-mass and cool stars; and (vi) Solar System.”
(ESO Annual Report, 1993). This classification system, as well as the procedure,
has remained in force ever since. Not surprisingly, with the advent of the VLT, the
number of observing proposals has kept rising, and is now at a level of 1000 proposals per semester. It would seem as if the thirst for observing time of astronomers is
impossible to quench.
The pressure factor on the telescopes, expressing the demand for time relative to the
available facility time, is substantial and the Users Committee have kept ESO’s focus
on expanding its telescope park and on securing smooth operations. But no organisation is stronger than its weakest link. To ensure that ESO could live up to the
demands for excellence across the board, Giacconi, introduced the idea of an international visiting committee1, comprised of scientists from ESO Member States and
beyond. They were charged with reviewing all aspects of the organisation. The first
Visiting Committee was appointed in December 1994 with Alec Boksenberg (Royal
Observatories), Claes Fransson (Stockholm Observatory [Stockholms Observatorium]), Ken Freeman (Mount Stromlo and Siding Spring Observatory), Johannes
Geiss (Universität Bern), John Huchra (Harvard Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics), Rolf Kudritzki (Universitätssternwarte München), and Guy Monnet (at the time
from Observatoire de Lyon). George Miley (Leiden Observatory) was asked to chair
the committee. Since then, with varying composition, the Visiting Committee has
become a recurrent feature in the oversight of the organisation, providing important
input to the Council, the ESO management and its staff.
We described how the now familiar operational structure of ESO had emerged in the
mid-1970s: the European headquarters with strong technical and scientific competences and the observatory in Chile. The facilities in Santiago were largely dormant
for twenty years. But times change.
Once the decision to develop a second observing site at P
­ aranal was taken, the question of the role of the Santiago office was re-opened. Most of ESO’s activities in
1	

This was in itself not new in the academic world, but it had not been used at ESO before.

452

Chapter IV-7 ∙ A Growing Organisation

Chile, including the administration, had been concentrated at La Silla since 1975.
Would it make sense to run ­Paranal from La Silla in the long run? And, in view of the
troubled relationship between ESO and Chile in the early 1990s, would a strengthened presence in Santiago help? In 1994, ESO decided to move the administration
back to Vitacura. During September 1994 the Astronomy Support Department also
moved its offices from La Silla to Santiago, breathing new life into the Vitacura premises. As the number of staff members grew in connection with the VLT, the former astronomical workshop in Vitacura was refurbished and converted into offices
for astronomers. By 2002, the scientific staff in Vitacura comprised approximately
35 staff, 15 fellows (postdocs), five paid associates and ten PhD students/co-­opérants
(Alloin, 2001). As we discussed in the previous chapter, this had very positive repercussions for Chilean astronomy and illustrates the catalytic effect that ESO’s presence, together with that of the American observatories, had in the region2 . Yet, from
ESO’s historical perspective the return to Santiago represented something of a volte
face. Sometimes, it seems, such a volte face can be a healthy development. In any event,
the old tension between Santiago and “Europe” has not reappeared and both centres
exist in a fruitful symbiosis today.
The next stage of the reorganisation followed logically from the relocation of major
activities to Santiago, combined with the shift in the centre of gravity that occurred
as the VLT moved into pole position as ESO’s prime facility. In February 2005, the
two observatories, La Silla and ­Paranal, merged to become one observatory in two
sites, under the name the La Silla ­Paranal Observatory — streamlining both management and operations. In the 1980s and 1990s, the development of the ­Paranal site
had leaned heavily on La Silla for logistical support. Now, P
­ aranal had grown strong
and could provide support and help for La Silla, when needed.
≈
Moving now to issues of governance, as the organisation took in more Member States
and embarked on new projects, the budget grew accordingly. The main income for
ESO is the annual contribution by its Member States. The individual contributions
are determined by the size of the economy of the respective countries. This means
that, in principle, every country contributes its fair share. The 1962 Convention has,
however, built in an upper limit for the contribution of a single country. This was

2	

The Vitacura Centre was further strengthened when the new ALMA office opened in 2010 on the premises.

453

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

originally set at one third of the budget 3 , but has, by Council decision, been lowered
first to 27.6% and periodically to somewhat less. The reason for the upper limit is to
avoid a situation in which a single country becomes too influential in the organisation. Historically Germany, Europe’s largest economy, has continuously hit the contribution limit, as has France for long periods of time. Despite this exception, the
“fair share” principle applies. Taken in absolute numbers, however, the contributions
of the different countries vary significantly, from Germany and France at the very
top, to Finland, Portugal and the Czech Republic as the smallest contributors among
the current Member States. Based upon the idea of the “fair share”, Article V, Paragraph 4 states that “each member state shall have one vote in the Council”. This ensures
equal treatment and equal influence on decisions and also extends to decisions on
the budget. But even if there are great similarities between the Member States, their
national economies are not necessarily in step. This can lead to different views on
the budget and, in some cases tension between the few large countries and the more
numerous smaller ones. This problem became apparent in the course of the 1990s
under the financial strain imposed by the budgetary belt-tightening of many countries, but also in the face of increased interest of new countries in joining the organisation. In 1995, Council reached a compromise solution, implementing the principle
of weighted voting on a trial basis. The idea would be that while the small countries
should not be able to outvote the two largest contributors, the latter should not be
able to impose their will on the smaller countries either. At the same time, however,
a stalemate should also be avoided, to ensure that the organisation could function.
This implied that endorsement of the annual budget would require a “double majority”, meaning a majority both among the Member States and the yes votes securing
contributions of at least 55% of the funding. This was implemented for the Finance
Committee, which recommends the budget. The decision on the budget, however, is
the prerogative of the Council, for which the Convention continues to apply. Initially, the decision was for a trial period of three years, but it remained in force until
the end of 2003. In 2004, it was modified somewhat, but the basic idea was retained.
According to the revised practice, “A double majority procedure shall apply to the
Finance Committee recommendations to Council… . The percentage of contributions
necessary to reach the financial majority under this procedure is set at a level of more
than the total contributions of all Member States (100%) reduced by the sum of the percentages of the two largest contributors, according to the scale of contributions in force
at the time the vote takes place.”
3	

Article VII, para. 1 c).

454

Chapter IV-7 ∙ A Growing Organisation

≈
Membership of the STC was originally based on the idea of national representation, as it was for Council and Finance Committee. In 2005, however, the composition of the Scientific Technical Committee was changed “to ensure broad coverage
of all the range of scientific disciplines required for VLT, VLTI, ALMA, and ELT” 4
(ESO Annual Report, 2005). For a while members would be nominated not by their
national constituencies and as representatives of those, but by a dedicated nomination committee, with the membership confirmed by Council5 . It seemed like a natural follow-up to the changes in the OPC, reflecting the growing complexity of ESO’s
programmes, but also, in a deeper sense, revealing the growing perception of a unified European scientific landscape, rather than a group of national ones 6 .

4	

Following a recommendation by the 2004 Visiting Committee.

5	

This procedure was later simplified, but the focus on securing the widest possible set of expertise was retained.
Whilst national nomination was reintroduced, the selection is made by the Director General, subject to confirmation by the Council.

6	

It was the same thinking that enabled the establishment of the European Research Council as a pan-European
funding mechanism for scientific research, based on scientific excellence, only, and without any national selection mechanism.

455

Chapter IV-8

The Surge
“The VLT changed everything.”
Gerry Gilmore, Speech at Lancaster House on 8 July 2002
on the occasion of the UK accession.

T

here were five founding countries of ESO — Belgium, France, Germany, the
Netherlands and Sweden. In 1967, Denmark joined. Many years passed before
the next countries joined — Switzerland and Italy, both in 19821. Once more, a long
period would pass with ESO in a stable situation as regards Member States, but from
2001, things changed dramatically. Between 2001 and 2008 ESO took in six new
Member States, in the following order: Portugal (2001), the United Kingdom (2002),
Finland (2004), Spain (2006), the Czech Republic (2007) and Austria (2008)2 . There
were a number of reasons for this surge in membership. Undoubtedly, the success
of the VLT played a major role, as the quote by Gerry Gilmore suggests. Aside from
the research perspectives opened up by the VLT, it also accorded ESO credibility as
regards the future. It seems that ESO’s involvement in the ALMA project was equally
important, and helped the entry of both the UK and Spain. ESO’s future projects
were of great interest both to scientists and industrialists in many countries and
stimulated a strong desire to become part of them. But there was more to this surge.
The early years of the first decade of the twenty-first century saw an unprecedented
move towards European integration. This went far beyond the issue of science, but
it was accompanied by a growing recognition among governments that science and
technology played a central role in the creation of wealth. Among other things, this
manifested itself in many countries by an increase in their investments in research
1	

To join ESO a country must accede to the ESO 1962 Convention and its associated protocols. This obviously
requires a decision by the Government in question backed up by a confirmation by the parliament of the country,
in the process known as ratification. Only when the ratification documents have been presented (to the French
Ministry of Foreign Affairs, which holds the original of the Convention), will the country formally become a
member.

2	

During that period early, informal discussions also took place with almost ten additional countries, some of
which may, ultimately, lead to membership.

457

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

activities 3 . This in turn became an important element of the overall political development towards the creation of the European Research Area. As regards ESO membership, it is probably not possible to assess how much the ERA development actually
meant vis-à-vis the other factors, but there is no doubt that it led to an overall political understanding of the value of European collaboration in research and therefore
also provided important arguments in the political decision process that underpins
government actions. The tailwind for science was notable. But to obtain a full appreciation of what this development meant for ESO, we once more need to acknowledge the human factor. Again and again we see how young scientists — from outside the original Member States — became familiar with ESO and its projects, and
how seeds were planted that would ultimately blossom, sometimes twenty years or
more later. This is a fact of crucial importance, for it takes dedicated people to join
up the technological, scientific, political and strategic dots that become apparent in
the evolution of nations. It is therefore not surprising at all that we shall see a number of individuals play decisive roles in helping their countries join the organisation.
≈
Article VII, paragraph 3 of the ESO Convention proscribes that “States becoming
Members of the Organization after the date on which the Convention comes into force
shall be required to make a special contribution representing their share in capital investment and fitting-out cost already incurred.” As the observatory grew and the sums
representing the capital investment became considerable, this created a major hurdle for countries wishing to join. ESO’s policy deviated from most other organisations in this respect, but it is important to remember that when a country joined,
the community of scientists obviously also grew. It was therefore important for the
organisation to have the necessary resources to serve the enlarged community properly. Thus we remember that the special contributions made by Italy and Switzerland
were used to pay for the NTT. On several occasions Council reaffirmed two important decisions: that the special contribution would be used to increase the budget
(rather than lowering the contributions of the existing Member States), and, importantly, that a calculation of the capital investment would only comprise those facilities that were of real scientific significance at the moment of accession. Furthermore,
ESO’s facilities would also depreciate with time and this would be accounted for in
3	

Thus, in 2003, the European Council — the meeting of Heads of Governments and States of the EU — agreed
to raise their spending on research to 3% of the Gross Domestic Product (GDP) to be reached by the year 2010.
This became known as the Barcelona Decision. Whilst not achieved within the foreseen timeframe, it has been
retained in the Europe 2020 Strategy.

458

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

the calculation of the capital investment considered. In round numbers, during the
first decade of the new century, the relevant capital investment was around one billion euros. The special contribution was thus based on this sum, but the amount to
be paid depended on the GDP — or to be precise the Net National Income (NNI)
— of the candidate country relative to the equivalent number for the existing Member States. Joining ESO constituted a major effort on the part of the candidate country, and required the mobilisation of political will.
We will now try to trace the main steps towards membership that led to the 2001–
2008 surge (the accessions of Switzerland and Italy have been described briefly by
Woltjer in his 2006 book). Although the membership increase happened at quite a
pace, it was built on a long — sometimes decades long — sequence of contacts, informal exchanges and discussions and, from a certain point in time, more formal interaction. Each of the stories is a story of hope, frustration, sustained lobbying and,
mostly, the attainment of the coveted goal. But this was not always the case. The first
example would, in fact, appear to be a failure.

Australia
Historically, the main observatories in the southern hemisphere have been located in
South Africa and in Australia. It was only in the 1960s that Chile, with its superior
observing sites, was added to the list. Modern astronomy in Australia was vibrant.
The scientists had advanced optical telescopes4 and some of the most impressive facilities for radio astronomy as well, including the Australia Telescope, which was opened
in September 1988. The success of Australian astronomy was not only rooted in
the historical fact that the continent had been the home of observational facilities
since the late 18th century, but also because in the second half of the 20th century,
there had been a tacit understanding among the twin communities of optical and
the radio astronomers that large investments would alternate between the groups.
Standing together had helped both communities secure the necessary funding. In
the 1960s, the 64-metre Parkes Radio Telescope had been the pride of the community, in the 1970s, the Anglo Australian Telescope had been built and in the 1980s,
it was the turn of the Australia Telescope, as already mentioned. However, the two
main sites for optical telescopes, Mount Stromlo near Canberra and Siding Spring
4	

Including the 3.9-metre Anglo Australian Telescope, commissioned in 1974, two years ahead of the ESO 3.6metre telescope and now part of the Australian Astronomical Observatory.

459

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

in the Warrumbungles (New South Wales), were far from ideal, and so, as the next
generation of very large telescopes — the 8–10-metre-class telescopes — were being
planned in the US and in Europe (but to be placed in Chile), Australian astronomers
became interested in participating in one of these projects 5 . Their interest coincided
with ESO’s interest in expanding its membership base, and in reinstating the VLTI
programme that had been postponed in 1993. And so, towards the end of that year,
Giacconi contacted Jeremy Mould, then Director of the Mount Stromlo and Siding
Spring Observatories.
In early 1994, Giacconi paid a visit to Australia. Aside from seeing the Australian
astronomers at Mount Stromlo, he met the Federal Minister for Science, Christopher
Cleland Schacht, at Canberra’s conspicuous Parliament House. Schacht appeared
to be favourably disposed towards an ESO bid 6 , and, given this head start, Australian astronomers began preparing their case for joining ESO. This coincided with an
ongoing one-off competition for extra funding among all major national research
facilities and across disciplines, resulting in an investment plan entitled Innovate
Australia. The key scientists behind the ESO proposal were Ron Ekers, Director of
Commonwealth Scientific and Industrial Research Organisation’s (CSIRO) Australia Telescope National Facility, Lawrence Cram of the University of Sydney and
Jeremy Mould. In June 1995, Jeremy Mould attended an ESO Council meeting at
Garching and presented the Australian ideas, leading to a green light from Council
to continue the process. To further assist in the efforts, an ESO team comprised of
Peter Shaver and the author visited Australia in July 1995. They took part in a policy
event in Canberra and a public exhibition was held at the national Australian science
centre, Questacon. At the ESO Council meeting held in Milan on 28–29 November, the issue was again on the agenda.
Before we continue with the chronology of the Australian attempt to join ESO,
let us quickly address an obvious question that uninitiated readers may well pose:
for all its magnificent qualities, Australia can of course hardly be considered to be
part of Europe. Could a non-European become a member of a “European” organisation? Although the Convention determines the name of the organisation (containing the word European), perhaps somewhat surprisingly, it does not specify any
5	

In an Australian Science and Technology Council (ASTEC) report of 1992, possible participation in either
the Gemini or the Magellan Telescope Project with two 6.5-metre telescopes at La Campanas in Chile was
mentioned.

6	

Unfortunately, the minister was replaced shortly afterwards and his successor seemed much less enthusiastic
about ESO membership.

460

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

geographical limitations for the Member States. Discussions had already taken place
about a possible Chilean membership. Council was, in other words, open to the idea
of non-­European Member States. This was re-confirmed at the Milan meeting, in
which Council adopted a resolution stating that “The admission of … non-European
states is desirable provided that the European identity is not altered.” It appeared as if
­Australia might be on track to join within a short space of time. Alas, towards the
end of the year, although highly ranked in the peer review process, the proposal by
the A
­ ustralian astronomers was not selected by their government. Then a somewhat
ambiguously phrased letter, dated 14 December 1995, arrived from the Australian
government. The government had decided to fund an upgrade for the Australia Tele­
scope in Narrabri, the letter said, “ but not to provide additional funding for participation in the ESO VLT project immediately”. Nonetheless the minister had appointed
a negotiating team to meet with ESO. The ESO Council responded by setting up its
negotiation team and a tentative date of 5 February 1996 was set for the first meeting, but it never took place. And then, in March 1996, parliamentary elections led to
the ousting of Paul Keating’s Labour government. On 23 May 1996, the incoming
government of John Howard finally withdrew Australia’s bid, citing budgetary problems. In the end, Australia joined the Gemini Telescope project with twin 8-metre
telescopes, one located in Hawaii, the other in Chile.
Despite disappointment on both sides, a link remained: in June 1998 Australia was
awarded a contract for the delivery of the fibre positioner (OzPoz) for the VLT, mentioned in Chapter III-2. Even if the bid of 1995 failed, interest in Australian membership has remained. This book is about ESO’s past, not its future. As with other
countries that have wished to join, the road can be long and difficult, and even at
times appear to have reached a dead end, only to be opened up again at an opportune moment.

Portugal
With the Carnation Revolution of 1974, which led to establishment of the Third
Republic, Portugal began a major political reorientation. The African colonies were
given independence and in 1986, Portugal joined the European Communities. European integration brought with it rapid economic growth, due to support from the
European Communities, but also because Portugal, with its low wages, appeared to
be attractive for low-tech industrial production. On its own this was hardly a sustainable model for growth and a cohesive society. The reorientation therefore also

461

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

aimed at freeing the country from the stagnation of the past regarding investment in
scientific and technological infrastructure and in highly qualified human resources.
As a seafaring nation, Portugal could look back on a long astronomical tradition. The
Observatório Astronómico de Lisboa was established in the 19th century, inspired
by the observatories in Helsinki and St. Petersburg. Yet astronomy — along with
other sciences — had suffered from serious underinvestment and lack of perspectives for decades. By 1986, Portugal had only three professional astronomers at PhD
level. One of them, Teresa Lago, decided to make a bid to change this. She started
to develop astronomical studies at the Universidade do Porto in 1984, and as part
of this initiative, she contacted José Mariano Gago, who at the time headed the Portugal National Board for Science and Technology (JNICT)7. He was receptive and
encouraged Lago to develop a formal proposal for how Portugal could develop a longterm programme for astrophysics. Together with her colleagues and the support of
JNICT, she initiated a survey of the existing activities and subsequently developed a
five-year development plan. And, importantly, she also set up a small team of international advisors with Françoise Praderie, Jean Heyvaerts and Alec Boksenberg as
members. Following an international review in 1987, the proposal was approved by
Luis Valente de Oliveira, then Minister for Planning and Science and Technology 8 .
The plan provided a framework for the further evolution of Portuguese astronomy.
Its proposals included initiating a dedicated formal training programme at doctoral
level, the creation of positions for postdocs and support for research institutes. But
it also recognised the need to establish close links with international facilities, notably the observatories in the Canary Islands or ESO. In 1987, Lago visited Woltjer
and Giancarlo Setti, then Head of the ESO Science Division, at ESO. Woltjer, in his
final year as Director General, was sympathetic, but referred the issue to his successor Harry van der Laan. Van der Laan was equally positive and set up a joint astronomy working group with Setti and Marie-Helène Ulrich for ESO and Teresa Lago
and João Dias de Deus for Portugal as members. The charge to the working group
was to “survey … potentialities for the development of Portuguese astronomical research
in view of a possible membership of Portugal” (Setti et al., 1988). Meanwhile, on 30
November 1989, the Portuguese Secretary of State, José Pedro Sucena Paiva, together
with Lago, visited the ESO Headquarters. The visit bore fruit in terms of securing
the full support of the Portuguese government, whilst the working group report
7	

Junta Nacional de Investigação Cientifica e Tecnológica.

8	

A significant step was the establishment of the first research centre in astrophysics in Portugal, the Centro de
Astrofisica (CAUP) in Porto in 1988.

462

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

demonstrated the growth potential. The ESO Council therefore agreed to consider
a special arrangement that would support the development of Portuguese astronomy, but which also aimed at membership of the organisation within a period of ten
years. On the suggestion of Sucena Paiva, Lago made contact with Fernando Bello 9,
at the time Director of Projects and Planning Department at JNICT. Together, they
formed the driving force behind Portugal’s bid to join the ranks of highly developed
science nations as regards astrophysics.
In December 1989, the ESO Council gave its blessing to the agreement, and so,
on 10 July 1990, a Cooperation Agreement between ESO and Portugal was signed
by Sucena Paiva and Harry van der Laan. The Portuguese government committed
itself to support the development of its astronomical potential. In practical terms
the government would invest a steadily increasing amount in national efforts that
would essentially be equal to what its annual subscription to ESO would have been.
In return, Portuguese astronomers would gain immediate access to ESO facilities
and Portugal would be able to observe ESO committee meetings10 . In a sense, this
amounted to an associate membership of ESO for Portugal. It was a historic deal,
both for Portugal and for ESO. In fact, the ESO Council has traditionally declined
any suggestion of associate membership, with the exception of this particular case.
To mark the agreement, ESO mounted a major exhibition in September 1990 in
Porto and subsequently in Lisbon.
To monitor the implementation of the agreement, a joint Portugal/ESO Consultative Board was established, with Peter Shaver and Richard West representing ESO,
Teresa Lago and Fernando Bello, Portugal. The effect of the agreement was quickly
noticeable, with new research projects, fellowships and infrastructure investments.
Since the late 1980s, Portugal had made huge efforts not only to strengthen its science base, but also to foster the public awareness of science 11. In 1994, the year that
Lisbon was European Capital of Culture, CERN and ESO, in partnership with
the Portuguese authorities, created a 2000 square metre exhibition under the name
Infinitus at the former Tejo power station. The exhibition was opened by the Portuguese Prime Minister at the time, Aníbal Cavaco Silva.
9	

Bello would later act as negotiator for Portugal vis-à-vis ESO and subsequently as Portuguese delegate to the
ESO Council, together with Teresa Lago.

10	

The first Council meeting attended by a Portuguese observer was the landmark meeting in December 1990
where P
­ aranal was selected as the site for the VLT.

11	

This led to the creation a dedicated organisation, Ciência Viva, which later became an effective partner for ESO’s
outreach activities.

463

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

From the opening of the Infinitus Exhibition: Richard West, the Portuguese Prime Minister, Vitor
Constâncio (President of Banco de Portugal and of Lisbon European Capital of Culture) and Peter Creola
passing by a 1:50 scale model of the VLT. Also seen is Werner Kienzle from CERN. (Photo by the author)

The following year, a mid-term report prepared by JNICT was clearly encouraging:
Portugal had spent more than its “ESO contribution” during the first five years and
doubled the number of people in astronomy. By then CAUP alone had 21 PhD students being trained abroad and five in Porto. Furthermore four PhDs had been concluded abroad and one in Porto. It also confirmed that cooperation with ESO was
seen as “ fundamental for the future of astronomy in Portugal” 12 . Portugal was gradually moving towards a situation where it could benefit from full ESO membership13 .
So, towards the end of the decade the time had come to discuss the full membership. First discussions between Giacconi and the various Portuguese stakeholders
had already occurred in 1997, but, in view of the impending expiry of the Cooperation Agreement, they intensified in 1999. A meeting on 13 April 1999 led to the
signing of a Statement of Intent by Gago and Giacconi. In parallel a series of events
were organised. These included a workshop entitled Portugal — ESO — VLT at the
­Lisbon Museum of Science, mainly for young Portuguese scientists; a public exhibition and lectures and a press conference with the Minister of Research and ESO’s
Director General. The Minister was now José Mariano Gago, who had not only
12	

Report by the Portuguese observer, Fernando Bello, to the ESO Council.

13	

In fact, over the ten-year period, the number of professional astronomers increased from three to about sixty.

464

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

worked hard to enable his country’s scientific community to catch up, but was also
a driving force on the European science policy stage as one of the key figures behind
the idea of a European Research Area, which had been endorsed by the European
Council only a few weeks earlier 14 .
Discussions resumed in Lisbon in November, now between Catherine Cesarsky, as
new Director General, and Gago. A further meeting happened on 7 March 2000,
when a basic mutual understanding about the terms of accession was reached. With
the successful conclusion of the negotiations, Gago and Cesarsky signed the formal
accession agreement on 27 June at a ceremony at the ESO Headquarters. To mark
the new membership the ESO Council held its summer meeting in 2001 on 18–19
June, in Porto, at Teresa Lago’s University.
The Accession Agreement was followed up by two additional agreements. An agreement with the Portuguese Ministry of Science and Technology foresaw a continuation of the Portugal/ESO Committee for several years. The other, with the Portuguese Innovation Agency, allowed Portugal to send young “technical graduates” for a
period of one to two years to work at ESO. A similar agreement had been concluded
with CERN a few years earlier. These agreements have proven to be very beneficial
both for the organisations and for the continued Portuguese efforts to catch up with
some of the technologically more advanced countries on the continent.

United Kingdom
The connection between ESO and the United Kingdom began, as we have already
seen, before the organisation came into formal existence. Harold Spencer Jones, the
Astronomer Royal, took part in the initial discussions about the common southern
observatory. However, with his retirement in 1955, British interest faded. Influential British astronomers such as Fred Hoyle, Richard Woolley, Roderick Redman
and others saw greater prospects for UK astronomy in a Commonwealth project,
which led to the establishment of the Anglo-Australian Observatory in New South
Wales, Australia. Few countries in Europe can look back on a history of astronomical
research more impressive than that of the UK. The early loss of the UK as a partner
in ESO was therefore undoubtedly painful, but somehow as we saw in Chapter I-2

14	

Under the Portuguese EU Presidency.

465

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

it was water under the bridge. In any event, the UK went its own way and expanded
its engagements not just in Australia but also in Hawaii and in Spain15 .

In 1989, Sir Patrick Moore, possibly the most famous astronomy populariser ever, visited La Silla to make
two programmes for the BBC series The Sky at Night, as well as a film for ESO. Here, he is doing an
interview with Jorge Melnick in the 3.6-metre control room. The man behind is the long-term producer of
The Sky at Night, Pieter Morpurgo. (Photo by the author)

By the mid-1980s, as the new generation of 8–10-metre class was being planned, an
“8-metre task group” had been established in the UK. Towards the end of the decade, Ian Corbett, who at the time served as Head of the Astronomy Division at the
UK Science and Engineering Research Council16 , was involved in the discussions
together with the other members of the task group. It seemed clear that, unlike in
the days of the 4-metre-class telescopes, the UK would not be able to build its own
telescope and therefore the attention was focussed on possible partnerships. C
­ orbett
had informal contacts with ESO, first with Woltjer, then with his successor van der
Laan, but these contacts did not lead anywhere. Instead, it appeared that, given the
financial constraints, the UK would not be able to afford membership of ESO and, in
view of the many telescopes accessible to UK astronomers on La Palma and Hawaii,
15	

A link between the UK and ESO was retained, however, in the shape of the joint survey of the southern sky,
mentioned in Chapter I-7.

16	

Corbett would later become Head of the ESO Administration and, subsequently, Deputy Director General of
ESO.

466

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

it would be difficult to justify buying into La Silla. The two alternatives for the UK
that appeared to be viable were participation in an American telescope project (which
evolved to become the Gemini telescopes) or in the very large telescope project in
Spain that ultimately became the GTC (to which we shall return shortly). In the
end, in 1994, the UK became a partner in Gemini. But British astronomers never
left the much more powerful VLT out of their sights. By that time, the VLT was progressing and, to Corbett and many of his colleagues, it appeared increasingly attractive, not the least because of the strategic thinking that underpinned ESO’s project.
Once again, Corbett undertook informal conversations with ESO, now under the
leadership of Giacconi, and once more, it seemed that they failed to find a basis for
more formal talks.
Then, almost simultaneously two important developments occurred that would
change the relationship between the UK and ESO.
The first was to be repeated shortly afterwards in countries like Finland and Spain:
the effect of the emergence of the joint European/American millimetre-wave project LSA/MMA (which evolved into ALMA), in which the radio astronomy community of the UK had a strong interest. When it became clear that the two projects
would merge and that ESO might play a leading role at least in the European context, this contributed to stimulating interest in joining the organisation. Thus ESO,
traditionally seen as the optical astronomers’ organisation, became attractive to the
wider community. In April 1998, Corbett — now as Deputy Chief Executive —
sent a letter on behalf of PPARC, the successor organisation to the SERC, formally
declaring the interest of the UK in participating in “a mm/submm array project” 17.
This led to a meeting on 13 May between Ian Corbett and Paul Murdin, representing
PPARC, and Giacconi, Richard Kurz, Peter Shaver and Norbert König 18 , in which
“the meeting concentrated on PPARC participation through ESO.”
The second development had its origin, not in astronomy, but in politics. In 1997,
Tony Blair had taken over the reins of government in the UK. An important goal
for the new Labour government was a stronger, more constructive participation by
the UK in European matters. Furthermore, it was open to the idea of increasing
the spending on science and technology, based on “several reports [that] found that
a shortage of state-of-the-art research equipment was making it difficult for universities
17	

Letter to the ESO Director General, 29 April 1998.

18	

Head of the ESO Administration at the time.

467

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

in the UK to remain at the forefront of international research.” (Physics World, 1999).
Under the heading “Making UK science fit for the Millennium”, the 1998 Comprehensive Spending Review declared that “the Government will invest a total of more
than GBP 1.1 billion to transform the science base, after years of under-funding, in a
unique partnership with the Wellcome Trust.” (UK Government, 1998). And so —
in the year of the VLT’s first light — the government, together with the Wellcome
Trust, the world’s largest biomedical research charity, established a Joint Infrastructure Fund (JIF). The participation of the charity might suggest a certain bias towards
the life sciences, but the fund actually supported a broad range of projects. In fact,
one of the projects that received funding during the first round was the VISTA
project (see Chapter IV-3). The UK participation in ALMA and the VISTA telescope, which would soon be looking for a home, created a unique opportunity for a
new approach to ESO. At PPARC both Ken Pounds, its chief executive officer, and
­Corbett saw this. Pound’s successor Ian Halliday also gave strong support to the
idea. This time things looked more promising. The proposal received a strong boost
when Corbett and others from PPARC, riding on a Eurostar train back from an ESA
Council meeting at ministerial level in May 1999, had the opportunity to broach the
idea with the Undersecretary for Science, Lord Sainsbury of Turville. In a followup meeting with Sainsbury and John Taylor, a senior civil servant, PPARC received
a green light to explore the conditions for UK membership. Thus, on 22 November
1999, Halliday and Cesarsky met at ESO to discuss possible membership. The ball
had begun to roll.
British astronomers, who still had to wait another two and a half years before the
8.1-metre Gemini South saw first light, were not the only ones who had noticed the
initial success of the VLT. The first results obtained with the VLT had also created
echoes in the world of politics. Thus, in March 2000, one year after the high-­profile
inauguration of the ­Paranal Observatory, a debate about ESO membership took
place at Westminster in the House of Lords. In a passionate speech, Simon Brooke
Mackay (Lord Tanlaw) said: “If this country fails to subscribe [to ESO] … this will mean
that astronomy will hardly be worth pursuing as a career in Britain in the new millennium. Does the Minister agree that this will be a most unsatisfactory situation, especially in view of what the Government says about the need to encourage science in our
schools coupled with the keenness to participate in Europe?” 19
19	

As in other cases, ESO’s information service was active in support of UK membership. Public activities included
presentations (with an audience of almost 1000 people) at the annual Astrofest event at the K
­ ensington Town
Hall, presentations at the British Astronomical Association and close links with the UK media, not least the
BBC.

468

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

On 24 May 2000, a first formal meeting took place between the UK and ESO in
Garching. At this stage, it was still an exploratory discussion. The core of the proposal
was that the money for the UK participation in ALMA would be spent towards the
special entrance fee. Furthermore, the VISTA telescope would be delivered to ESO
as an in-kind contribution. Since it was clear that the survey telescope would only be
ready much later, deep infrared sky survey data obtained with the Wide Field ­Camera
at UKIRT20 (on Hawaii) was included as a UK in-kind contribution.
Further informal conversations followed at the 24th IAU General Assembly in Manchester in August of that year. While it was obvious that the details would take some
time to work out, the UK government felt confident enough in November 2000 to
officially announce its intention to join ESO 21. Shortly afterwards, Taylor sent in
the formal application for membership. As in the case of the other acceding countries, months of negotiations followed, but by the autumn, a deal had been reached.
The UK formally declared its agreement in November 2001 and the ESO Council approved it at its meeting on 3 December of the same year. The accession, which
became effective as of 1 July 2002, was marked by an ESO Council meeting in London, including an evening reception at Lancaster House as well as a press event in
the historic Octagon Room of the Royal Greenwich Observatory. This was just three

From the press meeting at the Royal Greenwich Observatory. From left to right: Roy Clare, Arno Freytag
(President of the ESO Council), Lord Sainsbury, Gerry Gilmore, Ian Halliday (Chief Executive Officer
of PPARC), Catherine Cesarsky and Pat Roche. (Courtesy: PPARC)
20	

United Kingdom Infrared Telescope.

21	

UK Announces Intention to Join ESO (ESO press release 22 November 2000).

469

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

months and four days short of 40 years after the signing of the ESO convention in
Paris. Probably for that reason, at the press conference, a journalist posed the unavoidable question: “If ESO is the answer, why did it take 40 years for the UK to ask the
question?” Gerry Gilmore provided the answer: “The real change that has happened
in the last few years was the VLT… . Everybody said: Wow! They’ve just jumped ahead
of us. These guys are good. We better get on-board!”
Finland
Finland became the third country in the surge. Finnish astronomy had a proud astronomical tradition linked to the Helsinki Observatory (Helsingin yliopiston Observatorio). In fact the first observatory was built in Turku (Åbo) in 1819, but after a
fire in 1827, the university was moved to a new location in Helsinki (Helsingfors)
and a new observatory was built. When it opened in 1834, it was a state-of-the-art
observational facility. The most famous astronomer at that time associated with this
observatory, was Friedrich W. A. A
­ rgelander, but perhaps the most conspicuous contribution to observational astronomy was its participation in producing the Astrographic Catalogue in the late 19th and early 20th century, which itself was part of
the famous Carte du Ciel project. Besides Helsinki, astronomy was revived in Turku
in the 1920s and later also taken up in Oulu in the north of the country. Significantly, Finnish astronomers had also become involved in millimetre-wave astronomy with the 14-metre “radio” telescope, operated by the Helsinki University of
Technology (Teknillinen Korkeakoulu) at the Metsähovi Radio Observatory, established in 1974, and located at Kirkkonummi, outside the Finnish capital (Mattila et
al., 2004). With growing activities in Turku, Oulu and Helsinki, a new generation
of astronomers was emerging.
One of them was Kalevi Mattila, who in 1980 was involved in a research collaboration with Gerhard Schnur, a German ESO staff astronomer. Their goal was to measure the optical extragalactic background light, and as part of this project, Mattila
visited ESO’s science group in Geneva to scan ESO Schmidt plates. He was also introduced to the IHAP image processing system that we have mentioned in Chapter I-10.
This was new and Mattila was duly impressed. Soon afterwards he was appointed
professor of astronomy at the University of Helsinki (Helsingin yliopisto). In this
function he chaired a working group that considered “Finland’s possibilities to participate in international astronomy projects.” (Mattila et al., 1982). The cover of their
report featured a picture of the globular cluster Omega Centauri, obtained with the

470

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

Danish 1.54-metre telescope at La Silla 22 . The scope of the report was shown by the
mention of two international projects of interest to Finland: the proposal for a 2.5metre Nordic Optical Telescope to be placed at La Palma and the new project for
a submillimetre telescope driven by Swedish astronomers, originally conceived as a
Nordic project but eventually becoming the 15-metre SEST. Aside from the scientific
potential, Nordic cooperation in general was in high political standing in Finland,
since it had been one of the options open to this country, which for many decades
had lived uneasily in the shadows of its mighty neighbour, the Soviet Union. While,
as we have mentioned, Finnish astronomers had already become deeply involved in
millimetre astronomy, the optical telescope offered interesting opportunities for a
Finnish in-kind contribution in terms of the optics for the NOT. However, the Finnish involvement in the NOT required more resources than originally thought, and
thus Finland had to restrict its involvement in the SEST to a bilateral deal with Sweden, giving Finland a 5% stake in that telescope. Perhaps not a lot, but given that the
SEST could be operated 24 hours a day, Finnish millimetre astronomers found themselves with plenty of observing time. This involvement also increased the interaction
with ESO scientists and technicians considerably and raised interest in joining the
organisation. Finnish optical astronomers opted for NOT participation, feeling that
fully-fledged ESO membership would be unrealistic at the time.
There is a somewhat curious aspect to this: whereas interest in ESO activities was
normally very strong among the community of optical astronomers in most countries, it has been rather low among radio astronomers. However, in the case of Finland, as its entry into ESO went mainly through the SEST participation, it had
strong support from the growing field of millimetre-wave astronomy. Besides, many
of the astronomers were working in both wavelength regions. Even so, it would take
another 20 years, before membership became possible.
In the early 1990s Finland experienced a near collapse of its economy. Deregulation
of the banks created a bubble economy based on foreign debt. When the communist
Eastern Bloc fell apart, this meant the loss of major trading partners for Finland. In
those dark days, the Finnish government took the conscious decision to invest heavily in education and science as a way towards economic recovery. Since then Finland
has seen the highest spending on R&D in relation to its GDP among all the European countries, and in fact in the world.
22	

This had a Finnish connection since the corrector lens for that telescope (to increase the field of view) had been
produced by the Tuorla Observatory.

471

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

As the economy improved, the Tuorla Observatory became interested in participation in the project to build the 10-metre telescope on La Palma, the GTC. In
response, however, the Finnish Ministry of Education set up a working group in
September 1998 to look in a more general way at “megaprojects in astronomy”. The
group was chaired by Mirja Arajärvi of the Ministry of Education. Other members of
the group included Mattila, Mauro Valtonen (from the Tuorla Observatory), Merja
Tornikoski, from the Metsähovi Radio Research Station, representatives of the space
science community, of TEKES (the Finnish Agency for Technology and Innovation),
the Academy of Finland and finally Risto Pellinen, who represented Finland in ESA.
The report of the working group was published in 1999 and concluded that “Finland
[should] launch negotiations about membership in the European Southern Observatory
(ESO).” However, it continued, “should this fall through, Finland should explore possibilities to join the Canary Island GTC project and the ESO LSA/MMA radio telescope
projects.” (Finnish Ministry of Education, 1999). Clearly, a major advantage of ESO
membership, from the Finnish perspective, was that it would offer both the optical
and the millimetre-wave astronomical communities interesting perspectives. In addition it was found to bring synergies with ESA, of which Finland had become a full
member in 1995. The proposal fell on fertile political ground. Finland had also joined
the European Union in 1995 and the overall attitude was favourable towards international and especially European cooperation. Finland had furthermore followed
the discussions in the framework of the OECD Megascience Forum and appreciated
the value of participating in major research infrastructure projects. Mirja A
­ rajärvi
herself was a staunch supporter of the bid by the astronomers, patiently and skilfully paving the way through the political system during the time to come. We are
yet again reminded of Blaauw’s comments regarding the importance of broadminded
science policy makers.
Following an informal contact, the ESO Director General, Catherine Cesarsky,
together with Massimo Tarenghi, visited Helsinki in November 1999 to present
the activities of organisation and discuss the formal process that would be necessary
for the accession to the ESO Convention.
Finland was now working towards a formal application for membership, but it would
still take some time, because, among other things, it was waiting for the recommendations of an international evaluation panel in 2000. This report endorsed ­Finland’s
aspirations to join ESO, but for a while the process seemed to slow down. In February 2002, another meeting took place, this time between Mirja Arajärvi, Pentti

472

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

Pulkkinen (from the Academy of Finland) and two ESO representatives, Richard
West and the author. The meeting led to an information seminar at the Academy of
Finland, held in May 2002. It may also have slightly boosted the formal application
to ESO for membership, which was submitted by the Finnish Government only a
couple of weeks later.
As in the case of the United Kingdom, Finland was interested in paying a part of
the accession fee as an in-kind contribution. Such an approach has often been used,
partly to alleviate the financial burden, partly to give the institutes and industry of
the candidate country a headstart in ESO. But it has its drawbacks. ESO is through
and through based on the idea of excellence through competition. According a kind
of protected status for goods and services, if only for a limited period of time, runs
counter to this principle. Furthermore, there may be questions of liability and product guarantees, etc. But since the accession of a country is a political process, there
is a certain scope for compromise, as we saw it in the case of the UK. For Finland
this meant that a limited part of its special entrance fee was a three-year study of
the future needs for the ESO community in the area of data reduction and analysis

Catherine Cesarsky and Tuula Haatainen exchanging the accession agreement documents on 9 February
1994 with Ian Corbett, now as Head of the ESO Administration, overseeing the procedures. (Photo: Hans
Hermann Heyer)

473

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

environments, called Sampo 23 . This study dovetailed with the efforts regarding the
Astrophysical Virtual Observatory and also with e-science activities in the UK under
the name AstroGrid. The in-kind negotiations unavoidably took time. Meanwhile
also parliamentary elections and the formation of a new government occurred in
2003, but ultimately an agreement was reached and the new government was ready
to take the decisive step.
The ESO Council endorsed the agreement with Finland on 30 January and on 9 February 2004, the membership agreement was signed by the Finnish Minister of Education and Science, Tuula Haatainen, and the ESO Director General at a ceremony in
Garching. Membership took effect on 7 July of that year with Mirja Arajärvi attending the ESO Council meeting on that date.

Spain
Like its neighbour on the Iberian peninsula, Spain had lived in relative isolation from
the rest of Europe under its Falangist rule since the Second World War. However,
with the death of the leader of the government in 1975, Francisco Franco, things
began to change. Spain had already applied for membership of the European Communities in 1977. After a somewhat precarious transition period, democracy had
been firmly established in the early 1980s and in 1986 Spain became a member as
part of what is commonly known as the third enlargement round 24 . As we saw in the
case of Finland, joining Europe had become a political imperative. At the same time,
Spanish astronomy was developing fast. The observatories in the Canary Islands, at
El Teide in Tenerife and Roque de los Muchachos at La Palma, were expanding their
park of telescopes, owned by national institutes in a number of European countries,
notably the UK, the Netherlands, Germany and Sweden. The observatories were
operated under a set of agreements, including one between the user institutions and
23	

Sampo is a mythological artefact in Finnish folkore and the national epos Kalevala, which has strong links to
the sky and origins of the world.

24	

Not for the first time do we see that science and scientific cooperation can precede (and even run counter to)
political developments. Spain had joined CERN in 1959, but withdrew ten years later. In 1983 it rejoined the
organisation. In 1964 Spain was a founding member of ESRO, one of the two parent organisations that then
merged to form ESA in 1975. The agreements for the establishment of the Observatorio de Calar Alto date back
to the early 1970s, and international collaboration in astronomy in the Canary Islands started in the 1960s,
with the Observatorio del Teide being established in 1964. Nonetheless, the cases of Spain, Portugal, the Czech
Republic and Finland demonstrate that an overall political agenda can help to boost international cooperation
in science considerably.

474

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

the Instituto de Astrofísica de Canarias under the leadership of its influential director, Francisco Sánchez Martínez. On the mainland, the German–Spanish Astronomical Centre (Centro Astronómico Hispano–Alemán) had been established at
Calar Alto, in the Almería Province, with a 3.5-metre telescope as its largest facility 25 . The Instituto Geográfico Nacional (IGN) had built a 14-metre millimetrewave radio telescope in Yebes (near G
­ uadalajara, in central Spain) in the mid-1970s
and through the participation of IGN in IRAM, radio astronomers enjoyed access
to the 30-metre millimetre/submillimetre telescope on Pico Veleta in the Sierra
Nevada as well the IRAM array in France26 . ­Spanish astronomers enjoyed guaranteed observing time at these telescopes, but some also found their way to La Silla,
often participating in collaborations with scientists in the ESO
Member States. Astronomers
who had worked with ESO in
some capacity included José
Miguel Rodríguez Espinosa,
Josefa Masegosa, ­Montserrat
­Villar Martín, Carme Gallart,
Eduardo Martín and María
Rosa Zapatero Osorio. A first
push for Spanish membership
of ESO, however, was to come
from elsewhere.

Among the early observers at La Silla was Alvaro Giménez
Cañete, who later became ESA Director of Science and
Robotic Exploration. Here he is seen working at the Danish
0.5-metre telescope in 1982. (Photo by the author)

In 1987, Jon Marcaide proposed to the Spanish Secretary
of State, Juan Rojo A
­ laminos,
that Spain should join ESO.
M arcaide, a radio astrono­
mer, had returned to Spain
after stints at Massachusetts
Institute of Technology and
the Max-Planck-Institut für

25	

Another observatory, the Observatorio de Sierra Nevada near Granada, started operating in 1981 as an initial
collaboration between the Institute of Astrophysics of Andalucía (IAA), the Royal Greenwich Observatory,
and the Observatoire de Nice.

26	

Spain also hosted the Villafranca satellite tracking station near Madrid, which became the operations centre of
the International Ultraviolet Explorer Satellite and later also the European Space Astronomy Centre.

475

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Radioastronomie in Bonn. H
­ aving also lived for a while in Munich, he was familiar
with ESO. Furthermore, he knew Daniel Ponz, who worked at ESO in Garching.
With his international experience, Marcaide realised the importance for Spanish
astronomers of becoming more integrated in the international scientific community
and involved in European-level collaborations. He also saw a need to establish a grassroots framework for its growing astronomical community. Marcaide was of course
not the only Spanish astronomer with international experience, and so he soon found
like-minded colleagues, notably Ramon Canal ­Masgoret, who had worked at the
University of Chicago and the Max-Planck-Institut für Astrophysik in Garching and
Eduard Salvador-Solé, who obtained his PhD at the Institut Astrophysique de Paris
(IAP) in Paris. In 1991, they took the initiative to establish the Sociedad Española
de Astronomía (SEA) with Canal as its first president. Marcaide’s initial attempt
regarding ESO was not successful. Rojo answered that although ESO membership
was only believed to cost 7% of the CERN membership, “Seven percent of an astronomical figure is still an astronomical figure!” (­Marcaide, 2011). Around the same
time, ESO was invited to mount an exhibition at the new planetarium in Madrid.
The exhibition opened on 1 March 1988 with a major social event including public talks and the gathering of many prominent astronomers in Spain. In the following years, Marcaide, who had become perhaps the strongest promoter of ESO membership found allies and so, in October 1996, ESO’s Director General accepted an
invitation to attend the annual meeting of SEA, which took place in San Sebastián.
Giacconi’s presentation had a considerable effect. Understandably, Spanish astronomy was strongly associated with the Canary Islands observatories, which harboured
plans for an 8–10-metre telescope. Even so, the meeting led to a resolution with a
double recommendation: “The SEA is committed to joint action on the entry into ESO
and construction of the 10-metre Spanish telescope. It considers both aspects together will
not only allow to maintain the scientific level reached by the astronomical community
in recent years but will give access to even higher steps within the worldwide astronomical landscape.” 27 Importantly, the outcome was communicated to Gonzalo León Serrano, then Director General of the Office for Science and Technology of the Spanish
Government. León supported the idea. Among the participants at the San Sebastián
meeting was a prolific journalist from El País, Alicia Rivera, who became a staunch

27	

“La SEA apuesta por una acción conjunta sobre la entrada en ESO y la construcción del telescopio español de 10 m.
Considera que ambos aspectors al unísono permitirán no solo el mantinimiento del nivel científico alcanzado por
la comunidad astronomía en los últimos años sinó también acceder a escalones aún más destacados dentro del
­panorama de la astronomía mundial.”

476

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

supporter of Spanish ESO m
­ embership 28 . With the Spanish economy expanding,
all of this activity suggested that Spanish membership might be possible. The ESO
Council saw this positively and was favourably disposed towards Spanish membership, but at the time ESO had its own problems and Council struggled to develop a
clear vision for what it wanted vis-à-vis Spain, beyond straightforward membership.
ESO was still shaken by the land dispute in Chile and was interested in alternative
sites, including those in the northern hemisphere, also for scientific reasons. At the
same time ESO was facing serious cash flow problems relating to the VLT. One idea
was to use the Spanish contribution to finance one of the VLT Unit Telescopes and
place it in Spain. This idea did not find many supporters, however. For Spain, the
challenge was to balance the understandable interests of its major observatory at La
Palma with the demands arising from an accession to ESO. Even so, on 28 October 1996, an ESO delegation led by Riccardo Giacconi and comprising Jean-Pierre
Swings, Arno Freytag and N
­ orbert König 29 met with Gonzalo León and Francisco
Sanchez. The meeting did not lead to any result. It was clear that the Spanish negotiators wished to give priority to their large telescope, then thought to be an 8-metre
telescope, at La Palma, and ESO was not willing, after all, to part with one of its UTs.
However, the San Sebastián meeting had also been attended by Paul Vanden Bout
from NRAO and Michael Grewing from IRAM, who spoke about the plans for
a large array of millimetre-wavelength telescopes in the southern hemisphere; the
project that eventually became ALMA. This project also met with strong interest
from Spanish astronomers and they managed to win the support of the government in their desire to become part of it. So, in the spring of 1997, the government
declared its interest in joining ALMA, by means of a telefax to Giacconi. The telefax arrived shortly before Giacconi’s meeting with Paul Vanden Bout that we mentioned in Chapter IV-1, and strengthened Giacconi’s position, although it did not
imply S­ panish membership of ESO itself.

28	

ESO carried out several outreach activities in those years with Spanish participation. This included further exhibitions in Barcelona and at EXPO 1992 in Seville, the Future Astronomers of Europe contest in 1993, its support for the European Association for Astronomy Education (EAAE) with its high-profile outreach activities,
support for the Spanish Física en Acción programme and finally an event for Spanish industry in relation to the
Spanish participation in ALMA. Conversely, Spain began to support the ESO/EAAE outreach programme
Catch a Star.

29	

As well as a representative from the French Embassy in Madrid.

477

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The case for joining ESO, however, was boosted by a number of events that occurred
around the turn of the century. The first was a study instigated by SEA and led by
Xavier Barcons about “the status of Astronomical Research in Spain (1999–2002)”.
This was followed up by ESO’s next Director General, Catherine Cesarsky, in 2001
with meetings in July and in November of that year, in Garching and Madrid respectively. The November meeting was with the Secretary of State for science policy,
Ramón Marimón. Although the subject of the discussions was Spain’s participation in ALMA, full Spanish membership of ESO was discussed, but it was decided
to postpone this 30 .
The third event was the decision in December 2002 by the Spanish government to
participate in Phase Two of the ALMA project, the construction. As we have seen,
there was strong Spanish interest in this project, not the least from José Cernicharo,
from CSIC31, as the main driving force behind the participation of Spain.
A recommendation from the National Astronomy Committee to the Spanish government to start negotiations to join ESO followed in March 2003. The membership of this body included the President of CSIC and the Director General of IGN,
as well as the directors of all the major astronomy institutes in Spain.
Finally, in November 2003, the Spanish government published a comprehensive
National R&D&I Plan for the period 2004–2007, in which membership of ESO
was explicitly recommended. In the same month, the government sent a formal letter to ESO requesting the opening of negotiations.
The first meeting of the negotiating parties took place on 4 March 2004. This was
followed by an “in-kind working group” meeting in Garching in April, co-chaired
by Gerry Gilmore and Xavier Barcons on behalf of ESO and Spain, respectively. As
part of its special contribution, Spain wished to offer access to the 10-metre GTC
telescope at La Palma. This was an interesting proposition for ESO. Firstly it would
give access, albeit temporarily, to a powerful northern hemisphere facility. Secondly,
30	

Independently, in 2001, speculations emerged about a possible merger between ESO and the Canary Islands
observatories, which was occasionally also described as the ENO, the European Northern Observatory. This
did not seem an attractive option to ESO, as it might have diverted resources away from ESO’s new main projects, on which the future of European astronomy depended. Instead ESO reiterated that Spain would be welcome as a member of the organisation.

31	

The Consejo Superior de Investigaciones Científicas.

478

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

the primary mirror of GTC is a segmented mirror, rather than a monolith. GTC thus
employs the same technology as the Keck telescopes in Hawaii. A segmented mirror was also planned for ESO’s next giant optical telescope, and access to the GTC
would enable ESO to gain first-hand experience in this area, which so far was new
to the organisation 32 . Despite the obvious benefits, however, the negotiations took
quite some time. This was partly because ESO had by now put an upper limit on the
size of the in-kind part of the special contribution and putting together a solution
that would satisfy both sides was not easy. Furthermore the completion of the GTC
itself was delayed, hardly an unusual fate for a large telescope project, as we know.
In December 2005, the negotiators had, however, reached agreement and the declaration to join ESO was formally signed by María Jesús San Segundo, Spanish Minister of Education and Science and Catherine Cesarsky, at a ceremony in Madrid
on 13­February 2006. The agreement foresaw Spanish membership by 1 July 2006,
but the formal ratification procedure lasted into the early days of 2007. Spain thus
became ESO’s 12th Member State on 14 February 2007. And just eight weeks earlier,
another country had announced its readiness to join: the Czech Republic.

The Czech Republic
The first informal discussions about ESO membership for what was then
­Czechoslovakia occurred on 28 April 1990, on the occasion of a celebration of Jan
Hendrik Oort’s 90th birthday in Leiden 33 . Among the many guests were ESO’s
Director General, Harry van der Laan, and the ESO Council President, Per-Olof
Lindblad. A young Czech astronomer, Jan Palouš, was also present. This was just one
and a half years after the so-called Velvet Revolution, which was part of the political
changes that took place across Central and Eastern Europe at the end of the 1980s,
and which allowed these countries to re-establish their historical connections with
the West. In the field of science, a major step was taken in 1991, when Czechoslovakia joined CERN. Early accession to CERN became possible because the CERN
Council had decided to offer membership to a number of the countries that had been
under Soviet influence under very favourable conditions, as a welcome gesture. ESO,
however, was less forthcoming, in the sense that the ESO Council was not minded
32	

It is also worth noting at the time several Spanish institutes and companies were already actively collaborating
with ESO through the FP6-funded ELT Design Study, which started in 2005. We have alluded to this study in
Chapter IV-4.

33	

For readers proficient in the Czech language, a comprehensive description of the country’s accession process is
given by Palouš, J (2009): Česká republika v Evropské jižní observatoři.

479

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

to make any special concessions to new countries at the time. ESO’s insistence on
the payment of a substantial entrance fee has been the subject of debate over time,
but, as we have seen, it has provided for a fresh inflow of capital and thus enabled the
organisation to undertake new projects and also to better cope with the increase of its
user community every time a country joined. The first discussions between van der
Laan and Palouš therefore focussed on how Czechoslovakia could raise this amount,
which was not insignificant for a country that had just emerged from the shadows
of the Soviet system with its regulated economy. At the time, it was thought that
financial help might be obtained from the European Community, but this option
never materialised. By July 1992, the Czech Ministry was seriously interested in
joining and requested a report from the Czechoslovak Academy of Sciences about
the implications of Czechoslovak membership of ESO. But then the process was
interrupted by yet another political earthquake: the country split in two — into the
Czech Republic and Slovakia — and in the wake of this, the Czechoslovak Academy
naturally ceased to exist. Things only began to move again in 1999. By that time,
Palouš had become chairman of the Czech National Committee for Astronomy
and the proposal was relaunched. He invited Peter Shaver from ESO to give a talk
about ESO’s future plans, especially regarding ALMA, at an astronomy meeting in
Prague in April 1999. He also contacted Catherine Cesarsky, who had just assumed
her post as the new Director General of ESO. The proposal to join ESO gathered
rapid momentum and, in January 2002, the Czech astronomical community sent
a formal inquiry to ESO about membership conditions. This was supported by the
President of the Czech Academy of Sciences of the time, Helena I­ llnerová, who knew
Catherine Cesarsky well from their participation in the European Research Advisory Board (EURAB), a body set up to advise the European Research Commissioner,
Philippe Busquin. Palouš had gained confidence in the project and he decided to aim
for August 2006 as the accession time to coincide with the IAU General Assembly,
scheduled to be held in Prague.
He also tried to arrange for a stop at ESO in Chile by the Czech Prime Minister,
Vladimir Špidly, as he visited the country in October 2003. The visit to ESO did not
happen, but in the process, the Czech Ambassador to Santiago, Lubomir Hladík,
became a good ally. Although the prime minister did not manage to visit ESO, political attention had been created. In a curious twist of fate, the ESO cause may also
have been helped by an incident that itself had nothing to do with it. In early 2005,
Czech tourists in Chile caused a major forest fire. The incident became an international issue and the Czech government sent two high-ranking officials to Chile to
deal with the matter. Thanks to the good offices of the ambassador, a side visit to the

480

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

ESO Santiago office was arranged, adding to government awareness of the ESO question. Later in 2005, things began to speed up. In June the Czech Academy of Sciences made a formal proposal to the government. On 10 November 2005, Catherine
Cesarsky and the author visited Prague and met with the Academy President Václav
Pačes, representatives of various Czech Ministries and of the Czech astronomical
community. Later in the day, they also met with the Deputy Prime Minister, Martin
Jahn, who was very supportive. It looked good, but Jahn was about to resign and furthermore, elections had been called for the coming summer. These elections unfortunately resulted in a hung parliament and a long period of political uncertainty.
Nevertheless, the outcome of the informal discussions was substantial. The Czech
government agreed to make a preliminary payment of the accession fee in advance
and the money was transferred into ESO’s account on 14 December 2005.
In February of the following year, the government sent its official application to
ESO and nominated a negotiating team. In July of that year, the ESO Council did
the same and the two negotiating teams met for one single meeting, on 20 September 2006 in Garching.
Meanwhile, in August, Prague had hosted the XXVI General Assembly of the International Astronomical Union with 2500 participants. The situation was such that
the Czechs could not announce their accession to ESO, as they had hoped, but the
General Assembly nevertheless played a role. A major topic at this General Assembly was the (re-)definition of what constituted a planet, a topic that generated much
heated debate and media interest. When the General Assembly finally decided on
the issue, Pluto — which used to be considered the ninth planet of the Solar System
— was downgraded to a “dwarf planet”. We shall not recapitulate the scientific arguments here, but the debate generated immense public interest worldwide — and of
course also in Prague. Astronomy became a topic on the streets. As Jan Palouš later
recalled, “Pluto helped us into ESO!”
In November a Czech delegation visited P
­ aranal. Here it turned out that the draft
agreement reached in Garching had raised additional issues within the Czech administration, linked to the advance payment of the accession fee and what would happen if parliamentary ratification failed. In a swift recovery action, the problems were
solved, literally while driving through the desert to P
­ aranal and with some frantic
telephone calls to Europe. The accession agreement, with the additional clauses, was
approved by the ESO Council on 6 December 2006 and by the Czech government

481

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

The Czech delegation visit to P
­ aranal — from left to right: Ambassador Hladík, Jan Palouš, Andreas
Kaufer (Director of the ­Paranal Observatory), Stanislav Stefl and Václav Pačes, president of the Czech
Academy of Sciences. (Photo by the author)

on 12 December, with the signing of the document foreseen before Christmas. The
Czechs were in a hurry, for the political situation in the country had become increasingly uncertain. Ultimately, the date was set for 22 December, but the time of day
kept changing. The small ESO delegation 34 opted to fly in on the previous afternoon,
only to learn that the Prime Minister had tendered his resignation that very same day.
Luckily, the President had refused the resignation and thus, the responsible minister, Miroslava Kopicová, was still authorised to sign on the following day. The agreement was signed and submitted to parliament for ratification. Only 18 days after the
signing, the government finally fell, but at that stage, the ratification process was
underway, closely monitored and nurtured by Jan Palouš, and on 13 April 2007, the
instruments of ratification were deposited at the French Ministry of F
­ oreign Affairs
as required by the ESO Convention.

34	

Associate Director Thomas Wilson and the author.

482

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

This was a true cliffhanger, but it was also a remarkably well executed process by the
Czech astronomers35 in the middle of the most difficult political situation that one
can think of. It was a country that had only joined the European Union in 2004
and was therefore in the process of deep and rapid adjustment, while having to cope
with a complete parliamentary stalemate and a government on the verge of collapse.
The Czech Republic was the first country of the former Eastern Bloc in Europe to
become a member. The accession raised interest in ESO in other countries in the
region (notably Poland) — and also in a country with close historical ties, Austria.

Austria
Many Austrian astronomers had worked in Germany and had observed at La Silla
as “German astronomers”. They were therefore well acquainted with ESO. The first
suggestion that Austria should join ESO came up in the early 1970s in conversations
between Blaauw and Hans Michael Maitzen (Maitzen & Hron, 2008), then a young
astronomer working at the Ruhr-Universität Bochum and therefore also occasionally observing with the Bochum telescope at La Silla. Maitzen returned to his native
Austria in 1976 and began lobbying for ESO membership, with some initial success.
However, in 1980, the Austrian government decided against membership, due to a
veto by the Austrian Ministry of Finance. A second attempt was undertaken in the
period 1988–1991, rekindled by a visit of the ESO Council President, Kurt Hunger
in 1986, and also with support from the Austrian Minister of Science, Erhardt Busek.
Formal negotiations began in June 1990, partly preceded by various outreach activities, including an exhibition at the Vienna Planetarium in December 1987 and at the
Austria Centre in Vienna’s UN City in connection with the 7th EUREKA Minister Conference in June 1989. However, in 1991, the Austrian Ministry of Finance
again said no. The ESO project went into hibernation until the year 2000 when the
new ESO Director General, Catherine Cesarsky, attending a science meeting in
­A lpbach in Austria, encouraged the Austrian astronomers to restart the process. Formally the showstopper so far had been the veto by the Ministry of Finance, but other
reasons for Austria’s arduous path towards ESO membership were disagreement
within the astronomical community and lack of support within the ­bureaucracy.
35	

Occasionally with a little help from friends: the first Czech astronomer to work as an ESO staff astronomer,
Stanislav Stefl, took up his duties in 2004. Also in that year, the Venus transit project, led by ESO, held what
was possibly the first EU-funded, science-related meeting in the Czech Republic.

483

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Among the astronomers, the opponents of ESO membership feared that funds for
Austrian astronomy would diminish if money were diverted to pay for membership.
This apparently logical argument has been seen again and again in many countries
contemplating to join, but it has seldom been borne out by reality. In most cases —
though admittedly not all — the outcome has been the opposite: keen to make the
best of membership, governments have actually allocated more funds to the national
scientific effort, not less. In the end, the formation of the Österreichische Gesellschaft für Astronomie und Astrophysik (ÖGA 2) in 2002 helped resolve the internal
differences. The other important element, the need for support by strong, dedicated
civil servants is equally clear. Blaauw’s comment about “people in these important
positions of science policy”, quoted in Chapter I-2, bears testimony to this. Conversely,
without support from within the administration, things become very difficult. For
a long time this appeared to be the case in Austria. To be fair, Austria was far from
being an isolated case. And, in any case, by 2006 things had begun to look much
more positive. Consensus had been achieved within the scientific community and
the bid was backed by a young, dynamic civil servant, Daniel Weselka, and also by
his hierarchical superiors, notably Peter Kowalski, the Director General for Scientific Research and International Relations at the Austrian ministry.
So, for the third time, on 28 June 2006, discussions assumed a formal character
with a negotiating team appointed by Council paying a visit to Vienna. During the
coming months, discussions progressed, although at a very slow pace. The main reason was that Austria wished to pay a part of the entrance fee as an in-kind contribution, requiring long discussions to define the nature and the value of this. However, by June 2007, the main hurdles had seemingly been overcome and the way lay
open for a formal agreement. Then, in a surprise move, the Austrian government
abruptly retreated from the process, bringing back memories of the situation in 1991.
The shock can be felt in an e-mail of 10 July from Catherine Cesarsky to the Council president, Richard Wade: “Dear Richard: I must inform you … that, after a very
positive and even conclusive meeting on the in-kind contribution, the negotiation with
Austria has suddenly collapsed.” The unexpected change of heart caused much commotion, in particular among Austrian astronomers, who once more saw their hopes
crushed. Soon after taking over as ESO Director General on 1 September 2007, Tim
de Zeeuw therefore met with the Austrian minister, Johannes Hahn, in a last-ditch
attempt to salvage the situation. No real breakthrough was achieved at the meeting itself, but it opened the way for continued, quiet discussions between the parties
and in March 2008, the government informed ESO that it was ready to resume formal negotiations with the aim of joining the organisation by the middle of the year.

484

Chapter IV-8 ∙ The Surge

Things were finally falling into place, it seemed. But it meant that negotiations had to
be concluded and all documents approved, both by the various Austrian authorities
and ESO within three months. On 30 June, the Austrian minister and ESO’s Director General signed the accession agreement. The negotiators had reached their goal.
It wasn’t the only goal scored then as Vienna was one of the hosts for the European
Soccer Championship at the time! The speed at which things developed turned out
to be fortuitous. Only nine days after the signing of the agreement, the government
collapsed and parliamentary elections were called. Ratification of the agreement,
thus fell to the new parliament. Luckily, the minister was able to continue in office
and, with the able help of Weselka and Hans-Joachim Sorger, an aide to the minister, the process was completed, so that Austria became ESO’s 14th Member State.

485

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

(Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)

486

Chapter IV-9

Born in Europe, at Home in the World
“Sometimes a global approach as well as a global strategy
would be appropriate.
It would bode well for Council to think of global strategy
if not necessarily of global projects.”
Richard Wade, ESO Council President,
Statement to the ESO Council.

W

ith the commissioning of the VLT, the successful relaunch of the interferometry option (VLTI), engagement in the ALMA project and the E-ELT project
on the horizon there is no doubt that ESO has come to be seen as a scientific powerhouse in the world of astronomy. The so-called Senior Report by the National Science Foundation of the US, published in 2006, testified to this by stating that “there
is no U.S. organization that provides a suitable match to ESO. Despite its origin as an
optical observatory, ESO was the natural organization to lead European involvement
in the ALMA project and, through the international nature of its operations, obtained
the resources to match NRAO in constructing and operating ALMA.” (NSF, 2006).
It is also evident that ESO has become the centre of gravity for European astronomy, working in symbiosis with the national institutes and the various European networks that have sprung up since the year 2000 and to which we shall return below.
But ESO has also played its own role in the wider development towards European
integration. Firstly, the very wording of the Convention gave the organisation a European remit and perspective, even if it spoke of “member states” rather than “Europe”.
But in the discussions between CERN and ESO in 1969, we find an interesting comment about the possible wider implications of the foreseen close cooperation between
the two organisations. In a letter to the incoming Director General Blaauw, Kees
­Zilverschoon — then head engineer at CERN — reported from the discussions at
the CERN Council about this that “ it was remarkable how almost everyone … entirely
lost sight of the orginal aim, the construction of the telescope, and rather emphasized the

487

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

scientific importance … and the political aspect: Formation of a ‘communauté scientifique Européenne’, in which there would be room also for other organisations for fundamental science.” (Blaauw, ibid.). It is in fact a remarkable statement because here we
see a very early expression of the ideas that have ultimately led to the creation of the
European Research Area. Perhaps even the first? It is in any event noteworthy that
the initial ideas at the purely political level were formulated only in 1973 by European Commissioner Ralph Dahrendorf (Madsen, 2010).
≈
ESO began to develop activities outside its Member States in the 1980s. An early
example — in September 1987 — was a joint school between ESO and the Astronomical Council of the Academy of Sciences of the USSR, organised at the ­Byurakan
Astrophysical Observatory in Armenia. For a while, it would be an isolated initiative.
ESO’s primary task is to serve its Member States, but, as we shall see, the organisation soon became much more involved in developments outside its own narrow area,
both geographically and thematically.
ESO gradually adopted a broader view of its obligations as a European organisation.
One of the early examples was the support programme for the Central and Eastern
European (C&EE) countries, which was decided by the ESO Council in December
1992. Let us remember that at the time, Eastern Europe was experiencing its greatest
upheaval since World War II. In November 1989, the Berlin Wall had come down,
leading to German re-unification in 1990. In 1991, the Soviet Union collapsed and
the existing institutional and organisational frameworks there either ceased to exist
or were paralysed. This did not only happen in the Soviet Union, but countries that
had belonged to the then Soviet sphere of influence were also affected. Science and
scientists were affected along with everyone else, but for them it was perhaps even
more dramatic, since in the communist system, science was more an integral part
of the public system than in the West — a system that for a while seemed simply to
evaporate. An example illustrates how desperate the situation was: for a while, the
monthly salary at the Abastumani Astrophysical Observatory in Georgia was the
equivalent of two US dollars, if it was paid at all. In fact for many months the astronomers did not receive any payment whatsoever. One day, they came across an abandoned lorry that turned out to be loaded with sugar. The observatory confiscated
the sugar and distributed it among its employees — as salary. At the observatory in
Armenia, the situation may have been slightly better, but instead they only had electrical power for one hour a day — during daytime (Shustov, 2010). It is no wonder

488

Chapter IV-9 ∙ Born in Europe, at Home in the World

that cries for help percolated through the scientific community and also reached
ESO. In June 1992, the Council set up a working group “to provide advice about
ESO’s future relations with C&EE astronomy under the recent changes in Europe”
(ESO press statement 11/92)1. The rationale for ESO involvement clearly illustrates
that the organisation had accepted a wider role beyond providing top-of-the-line
observing facilities for its Member State astronomers. It stated: “The Council agreed
that ESO, as the major European astronomy organisation, and with its many links to
individual researchers, scientific institutes and observatories as well as to policy makers,
is in an optimal position to assess objectively the very diverse needs and to provide support to C&EE astronomy in a non-bureaucratic and cost-effective way.” According to
the report by the working group, there were about 60 institutes in the C&EE area
with some 700 members of the IAU. At the time the American Astronomical Society
(AAS) had raised some funds for support, as had the European Astronomical Society
(EAS), but none were anywhere near sufficient to alleviate even the worst problems.
On the other hand the European Community was preparing more comprehensive
help, but it seemed clear that this programme would take time to become established
and to achieve any substantial results. Therefore, the report concluded: “Considering
the present dramatic situation of astronomy in the C&EE countries and in line with
ESO’s historical obligations to European astronomy, it is highly desirable that ESO …
considers and executes a limited, but appropriate support programme as soon as possible, before a more substantial effort can be realised through more resourceful means.”
The three-year support programme began in early 1993 and had a yearly budget of
half a million deutschmarks, to be dispensed partly as individual research grants,
and partly to buy modern equipment (mainly computers, but also observational
equipment, such as CCD detectors). Funds could also be allocated to support visits of astronomers from ESO Member States to C&EE institutes as well as to enable
C&EE astronomers to participate in ESO conferences. It also enabled institutes to
take out a free subscription to the journal Astronomy & Astrophysics. The programme
was managed by ESO under a dedicated committee comprised of Nicolai Chugai
(Moscow), James Lequeux (Paris), Georges Meylan (ESO), Giancarlo Setti (­Bologna),
Jean-Pierre Swings (Liège) and headed by Richard West (ESO). West knew the scientific communities of the countries in question well 2 , spoke fluent R
­ ussian and had
occasionally solved delicate questions of science diplomacy at the time of the Cold
1	

Members of the working group were Jan Bezemer, Jean-Pierre Swings, Gerhard Bachmann and Richard West.

2	

From 1982–85 West had served as General Secretary of the International Astronomical Union. As a young student, he had observed at the Abastumani Astrophysical Observatory — and brought back a Georgian wife.

489

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

War. If the response to the first call could be taken as a measure of the need, the
numbers spoke for themselves: with 284 applications covering 936 applicants, the
requested amount was eleven times bigger than the budget for the first year.
It is worthwhile dwelling a little on this activity, because it illustrates how what may
often be seen as lofty political decisions were transformed into effective help “on the
ground”. This was driven by a genuine desire to help and enabled by what one can
only describe as considerable personal courage. The articles in The ESO Messenger
do not reveal anything of the dramatic circumstances under which the C&EE programme was actually carried out, probably because at the time, West was also editor of The ESO Messenger.
Delivering the programme also meant ensuring that the aid reached the right people. Conditions in the East were such that this often required delivery right to the
front door. Since this could not be done safely through intermediaries, West himself travelled with what for people in that part of the world must have appeared to
be large sums of money — in cash 3 . Personal grants amounted to 400 deutschmarks
each, which at the time was the equivalent of a full year’s salary. Since exchanging
foreign currency was not simple, the money was packed in envelopes each with eight
50 deutschmark notes.
For security reasons, the local authorities occasionally provided armed protection
during these missions, but within the ESO administration the unease was palpable
and they welcomed the day when more orderly conditions again enabled regular bank
transfers. After 1995, when the ESO programme folded, support was mainly taken
over by INTAS 4 , an organisation set up by the European Community and a number of countries and endowed with significant funds. The INTAS programme covered all areas of science and ran until 2006. It could be argued that the ESO support
programme could only be but a drop in the ocean, but that probably does not do justice to it. The ESO programme was a “first aid” activity, delivered without delay in
an emergency situation. The experience gathered was passed on to INTAS and other
relief efforts5 . Aside from the immediate relief, it sent an important signal to the scientists of the former Eastern Bloc and their societies, at a time when ­f undamental
3	

On at least one mission to Ukraine, he was accompanied by Georges Meylan.

4	

The International Association for the promotion of co-operation with scientists from the New Independent
States of the former Soviet Union (NIS).

5	

West later advised the Soros Foundation regarding support for science in Eastern Europe.

490

Chapter IV-9 ∙ Born in Europe, at Home in the World

s­ cience — and its practitioners — stood in low regard. It constituted a stamp of international recognition and approval, of political importance 6 and, of course, it was also
a show of solidarity within the world’s scientific community.
A further step towards engagement in broader policy matters came with ESO’s participation in the Europa Ricerca event in Rome in June 1990, on the occasion of the
8th Ministerial Conference of EUREKA, and by invitation from its then President
Antonio Ruberti. In 1993 Ruberti became European Commissioner for Research
and began to think more seriously about how research in Europe could be integrated
within a European framework. ESO also organised an exhibition at the Council of
Europe between 26 September–12 October 1991. We shall return to the wider European policy perspectives shortly.

The training activities that had
started with the summer school
in Armenia changed character.
In 1988, ESO and the Observatoire de Haute-Provence, under
the directorship of ­Phillipe
Veron, began a series of joint
biannual summer schools
for young astronomers. The
rationale was that, with tele­Learning the tools of the observing trade: young astronoscopes now being operated in
mers at the first ESO/OHP summer school in 1988 — Maria
Grazia Franchini and Henri Boffin.
faraway places, there were fewer
options for young astronomers
to become acquainted with modern observational techniques. The summer schools
continued until 1996, when they were relaunched under the new name of NEON
schools 7, thanks to an initiative by Michel Dennefeld and with financial support
by the European Commission within the framework of the Marie Curie Actions.
6	

This was already seen in the report by the Council working group that stated: “The recent experience has shown
that C&EE institutes and individual scientists who are actively involved in ongoing international collaboration programmes have better chances of obtaining support by their national authorities and therefore of surviving
scientifically.”

7	

NEON stands for the Network of European Observatories in the North. This originally meant the Osservatorio Astrofisico di Asiago in Italy, the Spanish/German Observatorio de Calar Alto and OHP, but soon brought
the Canary Islands observatories as well as ESO into the partnership.

491

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

≈
In 1989, ESO introduced its own Research Student Programme, an idea of Harry
van der Laan. With wonderful new research facilities becoming available, it was of
course important to secure adequate recruitment to astronomy and to provide students with a perspective for their own development within this highly competitive,
global science. The programme, initially with eight positions per year, was designed
for postgraduate students preparing for a PhD. Since ESO is not a degree-granting
institution, the idea was that the students would obtain their degree from a national
university, but that they would spend 1–2 years at ESO, either in Garching or in
Chile, as part of their doctoral work. At ESO, they would be aided by a local mentor, but also maintain contact with their formal supervisors back home. In The ESO
­Messenger, van der Laan presented the rationale: “Having research students in our
teams in addition to fellows, to visitors and to staff serves this purpose: Research students, bright, ambitious, naïvely demanding, contribute to the research mindedness
of an institution… . Secondly, the … programme serves to extend the linkage of ESO to
Europe’s universities… . A third aspect concerns the long-term quality and ambitions of
European astronomy embodied in the next generation. The fellows and students who
spend a year or two within ESO are better equipped to use its facilities for their personal
research in future. In addition, and just as important, they will enable the institutes
that employ them to use ESO telescopes and services to best advantage. They are the vanguard of VLT observers, training now and set to work for decades in the next century.
Finally, and related to the preceding point, these youthful scientists establish patterns
of professional and personal relations among themselves, relations that will guide their
collaborations and projects of the future. The result will be … growth of European excellence in astronomy. And that too is ESO’s raison d’etre.” (van der Laan, 1989). The
programme has been highly successful and up to the present day more than 200 doctoral students from almost 30 countries have benefitted from it. But the programme
is not just about numbers, as the author experienced during a night stay at the VLT
control room, chatting to two female astronomers: “Here we’re sitting, two young
grad students, with the world’s most advanced astronomical telescope at our control.
It’s fantastic!” Indeed.
≈
By the end of the 20th century, ESO had established itself as a flagship organisation
enabling European research in astronomy. Several countries were on their way to
join while ESO itself was about to enter into an international collaborative project

492

Chapter IV-9 ∙ Born in Europe, at Home in the World

(ALMA) with partners in Asia and the Americas. Further large projects 8 — some
with potential ESO involvement — in combination with the overall changes in the
European science policy landscape, that we shall discuss below, prompted the introduction of a Science Strategy Working Group by the ESO Council in June 2003.
The committee structure of ESO already included the Scientific Technical Committee that addressed questions of the scientific orientation of ESO, for example,
new instrumentation and major scientific activities, such as surveys. The SSWG,
however, would instead address the overall policy aspects and develop paths for the
future evolution of ESO within the broader European science landscape. Chaired by
Ralf Bender, the initial membership of the SSWG comprised Claes Fransson, Gerry
Gilmore, Franco Pacini, Jean-Loup Puget, Simon Lilly, Thomas Henning and Tim
de Zeeuw as well as ESO staff members Bruno Leibundgut, Guy Monnet and Peter
Quinn. ESO was not the only organisation to establish a dedicated body for such a
purpose. In the face of the concentration in particle physics of mega-projects, both
present and future, CERN had done the same, and in 2006, the CERN Council,
building on the work of its working group, adopted a sweeping resolution regarding
the future of particle physics in Europe. “There is a fundamental need for an ongoing process to define and update the European strategy for particle physics,” the text
declared, “Council, under Article II-2(b) of the CERN Convention, shall assume this
responsibility, acting as a council for European particle physics 9 , … Council will define
and update the strategy based on proposals and observations from a dedicated scientific
body that it shall establish for this purpose.” The question for the ESO Council was
whether it should follow suit. It did not. Under its next chair, Tim de Zeeuw, the
working group elaborated on three scenarios ranging from focussing on the projects
currently in ESO’s portfolio (mainly VLT, ALMA participation and E-ELT) to an
all-encompassing role as the coordination body for all of European astronomy. Seeing that the strength of European astronomy derived from “the synergy of a shared
vision in large projects and the individual interests and innovation of member states in
smaller projects” 10 , the ESO Council chose the middle way, reaffirming the notion
that ESO should indeed focus on large projects beyond the capacity of any of the
individual Member States. It essentially meant a continuation of the ideas that had
underpinned the establishment of the organisation in the first place, the milestone
of the 1998 Giacconi paper and into the era of the ELTs and, potentially, other large
8	

In December 2003 ESO organised a meeting of the OECD Global Science Forum in Munich, with a follow up
meeting in April 2004 in Washington to discuss megaprojects in astronomy.

9	

Readers will remember that the acronym CERN stands for the Conseil Européen pour la Recherche Nucléaire.

10	

Report to the ESO Council, 14 March 2007.

493

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

infrastructure projects. The corollary of this was, inevitably, that ESO should not
be responsible for the “small telescopes”, even if they happened to be located at an
ESO site. The discussion of small vs. large telescopes had been in progress for decades with many astronomers correctly emphasising the usefulness of the 1–2-metreclass telescopes, both in terms of the science that can be carried out with such facilities and their potential for training future generations of astronomers. But it would
not be for ESO to secure the future for these telescopes.
≈
Of course, ESO was not the only research organisation that had achieved success in
the global arena. CERN had long since grown into the leading organisation in the
world for particle physics and in the area of space activities ESA had become the
“NASA of Europe”, providing Europe with an independent launch capacity and
building and operating a host of satellites, many of which served scientific purposes.
EMBL had been instrumental in building up research capacity in the new scientific
discipline of molecular biology and demonstrated continued leadership in Europe.
Other organisations at the European level had played important roles as well, each of
them demonstrating the power of cooperation and collaboration between countries
and the advantages of pooling resources, human as well as capital. While this happened two important political developments gained momentum: the general drive
towards stronger political integration in Europe and the decision, in the spring of
2000, by the heads of states and governments to turn Europe into a strong 11, knowledge-based economy. This would clearly be significant for those who generate knowledge, namely scientists. The political framework that was created to foster this process became known as the European Research Area, an idea that harks back to the
1960s (and to which we have alluded on several occasions already) but was given a
major boost by Europe’s leaders, including increased funds for science and technology partly channelled through the Framework Programme of the European Union.
In a very general way, everyone was now embracing some of the basic ideas that had
underpinned the success of ESO CERN, and some of the other research organisations. But how did this affect ESO, which of course is not directly associated
with the European Union? Firstly, the work of ESO’s SSWG obviously took place
within this context. Secondly, in the new spirit of the ERA, astronomical networks
financed through the EU emerged. Three networks became important: OPTICON,
11	

The political ambition was to become the most competitive economy in the world, a goal that was quietly abandoned ten years later.

494

Chapter IV-9 ∙ Born in Europe, at Home in the World

for optical astronomy, RadioNet, for radio astronomy, and finally ILIAS (and later
ASPERA) for astroparticle research. OPTICON was perhaps especially attractive
for astronomers in countries that were not yet members of ESO, since it included
many institutes in these countries. However, ESO decided to become a full member of the network and has worked with it ever since. In this sense, OPTICON also
provided a forum for discussions and for developing collaborative projects between
institutes in ESO Member States and non-member states, but also involving ESO
itself. Thirdly, a further initiative, in 2005, was ASTRONET, a cooperation between
some of the main funding organisations in astronomy that also included ESO (and
with ESA as an observer). In 2007, ASTRONET produced a common science vision
document, followed in 2008 by the first European roadmap for astronomy covering
both the ground and space segments — an equivalent to the Decadal Survey of US
astronomy produced by the National Research Council Committee on Astronomy
and Astrophysics12 .
≈
In the months before ERA was formally launched, some key players began to think of
the shift in European policies, including José Mariano Gago, the Portuguese minister
who had played an instrumental role in elevating support for science to the highest
political levels, and Philippe Busquin, the new European Commissioner in charge
of research and an ardent supporter of the ERA idea. Busquin began by talking to
a number of key figures in the scientific community. At the suggestion of Curien,
he interviewed Catherine Cesarsky, the newly appointed Director General of ESO,
and the Director General of EMBL, Fotis Kafatos. Cesarsky pointed out the role
that intergovernmental research organisations played in the European science landscape. Then, at an EU Council of Ministers meeting in Lisbon on 17–18 April, a
select group of scientists was invited to present their views to the ministers, including
Jean-Jacques Dordain from ESA (who later became Director General of that organisation) and Cesarsky. Having thought about the implications of the ERA proposal,
Cesarsky realised that it was essential for the intergovernmental organisations, with
their vast experience, not only to assist in the ERA process, but also to safeguard their
own legitimate interests, and that this could best be done by joining forces. This led
12	

As already mentioned, several ESO Directors General had in the past expressed the desirability of having such
a plan. As a substitute, ESO developed its own long-range plan, even if this could in no way cover all the needs
of European astronomers. During her term of office as ESO DG, Catherine Cesarsky had therefore suggested
to the European Astronomical Society (EAS) that it might consider taking up this task, but in the end the EAS
declined.

495

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

to the formation of the EIROforum13 partnership, which was formally sealed with
the signing of the EIROforum Charter on 12 November 2002 in Brussels.

On 20 April 2005, the EIROforum partners published a joint vision paper for the future evolution of
European science. Seen at the formal presentation at the Press Centre of the Berlaymont Building in
Brussels (from left to right): Colin Carlile (ILL), Bill Stirling (ESRF), Robert Aymar (CERN) François
Biltgen (President of the EU Competitiveness Council), David Southwood (ESA), Janez Potočnik
(European Commissioner for Research), Catherine Cesarsky (ESO), Iain Mattaj (EMBL), Jerôme Pamela
(EFDA-JET) and Katja Adler (BBC journalist and moderator). (Photo: European Commission)

The original EIROforum members were CERN, EFDA-JET (European Fusion
Development Agreement-Joint European Torus), EMBL, ESA, ESO, ESRF (European Synchrotron Radiation Facility) and ILL (Institut Laue-Langevin)14 . Between
them they covered a wide spectrum of scientific disciplines including particle physics, fusion research, molecular biology, space science, astronomy and astrophysics,
material science and neutron research. By virtue of their own scientific standing and
involvement with multiple disciplines, the group could undertake actions and make
pronouncements on important science policy issues, credibly and legitimately, in a
13 

EIROforum stands for the European Intergovernmental Research Organisations’ Forum, a name that was suggested by Richard West during a meeting at Garching.

14	

In 2010, the partnership was augmented by the European X-ray Free Electron Laser (XFEL).

496

Chapter IV-9 ∙ Born in Europe, at Home in the World

way that would have been beyond the bounds of any individual organisation. The
partners also differed in size. ESO found itself in the middle, able to understand the
specific problems of the small organisations but also to think big. Of course, ESO
had traditionally maintained close scientific links to CERN and ESA, which were
the largest members of the new partnership. All of this meant that ESO was ideally
placed to play a key role as a motor for the collaboration for many years — strongly
backed by Cesarsky, who had an in-depth understanding of the broader European
science policy issues. The EIROforum was organised to have a Council, comprised
of the Directors General15 of the partner organisations, meeting twice a year, a Coordination Group and a number of Thematic Working Groups. The partnership established a rotating chairmanship with a term of one year. However, the first term, during which ESO held the chairmanship, was only for six months. This was thought to
be appropriate since it was during the period of formation. C
­ atherine Cesarsky held
the EIROforum chair, with Peter Quinn serving as chair of the Coordination Group,
and Richard West as the second ESO representative16 . In October 2003, EIROforum signed a Statement of Intent of cooperation with the European Commission17,
opening up opportunities for continued mutual consultations and joint activities in
support of the European Research Area.
≈
ESO’s involvement in the ERA process, both on its own and through the ­EIROforum,
was not based purely on altruistic motives. As mentioned, the ERA umbrella new
groups and networks were formed, including in astronomy. Astronomers in the nonESO member states in particular grasped these new opportunities. However, unlike
the process that led to the creation of ESO, the ERA process was essentially a politically-driven, top-down process and Cesarsky realised the dangers this entailed. Thus
on the European political stage, European astronomy became largely understood as
those activities that enjoyed financial support from the European Union. ESO, on
the other hand, whilst riding on the huge success of the VLT, was barely noticed at
this level. The risk was that the new initiatives, however well intended and thought
to foster collaboration and unity in European astronomical research, would actually cause the opposite — a fragmentation of efforts. Raising the awareness and the
15	

Or equivalent.

16	

The second term, from July 2008–June 2009, saw Tim de Zeeuw in the chair and the author chairing the Coordination Group.

17	

Renewed on 24 June 2010 with a formal signing ceremony at the ESO Headquarters.

497

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

profile of ESO at this political level was therefore necessary to bring European astronomy together on a much bigger scale, among other things manifested through the
growth in the number of ESO Member States. At the same time, taking part in policy discussions at this level required resources that few in the astronomical community, aside from ESO, could muster.

Catherine Cesarsky and Philippe Busquin, then European Commissioner for Research, at P
­ aranal in
August 2003. In 2007, Busquin’s successor, Janez Potočnik, also paid a visit to the observatory. (Photo
by the author)

ESO at least had the capability to act as a conduit for the astronomical community
in these matters. One example was a proposal by Piero Benvenuti that was meant to
address the fragmentation of funding for certain research projects. In 2001, to overcome this problem (see also Chapter III-1), ESO pushed for a new fellowship scheme
vis-à-vis the EU, under the name ELITE, meant to provide a one-stop funding process for important research projects in astronomy.

498

Chapter IV-9 ∙ Born in Europe, at Home in the World

Although it was not implemented, the ELITE proposal, along with the study that
underpinned it, became an important voice in the growing choir 18 that eventually
succeeded in winning the argument for the creation of the European Research Council (ERC). The ERC is recognised today as perhaps the single most important new
body within the European Research Area and is focussed exclusively on supporting
excellence in research.
≈
We have seen how ESO became the natural partner in the quasi-global ALMA project. Given discussions in the past regarding expansion of its membership beyond
Europe, it is therefore not surprising that this led to discussions with several overseas governments. At the time of writing, Brazil is at an advanced stage in the joining
process. This book is about the past history and we shall leave speculations about the
future to others. Yet, much has changed in the world both since the 1954 L
­ eiden declaration, widely seen as ESO’s birth certificate, and the 1962 Convention. Whilst its
roots remain solidly European, in a globalised world, ESO has stepped onto a wider
stage. Expressed differently: born in Europe, at home in the world.

18	

ESO was very much a voice in that choir, following the discussions that began with the first international meeting at the Nobel Foundation in the spring of 2002 and, together with more than 50 other organisations and
associations, signing a declaration of support, published in Science in August 2004.

499

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

In July 2006, ESO organised a live videoconference with the
­Paranal Observatory at a major on-stage show at the central
square in Munich, the Marienplatz, in connection with the
German Wissenschaftssommer. (Photo: Hans Hermann
Heyer)

500

Chapter IV-10

A Window to the Public
“The sharing of knowledge is quite simply a question
of democracy and even of justice… .”
Prof. José Mariano Gago, Portuguese Minister for Science
and Technology, RTD info, February 2005.

I

n the 100th issue of The ESO Messenger, Kurt Kjär, then technical editor of the
magazine, recalled a somewhat bizarre incident at the ESO Office in Garching
in 1977. He wrote: “The ESO Headquarters was in its construction phase and the
­Garching staff (22 or 23 people) was provisionally housed in an apartment building
in Garching. Only a small, discreet sign identified the place as ESO offices. One day,
the manager of the publishing firm came to ESO to bring the blue-prints of The ESO
Messenger… . To see someone from ESO, a visitor had first to ring the bell outside the
building. Then a member of the ESO Secretariat, located in a flat on the ground floor
of the building, opened the door and asked whom he wanted to see. Then the secretary
informed the staff member concerned by telephone. The visitor went up to the apartment
in which the staff member had his office. Here, he had to ring the bell again and wait
a moment to be let in. This all must have appeared very strange and mysterious to the
man. He said nothing while he was at ESO. But some weeks later, when the technical
editor had matters to discuss with him at his place, he said: ‘Now I know what ESO is all
about — you can’t fool me — astronomy is just a pretext. ESO is a secret-­service agency!’
(Kjär, 2000). The oddness of the episode notwithstanding, Kjär’s more sombre conclusion was clear: “It shows that public relations activities should not be neglected in
an organisation like ESO.”
Despite a well-developed tradition of the popularisation of science, mostly in the
form of public lectures by distinguished scientists (Gregory & Miller, 1998), it is
true that the European academic world had not given priority to public communication. In general, institutional arrangements to provide information and to support a broader public awareness were scarce and not held in particularly high regard
in academia. As an organisation, ESO did not differ from the mainstream during

501

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

the first couple of decades of its existence, despite the occasional ad hoc outreach
activity. But change was on its way. Slowly, a new communication culture emerged,
strongly inspired by the rather different approach taken by scientists in the US — in
turn prompted by surveys conducted by the American Association for the Advancement of Science (AAAS) about public scientific literacy. At ESO, the wake-up call
came in the mid-1980s, when the organisation moved towards the decision on the
next generation telescope, the VLT. To prepare the ground, the representatives of
the ESO Member States urged the organisation to undertake a dedicated effort in
public outreach1, and so in early 1986, what was originally called the Information
and Photo­g raphic Service2 was created, headed by Richard West. It was an excellent
choice. West was a born communicator. In 1972 he had been awarded a prestigious
communication prize in his native Denmark, the Rosenkjær Prize, given to scientists or persons from “cultural life” for their ability to communicate complex topics.
As already mentioned, the passage of Halley’s Comet in 1986 provided an almost
ideal opportunity to get into the “business”. From the outset, the effort rested on two
main pillars: press releases and exhibitions. Both contributed to building up public
recognition of ESO, but the exhibitions also served to directly support attempts to
broaden the Member State base. In fact, an ESO exhibition (or other public event)
was often the first visible sign of a move towards a closer relationship between a nonmember country and the organisation, e.g. in Portugal, Spain, Austria, etc. However,
with the strong encouragement of the Director General of the time, Harry van der
Laan, ESO soon added other activities to its outreach arsenal. The first was video production. The decision to build up competence and capacity in this field was originally
driven by the desire to document the VLT project as it progressed. Video recordings
were not just of historical importance but used actively to keep ESO staff informed
in a timely fashion about ongoing developments, be it wind tunnel tests, production
of mechanical pieces or construction activities — all activities that happened in different locations around Europe and the rest of the world. Video as a recording tool
had been around for some years, but the important strategic (and bold at the time)
1	

In a statement by the Swiss government delegate at the ESO Council meeting in November 1984, he stressed
that “ it was extremely important that an organisation like ESO makes headlines from time to time. This was most
important for the tax payers, for parliamentarians, and government officials, particularly at a time where big decisions were lying ahead involving a substantial amount of money.” It is noteworthy, perhaps puzzling, that it did
not come from the astronomers themselves.

2	

In various incarnations the department has existed ever since. Reflecting a slight switch in scope, in 1994 it
became the Education and Public Relations Department, then the Public Affairs Department (also covering
science policy and some international relations aspects) and, from 2008, the education and Public Outreach
Department.

502

Chapter IV-10 ∙ A Window to the Public

The inauguration of a major ESO exhibition at the Museon in the Hague in January 1989 also brought
some of the key actors in ESO’s history together including Jan Oort (left), one of the “ founding fathers”,
Adriaan Blaauw (centre right), the second Director General, and Harry van der Laan, the fourth Director
General of the organisation. (Photo by the author)

decision by ESO was — from the start — to choose a broadcast-quality solution on
the principle that as ESO strove for excellence in its scientific and technical areas, it
should do likewise in outreach and communication. This way, the recorded material
could not only be used for internal purposes, but also be made available to television
channels across the world (Madsen, 1993). From this nonetheless modest start, ESO’s
broadcast service has evolved into a highly professional unit able to work with top-ofthe line television channels from CNN, Discovery Channel, NHK (of Japan), ABC
(Australia) to all the major European channels whether public or private — and even
Arab channels such as Al Jazeera 3 . As part of the broadcast service, ESO also began
to develop advanced computer animations, both of astronomical phenomena and
of new technology projects. The ability to deliver photo-realistic imagery became a
powerful tool in promoting new projects and winning air time on television. Harry
van der Laan’s role in developing ESO’s outreach activities was not limited to supporting the effort; he also decided to embed it in the Office of the Director General.
This was an important and far-sighted move that made communication Chefsache
3	

While ESO produced and delivered significant amounts of footage to television, it also received camera teams
from all over the world, including many from the most prestigious channels. In 2010, the first German-­produced
3D documentary Das Auge 3D, about the VLT on P
­ aranal, also became the first ever 3D documentary to be
screened on German television — on the National Geographic Channel.

503

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

and enabled ESO to develop a high public profile, in fact to become one of the leading science communication efforts in Europe.
Later, as technology opened up for new media, based on the internet, ESO became
increasingly present on these communication platforms as well. Over the years, to
some limited extent, ESO became part of popular culture, featuring in commercials,
films and even in stand-up comedy shows. For example, in 1990, the new NTT was
used in a promotional campaign for a Swiss hotel chain (under the theme of “excellence”) and later the VLT formed the backdrop for several car commercials (e.g.,
Audi). The acronym ESO could be found in crosswords, and occasionally ESO even
appeared in science fiction movies on television or on the cinema screens, e.g., in
1985 in the German movie Das Gespinst (seemingly inspired by Fred Hoyle’s 1957
novel The Black Cloud), which was shot partly at the ESO Headquarters in Garching,
partly at La Silla. And in 2008, the P
­ aranal Residencia was chosen for some scenes
in the James Bond movie A Quantum of Solace.
Press releases formed the backbone of the outreach activities from the outset.
Although the principle has always been followed that a press release would only be
issued if there was real and solid content, ESO has continuously issued more press
releases about astronomy than any other national research organisation in Europe
and thus contributed significantly to giving European astronomy public visibility.
The press releases have always been held in high regard by professional science journalists for their reliability, accuracy and the amount of information contained in
them, as has been confirmed to ESO again and again. But press releases are — press
releases; and media work can be hard and fast. For that reason, in 2005 ESO took a
— possibly unique — initiative to publish an ethics statement, describing how ESO
press releases are to be understood, how they are produced and what actions are taken
should a scientific claim later turn out to be untenable 4 .
As we have told the story of ESO in this book, we have occasionally also touched
upon some of the many activities carried out by the group since 1986.
≈
While the department had grasped the opportunity of the Halley apparition and
other astronomical events (such as supernova 1987A) and worked hard to promote
4	

http://www.eso.org/public/outreach/pressmedia/pr-proc.html

504

Chapter IV-10 ∙ A Window to the Public

ESO’s immediate goal of building the VLT, by 1993 it began to develop a more
holistic view and strategic vision for its continued work. As a consequence it developed a separate strand of activities in the field of education, strongly encouraged by
the Director General of the time, Riccardo Giacconi. Did ESO have an educational
obligation? Giacconi clearly thought so. Unsurprisingly, he finishes his 2008 memoirs with a strong plea in favour of educational outreach: “While our society relies
increasingly on technology, based on science and reason, the effects on society of teaching
rational thinking are not at all obvious… . I have pledged myself to do what I can still
do … to spread the light of reason.”
Beyond these high aims, ESO’s educational activities dovetailed with wider efforts
undertaken by the European Union and instigated by Antonio Ruberti, the energetic Italian scientist, politician and European Commissioner for Research, leading to the creation of a European Science Week. Under this umbrella, the European Commission agreed to co-fund scientific outreach activities with a “European
dimension”, including science education initiatives. For more than ten years, ESO
became a prominent actor within this framework, often carrying out activities that
were widely described as the flagships of the Science Week.
The first initiative was called The Future Astronomers of Europe and targeted pupils
in upper secondary schools in 18 countries (17 in Europe 5 as well as Chile). They were
invited to write essays with the title “A night with the VLT”. The programme built
on the premise that by the time the VLT would become operational many of these
young people would be in the middle of or have finished their tertiary education.
Drawing their attention to astronomy (and, of course, the VLT) before they made
their career choice would be good. And, who knew, perhaps some would end up as
astronomers and ultimately use the VLT themselves. As it was, this actually happened. So, in November 1993, 18 excited young people — national winners of the
essay contest — arrived in Munich ready to undergo an astronomical crash course
at the ESO Headquarters. A week later, the group departed for La Silla, where they
had been given telescope time, first two nights on the Dutch 0.9-metre telescope and
afterwards half a night on the NTT, to be used for observational programmes prepared by them in Garching. Shortly before their arrival at La Silla, however, three
new supernovae (1993af, ag, ah) had been discovered, so the initial plans were overthrown and they instead had the opportunity of experiencing the excitement of
observing such a unique event. And they were given their chance at the telescopes.
5	

Countries that were either Member States of ESO or the European Union.

505

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Fortune favours the bold, as it is said. The young people carried out the observations,
reduced the data at La Silla and saw their names published in IAU Circular 5897.
Since the group had also been followed by a television crew, the excitement was not
confined to the small group of young participants, but found its way back to a much
larger audience in Europe.
6

For the 18 winners 6 of the Future Astronomers of Europe contest, the visit to La Silla was an experience
they would never forget. Here, some of them are receiving instructions from Eva Grebel, as they prepare
for a night’s observations at the Dutch 0.9-metre telescope. (Photo by the author)

The Future Astronomers of Europe programme was a huge success, but it also revealed
a serious problem. In spite of dedicated efforts to inform schools in all 18 countries
about the programme, it turned out that none of the winners had actually heard
about it through their schools. This at least suggested that an enhanced effort towards
teachers might be indicated. During the next European Science Week, in 1994, ESO
therefore organised a conference for interested science teachers with the title Astronomy — Science, Technology, Culture. At the conference, the participants adopted a
6	

Michael Bieglmayer (Austria), Nicolas Debry (Belgium), Edith Valenzuela (Chile), Thomas Greve (Denmark), Jere Veikko Kahanpää (Finland), Nicolas Leterrier (France), Sonja Schuh (Germany), Lambros Kourtis
(Greece), Theo Honohan (Ireland), Carlo Farrigno (Italy), Alain Dondelinger (Luxembourg), Uri Naftali Shimron (The Netherlands), Niels Erland Haugen (Norway), João Pedro del Carvalho Saraiva (Portugal), Sergio
Marco (Spain), Tyberiusz Moska (Sweden), Miroslava Zavadsky (Switzerland) and Christian Miller (United
­K ingdom). Several of them subsequently chose to study astrophysics.

506

Chapter IV-10 ∙ A Window to the Public

Declaration on the Teaching of Astronomy in Europe’s Schools, stating that “Astronomy should contribute towards the consciousness that, in a complex society abounding in
science and technology, a scientific education is essential for the choices that every ­citizen
has to make in the democratic life. Students should feel that the Earth is a wonderful
place in the Universe, and to be cared for and defended.” It set out some particular
teaching goals, but also provided powerful arguments as to why and how astronomy
can serve broader educational purposes. In this connection it stated that “Astronomy teaching can contribute to an understanding of the physical laws, which start from
the human level and reach the macro-cosmos to give a scientific organised outlook on
our world and appreciate the uniqueness of the Earth for the human race. Astronomy
locates our niche in space and
time. Students should be aware
of threats, from light pollution
and radio interference, to our
ability to observe the night sky.”
It continued: “Astronomy teaching conveys the fundamentals of
the scientific method, including
the associated doubt and lack
of answers and the interplay
between experiment and theory,
The teachers’ conference in Garching led to a long-term partthereby forcing students to adopt
nership between ESO and some of Europe’s most dedicated
a critical attitude towards the
science teachers. Seen here is Lucienne Gouguenheim giving a
presentation at the meeting. (Photo: Hans Hermann Heyer)
many pseudo-sciences.”
The conference led, among other things, to the formation of a European Association for Astronomy Education, which became a very good partner for ESO’s following educational activities. The meeting also laid the seeds of a much more substantial
activity to support science teachers — the large Physics on Stage 7 and (later) Science
on Stage Festivals, embedded in what became the EIROforum Science Teachers’ Initiative (ESTI) 8 . Among the other activities to follow were Astronomy On-Line in
1996, a relatively early educational activity using the internet (and, in fact, leading
many schools to become connected to the net, often with Government support), and
Life in the Universe (2001), designed to create awareness about the level of serious
7	

Based on an initiative by ESO.

8	

It is estimated that these activities have exposed several tens of thousands of science teachers to new ideas about
science teaching (Madsen, 2006).

507

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

science relating to exoplanets and the prospects for extraterrestrial life. Most of the
activities had targeted “the best and the brightest” of young people. Catch a Star 9, on
the other hand, was an internet-based programme with broader aims — trying to
reach both younger children and those who might not have had enough confidence
to enter into highly competitive programmes. Once again, the EAAE played a major
role in assisting ESO in these activities.
Another activity deserves mention here: VT-2004, on the occasion of the transit of
Venus in 2004 on 8 June of that year. In terms of reach, it was the largest programme
ever undertaken by ESO, but while it exploited an astronomical event, just like the
cases of Halley and the Shoemaker-Levy 9, this was a pure outreach event without
new scientific results being expected. In a sense, the science had been done in the
18th and 19th centuries. Back then, the main scientific rationale lay in the opportunity — by means of triangulation — to use the crossing of Venus over the surface of
the Sun, observed from different locations on the Earth, to determine the distance
between the Earth and the Sun and thus also to determine the absolute scale of the
Solar System. A Venus transit is a relatively rare event, the previous one having taken
place in 1874. In 2004, the great opportunity lay in re-enacting the historical scientific experiment, but now involving a large number of people. Observing teams —
this time amateurs and interested public — could observe the transit and report their
data to a central hub at ESO.
All in all more than 2700 teams
took part, but many more simply chose to follow the event in
the live webcast from ESO. On
the day of the transit, ESO registered no less than 55 million
web hits within an eight-hour
period, and in total the website
clocked 75 million hits during
the programme. Perhaps not
surprisingly, six million came
from Germany. At the other
end of the scale (but still someChildren in Garching’s central square, the Bürgerplatz, lining
how pleasing), six came from
up to observe the Venus transit event on 8 June 2004, guided
by volunteer ESO staff. (Photo: Heinz Kotzlowski)
Rwanda. VT-2004 was led by
9	

Proposed to ESO by Rosa Maria Ros, a Spanish astronomer based in Barcelona.

508

Chapter IV-10 ∙ A Window to the Public

ESO, but also involved the EAAE, the Institut de Mecanique Celeste et de Calcul
des Ephemerides (IMCCE)/Observatoire de Paris and the Astronomical Institute
of the Academy of Sciences of the Czech Republic (Astronomický ústav Akademie
věd České republiky) together with national nodes in 25 countries. This project was
also co-funded by the European Commission.
≈
As time went by the educational activities grew in size and complexity. They also
grew in budget and even with the funding from the European Commission, it was
clear that more “shoulders” were needed. The activities initially had the character of
small pilot programmes, but the need in Europe for action was such that critical mass
became an issue, both in terms of conducting the activities and in order to achieve
the improvement in quality and attractiveness of contemporary science education
that all surveys demonstrated was so badly needed. ESO therefore initiated a close
collaboration with its sister organisations, first CERN and ESA, and later, with all of
the organisations that today form the EIROforum. This partnership in turn opened
up the possibility of carrying out major activities such as ESTI — already mentioned
— with science teaching festivals and a European science teaching journal entitled
Science in School. The ESTI initiative was a unique and widely acclaimed activity,
drawing in participants from far beyond the borders of Europe 10 .
With the support of consecutive Directors General and the ESO Council, there is
no doubt that among European science organisations ESO played a pioneering role
with respect to outreach activities. Its activities were both based on the legitimate
wish to promote its own programmes and projects and the fundamental recognition
that ESO as a member of the worldwide knowledge community could make a unique
contribution towards stimulating public awareness and interest in science in general
and — of course — in astronomy in particular. Noblesse oblige.
This rationale also drove ESO’s considerable involvement in the International Year
of Astronomy (IYA2009), which ultimately involved almost 150 countries. ESO’s
engagement started in 2006, when the efforts of the IAU began in order to achieve
the necessary resolution by the General Assembly of the United Nations declaring the year 2009 as the International Year of Astronomy, commemorating the

10	

Such as Canada, Chile and Russia.

509

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

quadrennial of the first use of an astronomical telescope by Galileo 11. With its intergovernmental status, the fact that it was supported by a number of member states
of the United Nations and the European origin of the IYA2009 proposal, ESO was
able to act as a credible interlocutor on the international diplomatic stage12 , hand in
hand with the IAU. Well aware of ESO’s strength in this field, the IAU President
asked the author to lead this political action in support of IYA2009, aided by Enikő
Patkós. The approval of the IYA2009 at the UN General Assembly was obtained
on 19 December 2007.

The IAU delegation that presented the IYA2009 initiative at the United Nations in New York on
1 November 2007. From left to right: The author, Beatriz Barbuy (IAU Vice President), Robert Williams
(IAU President Elect), Catherine Cesarsky (IAU President), Luigi di Chiara (Italian UN Mission),
Kevindran Govender (SALT), Nella Le Moli (INAF) and Leopoldo Benacchio (INAF).

Shortly afterwards, ESO’s outreach activities were merged with the Hubble European Information Centre (also residing at ESO as part of the ESA/ESO European
Coordination Facility for the Hubble Space Telescope). Together with the IYA2009
11	

The proposal to hold an International Year of Astronomy was originally made by the Italian astronomer (and
former ESO Council President) Franco Pacini, first leading to a resolution by the International Astronomical Union at its 2003 General Assembly in Sydney and followed up with an endorsement by UNESCO at its
­General Conference in 2005.

12	

Including the United Nations General Assembly and the United Nations Committee for the Peaceful Uses of
Outer Space, in which ESO has status as permanent observer.

510

Chapter IV-10 ∙ A Window to the Public

secretariat, also hosted by ESO, an immensely powerful outreach group emerged,
serving not just ESO, but the astronomical community as a whole. During IYA2009
ESO led four of the twelve IYA2009 Cornerstone projects, each a major activity with
a global reach. Perhaps most spectacular was Around the World in 80 Telescopes, a
live full 24-hour public webcast, featuring most of the research astronomical observatories in the world and attracting an estimated 200 000 viewers. The webcast,
which included a lavish collection of stunning images, was hosted and produced at
the ESO Headquarters, with astronomers at observatories around the globe participating. Another ESO-led Cornerstone project, launched in April 2009, was the
Portal to the Universe, designed to serve as a “one-stop shop” for online astronomy
information material. Finally, the Cosmic Diary was a site where professional scientists could blog about their work and their lives as scientists. No less than 14 ESO
astronomers participated in the project. Another activity worthy of mention was the
GigagalaxyZoom project, basically a triad of marvellous images of the Milky Way,
which documented a virtual journey to the central dust band of our galaxy 13 . The
GigagalaxyZoom project attracted about 500 000 visitors and was shown in 50 exhibitions in Europe. Yet all of this happened — so to speak — on the side, next to the
normal tasks: keeping up with a steady stream of scientific press releases, videos and
exhibitions, and many other activities. Making the most recent and exciting results
from astronomical research available to the general public meant fulfilling a deep
obligation to the millions of people, whose continued support for this great adventure decides whether it can go on or not.

13	

The first image, an 800-million-pixel panorama of the entire sky was produced by Serge Brunier, a French writer
and astrophotographer, and Frédéric Tapissier in collaboration with ESO. The second image was a detailed view
covering a 34 × 20 degree field of the constellations of Sagittarius and Scorpius, as observed with a 10-­centimetre
amateur telescope. This was produced by Stéphane Guisard, an engineer at the ­Paranal Observatory and also
a keen amateur astronomer, and finally a 370-million-pixel view of NGC 6523, the Lagoon Nebula, obtained
with the Wide Field Imager at the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope at La Silla.

511

Epilogue
“Over the past half century, European astronomy
has progressed from backwater to front-row player… .”
Johannes Andersen, 2011.

I

t is tempting to see the ESO story as an almost automatic, indeed irresistible, progression of science and technology, both interlinked and mutually enhancing.
In this view, the politics and the human stories — what might be dismissed as “the
many anecdotes” — could be understood merely as ripples on the pond. This would
not necessarily be completely wrong since, at the end of the day, ESO is about scientific excellence. Science, understood as an ever-growing body of knowledge, is often
seen this way. Yet this is too narrow a view, as the last chapters have aimed to demonstrate. For science is also a deeply human endeavour with all the implications that
follow. While pursuing its goal of scientific excellence, ESO has both been influenced
by and itself influenced wider developments in Europe. We have occasionally referred
to the European Research Area. As an idea it can be traced back to the 1970s, yet as
a general political concept, it first saw the light of day with the dawn of the new millennium. However, its basic tenets — free and unhindered cross-border collaboration, attainment of critical mass, development of common strategies and pooling of
resources to reach shared goals, etc. — are exactly the features that have characterised ESO since its early days, fifty years ago. If, beyond those general ideas, one were
to identify key lessons of the ESO story of interest to a wider audience, they would
probably include:
The value of competition: We remember Heckmann’s remarks about the dangers of a
scientific monoculture. ESO was born at a time when Europe had fallen behind and
the organisation was carried forward by the desire to regain lost ground. Yet science is
not just about competition, it is as much about cooperation — a fact that has spurred
the creation of the somewhat curious term of co-opetition. But a requirement for
participation in joint projects at the appropriate level is the competence acquired by
accepting the challenge of competition. Perhaps the best example is ESO’s participation in the ALMA project — not as a junior partner, but on a par with the other
participants.

513

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Long-term thinking: When new science facilities, especially large and costly ones, are
conceived, there is a natural tendency to focus on the initial investment. However,
ensuring the necessary resources for operations and future upgrades are arguably
as important, if not more so. Enabling long-term planning and execution, in turn,
requires the proper institutional and legal structure, and ESO is deeply indebted to
its founding fathers for providing exactly that, even if it took time.
Excellence, excellence, excellence, but…: Excellence is the fuel that makes the research
engine run. Excellence in research, however, requires excellent facilities and telescopes. The NTT and the VLT with their advanced instruments provide ample
examples of this. Excellence within a research infrastructure is of course no less
important — among other things for its ability to recruit and retain expert staff. But
the best is sometimes the enemy of the good. ESO occasionally struggled to complete
technological projects in time, not because they were not finished (in a technical or
contractual sense), but because enthusiastic engineers and technicians, convinced
that they could do still better, were reluctant to let go of their piece of equipment.
That there is a balance here is because ...
... Time counts: As every scientist knows, a discovery is only made once. Being second
is no fun. But time, and timing, counts in the world of management and politics, as
well — two worlds that play important roles in the realisation of large research facilities. In management, time equals money, in politics, timing can be a make or break
question for the approval of a new project.
The tremendous impact of a major research infrastructure on the organisation of its
research discipline: The creation of a major European facility in ground-based astronomy could only happen because the astronomers were willing and able to come
together behind the idea. This may, at the outset, have required many a scientist to
set aside his or her personal pet projects, but in retrospect, the result has been that
the astronomical community is considered one of the best-organised research communities in Europe — perhaps in the world — and able to attract substantial funding for a range of activities. It is worth noting that out of this process a European
astronomical community has emerged, where scientists work together across national
borders as a matter of course. And it is a community that is self-confident, vibrant
and ambitious in terms of its research objectives. The creation of this community is
also due to the fact that ...

514

Epilogue

... ESO acts as meeting point and breeding ground for talent: Over the decades, ESO
has provided a meeting place for astronomers, young and experienced, from all over
the world. Friendships have been forged, ideas have been argued over and collaborative projects developed. Talented young scientists have worked for periods of time at
ESO as students, as co-opérants or as fellows, before moving on to other institutes. A
survey of the ESO fellowship scheme showed that 92% of those who worked as fellows in Garching stayed within their scientific field after leaving the organisation1.
And a large number of scientists have simply met at the many conferences organised
by ESO or been involved in various ad hoc working groups.
Growth: ESO has grown because of its projects, but ESO’s projects have only been
possible because ESO grew. Growth is not only a matter of increased resources. ESO’s
expansion into non-optical wavelengths, first with SEST and later on a huge scale
through its involvement in the ALMA project is a case in point. The original European project, the LSA, was conceived outside ESO and even after the original project merged into ALMA it remained a partnership between a number of national
European institutes for a while (together with the NSF/NRAO/NRC as their North
American counterpart). But it became clear that if Europe was to act as an effective
partner in this quasi-global project and to also secure wide backing within Europe,
the European effort had to be unified and ESO was the right vehicle to realise this
project.
≈
It might seem like a truism to state that Europe and ESO have come far since October 1962. But this has not happened for free. Substantial resources, both human and
financial have been committed to allow European astronomers to catch up. As indeed
they have. But time does not stand still, and so it is important to move on, to develop
new projects and new methods of working. This is the challenge of the future. Without neglecting the scientific gains achieved with the current telescopes and thus the
contribution made to increasing our knowledge, if we fail to meet that challenge, the
past investment — undertaken to achieve a leading position for Europe’s astronomers in the long term — will have been in vain. And so, inevitably, we arrive at the
question of the E-ELT.

1	

ESO Annual Report, 2008.

515

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

What does the E-ELT mean to the Member States and their societies? First of all it
means a major effort in the mobilisation of resources, financial and intellectual. In
round numbers, the cost of the E-ELT is estimated to be about 1000 million euros.
This equals the price of four Airbus A380 Superjumbos. More relevant to understand the figure is perhaps to look at the cost in comparison with that of the VLT,
the project which marked the ESO’s breakthrough into the international world of
astronomical research. Adjusted for inflation, the 1999 cost was, as we will remember 990 million deutschmarks, or 506 million euros, to be shared amongst the eight
Member States. If we now consider both the growth in the number of Member States
and the growth in wealth over the last twenty-plus years, then the financial burden of
the E-ELT on the 14 European Member States will amount to 80% of the VLT cost 2 .
This book is written at the time when Brazil is in the process of joining ESO. If we
add Brazil to the calculation, the financial burden on each Member State would fall
to about 70% of the cost of the VLT. So much for cost. What about the gains? The
E-ELT will need the involvement of high-tech industry on a scale hitherto unseen for
an astronomical project. In turn, experience from the past suggests that there will be
important spin-offs and market opportunities created that will reach far beyond the
field of science3 . But the E-ELT is first and foremost a “science machine”.
What, then, will scientists get out of it? The honest answer, I believe, is that we don’t
know. Which is at the same time the best argument as to why we should do it. Yes,
we know what to look for. We know how to look and we also know why we are looking. All of this is substantiated by our current knowledge and elaborated in thoroughly thought-out science cases. Yet, if on the eve of Galileo’s first use of the telescope to study the heavens, the assembled scholars of the world had been asked where
the intellectual voyage sparked by Galileo would eventually take us, would they have
been right in their predictions? Some might have had an inkling of what was to come,
for the human mind is awesome in its capability, but most would have been wrong.
What we therefore can expect to find out there in the depths of space are surprises.
Here lies the true fascination and power of science — its ability to harness the human
intellect to unveil and help us understand those surprises and integrate this knowledge into the cultural edifice of humankind. If ESO can contribute to this endeavour, the efforts of its Member State societies will have been well invested.
2	

Expressed differently, together the 14 countries have a population of about 400 million. The E-ELT thus constitutes an investment of 2.5 euros per capita. Since this is spread over roughly 10 years, it means 25 cents per
annum per capita.

3	

A study at CERN, the European laboratory for particle physics, showed that one euro of expenditure in hightech procurement at CERN generates 3.7 times as much value in industry (Autio et al., 2003).

516

References

References

Bauersachs, W. 1982, Dome for the 2.2 m Telescope
Commissioned, The ESO Messenger, 30
Beckers, J. M. 1988, Increasing the size of the
­isoplanatic patch with multiconjugate adaptive
optics, in Ulrich, M.-H. (ed.), Very Large
Telescopes and their Instrumentation,
Proceedings of the ESO Conference held in
Garching, March 21–24 1988
Beckers, J. M. 2003, Interferometric Imaging in
Astronomy: A Personal Retrospective, Reviews in
Modern Astronomy, Vol. 17
Behr, A. 1993, Otto Heckmann 1901–1983, The ESO
Messenger, 33
Benvenuti, P. 1984, The Space Telescope European
Coordinating Facility Begins its Activity, The
ESO Messenger, 36
Beuzit, J. L. 2009, The First Common-User AO
Facility ADONIS, ESO celebration “20 Years of
Adaptive Optics at ESO”, 27 November 2009
Beuzit, J. L. & Hubin, N. 1993, ADONIS — a userfriendly adaptive optics system for the 3.6-m telescope, The ESO Messenger, 73
Blaauw, A. 1974, To all ESO Staff Members, The ESO
Messenger, 1
Blaauw, A. 1991, ESO’s Early History — The
European Southern Observatory from Concept to
Reality, ESO, Garching, Germany
Blaauw, A. 2004, My Cruise Through the World of
Astronomy, Annual Review, Astronomy &
Astrophysics.
Block, D. L. 2011, A Hubble Eclipse: Lemaître and
Censorship, Proceedings of the 80th Anniversary
Conference held by the Faraday Institute, St.
Edmund’s College, Cambridge
Bonaccini Calia, D., Hackenberg, W., Cullum, M.,
Brunetto, E., Quattri, M., Allaert, E., Dimmler,
M., Tarenghi, M., Van Kersteren, A., Di Chirico,
C., Sarazin, M., Buzzoni, B., Gray, P., Tamai, R.,
Tapia, M. R., Davies, R., Rabien, S., Ott, T. &
Hippler, S. 2001, ESO VLT Laser Guide Star
Facility, The ESO Messenger, 105
Bonnet, H., Abuter, R., Baker, A., Bornemann, W.,
Brown, A., Castillo, R., Conzelmann, R.,
Damster, R., Davies, R., Delabre, B., Donaldson,
R., Dumas, C., Eisenhauer, F., Elswijk, E.,
Fedrigo, E., Finger, G., Gemperlein, H., Genzel,
R., Gilbert, A., Gillet, G., Goldbrunner, A.,
Horrobin, M., ter Horst, R., Huber, S., Hubin,
N., Iserlohe, C., Kaufer, A., Kissler-Patig, M.,
Kragt, J., Kroes, G., Lehnert, M., Lieb, W.,
Liske, J., Lizon, J.-L., Lutz, D., Modigliani, A.,
Monnet, G., Nesvadba, N., Patig, J., Pragt, J.,
Reunanen, J., Röhrl, C., Silvio Rossi, S.,

Alloin, D. 2001, ESO: Research Facilities in Santiago,
The ESO Messenger, 105
Andersen, J. 1993, Ray Tracing Twenty Years at ESO,
The ESO Messenger, 72
Andersen, J. 1996, Planning for La Silla in the VLT
Era: What Came Out?, The ESO Messenger, 83
Andersen, J. 2011, Building a Strong, Unified
European Astronomy, in Lasota, J.-P. (ed.),
Astronomy at the Frontier of Science, Springer
Verlag
Ardeberg, A., Andersen, T., Owner-Petersen, M. &
Jessen, N.-C. 1996, A 25 m Live Optics Telescope,
Proceedings SPIE, 2871
Arnaboldi, M., Capaccioli, M., Mancini, D.,
Rafanelli, P., Caramella, R., Sedmak, G. &
Vettolani, G. P. 1998, VST: VLT Survey
Telescope, The ESO Messenger, 93
Arsenault, R., Hubin, N., Stroebele, S., Fedrigo, E.,
Oberti, S., Kissler-Patig, M., Bacon, R.,
McDermid, R., Bonaccini-Calia, D., Biasi, R.,
Gallieni, D., Riccardi, A., Donaldson, R.,
Lelouarn, M., Hackenberg, W., Conzelman, R.,
Delabre, B., Stuik, R., Paufique, J., Kasper, M.,
Vernet, E., Downing. M., Esposito, S.,
Duchateau, M., Franx, M., Myers, R. &
Goodsell, S. 1986, The VLT Adaptive Optics
Facility Project: Telescope Systems, The ESO
Messenger, 123
ASTRONET 2008, The ASTRONET Infrastructure
Roadmap
Autio, E., Bianchi-Streit, M. & Hameri, A.-P. 2003,
Technology Transfer and Technological Learning
through CERN’s procurement activity, CERN
Baade, D., Giraud, E., Gitton, P., Glaves, P., Gojak,
D., Mathys. G., Rojas, R., Storm, J. & Wallander,
A. 1994, Re-invigorating the NTT as a New
Technology Telescope, The ESO Messenger, 75
Babcock, H. W. 1953, The Possibility of Compensating
Astronomical Seeing, Publications of the
Astronomical Society of the Pacific, 65, 386
Balestra, A., Santin, P., Sedmak, G., Comin, M.,
Raffi, G. & Wallander, A. 1992, NTT Remote
Observing From Italy, The ESO Messenger, 69
Banse, K. 2003, The Munich Image Data Analysis
System, in Heck, A. (ed.), Information Handling
in Astronomy — Historical Vistas, Kluwer
Academic Publishers
Baranne, A., Queloz, D., Mayor, M., Adrianzyk, G.,
Knispel, G., Kohler, D., Lacroix, D., Meunier,
J.-P., Rimbaud, G. & Vin, A. 1996, ELODIE: A
spectrograph for accurate radial velocity measurements, Astronomy & Astrophysics Suppl. Ser.,
119, 373

519

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Danziger, J. & Bouchet, P. 2007, SN 1987A at
La Silla: The Early Days, The ESO Messenger,
127
Dekker, H. 2009, Evolution of Optical Spectrograph
Design at ESO, The ESO Messenger, 136
Dekker, H. & D’Odorico, S. 1992, UVES, the
UV-Visual Echelle Spectrograph for the VLT, The
ESO Messenger, 70
Dickmann, S. 1989, Adaptive Optics shown on French
telescope, Nature, 341
Dierickx, P. & Ansorge, W. 1992, Mirror Container
and VLT 8.2-m Dummy Mirror Arrive at
REOSC Plant, The ESO Messenger, 68
Dierickx, P. 1993, Manufacturing of the 8.2-m
Zerodur Blanks for the VLT Primary Mirrors —
a Progress Report, The ESO Messenger, 71
Dierickx, P. & Zigmann, F. 1991, Aluminium Mirror
Technology at ESO: Positive Results Obtained
with 1.8-m Test Mirrors, The ESO Messenger, 65
D’Odorico, S. 1997 A Deep Field with the Upgraded
NTT, The ESO Messenger, 90
D’Odorico, S., Enard, D., Lizon, J.-L., Ljung, B.,
Nees, W. & Ponz, D. 1983, The ESO Echelle
Spectrograph for the Cassegrain Focus of the 3.6-m
Telescope, The ESO Messenger, 33
D’Odorico, S., Beckers, J. & Moorwood, A. 1991, A
Progress Report on the VLT Instrumentation
Plan, The ESO Messenger, 65
D’Onofrio, M. & Carlo Burigana, C. (eds.) 2009:
Massimo Capaccioli in Questions of Modern
Cosmology — Galileo’s legacy, Springer Verlag.
Duffner, R. W. 2009, The Adaptive Optics Revolution,
University of New Mexico Press
Dürbeck, H. W., Osterbrock, D. E., Barrera, L. H. &
Leiva, R. 1999, Halfway from La Silla to P
­ aranal
— in 1909, The ESO Messenger, 95
Ebersberger, J. & Weigelt, G. 1978, Speckle
Interferometry and Speckle Holography with the
1.5 m and 3.6 m ESO Telescopes, The ESO
Messenger, 18
Edvardsson, B., Andersen, J., Gustafsson, B.,
Lambert, D. L., Nissen, P. E. & Tomkin, J. 1993,
The Chemical Evolution of the Galactic Disk,
Astronomy & Astrophysics, 275, 101
Enard, D. 1987, The VLT — Genesis of a Project, The
ESO Messenger, 50
Enard, D. 2002, The early days of instrumentation at
ESO, The ESO Messenger, 109
ESO/Government of Chile Joint Committee for the
Development of Astronomy 2006, 10 Years
Exploring the Universe

Schmutzer, R., Schoenmaker, T., Schreiber, J.,
Ströbele, S., Szeifert, T., Tacconi, L., Tecza, M.,
Thatte, N., Tordo, S., van der Werf, P. & Weisz,
H. 2004, First Light of SINFONI at the VLT,
The ESO Messenger, 117
Bonnet, H., Bauvir, B., Wallander, A., Cantzler, M.,
Carstens, J., Caruso, F., Di Lieto, N., Guisard, S.,
Haguenauer, P., Housen, N., Mornhinweg, M.,
Nicoud, J.-L., Ramirez, A., Sahlmann, J.,
Vasisht, G., Wehner, S. & Zagal, J. 2006,
Enabling Fringe Tracking at the VLTI, The ESO
Messenger, 126
Booth, R. 1994, A Southern Hemisphere Millimetre
Array, in Ishiguro, M. and Welch, W. J. (eds.),
Astronomy with Millimeter and Submillimeter
Wave Interferometry, ASP Conference series
Booth, R., Johansson, L. E. B. & Shaver, P. 1989,
SEST — the First Year of Operation, The ESO
Messenger, 57
Brand, J. 1982, The Atmospheric Transmission at
La Silla at 230 GHz, The ESO Messenger, 2,
Breysacher, J. 1988, Some Statistics about Observing
Time Distribution on ESO Telescopes, The ESO
Messenger, 51
Breysacher, J. & Tarenghi, M. 1991, Flexible
Scheduling at the NTT, a New Approach to
Astronomical Observations, The ESO Messenger,
63
Brown, M. 1987, European Telescope Will Be Biggest,
New York Times, December 22nd
Burrows, C. 2012, private communication with the
author and STScI News Release 1996-02: Disk
around Star May Be Warped by Unseen Planet
Calder, N. 1980, The Comet Is Coming, BBC
Cayrel, R., Spite, F., Spite, M., Hill, V., Primas, F.,
Andersen, J., Nordström, B., Beers, T. C.,
Bonifacio, P., Molaro, P., Plez, B. & Barbuy, B.
2001, Measurement of stellar age from uranium
decay, Nature, 409, 691
Chaisson, E. 1994, The Hubble Wars: Astrophysics
Meets Astropolitics in the Two-Billion-Dollar
Struggle Over the Hubble Space Telescope
Harvard University Press
Chauvin, G., Lagrange, A. M., Dumas, C.,
Zuckerman, B., Mouillet, D., Song, I., Beuzit,
J.-L., Lowrance, P. 2004, A Giant Planet
Candidate near a Young Brown Dwarf,
Astronomy & Astrophysics, 425, L29
Chauvin, G., Lagrange, A.M., Dumas, C.,
Zuckerman, B., Mouillet, D., Song, I., Beuzit,
J.-L. & Lowrance, P. 2004, Giant Planet
Companion to 2MASSW J1207334-393254,
Astronomy & Astrophysics, 425, L29

520

References

Ettlinger, E., Giordano, P. & Schneermann, M. 1999,
Performance of the VLT Coating Unit, The ESO
Messenger, 97
Fehrenbach, C. 1981, The First Steps of the European
Organization, The ESO Messenger, 24
Finnish Ministry of Education (Opetusministeriön)
1999, Tähtitieteen Suurhankkeet — Työrihmien
Musitio, 8, 1999
Fischer, R. & Walsh, J. 2009, An Extension for ESO
Headquarters, The ESO Messenger, 135
Flensted Jensen, M. 2002, Deputy Chairman, The
Expert Group on the establishment of a European
Research Council, private conversation with the
author
Fosbury, R. A. E. & Albrecht, R. 2002, The Space
Telescope — European Coordinating Facility, The
STScI Newsletter, 19, 3
Foy, R. & Labeyrie, A. 1985, Feasibility of adaptive
telescope with laser probe, Astronomy &
Astrophysics, 152, 2
Franchini, M., Molaro, P., Nonino, M., Pasian, F.,
Ramella, M., Vladilo, G., Centurion, M. &
Bonifacio, P. 1992, ‘Remote’ Science with the
NTT from Italy — Preliminary Scientific Results,
The ESO Messenger, 69
Fransson, C., Gilmozzi, R., Gröningsson, P.,
Hanuschik, R., Kjär, K., Leibundgut, B. &
Spyromilio, J. 2007, Twenty Years of Supernova
1987A, The ESO Messenger, 127
Fusco, T. & Rousset, G. 2009, NAOS-CONICA
(a.k.a NACO) for the VLT, Celebration meeting
on the occasion of 20 years of AO at ESO,
November 2009
Gehrels, N. 2005, A short gamma-ray burst apparently associated with an elliptical galaxy at redshift z = 0.225, Nature 437, 851
Gehring, G. & Rigaut, F. 1991, New Year’s Eve with
Adaptive Optics, The ESO Messenger, 63
Giacconi, R. 2008, Secrets From The Hoary Deep — A
Personal History of Modern Astronomy, Johns
Hopkins University Press, Baltimore, MD, USA
Gillessen, S., Eisenhauer, F., Trippe, S., Alexander, T.,
Genzel, R., Martins, F. & Ott, T. 2009,
Monitoring stellar orbits around the Massive
Black Hole in the Galactic Center, Astrophysical
Journal, 692, 1075
Gillessen, S., Eisenhauer, F., Perrin, G., Brandner, W.,
Straubmeier, C., Perraut, K., Amorim, A.,
Schöller, M., Araujo-Hauck, C., Bartko, H.,
Baumeister, H., Berger, J.P., Carvas, P., Cassaing,
F., Chapron, F., Choquet, E., Clenet, Y., Collin,
C., Eckart, A., Fedou, P., Fischer, S., Gendron,
E., Genzel, R., Gitton, P., Gonte, F., Gräter, A.,

Haguenauer, P., Haug, M., Haubois, X.,
Henning, T., Hippler, S., Hofmann, R., Jocou,
L., Kellner, S., Kervella, P., Klein, R.,
Kudryavtseva, N., Lacour, S., Lapeyrere, V.,
Laun, W., Lena, P., Lenzen, R., Lima, J., Moch,
D., Moratschke, D., Moulin, T., Naranjo, V.,
Neumann, U., Nolot, A., Paumard, T., Pfuhl,
O., Rabien, S., Ramos, J., Rees, J. M., Rohloff, R.
R., Rouan, D., Rousset, G., Sevin, A., Thiel, M.,
Wagner, K., Wiest, M., Yazici, S. & Ziegler, D.
2010, GRAVITY: a four-telescope beam combiner
instrument for the VLTI, SPIE
Gilliotte, A. 1992, Fine Telescope Image Analysis at
La Silla, The ESO Messenger, 68
Gilliotte, A., Ihle, G. & Lo Curto, G. 2005,
Improvements at the 3.6-m Telescope, The ESO
Messenger, 119
Gilmozzi, R. 2006, Giant Telescopes of the Future,
Scientific American, May 2006
Gilmozzi, R. & Spyromilio, J. 2007, The European
Extremely Large Telescope (E-ELT), The ESO
Messenger, 127
Glindemann, A., Bauvir, B., Delplancke, F., Derie, F;
di Folco, E., Gennai, A., Gitton, P., Housen, N.,
Huxley, A., Kervella, P., Koehler, B., Lévêque, S.,
Longinotti, A., Ménardi, S., Morel, S., Paresce,
F., Phan Duc, T., Richichi, A., Schöller, M.,
Tarenghi, M. & Wallander, A. 2001, Light at the
end of the tunnel — First Fringes with the VLTI,
The ESO Messenger, 104
Gray, P. M. 2000, Assembly and Integration to First
Light of the Four VLT Telescopes, in Telescope
Structures, Enclosures, Controls, Assembly/
Integration/Validation, and Commissioning,
Proceedings of SPIE, 4004
Gregory, J. & Miller S. 1998, Science in Public:
Communication, Culture and Credibility, Basic
Books
Grenon, M. 1990, The Northern Chile Climate and
its Evolution — A Pluridisciplinary Approach to
the VLT Site Selection, The ESO Messenger, 61
Grewing, M. & Guilloteau, S. 1997, The LSA Study,
IRAM Newsletter 32
Grosbøl, P. & Biereichel, P. 2003, IHAP — Image
Processing and Handling, in Heck, A (ed.),
Information Handling in Astronomy —
Historical Vistas, Kluwer Academic Publishers
Grothkopf, U. 2010, ESO publication statistics, as per
March 2010
Gouiffes, C., Wampler, E. J., Baade, D. & Wang, L. F.
1989, NTT Images of SN 1987A, The ESO
Messenger, 58

521

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Krügel, E. & Schulz, A. 1985, Submillimetre
Spectroscopy at La Silla, The ESO Messenger, 40
Kuijken, K., Bender, R., Cappellaro, E., Muschielok,
B., Baruffolo, A., Cascone, E., Iwert, O., Mitsch,
W., Nicklas, H., Valentijn, E. A., Baade, D.,
Begeman, K. G., Bortolussi, A., Boxhoorn, D.,
Christen, F., Deul, E. R., Geimer, C., Greggio,
L., Harke, R., Häfner, R., Hess, G., Hess, H. J.,
Hopp, U., Ilijevski, I., Klink, G., Kravcar, H.,
Lizon, J. L., Magagna, C. E., Müller, P. H.,
Niemeczek, R., De Pizzol, L., Poschmann, H.,
Reif, K., Rengelink, R., Reyes, J., Silber, A. &
Wellem, W. 2002, OmegaCAM: the 16k × 16k
CCD Camera for the VLT Survey Telescope, The
ESO Messenger, 110
Kurz, R. & Shaver, P. S. 1999, The ALMA Project,
The ESO Messenger, 96
Lagage, P. O., Pel, J. W., Authier, M., Belorgey, J.,
Claret, A., Doucet, C., Dubreuil, D., Durand,
G., Elswijk, E. E., Girardot, P., Käufl, H.-U.,
Kroes, G., Lortholary, M. M., Lussignol, Y.,
Marchesi, M., Pantin, E., Peletier, R. R., Pirard,
J. F., Pragt, J. J., Rio, Y., Schoenmaker, T.,
Siebenmorgen, R., Silber, A., Smette, A., Sterzik,
M. & Veyssiere, C. 2004, Successful
Commissioning of Visir: The Mid-Infrared VLT
Instrument, The ESO Messenger, 117
Lagrange, A.-M., Chauvin, G., Ehrenreich, D.,
Rousset, G., Charton, J., Rabou, P., Montri, J.,
Lacombe, F., Mouillet, D., Gratadour, G.,
Rouan, D., Gendron, E., Fusco, T., Mugnier, L.
& Allard, F. 2008, A probable giant planet
imaged in the β Pictoris disk. VLT/NACO Deep
L-band imaging, Astronomy & Astrophysics,
493, L21
Lauberts, A. 1982, The ESO/Uppsala Survey of the
ESO (B) Atlas, ESO
Laustsen, S. 1974, Introduction, in Richter, W.,
Plathner, D., Roozefeld, J. F. and van der Ven, J:
The Mechanical Design of the 3.6-m Telescope,
ESO Technical Report 1
Laustsen, S. 1977, Progress Report 3.6-m Telescope
(1977), The ESO Messenger, 9
Laustsen, S. 2002, How ESO got its Optics Group, The
ESO Messenger, 109
Laustsen, S., Madsen, C. & West, R. 1987, Exploring
the Southern Sky, Springer Verlag
Leibundgut, B., Spyromillo, J., Walsh, J., Schmidt, B.
P., Phillips, M. M., Suntzeff, N. B., Hamuy, M.,
Schommer, R. A., Aviles, R., Kirshner, R. P.,
Riess, A., Challis, P., Garnavich, P., Stubbs, C.,
Hogan, C., Dressler, A. & Ciaroullo, R. 1995,

Guicharrousse, I. Científico se alimentó sólo con agua y
barro, El Mercurio, 1 August 1987.
Hardy, J. W. 1994, Adaptive Optics, Scientific
American, 270
Harwit, M, 1981: Cosmic Discovery: The Search,
Scope, and Heritage of Astronomy, MW Books
Heckman, O. 1976, Sterne, Kosmos, Weltmodelle, R.
Pieper & Co Verlag, Munich Zurich
Hjort, J., Watson, D., Fynbo, J. P. U., Price, P. A.,
Jensen, B. L., Jørgensen, U. G., Kubas, D.,
Gorosabel, J., Jakobsson, P., Sollerman, J.,
Pedersen, K. & Kouveliotou, C. 2005, The optical afterglow of the short gamma-ray burst GRB
050709, Nature, 437, 859
Hosfeld, R. 1954, Comparisons of Stellar Scintillation
with Image Motion, Journal of the Optical
Society of America, 44, 4
Ihle, G. 1995, The Last Trip of the ESO GPO, The
ESO Messenger, 81
Ihle, G., Montano, N. & Tamai, R. 2007, The 3.6-m
Dome: 30 Years After, The ESO Messenger, 129
Käufl, H.-U., Jouan, R., Lagage, P. O., Masse, P.,
Mestreau, P. & Tarrius, A. 1992, TIMMI at the
3.6-m Telescope, The ESO Messenger, 70
Käufl, H.-U. 1993, Ground-Based Astronomy in the
10 and 20 µm Atmospheric Windows at ESO —
Scientific Potential at Present and in the Future,
The ESO Messenger, 73
Käufl, H.-U. 1994, N-Band Long-Slit Grism
Spectroscopy with TIMMI at the 3.6-m Telescope,
The ESO Messenger, 78
Käufl, H.-U., Ageorges, N., Dietzsch, E., Hron, J.,
Relke, H., Scholz, D., Silber, A., Sperl, M.,
Sterzik, M., Wagner, R. & Weilenmann, U.
2000, First Astronomical Light with TIMMI2,
ESO’s 2nd-Generation Thermal Infrared
Multimode Instrument at the La Silla 3.6-m
Telescope, The ESO Messenger, 102
Kjär, K. 2000, About the ESO Messenger, The ESO
Messenger, 100
Koehler, B. 1998, ESO and AMOS Signed Contract
for the VLTI Auxiliary Telescopes, The ESO
Messenger, 93
Krige, J. & Guzetti, L. (eds.) 1995, History of
European Scientific and Technological
Cooperation, Conference in Florence,
Proceedings, European Commission, Brussels,
Belgium
Krige, J. 2005, Isidor I Rabi and CERN, School of
History, Technology & Society, Georgia
Institute of Technology, Atlanta, GA, USA,
Phys. Perspect., 7

522

References

Discovery of a Supernova (SN 1995K) at a
Redshift of 0.478, The ESO Messenger, 81
Léna, P. 2008, The Early Days of the VLTI, in
Richichi, A., Paresce, F. & Chelli, A. (eds.): The
Power of Optical/IR Interferometry: Recent
Scientific Results and 2nd Generation
Instrumentation, Proceedings of the ESO
Workshop held in Garching, April 4-8 2005,
Springer
Léna, P. 2012, private communication with the
author
Leroy, E. 1975, Avanti for the Telescope, The ESO
Messenger, 3
Madsen, C. 1993, Das Größte Teleskop der Welt —
Konzept und Videodokumentation eines ehrgeizigen europäischen Technologieprojektes, in
Lehmann, R. G. (ed.): Corporate Media —
Handbuch der Audiovisuellen und multimedialen Lösungen und Instrumente, Verlag
Moderne Industrie
Madsen, C. 2006, Science on Stage — Towards a
Rejuvenated Science Teaching in Europe,
Proceedings, the 9th International Conference
on Public Communication of Science and
Technology, Seoul, Korea
Madsen, C. 2010, Scientific Europe: Policies and
Politics of the European Research Area,
Multiscience, UK
Maitzen, H. M. & Hron, J. 2008, Die
Universitätssternwarte Wien — Pflanzstätte des
Österrechischen ESO Beitritts, Communications
in Astroseismology, 149
Marcaide, J. 2011, private communication with the
author
Mattila, K., Hämen-Antilla, A., Kajantie, K. &
Valtonen, M. 1982, Tähtitieteen asema Soumessa
ja Soumen mahdollisuudet Osallistua kansainvällisiin tähtitieteen Hankkeisiin
Mattila, K., Tornikoski, M., Tuominen, I. &
Valtaoja, E. 2004, Astronomy in Finland, The
ESO Messenger, 117
Mayor, M. 2012, private communication with the
author
Mayor, M. & Queloz, D. 1995, A Jupiter-mass companion to a solar-type star, Nature, 378
McCray, W. P. 2004, Giant Telescopes: Astronomical
Ambition and the Promise of Technology,
Harvard University Press
McMullan, D. & Powell, R. 1977, The electronographic camera, New Scientist, 73, 1044
Mehra, J. 1973, The Physicist’s Conception of Nature,
Reidel, Dordrecht, 1973.

Mellier, Y., Maoli, R., Van Waerbeke, L., Schneider,
P., Jain, B., Erben, T., Bernardeau, F., Fort, B.,
Bertin, E. & Dantel-Fort, M. 2000, Cosmic
Shear with Antu/FORS1: An Optimal Use of
Service Mode Observation, The ESO Messenger,
101
Merkle, F., Kern, P., Lena, P., Rigaut, F., Fontanella,
J. C., Rousset, G., Boyer, C., Gaffard, J. P. &
Jagourel, P. 1989, Successful Tests of Adaptive
Optics, The ESO Messenger, 58
Menten, K. 2009, Leo Brandt: Pionier der
Funkmesstechnik und Initiator der
Radioastronomie in Deutschland, in
Mittermaier, B. & Rusinek, B. A. (eds.): Leo
Brandt (1908–1971) Ingenieur —
Wissenschaftsförderer — Visionär, Proceedings,
Scientific Conference on the occasion of the
100th anniversary of the NorthrineWestphalian Science politician and founder of
the Forschungszentrum Jülich,
Forschungszentrum Jülich
Monnier, J. D. 2003, Optical Interferometry in
Astronomy, Reports on Progress in Physics 66,
Institute of Physics
Morian, H. 2003, Tiefer Blick ins All, Schott Info, 1
Moorwood, A., Cuby, J.-G. & Lidman, C. 1998,
SOFI Sees First Light at the NTT, The ESO
Messenger, 91
Moorwood, A. F. M. 2003, CRIRES Takes Shape,
The ESO Messenger, 114
Moorwood, A. F. M. 2009, 30 Years of Infrared
Instrumentation at Eso: Some Personal
Recollections, The ESO Messenger, 136
Murtagh, F. & Fendt, M. 1994, The SL-9/ESO Web
Encounter, The ESO Messenger, 77
Muñoz, H. 2008, The Dictator’s Shadow, Basic Books
Müller, R., Höness, H., Espiard, J., Paseri, J. &
Dierickx, P. 1993, The 8.2-m Primary Mirrors of
the VLT, The ESO Messenger, 73
NASA 1998, Hubble Takes First Image of a Possible
Planet around Another Star and Finds a
Runaway World, NASA Release, 98-91
National Science Foundation 2006, From the Ground
Up: Balancing the NSF Astronomy Program —
Report of the National Science Foundation,
Division of Astronomical Sciences, Senior
Review Committee
Neufeld, D. A., Schilke, P., Menten, K. M., Wolfire,
M. G., Black, J. H., Schuller, F., Müller, H. S. P.,
Thorwirth, S., Güsten, R. & Philipp, S. 2006,
Discovery of interstellar CF+, Astronomy &
Astrophysics, 454, L37

523

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Quirrenbach, A. 2000, Adaptive Optics with Laser
Guide Stars: Basic Concepts and Limitations; in
Ageorges, N. and Dainty, J. C. (eds.): Laser guide
star adaptive optics for astronomy, North
Atlantic Treaty Organization, Scientific Affairs
Division and Springer
Reimers, D. & Wisotzki, L. 1997, Highlights From
The Key Programme: ‘A Wide-Angle Objective
Prism Survey For Bright Quasars’ — The
Hamburg/ESO Survey, The ESO Messenger, 88
Reipurth, B. 1995, Astronomers in Chile Meet at ESO
in Vitacura, The ESO Messenger, 80
Reipurth, B. 2010, private communication
Reipurth, B. & Madsen, C. 1989, Signposts of Low
Mass Star Formation in Molecular Clouds, The
ESO Messenger, 55
Richichi, A. & Moorwood, A. 2006, Secondgeneration VLTI Instruments: a First Step is
Made, The ESO Messenger, 125
Richter, W. 1976, On the Vertical Support of
Astronomical Research in Cassegrain Cages, The
ESO Messenger, 6
Richter, W. 1978, Mechanical Constraints on Large
Telescopes, in Pacini, F., Richter, W. & Wilson,
R. N. (eds.) 1978, ESO Conference on Optical
Teescopes of the Future, Geneva, 12–15
December, 1977
Riess, A. G., Filippenko, A. V., Challis, P.,
Clocchiatti, A., Diercks, A., Garnavich, P. M.,
Gilliland, R. L., Hogan, C. J., Jha, S., Kirshner,
R. P., Leibundgut, B., Phillips, M. M., Reiss, D.,
Schmidt, B. P., Schommer, R. A., Smith, R. C.,
Spyromilio, J. & Stubbs, C. 1998, Observational
Evidence from Supernovae for an Accelerating
Universe and a Cosmological Constant, The
Astronomical Journal, 116, 1009
Roddier, F. & Sarazin, M. 1990, The ESO differential
image motion monitor, Astronomy &
Astrophysics, 227
Rule, B. H. & Sisson, G. M. 1965, Types of Mounting,
in Crawford, D. L. (ed.), The Construction of
Large Telescopes, Proceedings from Symposium
no. 27 held in Tucson, Arizona, Pasadena and
Mount Hamilton, California, USA, 5–12 April
1965, International Astronomical Union —
Symposium no. 27, Academic Press, London
Rupprecht, G., Böhnhardt, H., Moehler, S., Møller,
P., Saviane, I. & Ziegler, B. 2010, Twenty Years of
FORS Science Operations on the VLT, The ESO
Messenger, 140
Sack, M. 1980, Det Ding muß sich drehn — Die
astralen Zwillinge von München-Garching, Die
Zeit

Nilson, P. 1971, The Uppsala General Catalogue of
Galaxies, Presented to the Royal Society of
Science of Uppsala
Nordström, B., Mayor, M., Andersen, J., Holmberg,
J., Pont, F., Jørgensen, B. F., Olsen, E. H., Udry,
S. & Mowlavi, N. 2004, The Geneva-Copenhagen
survey of the Solar neighbourhood — Ages, metallicities, and kinematic properties of ~14 000 F
and G dwarfs, Astronomy & Astrophysics, 418, 3
Nordström, B., Mayor, M., Andersen, J., Holmberg,
J., Pont, F., Jørgensen, B. F., Olsen, E. H., Udry,
S. & Mowlavi, N. 2004b, A Livelier Picture of the
Solar Neighbourhood, The ESO Messenger, 118
Otárola, A., Delgado, G., Booth, R., Belitsky, V.,
Urbain, D., Radford, S., Hofstadt, D., Nyman,
L. Å., Shaver, P. & Hills, R. 1998, European Site
Testing at Chajnantor: a StepTowards the Large
Southern Array, The ESO Messenger, 94
Palouš, J. 2009, Česká republika v Evropské jižní
observatory, Cs. cas. fyz., Vol. 59, No. 5, FZÚ
AV ČR v.v.i
Pasachoff, J. 1979, Astronomy: From the Earth to the
Universe, Saunders College Publishing
Pasquini, L., Avila, G., Blecha, A., Cacciari, C.,
Cayatte, V., Colless, M., Damiani, F., de Propris,
R., Dekker, H., di Marcantonio, P., Farrell, T.,
Gillingham, P., Guinouard, I., Hammer, F.,
Kaufer, A., Hill, V., Marteaud, M., Modigliani,
A., Mulas, G., North, P., Popovic, D., Rossetti,
E., Royer, F., Santin, P., Schmutzer, R., Simond,
G., Vola, P., Waller, L. & Zoccali, M. 2002,
Installation and Commissioning of FLAMES, the
VLT Multifibre Facility, The ESO Messenger,
110
Pasquini, L., Bonifacio, P., Randich, S., Galli, D. &
Gratton, R. G. 2004, Be in turn-off stars of
NGC 6397: early Galaxy spallation, cosmo­
chronology and cluster formation, Astronomy
& Astrophysics, 426, 2
Pedersen, H. & Cullum, M. 1982, The CCD on
La Silla, The ESO Messenger, 30
Pedersen, H., Rigaut, F. & Sarazin, M. 1988, Seeing
Measurements with a Differential Image Motion
Monitor, The ESO Messenger, 53
Pedersen, H., Lindgren, H. & de Bon, C. 1991, The
Vaca Muerta Mesosiderite, The ESO Messenger,
65
Peterson, B. A., D’Odorico, S., Tarenghi, M. &
Wampler, E. J. 1991, The NTT Provides the
Deepest Look Into Space, The ESO Messenger, 64
Physics World: Boost for UK physics, 13 May 1999
Plathner, D. 1976, The 3.6-m Telescope on La Silla,
The ESO Messenger, 5

524

References

Sarazin, M. 1986, Seeing at La Silla: LASSCA 86,
The ESO Messenger, 44
Sarazin, M. 1988, Site Evaluation for the VLT: Seeing
Monitor No. 2 Tested in Garching, The ESO
Messenger, 52
Sarazin, M. 1992, PARSCA 92: The ­Paranal Seeing
Campaign, The ESO Messenger, 68
Saviane, I., Ihle, G., Sterzik, M. & Kaufer, A. 2009,
La Silla 2010+, The ESO Messenger, 136
Schilling, G. & Christensen, L. L. 2009, Eyes on the
Skies — 400 years of telescopic discovery, Wiley
VCH
Schmidt-Kaler, T. & Dachs, J. 1968, The 61 cm
Photometric Telescope of the Bochum University
at La Silla, The ESO Bulletin, 5
Schramm, J. 1996, 2010, Sterne über Hamburg —
Die Geschichte der Astronomie in Hamburg,
Kultur und Geschichtskontor Bergedorf
Setti, G., Ulrich, M.-H., Dias de Deus, J. & Lago, T.
1988, On the Situation of Astronomy in Portugal,
Report by JNICT to the Portuguese
Government and to ESO
Shaver, P. A. 1989, VLT Operations — a First
Discussion, The ESO Messenger, 57
Shaver, P. A. & Booth, R. S. 1991, A Report on the
SEST Users Meeting and Workshop on
Millimetre-Wave Interferometry, 22-23 May
1991, The ESO Messenger, 65
Shaver, P. A. & Booth, R. S. 1998, The Large
Southern Array, The ESO Messenger, 91
Shustov, B. 2010, Private communication with the
author.
Srianand, R., Chand, H., Petitjean, P. & Aracil, B.
2004, Limits on the time variation of the electromagnetic fine-structure constant in the low energy
limit from absorption lines in the spectra of distant
quasars, Physical Review Letters, 92:121302
Srianand, R., Noterdaeme, P., Ledoux, C. &
Petitjean, P. 2008, First detection of CO in a
high-redshift damped Lyman-alpha system,
Astronomy & Astrophysics, 482, L39
Stock, J. 1968, Astronomical observing conditions in
Northern Chile, The ESO Bulletin, 5
Soucail, G., Mellier, Y., Fort, B., Mathez, G. &
Cailloux, M. 1988, The giant arc in A 370: spectroscopic evidence for gravitational lensing from a
source at z = 0.724, Astronomy & Astrophysics,
191, LI9
Surdej, J., Swings, J.-P., Magain, P., Courvoisier, T.
J.-L., Kuhr, H., Refsdal, S., Borgeest, U., Kayser,
R. & Kellermann, K. 1987, A new case of gravitational lensing, Nature, 329, 695

Surdej, J., Arnaud, J., Borgeest, U., Djorgovski, S.,
Fleischmann, F., Hammer, F., Hursemekers, D.,
Kayser, R., Lefevre, O., Nottale, L., Magain, P.,
Meylan, G., Refsdal, S., Remy, M., Shaver, P.,
Smette, A., Swings, J.-P., Vanderriest, C., Van
Drome, E., Veron-Cetty, M., Veron, P. &
Weigelt, G. 1989, Profile of a Key Programme:
Gravitational Lensing, The ESO Messenger, 55
Tammann, G. A. 1995, The Role of ESO in European
Astronomy, in Krige, J. & Guzetti, L. (eds.):
History of European Scientific and Technological
Cooperation, Conference in Florence, November
1995, Proceedings, European Commission
Tammann, G. A. & Véron, P. 1985, Halley’s Komet,
Birkhäuser Verlag
Tanvir, N. R., Fox, D. B., Levan, A. J., Berger, E.,
Wiersema, K., Fynbo, J. P. U., Cucchiara, A.,
Krühlers, T., Hjorth, J., Jakobsson, P., Gehrels,
N., Bloom, J. S., Greiner, J., Evans, P., Rol, E.,
Olivares, F., Farihi, J., Willingale, R., Starling,
R. L. C., Cenko, S. B., Perley, D., Maund, J. R.,
Duke, J., Wijers, R. A. M. J., Adamson, A. J.,
Allan, A., Bremer, M. N., Burrows, D. N.,
Castro-Tirado, A. J., Cavanagh, B., de Ugarte
Postigo, A., Dopita, M. A., Fatkhullin, T. A.,
Fruchter, A. S., Foley, R. J., Gorosabel, J.,
Holland, S. T., Kennea, J., Kerr, T., Klose, S.,
Krimm, H. A., Komarova, V. N., Kulkarni, S.
R., Moskvitin, A. S., Mundell, C., Naylor, T.,
Page, K., Penprase, B. E., Perri, M.,
Podsiadlowski, P., Roth, K., Rutledge, R. E.,
Sakamoto, T., Schady, P., Schmidt, B. P.,
Soderberg, A. M., Sollerman, J., Stephens, A. W.,
Stratta, G., Ukwatta, T., Watson, D., Westra, E.,
Wold, T. & Wolf, C. 2009, A γ-ray burst at a redshift of z ≈ 8.2, Nature, 461, 1254
Tarenghi, M., Gray, P., Spyromilio, J. & Gilmozzi, R.
1998, The First Steps of UT1, The ESO
Messenger, 93
Tarenghi, M. 2010, Private communication with the
author
UK Government 1998, Modern Public Services for
Britain: Investing in Reform — Comprehensive
Spending Review: New Public Spending Plans
1999–2002
van Belle, G., Sahlmann, J., Abuter, R., Accardo, M.,
Andolfato, L., Brillant, S., de Jong, J., Derie, F.,
Delplancke, F., Phan Duc, T., Dupuy, C., Gilli,
B., Gitton, P., Haguenauer, P., Jocou, L., Jost, A.,
Di Lieto, N., Frahm, R., Mébardi, S., Morel, S.,
Moresmau, J.-M., Palsa, R., Popovic, D., Pozna,
E., Puech, F., Lévêque, S., Ramirez, A., Schuhler,

525

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Wilson, R. N. 1996, Reflecting telescope optics I: basic
design theory and its historical development,
Springer
Wilson, R. N. 1999, Reflecting telescope optics II: basic
design theory and its historical development,
Springer
Wilson, R. N. 2002, First Astronomical Light at the
NTT, The ESO Messenger, 109
Wilson, R. N. 2003, The History and Development of
the ESO Active Optics System, The ESO
Messenger, 113
Wilson, R. N. 2010, Private communication with the
author
Wilson, R. N. 2012, Private communication with the
author
Wilson, R. N., Franza, F., Giordano, P., Noethe, L. &
Tarenghi, M. 1988, Active Optics: the NTT and
the Future, The ESO Messenger, 53
Woltjer, L. 1977, The Case for Large Optical
Telescopes, in Pacini, F., Richter, W. & Wilson,
R. N. (eds.) 1977, Optical Telescopes of the
Future, Proceedings ESO Conference Geneva,
December 12th-15th 1977
Woltjer, L. 1991, The ‘Discovery’ of P
­ aranal, The ESO
Messenger, 64
Woltjer, L. 2006, Europe’s Quest for the Universe,
EDP Sciences, Paris
Zago, L. 1992, The Choice of the Telescope Enclosures
for the VLT, The ESO Messenger, 70

N., Somboli, F. & Wehner, S. 2008, The VLTI
PRIMA facility, The ESO Messenger, 134
van Boekel, R., Min, M., Leinert, C., Waters, L. B. F.
M., Richichi, A., Chesneau, O., Dominik, C.,
Jaffe, W., Dutrey, A., Graser, U., Henning, T., de
Jong, J., Köhler, R., de Koter, A., Lopez, B.,
Malbet, F., Morel, S., Paresce, F., Perrin, G.,
Preibisch, T., Przygodda, F., Schöller, M. &
Wittkowski, M. 2004, The building blocks of
planets within the ‘terrestrial’ region of protoplanetary disks, Nature, 432, 479
van der Kruit, P. 2012, private communication with
the author
van der Laan, H. 1988, Key Programmes on La Silla:
a Preliminary Enquiry, The ESO Messenger, 51
van der Laan, H. 1989, The New Research Student
Programme of the European Southern
Observatory, The ESO Messenger, 55
Véron, P. 1981, The Inauguration of the ESO
Headquarters Building at Garching, The ESO
Messenger, 24
von der Lühe, O., Bonaccini, D., Derie, F., Koehler,
B., Lévêque, S., Manil, E., Michel, A. & Verola,
M. 1997, A New Plan for the VLTI, The ESO
Messenger, 87
von der Lühe, O., Berkefeld, T. & Soltau, D. 2005,
Multi-conjugate solar adaptive optics at the
Vacuum Tower Telescope on Tenerife, Comptes
Rendus — Physique, 6, 10
Vreeswijk, P. M., Kaufer, A., Spyromilio, J.,
Schmutzer, R., Ledoux, C., Smette, A. & De
Cia, A. 2010, The VLT Rapid-Response Mode:
implementation and scientific results, SPIE
Conference
West, R. M. 1974, The Southern Sky Surveys — A
review of the ESO Sky Survey Project, The ESO
Bulletin, 10
West, R. M. 1983, Comets — Distant and Nearby,
The ESO Messenger, 32
West, R. M. 1985, Comet Halley Observed at ESO,
The ESO Messenger, 41
West, R. M. 1994, Comet Shoemaker-Levy 9 Collides
with Jupiter — The Continuation of a Unique
Experience, The ESO Messenger, 77
West, R. M. 2002, Memories of early times at ESO,
The ESO Messenger, 109
Wheeler, J. C. 2007, Cosmic Catastrophes: Exploding
Stars, Black Holes, and Mapping the Universe,
Cambridge University Press
Wilson, R. N. 1990, Spherical Aberration in the HST:
Optical Analysis of the Options Available

526

Appendices

Appendix 1

Important Milestones
Important milestones during the period covered in Part I
June 1953 — First discussions about a shared
European observatory between Walter Baade
and Jan Oort. Immediately thereafter, the subject is further discussed at the IAU Symposium
No. 1 in Groningen.

17 April 1964 — The Chilean Congress ratifies the
Chile/ESO Agreement.

26 January 1954 — The Leiden Declaration by leading astronomers from six European countries
formally proposes that a joint European observatory be established in the southern hemisphere.

30 October 1964 — Acquisition of La Silla and
land for the ESO Santiago Office in the Vitacura
district.

26 May 1964 — The ESO Council selects La Silla as
the site for its observatory.

March 1965 — ESO acquires a guesthouse in the
Las Condes district of Santiago.

December 1955 — Site testing begins in South Africa
to identify the best location for the ESO observatory.

March 1965 — Construction of the La Silla
Observatory begins.

5 October 1962 — Founding Members Belgium,
France, Germany, the Netherlands and Sweden
sign the ESO Convention at a ceremony in Paris.

24 March 1966 — Dedication ceremony for the road
to the summit of La Silla.
30 November 1966 — First light for the ESO
1-metre telescope at La Silla, the first telescope at
the observatory.

1 November 1962 — Otto Heckmann becomes the
first Director (General) of ESO, and provisional
ESO offices are set up at the Hamburger
Sternwarte.

January 1967 — Construction of the ESO Santiago
Office begins.

November 1962 — Site testing in Chile begins.

24 August 1967 — Denmark formally joins ESO as
its 6th Member State.

7 November 1963 — Chile is selected to host the
ESO observatory and the Agreement between
Chile and ESO (the “Convenio”) is signed.

2 October 1967 — Belgium, a founding member,
­ratifies the ESO Convention and thus formally
joins the organisation.

15 November 1963 — Decision to establish the ESO
Santiago office.

July 1968 — First light for the GPO at La Silla.

17 January 1964 — The ESO Convention enters into
force following parliamentary ratification by
France, Germany, the Netherlands and Sweden.

July 1968 — First light for the ESO 1.52-metre
telescope.

5 February 1964 — The ESO Council approves the
Chile/ESO Agreement.

7 September 1968 — First light for the Bochum
0.6-metre telescope.

529

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

December 1968 — ESO helps found the journal
Astronomy and Astrophysics.

2 October 1978 — Construction of the new ESO
Headquarters in Garching begins.

February 1969 — First light for the Danish 0.5-metre
telescope.

20 November 1978 — First light for the Danish
1.54-metre telescope.

25 March 1969 — Inauguration of the La Silla
Observatory by the President of the Republic of
Chile, Eduardo Frei Montalva, and of the ESO
Office in Santiago.

31 January 1979 — An agreement is signed between
ESO and the German Federal government as
host state for the new ESO Headquarters.
March 1979 — First light for the Dutch 0.9-metre
telescope.

1 January 1970 — Adriaan Blaauw takes over as
Director General of ESO.

8 August 1980 — First Light for the Swiss T70 telescope.

16 September 1970 — ESO signs an agreement with
CERN to collaborate on the realisation of the
ESO 3.6-metre telescope, enabling ESO to
establish offices at the CERN premises in
Geneva and draw on CERN staff.

24–27 March 1981 — ESO Conference on the
Scientific Importance of High Angular
Resolution at Infrared and Optical Wavelengths.
First milestone conference relating to large-scale
optical interferometry at ESO.

October 1970 — ESO’s Telescope Division is set up
at CERN.
December 1971 — First light for the ESO 0.5-metre
telescope.

5 May 1981 — First light of the 1.4-metre Coudé
Auxiliary Telescope (CAT), and its Coudé
Echelle Spectrometer (CES).

21 December 1971 — First light for the ESO 1-metre
Schmidt telescope.

5 May 1981 — Inauguration of the new ESO
Headquarters in Garching, Germany.

May 1974 — The first edition of The ESO Messenger,
ESO’s quarterly in-house magazine, is published.
1 January 1975 — Lodewijk Woltjer takes over as
Director General of ESO.
10 November 1975 — First Light of the Swiss
0.4-metre telescope.
2 December 1975 — The ESO Council approves the
proposal to locate ESO’s permanent
Headquarters building in Garching bei
München, Germany.
7 November 1976 — First light for the ESO
3.6-metre telescope.
12–15 December 1977 — Major ESO Conference at
CERN about future large telescopes leads to first
ideas about the VLT.
1978 — Completion of the initial Quick Blue Survey
of the southern sky, made with the 1-metre
Schmidt telescope.

530

Appendix 1 ∙ Important Milestones

Important milestones during the period covered in Part II
1 March 1982 — Switzerland formally joins ESO as
its 7th Member State.

24 March 1987 — First light for the 15-metre
Swedish–ESO Submillimetre Telescope (SEST).

24 May 1982 — Italy formally joins ESO as its 8th
Member State. The joining fees of Switzerland
and Italy are earmarked for the development
of the NTT, a testbed for VLT-relevant tech­
nologies.

8 December 1987 — Decision by the ESO Council
to build the Very Large Telescope (VLT).

23 February 1983 — Agreement between ESA
and ESO about the establishment of the Space
Telescope European Coordinating Facility
(ST-ECF) is signed.

July 1988 — First light of IRAC on the MPG/ESO
2.2-metre telescope.

1 January 1988 — Harry van der Laan takes over as
Director General of ESO.

October 1988 — The Chilean Government donates
the land around Cerro P
­ aranal to ESO.

16–19 May 1983 — Key meeting of European astronomers in Cargèse, Corsica, builds support for the
VLT array concept.

23 March 1989 — First light of the 3.5-metre New
Technology Telescope (NTT).

June 1983 — First Light of the Cassegrain Echelle
Spectrograph (CASPEC) at the ESO 3.6-metre
telescope.

11 May 1989 — First light of the second ESO Faint
Object Spectrograph and Camera (EFOSC2)
instrument on the NTT.

22 June 1983 — First light for the MPG/ESO
2.2-metre telescope.

16 April 1990 — First light of the Come-On instrument on the ESO 3.6-metre telescope.

1 March 1984 — ST-ECF begins operations at ESO
Garching.

4 December 1990 — Council approves Cerro
­Paranal as the site for the VLT.

June 1984 — First tests at ESO for remote control of
a telescope are carried out with the MPG/ESO
2.2-metre telescope.
November 1984 — First light of the f/35 chopping
secondary system and the infrared photometers
on the ESO 3.6-metre telescope.
November 1985 — First light of IRSPEC on the
ESO 3.6-metre telescope.
29 September–2 October 1986 — The European scientific community supports ESO plans for the
VLT at a major conference in Venice.
February 1987 — ESO plays a major role in the
observations of Supernova 1987A in the Large
Magellanic Cloud.

531

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Important milestones during the period covered in Part III
23 September 1991 — Construction of the ­Paranal
Observatory begins.

11 February 1998 — First light for the second
SUperb-Seeing Imager (SUSI2) on the NTT.

30 May 1992 — First light of the IRAC2 instrument
on the MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope.

12 April 1998 — First light for the Swiss 1.2-metre
Leonhard Euler telescope at La Silla.

21 July 1992 — First light of the Thermal Infrared
MultiMode Instrument (TIMMI) on the ESO
3.6-metre telescope.

25 May 1998 — First light for the first 8.2-metre
VLT Unit Telescope (UT1).
15 September 1998 — First light for the first visual
and near-UV FOcal Reducer and the low dispersion Spectrograph (FORS1) on VLT UT1.

15 December 1992 — First light of the Come-On+
instrument on the ESO 3.6-metre telescope.

6 October 1998 — First light of the Fibre-fed
Extended Range Optical Spectrograph (FEROS)
on the ESO 1.52-metre telescope.

1 January 1993 — Riccardo Giacconi takes over as
Director General of ESO.
16–22 July 1994 — The collision between Comet
Shoemaker-Levy 9 and Jupiter draws worldwide
attention to astronomy. La Silla telescopes play a
major role in the observing campaign and the
ESO Headquarters in Garching acts as focal
point for the European media.

16 November 1998 — First light of the Infrared
Spectrometer And Array Camera (ISAAC)
instrument on VLT UT1.

April 1995 — Site testing for the future Atacama
Large Millimeter/submillimeter Array (ALMA)
takes place in Chile together with National
Radio Astronomy Observatory and National
Astronomical Observatory of Japan.

18 December 1998 — The work of two independent
research teams, which includes observations at
La Silla, are described as the “Breakthrough of
the Year” by Science. Their results indicate that
the expansion of the Universe is accelerating. In
2011 the Nobel Prize in Physics was awarded to
the principal investigators for this discovery.

18 April 1995 — Amendment to the Convenio
between the Chilean Government and ESO is
initialled.

15 January 1999 — First light with the 67-millionpixel Wide Field Imager (WFI) camera on the
MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope.

5 September 1996 — The Chilean Senate ratifies the
Amendment to the Convenio with ESO.

1 March 1999 — First light for VLT UT2.
5 March 1999 — Official inauguration of the ­Paranal
Observatory. The four UTs are given the names
Antu (UT1), Keuyen (UT2), Melipal (UT3)
and Yepun (UT4).

2 December 1996 — Amendment to the Convenio
between the Chilean Government and ESO is
signed.
4 December 1996 — ­Paranal Foundation Ceremony.
25–26 June 1997 — Memorandum of
Understanding between ESO and NRAO about
working towards a joint project in millimetre/
submillimetre astronomy.
6 December 1997 — First light for the Son OF
ISAAC instrument (SOFI) on the NTT.

532

Appendix 1 ∙ Important Milestones

Important milestones during the period covered in Part IV
June 1999 — The choice of Llano de Chajnantor is
endorsed by ESO Council as the site for ALMA.

15 December 2002 — First light of the MID-infrared
Interferometric instrument (MIDI) on the VLTI.

1 September 1999 — Catherine Cesarsky takes over
as Director General of ESO.

11 February 2003 — First light of the High Accuracy
Radial Velocity Planet Searcher (HARPS) at the
ESO 3.6-metre telescope.

27 September 1999 — First light for the Ultraviolet
Visual Echelle Spectrograph (UVES) on Kueyen.
29 October 1999 — First light for FORS2 on Kueyen.

25 February 2003 — ESO and the US National
Science Foundation (NSF) sign a bilateral agreement on the Phase two (construction) of ALMA.

26 January 2000 — First light for VLT UT3,
Melipal.

18 April 2003 — First light of the MACAO–VLTI
facility.

4 September 2000 — First light for VLT UT4,
Yepun.

24 June 2003 — The 0.6-metre Rapid Eye Mount
(REM) telescope starts operations at La Silla.

11 October 2000 — First light of the second Thermal
Infrared MultiMode Instrument (TIMMI2) on
the ESO 3.6-metre telescope.

25 July 2003 — The Republic of Chile grants concession of the land on Chajnantor for the ALMA
project.

17 March 2001 — First light for the Very Large
Telescope Interferometer (VLTI).

6 November 2003 — Ground-breaking ceremony at
the site of the ALMA Operational Support
Facility.

5 April 2001 — ESO signs an agreement with representatives from North America on Phase one of
the ALMA project.

24 January 2004 — First light for the first 1.8-metre
Auxiliary Telescope (AT1).

7 May 2001 — Portugal formally joins ESO and
becomes the 9th Member State.

21 March 2004 — First fringes of the Astronomical
Multi-BEam combineR (AMBER) on the VLTI.

25 November 2001 — First light for NAOS/
CONICA instrument on VLT UT4, Yepun.

30 April 2004 — First light for the VLT Imager and
Spectrometer in the InfraRed (VISIR) on UT3,
Melipal.

26 February 2002 — First light of the VIsible MultiObject Spectrograph (VIMOS) on VLT UT3,
Melipal.

7 July 2004 — Finland formally joins ESO as the
11th Member State.

1 April 2002 — First light of the Fibre Large Array
Multi Element Spectrograph (FLAMES) on
UT2, Kueyen.

9 July 2004 — First light for the Spectrograph for
INtegral Field Observation in the Near-Infrared
(SINFONI) on the VLT’s UT4, Yepun.

24 June 2002 — The United Kingdom joins ESO as
its 10th Member State.

10 September 2004 — The VLT obtains the first-ever
image of a planet outside the Solar System.

December 2004 — The ESO Council accords the
highest priority to ESO leading the European
efforts to build en Extremely Large Telescope
(ELT).

14 September 2004 — Agreement is reached between
ESO, the US National Science Foundation and
the National Institutes of Natural Sciences,
Japan, concerning the construction of ALMA.

533

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

2 February 2005 — First light for the second
Auxiliary Telescope (AT2).

30 April 2007 — The Czech Republic formally joins
ESO as the 13th Member State.

4 July 2005 — As with the case of the collision
between Comet Shoemaker-Levy 9 and Jupiter,
ESO plays an important role, both scientifically
and with respect to the media, in connection
with the Deep Impact mission, which collided a
dedicated space probe with Comet 9P/Tempel 1.

5 August 2007 — First light for the LArge
BOlometer CAmera (LABOCA) instrument on
APEX.
22 August 2007 — First light for the High Acuity,
Wide field K-band Imaging (HAWK-I) instrument on UT4, Yepun.

14 July 2005 — First light for the submillimetre
Atacama Pathfinder Experiment (APEX).

1 September 2007 — Tim de Zeeuw takes over as
Director General of ESO.

1 November 2005 — First light for the third
Auxiliary Telescope (AT3).

20 December 2007 — The International Year of
Astronomy is approved by the United Nations
designating UNESCO and the IAU together
with ESO and other “associations and groups in
astronomy” as implementing bodies.

7 December 2005 — ESO signs the European contract for the production of up to 32 ALMA
antennas. This is the largest ever ESO contract
for industrial work on a ground-based astronomy project.

8 September 2008 — First light for the Phase
Referenced Imaging and Microarcsecond
Astrometry (PRIMA) instrument on the VLTI.

28 January 2006 — First light of the VLT laser guide
star, on UT4, Yepun.

9 November 2008 — First light for X-shooter on the
VLT.

28 February 2006 — Decision to host the ALMA
Santiago Central Office at ESO Vitacura.
4 June 2006 — First light for the CRyogenic highresolution InfraRed Echelle Spectrograph
(CRIRES) at UT1.

10 December 2008 — Several ESO telescopes were
used in a 16-year-long study to obtain the most
detailed view ever of the surroundings of the
supermassive black hole at the Galactic Centre.

15 September 2006 — The robotic TAROT–South
telescope starts work at La Silla.

18 December 2008 — The ALMA Observatory is
equipped with its first antenna.

11 December 2006 — The ESO Council agrees to
proceed with studies for the European Extremely
Large Telescope (E-ELT).

1 July 2009 — Austria formally joins ESO as its 14th
Member State.
6 July 2009 — Start of construction of the new
ALMA headquarters at the ESO premises in
Santiago’s Vitacura district.

27 November–1 December 2006 — The European
scientific community supports ESO’s ELT plans
at a major conference in Marseille.

17 September 2009 — First ALMA antenna arrives
at 5000-metre-altitude Chajnantor site.

15 December 2006 — First light for the fourth
Auxiliary Telescope (AT4).

25 November 2009 — First three ALMA antennas
are successfully linked (phase closure) at
5000-metre-altitude Chajnantor site.

14 February 2007 — Spain formally joins ESO as its
12th Member State.
25 March 2007 — First light for the Multi-conjugate
Adaptive optics Demonstrator (MAD) at the
visitor focus of Melipal.

11 December 2009 — VISTA, the new infrared
survey telescope, starts work.

534

Appendix 2

List of ESO Council Presidents
and Directors General
Year

President of Council

Director General

1962
1963
1964
1965
1966
1967
1968
1969
1970
1971
1972
1973
1974
1975
1976
1977
1978
1979
1980
1981
1982
1983
1984
1985
1986
1987
1988
1989
1990
1991
1992
1993
1994
1995
1996
1997
1998
1999

Jan Oort
Jan Oort
Jan Oort
Jan Oort/Bertil Lindblad
Gösta Funke
Gösta Funke
Gösta Funke
Henk Bannier
Henk Bannier
Henk Bannier
Augustin Alline
Augustin Alline
Augustin Alline/Henk Bannier
Bengt Strömgren
Bengt Strömgren
Bengt Strömgren
Jean-François Denisse
Jean-François Denisse
Jean-François Denisse
Jean-François Denisse
Paul Ledoux
Paul Ledoux
Paul Ledoux
Kurt Hunger
Kurt Hunger
Kurt Hunger
Per-Olof Lindblad
Per-Olof Lindblad
Per-Olof Lindblad
Franco Pacini
Franco Pacini
Franco Pacini
Peter Creola
Peter Creola
Peter Creola
Henrik Grage
Henrik Grage
Henrik Grage

Otto Heckmann
Otto Heckmann
Otto Heckmann
Otto Heckmann
Otto Heckmann
Otto Heckmann
Otto Heckmann
Otto Heckmann
Adriaan Blaauw
Adriaan Blaauw
Adriaan Blaauw
Adriaan Blaauw
Adriaan Blaauw
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Lodewijk Woltjer
Harry van der Laan
Harry van der Laan
Harry van der Laan
Harry van der Laan
Harry van der Laan
Riccardo Giacconi
Riccardo Giacconi
Riccardo Giacconi
Riccardo Giacconi
Riccardo Giacconi
Riccardo Giacconi
Riccardo Giacconi/Catherine Cesarsky

535

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

2000
2001
2002
2003
2004
2005
2006
2007
2008
2009
2010
2011
2012

Arno Freytag
Arno Freytag
Arno Freytag
Piet van der Kruit
Piet van der Kruit
Piet van der Kruit
Richard Wade
Richard Wade
Richard Wade
Laurent Vigroux
Laurent Vigroux
Laurent Vigroux
Xavier Barcons

Catherine Cesarsky
Catherine Cesarsky
Catherine Cesarsky
Catherine Cesarsky
Catherine Cesarsky
Catherine Cesarsky
Catherine Cesarsky
Catherine Cesarsky/Tim de Zeeuw
Tim de Zeeuw
Tim de Zeeuw
Tim de Zeeuw
Tim de Zeeuw
Tim de Zeeuw

536

Appendix 3

List of Interviewees

Johannes Andersen, Phillip Auer, Dietrich Baade, Klaus Banse, Xavier Barcons, Jacques Beckers, Fernando Bello,
Adriaan Blaauw, Henri Boffin, Domenico Bonaccini Calia, Albert Bosker, Roy Booth, Bob Brown, Massimo
Capaccioli, Mark Casali, Catherine Cesarsky, Ian Corbett, Phil Crane, John Danziger, Michel Dennefeld,
Sandro D’Odorico, Philippe Dierickx, Hedwig Dröll, Jan Doornenbal, Robert Fischer, Bob Fosbury, Roland
Geyl, Riccardo Giacconi, Alain Gilliotte, Andreas Glindemann, Roberto Gilmozzi, Flavio Gutierrez, Thijs
de Graauw, Peter Gray, Henrik Grage, Michael Grewing, Preben Grosbøl, Olivier Hainaut, Daniel Hofstadt,
Norbert Hubin, Henning Jørgensen, Bertrand Koehler, Luboš Kohoutek, Christine Sachs-Kohoutek, Joachim
Krautter, Richard Kurz, Harry van der Laan, Teresa Lago, Svend Laustsen, Pierre Léna, Hans Michael Maitzen,
Jon Marcaide, Kalevi Mattila, Alistair McPherson, Jorge Melnick, Suzanne Messerlian, Hans Morian, Jeremy
Mould, Paul Murdin, Birgitta Nordström, Lars-Åke Nyman, Michael Olberg, Angel Otárola, Peter Quinn, Jan
Palouš, Christian Patermann, Jutta Quentin, Bo Reipurth, Gero Rupprecht, Hans Rykaczewski, Marc Sarazin,
Dominik Schenkirz, Hans-Emil Schuster, Michael Schneermann, Boris Shustov, Chris Sterken, Jean-Pierre
Swings, Massimo Tarenghi, Ewine van Dishoeck, Paul Vanden Bout, Oskar von der Lühe, Richard West, Ray
Wilson and Lodewijk Woltjer.
Additional information was provided by:
Mary Bauerle, Leopoldo Benacchio, Elly Berkhuijsen, Daniel Bonneau, Bernard Delabre, Frédéric Derie, Dieter
Engels, Mart de Groot, Erik Høg, Gerardo Ihle, Masato Ishiguro, Max Kraus, Jet Merkelijn-Katgert, Bruno
Leibundgut, Lothar Noethe, Maximilian Metzger, Franco Pacini, Jørgen Otzen Petersen, Valentina Rodriguez,
Ulrich Schwarz, Josef Strasser, Jason Spyromilio, Will Sutherland, Piet van der Kruit, Huug van Woerden, Laura
Ventura, Tom Wilson and Tim de Zeeuw.

537

Appendix 4

List of Acronyms
AVO
Astrophysical Virtual Observatory
B&C
Boller & Chivens
BTA	Bolshoi Teleskop Alt-azimutalnyi
(Large Altazimuth Telescope)
BUS
BackUp Structure (ALMA)
C&EE
Central and Eastern European
CAMCAO	Camera for Multiconjugated
Adaptive Optics (VLT)
CARSO
Carnegie Southern Observatory
CASPEC	Echelle spectrograph for the
3.6-metre telescope
CAT
Coudé Auxiliary Telescope
CAUP
Centro de Astrofisica (Porto)
CCD
Charge Coupled Device
CDFS
Chandra Deep Field South
CDS	Centre de Données Astronomiques
de Strasbourg
CEA	Commissariat à l’énergie atomique
et aux énergies alternatives (Atomic
Energy Commission, France)
CEPAL	United Nations Economic
Commission for Latin America
CERGA	Centre d’Etudes et de Recherches
Géodynamiques et Astronomiques
CERN	Conseil Européen pour la Recherche
Nucléaire (the European
Organization for Nuclear Research)
CES
Coudé Echelle Spectrometer
CfA	Harvard Smithsonian Center for
Astrophysics
CFHT
Canada France Hawaii Telescope
CGE
Compagnie Générale d’Électricité
CMB
Cosmic Microwave Background
CNAA	Consorzio Nazionale per
l’Astronomia e l’Astrofisica
CNR	Consiglio Nazionale delle Ricerche
(Italian National Research Council)
CNRS	Centre National de la Recherche
Scientifique
CO
Carbon Monoxide
COBE
Cosmic Background Explorer
Come-On	Adaptive optics prototype
(3.6-metre)
Come-On+	Adaptive optics prototype
(3.6-metre)

2MASS
Two Micron All Sky Survey
A&A
Astronomy and Astrophysics
AAAS	American Association for the
Advancement of Science
AAS
American Astronomical Society
AAT
Anglo Australian Telescope
ABB
Asea-Brown Boveri
ACS	Advanced Camera for Surveys
(HST)
ADONIS
Adaptive optics system (3.6-metre)
AEM
ALMA construction consortium
AIV	Assembly Integration and
Verification
ALFA	Adaptive optics with Laser guide
star For Astronomy
ALMA	Atacama Large Millimeter/submilli­
meter Array
alt-az
altitude-azimuth
AMBER	Astronomical Multiple BEam
Recombiner (VLTI)
AMOS	Advanced Mechanical and Optical
Systems (Belgium)
AO
Adaptive Optics
AOF
Adaptive Optics Facility
AOS
Array Operations Site (ALMA)
APEX
Atacama Pathfinder Experiment
ARC
ALMA Regional Centre
ASPERA	European Strategy for Astroparticle
Physics
ASTE	Atacama Submillimeter Telescope
Experiment
ASTEC	Australian Science and Technology
Council
AstroGrid	Research and development project to
produce a virtual observatory based
on grid technologies
AT
Auxiliary Telescope
ATC
UK Astronomy Technology Centre
ATF
ALMA Test Facility
AU
Astronomical Unit
AUI
Associated Universities Inc.
AURA	Association of Universities for
Research in Astronomy (US)
AUSTRALIS	Consortium of Australian institutes
involved in OzPoz

538

Appendix 4 ∙ List of Acronyms

ESAC	European Science Advisory
Committee (for ALMA)
ESE	ELT Science and Engineering
­working group
ESFRI	European Strategy Forum for
Research Infrastructures
ESO	European Southern Observatory
(European Organisation for
Astronomical Research in the
Southern Hemisphere)
ESPRESSO	Echelle SPectrograph for Rocky
Exoplanet- and Stable Spectroscopic
Observations (VLT)
ESRC
ELT Standing Review Committee
ESRF	European Synchrotron Radiation
Facility
ESRO	European Space Research
Organisation
ESTI	EIROforum Science Teachers’
Initiative
EU
European Union
EURAB
European Research Advisory Board
EUREKA	Pan-European network encouraging
market-oriented, collaborative
research and development (R&D)
projects
EVA
Extra-Vehicular Activity
FC
Finance Committee
FEIC	Front-End Integration Centre
(ALMA)
FEROS	Fibrefed Extended Range Optical
Spectrograph
FIERA
CCD controller electronics
FINITO	Fringe-tracking Instrument of NIce
and Torino (VLTI)
FLAMES	Multi-object, intermediate and high
resolution spectrograph (VLT)
FOC
Faint Object Camera (HST)
FORS1	FOcal Reducer and low dispersion
Spectrograph (VLT)
FORS2	FOcal Reducer and low dispersion
Spectrograph 2 (VLT)
FOSC
Faint Object Spectroscopic Camera
FP6
Sixth EC Framework Programme
FSU
Friedrich-Schiller-Universität (Jena)
FUEGOS
Multi-Fibre Spectrograph (VLT)
FWHM
Full Width at Half Maximum
GB
Gigabyte
GCSII
Guide Star Catalog II
GDP
Gross Domestic Product
GHz
Gigahertz
GIRAFFE	Medium-high resolution
­spectrograph (VLT)

CONICA	Coudé Near-Infrared Camera (VLT)
CONICYT	Comisión Nacional de Investigación
Científica y Tecnológica
CORALIE	Echelle Spectrograph (Swiss
1.2-metre Leonard Euler telescope)
CORAVEL	Spectrovelocimeter (La Silla &
OHP)
COSTAR	Corrective Optics Space Telescope
Axial Replacement (HST)
CRIRES	CRyogenic high-resolution InfraRed
Echelle Spectrograph (VLT)
CSIC	Consejo Superior de Investigaciones
Científicas
CSIRO	Commonwealth Scientific and
Industrial Research Organisation
CTIO	Cerro Tololo Inter-American
Observatory
DARPA	Defense Advanced Research Projects
Agency
DG
Director General
DIMM
Differential Image Motion Monitor
DLR	Deutsche Luft- und
Raumfahrtforschung
DSM	Direction des Sciences de la Matière
(CEA)
EAAE	European Association for
Astronomy Education
EAS
European Astronomical Society
EBU
European Broadcasting Union
EC
European Commission
EEAB
ELT External Advisory Board
E-ELT	European Extremely Large
Telescope
EFDA	European Fusion Development
Agreement
EFOSC	ESO Faint Object Spectroscopic
Camera (3.6 metre)
EIE
European Industrial Engineering
EIROforum	European Intergovernmental
Research Organisations’ Forum
ELDO	European Launcher Development
Organisation
ELODIE	Cross-dispersed echelle
­spectrograph (OHP)
ELT
Extremely Large Telescope
EMBL	European Molecular Biology
Laboratory
EMMI	ESO Multi-Mode Instrument
(NTT)
ENO
European Northern Observatory
ERA
European Research Area
ERC
European Research Council
ESA
European Space Agency

539

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

IRAF	Image Reduction and Analysis
Facility
IRAM	Institut de Radioastronomie
Millimétrique
IRSPEC
Infrared spectrometer for the NTT
ISAAC	Infrared Spectrometer And Array
Camera (VLT)
ISO
Infrared Space Observatory (ESA)
ISOCAM
Infrared Camera (ISO)
ISR	Intersecting Storage Rings (CERN
project)
IT
information Technology
IUE
International Ultraviolet Explorer
IYA2009	International Year of Astronomy
2009
JAO
Joint ALMA Office
JCMT
James Clerk Maxwell Telescope
JET
Joint European Torus
JIF
Joint Infrastructure Fund
JNICT	Junta Nacional de Investigação
Cientifica e Tecnológica
JPL
Jet Propulsion Laboratory
KMOS	
K-band Multi-Object Spectrograph
(VLT)
KPNO
Kitt Peak National Observatory
LABOCA
Large APEX BOlometer CAmera
LAM	L’Observatoire Astronomique
Marseille-Provence
LAMA
Large Active Mirrors in Aluminum
LAMOST	Large Sky Area Multi-Object Fibre
Spectroscopic Telescope
LAOG	Laboratoire d’Astrophysique de
Grenoble
LASSCA
La Silla Seeing Campaign
LBT
Large Binocular Telescope
LESS	LABOCA Survey of the Extended
Chandra Deep Field South
LETI	Laboratoire d’électronique et de
technologie de l’information
(Grenoble)
LGS
Laser Guide Star
LGSF
Laser Guide Star Facility
LMC
Large Magellanic Cloud
LSA
Large Southern Array
LSST
Large Synoptic Survey Telescope
LZOS
Lytkarino Optical Glass Factory
M#n
Mirror #n
MACHO
Massive Compact Halo Objects
MAD	Multi-conjugate Adaptive optics
Demonstrator
mas
Milliarcseconds
MATISSE	Multi AperTure mid-Infrared
SpectroScopic Experiment (VLTI)

GMS	Gamma-ray burst Monitoring
System (La Silla)
GMT
Giant Magellan Telescope
GOODS	Great Observatories Origins
Deep Survey
GPO
Grand Prism Objectif
GRAAL	GRound-layer Adaptive optics
Assisted by Lasers (AOF)
GRAVITY	Adaptive optics assisted, near-­
infrared VLTI instrument (VLTI)
GRB
Gamma-ray burst
GTC
Gran Telescopio Canarias
HARPS	High Accuracy Radial velocity
Planet Searcher (3.6-metre)
HAWK-I	High Acuity Wide field K-band
Imager (VLT)
HDF
Hubble Deep Field
HES
Hamburg/ESO Survey
HH
Herbig–Haro (objects)
HIRES	Keck 10-metre telescope
­spectrograph
HRS	High Resolution Spectrograph
(HST)
HST
Hubble Space Telescope
IAA	Institute of Astrophysics of
Andalucía
IAC
Instituto de Astrofísica Canarias
IAP
Institut Astrophysique de Paris
IAU
International Astronomical Union
IC
Index Catalogue
ICSU	International Council of Scientific
Unions
IGN
Instituto Geográfico Nacional
IHAP	Image Handling and Processing
System
ILIAS	Integrated Large Infrastructures for.
Astroparticle Science
ILL
Institut Laue-Langevin
IMCCE	Institut de Mecanique Celeste et de
Calcul des Ephemerides
INAF	Istituto Nazionale di Astrofisica
(Italy)
INNSE
Innocenti-Santeustacchio (Italy)
INTAS	The International Association for
the promotion of co-operation with
scientists from the New Independent
States of the former Soviet Union
IR
Infrared
IRAC	InfraRed Array Camera (MPG/ESO
2.2-metre)
IRACE	Infrared Detector High Speed
Array Control and Processing
Electronics

540

Appendix 4 ∙ List of Acronyms

NOAO	National Optical Astronomy
Observatory
NOT
Nordic Optical Telescope
NOVA	The Netherlands Research School
for Astronomy (Nederlandse
Onderzoekschool voor Astronomie)
NRAO	National Radio Astronomy
Observatory (US)
NRC
National Research Council
NSF
National Science Foundation (US)
NTT
New Technology Telescope
OB
Observing Block
OBE
Operating Basis Earthquake
OECD	Organisation for Economic
Co-operation and Development
ÖGA 2	Austrian Society for Astronomy and
Astrophysics
OHP
Observatoire de Haute-Provence
OmegaCAM VST survey camera
ONERA	Office National D’Etudes et de
Recherche Aerospatiale
OPC
Observing Programmes Committee
OPD
Optical Path Difference
OPTICON
Optical Astronomy Network (FP5)
OSF	Operations Support Facility
(ALMA)
OSO
Onsala Space Observatory
OWL
OverWhelmingly Large Telescope
OzPoz	Multi-fibre positioner feeding
GIRAFFE and FLAMES
PARSCA 92 Paranal Seeing Campaign
PARSEC	Paranal Artificial Reference Source
for Extended Coverage
PI
Principal Investigator
PPARC	Particle Physics and Astronomy
Research Council
PRIMA	Phase Referenced Imaging and
Microarcsecond Astrometry facility
(VLTI)
QBS
Quick Blue Survey
QSO
Quasi-Stellar Object
QUEST
QUasar Equatorial Survey Team
R&D
Research and Development
RadioNet
Radio Astronomy network (FP5)
REM
Rapid Eye Mount (La Silla)
REOSC
French optical company
RMS
root mean square
SAG	Servicio Agrícola Ganadero
(Agricultural and Livestock Service)
SALT
Southern African Large Telescope
SEA
Sociedad Española de Astronomía
SEST	Swedish-ESO Submillimetre
Telescope

MATRA	French automotive and defence
­company
MFAS	Multi-Fibre Area Spectrograph
(VLT)
MIDAS
Munich Image Data Analysis System
MIDI	MID-infrared Interferometric
instrument (VLTI)
MIT	Massachusetts Institute of
Technology
MLE
Maximum Likely Earthquake
MMA
Millimeter Array
MMB
Mirror Maintenance Building
MMT
Multiple Mirror Telescope
MPA
Max-Planck-Institut für Astrophysik
MPE	Max-Planck-Institut für
­extraterrestrische Physik
MPG
Max-Planck-Gesellschaft
MPIfR	Max-Planck-Institut für
Radioastronomie
MPP	Max-Planck-Institut für
Plasmaphysik
MPQ	Max-Planck-Institut für
Quantenoptik
msl
metres above sea level
MUSE	Multi Unit Spectroscopic Explorer
(VLT)
NACO
NAOS-CONICA (VLT)
NAOJ	National Astronomical Observatory
of Japan
NAOS	Nasmyth Adaptive Optics System
(VLT)
NASA	National Aeronautics and Space
Administration (US)
NATO
North Atlantic Treaty Organization
NEON	Network of European Observatories
in the North
NFR	Swedish Natural Science Research
Council
NFRA	Netherlands Foundation for
Research in Astronomy
NGC
New General Catalogue
NGST
Next Generation Space Telescope
NICMOS	Near Infrared Camera and MultiObject Spectrometer (HST)
NINS	National Institutes of Natural
Sciences
NIRMOS	Near-InfraRed Multi-Object
Spectrograph
NIS	New Independent States (Soviet
Union)
NNI
Net National Income
NNTT	National New Technology
Telescope

541

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

UKIRT
United Kingdom Infrared Telescope
UKST
UK Schmidt Telescope
ULTRACAM High-speed camera (NTT)
UN
United Nations
UNESCO	United Nations Educational,
Scientific and Cultural
Organization
UT
Unit Telescope (VLT)
UT1–4	VLT Unit Telescopes 1–4: Antu,
Kueyen, Melipal and Yepun
UTC
Coordinated Universal Time
UV
ultraviolet
UVES	UV-Visual Echelle Spectrograph
(VLT)
VIMOS	VIsible MultiObject Spectrograph
(VLT)
VINCI	VLT INterferometer
Commissioning Instrument (VLTI)
VIRCAM	VISTA IR Camera
VIRGO	Gravitational Wave Detector at the
European Gravitational Observatory
VIRMOS	Visible Infra-Red Multi-Object
Spectrograph (VLT)
VISA
VLTI Sub-Array
VISIR	VLT Imager and Spectrometer for
mid-InfraRed
VISTA	Visible and Infrared Survey
Telescope for Astronomy
VLA
Very Large Array
VLT
Very Large Telescope
VLTI
Very Large Telescope Interferometer
VO
Virtual Observatory
VST
VLT Survey Telescope
WDR
Westdeutscher Rundfunk
WFC3
Wide Field Camera 3 (HST)
WFCAM	Infrared wide field camera for the
UK Infrared Telescope on Mauna
Kea
WFI	Wide-Field Imager (MPG/ESO
2.2-metre)
WMAP	Wilkinson Microwave Anisotropy
Probe
WTT
Wide Terrestrial Telescope
XFEL
European X-ray Free Electron Laser
XMM-Newton ESA’s X-ray space observatory
X-shooter	Multi-wavelength (ultraviolet-­
infrared) medium resolution
spectro­g raph (VLT)

SRON	Netherlands Foundation for Space
Research
SHARP
Camera on NTT
SINFONI	Spectrograph for INtegral Field
Observations in the Near Infrared
(VLT)
SKA
Square Kilometre Array
SL-9
Shoemaker-Levy 9
SMA
Submillimeter Array
SODAR
SOund Detection And Ranging
SOFI
Son OF ISAAC (NTT)
SOFIA	Stratospheric Observatory for
Infrared Astronomy
SOIMI
Società Impianti Industriali
SPHERE	Spectro-Polarimetric High-contrast
Exoplanet REsearch (VLT)
SPIE	International society for optics and
photonics
SPIFFI	Spectrometer for Infrared Faint
Field Imaging (VLT)
SPS	Super Proton Synchrotron (CERN
project)
SRC
Science Research Council (UK)
SSWG
Science Strategy Working Group
STC
Scientific Technical Committee
ST-ECF	Space Telescope European
Coordinating Facility
STFC	Science and Technology Facilities
Council (UK)
STScI	Space Telescope Science Institute
(US)
SUSI
SUperb Seeing Imager (NTT)
SUSI2
Superb Seeing Imager 2 (NTT)
TAROT	Télescope à Action Rapide pour les
Objets Transitoires (La Silla)
TB
Terabyte
TEKES	Finnish Agency for Technology and
Innovation
TIMMI	Thermal lnfrared Multimode
Instrument (3.6-metre)
TMT
Ten Meter Telescope
TMT
Thirty Meter Telescope
TNO	Netherlands Organisation for
Applied Scientific Research
TP
Telescope Project (Division)
TPD	Netherlands Institute of Applied
Physics
TRS
Technical Research Support
UC
Users Committee
UCLA	University of California,
Los Angeles
UK
United Kingdom
UKIDSS
UKIRT Infrared Deep Sky Survey

542

Appendix 5

Index of Names
A
Abott, Allison ∙ 296
Adler, Katja ∙ 496
Adorf, Hans-Martin ∙ 140
Agnelli, Susanna ∙ 299
Albanez Castilla, Jorssy ∙ 345
Albrecht, Rudolf ∙ 137, 140
Alcayaga, Roberto ∙ 179
Alfvén, Hannes ∙ 103
Allègre, Claude ∙ 308, 309
Allende Gossens, Salvador ∙ 87, 88
Allesandri, Arturo ∙ 39, 304
Alline, Augustin ∙ 87, 535
Alloin, Danielle ∙ 95, 446, 453
Ambartsumian, Viktor ∙ 27
Anciaux, Georges ∙ 88
Andersen, Johannes ∙ 93, 125–
128, 279, 286, 308, 314, 401,
402, 513, 537
Andersen, Morten ∙ 426
Andersen, Torben ∙ 72, 73, 376,
379, 414, 416
Andreani, Paola ∙ 388
Andreoni, Gaetano ∙ 191, 286
Appenzeller, Immo ∙ 184, 218,
348
Arajärvi, Mirja ∙ 472, 474
Ardeberg, Arne ∙ 48, 178–180,
184, 414, 416
Argelander, Friedrich ∙ 470
Ataza, Mario ∙ 290
Auer, Phillip ∙ 362, 363, 537
Aylwin, Patricio ∙ 289, 290
Aymar, Robert ∙ 496
Azouit, Max ∙ 181

B
Baade, Dietrich ∙ 140, 287, 321,
537
Baade, Walter ∙ 26, 27, 76, 78,
157, 275, 288, 529,

Baath, Lars ∙ 373
Babcock, Horace ∙ 231
Bachiller, Rafael ∙ 395
Bachmann, Gerhard ∙ 96, 97,
170, 290, 314, 489
Bacon, Roland ∙ 416
Bahner, Klaus ∙ 59
Bannier, Jan Hendrik
(“Henk”) ∙ 32, 52, 63, 535
Banse, Klaus ∙ 105, 537
Barbuy, Beatriz ∙ 510
Barcons, Xavier ∙ 478, 536, 537
Baron, Ana Maria ∙ 398
Barros, Christian ∙ 396
Baudry, Alain ∙ 380
Bauerle, Mary ∙ 397, 537
Bayle, André ∙ 69
Beasley, Tony ∙ 394
Beckers, Jacques ∙ 210, 216, 232,
238, 245, 246, 248, 351, 537
Becker, Wilhelm ∙ 27
Behr, Alfred ∙ 53, 54, 64, 65
Bello, Fernando ∙ 314, 463, 464,
537
Benacchio, Leopoldo ∙ 510, 537
Bender, Ralf ∙ 417, 493
Benvenuti, Piero ∙ 137, 138, 145,
321, 498
Benz, Arnold ∙ 395
Berentsen, Jørn ∙ 33
Bergeron, Jacqueline ∙ 286
Berkhuijsen, Elly ∙ 537
Berna, Sandra ∙ 397
Berthet, Stephane ∙ 314
Beuzit, Jean-Luc ∙ 236
Bezemer, Jan ∙ 170, 171, 489
Bieglmayer, Michael ∙ 506
Blaauw, Adriaan ∙ 9, 10, 12, 13,
22, 25, 27, 29, 31–33, 36, 37,
40, 45, 51, 54–57, 62, 64, 78,
79, 85, 86, 90, 92, 94, 95,
100, 126, 201, 291, 472, 483,
484, 487, 488, 503, 530, 535,
537

543

Blair, Tony ∙ 467
Blake, Geoffrey ∙ 395
Blichfeldt, Mogens ∙ 60
Bloemkolk, Johan ∙ 54, 97
Boeninger, Edgardo ∙ 290
Boffin, Henri ∙ 491, 537
Bok, Priscilla ∙ 27
Boksenberg, Alec ∙ 452, 462
Bolados, Carlos ∙ 350
Bondi, Hermann ∙ 62
Bonneau, Daniel ∙ 537
Bonneau, Jean-Michel ∙ 12
Bonneau, Marcel ∙ 33
Bonnet, Henri ∙ 227, 357
Booth, Roy ∙ 165, 166, 369, 371,
372, 376, 537
Borgman, Jan ∙ 33, 55
Bosker, Albert ∙ 30, 156, 537
Bouchet, Patrice ∙ 155, 156,
159–161, 308
Boulanger, François ∙ 371
Bourgeois, Paul ∙ 55
Bourlon, Fabien ∙ 209
Bouvier, Betrand ∙ 357
Braes, Luc ∙ 33
Braun, Robert ∙ 245
Breysacher, Jacques ∙ 104, 195,
321
Broesterhuizen, Emil ∙ 314
Bronfman, Leonardo ∙ 395, 447
Brosser, Philippe ∙ 314
Brouw, Willem ∙ 170, 307
Browne, Malcolm ∙ 173
Brunetto, Enzo ∙ 414
Brunier, Serge ∙ 511
Budker, Dimitri ∙ 240
Bugueno, Erich ∙ 326, 331
Burrows, Chris ∙ 272
Buschmeier, Willy ∙ 299
Busek, Erhard ∙ 483
Busquin, Philippe ∙ 480, 495, 498
Buzzoni, Bernard ∙ 225

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

C
Canal Masgoret, Ramon ∙ 476
Capaccioli, Massimo ∙ 401, 402,
404, 405, 537
Carlile, Colin ∙ 496
Carstens, Karl ∙ 102, 103
Cartes, Manue ∙ 116
Carvalho Saraiva, João
Pedro del ∙ 506
Casali, Mark ∙ 406, 537
Castro, Guglielmo ∙ 314, 448
Cayrel, Marc ∙ 256, 431
Cernicharo, José ∙ 478
Cesarsky, Catherine ∙ 11, 92,
133, 290, 297, 304, 310, 346,
347, 351, 359, 381, 385, 396,
416, 421, 422, 424, 425,
445, 447, 465, 468, 469, 472,
473, 478–481, 483, 484,
495–498, 510, 533, 535–537
Chaisson, Eric ∙ 139
Chapman, Clark ∙ 265
Charvin, Pierre ∙ 33
Chauvin, Gael ∙ 438
Chikada, Yoshihiro ∙ 395
Chincarini, Guido ∙ 95
Chirac, Jacques ∙ 169, 308
Chisogne, Jean-Pierre ∙ 353
Christensen, Lars
Lindberg ∙ 125, 143
Chugai, Nicolai ∙ 489
Churchwell, Edward ∙ 376
Cifuentes, Roberto ∙ 303
Citterio, Oberto ∙ 121
Clare, Roy ∙ 469
Collin, Bill ∙ 353
Colwell, Rita ∙ 381
Comeron, Fernando ∙ 320
Constâncio, Vitor ∙ 464
Corbett, Ian ∙ 376, 377, 385,
406, 466–468, 537
Cornwell, Tim ∙ 245
Costa, Emanuelle ∙ 301
Cotton, Bill ∙ 356
Coudé du Foresto, Vincent ∙ 356
Coutures, Christian ∙ 149
Cox, Pierre ∙ 395
Cram, Lawrence ∙ 460
Crane, Phil ∙ 95, 97, 105, 129,
537

Creola, Peter ∙ 170, 172, 173,
290, 297, 301, 304, 306, 314,
464, 535
Cristiani, Stefano ∙ 156
Crocker, James ∙ 286
Cros, Gerard ∙ 301
Crutcher, Richard ∙ 395
Cruz, Pedro ∙ 397
Cuby, Jean-Gabriel ∙ 420
Culhane, Len ∙ 142
Cullum, Martin ∙ 129, 336, 407
Cunningham, Colin ∙ 422
Curien, Hubert ∙ 103, 169, 195,
206, 451, 495

D
Dachs, Joachim ∙ 50
Dahrendorf, Ralph ∙ 488
Danziger, John ∙ 95, 159–161,
308, 537
de Bevere, Maurice ∙ 251
de Bon, Canut ∙ 178
de Breuck, Carlos ∙ 391
Debry, Nicolas ∙ 506
de Castro, Rodrigo ∙ 298, 301,
304, 448
de Graauw, Thijs ∙ 371, 537
de Groot, Martin ∙ 33, 67, 537
Deiries, Sebastian ∙ 404
de Jonge, Peter ∙ 164, 165, 209,
362
Dekker, Hans ∙ 129, 131, 220,
222
Delabre, Bernard ∙ 129, 225, 414,
422, 537
de Lacaille, Nicolas Louis ∙ 27
Delfosse, Michel ∙ 301
Delgado, Guillermo ∙ 375
de Loore, Christian ∙ 170
de Mella, Juan ∙ 392
Denisse, Jean-François ∙ 535
Dennefeld, Michel ∙ 95, 286,
347, 491, 537
de Oliveira, Luis Valente ∙ 462
Derie, Frédéric ∙ 537
de Vlaming, Frederik Willem ∙ 34
de Vries, Martin ∙ 57
de Zeeuw, Tim ∙ 10, 13, 144,
416, 421, 425, 484, 493, 497,
534, 536, 537
Dias de Deus, João ∙ 462

544

di Benedetto, Paolo ∙ 245
di Chiara, Luigi ∙ 510
Dierickx, Philippe ∙ 205, 214,
251, 253, 255–259, 413, 414,
420, 424, 537
D’Odorico, Sandro ∙ 129, 132,
144, 215, 216, 222, 225, 288,
537
Dondelinger, Alain ∙ 506
Doornenbal, Jan ∙ 29, 30, 40, 45,
57, 537
Dordain, Jean-Jacques ∙ 495
Downes, Dennis ∙ 245
Dröll, Hedwig ∙ 537
Ducci, Carlos ∙ 297, 302
Dümmler, Martin ∙ 357
Dumoulin, Bernard ∙ 80, 81, 97
Dunn, Stuart ∙ 209
Dürbeck, Hilmar ∙ 36

E
Edmondson, Frank K. ∙ 37, 38
Eichler, Jürgen ∙ 97
Eigen, Manfred ∙ 103
Ekers, Ron ∙ 460
Ellerbroek, Brent ∙ 420
Elsässer, Hans ∙ 116
Emerson, Jim ∙ 406
Enard, Daniel ∙ 65, 71, 113, 114,
128, 129, 170, 194, 203, 247,
255, 420, 422
Engels, Dieter ∙ 537
Erm, Toomas ∙ 326, 330
Eschwey, Jörg ∙ 15, 209, 312, 313,
338, 362, 392
Espiard, Jean ∙ 251, 256
Euler, Christa ∙ 51, 67, 104, 273,
532, 549
Evans, Neal ∙ 395

F
Farrigno, Carlo ∙ 506
Faucherre, Michel ∙ 235
Fehling, Hermann ∙ 97, 101
Fehrenbach, Charles ∙ 25, 30, 31,
37, 38, 55, 69
Fischer, Joschka ∙ 97, 101, 116,
203, 206, 396, 537
Fizeau, Hippolyte ∙ 243, 244

Appendix 5 ∙ Index of Names

Flebus, Carlo ∙ 353, 354
Fontanella, Jean-Claude ∙ 233
Fort, Bernard ∙ 216, 314
Fosbury, Robert ∙ 12, 137, 140,
144, 308, 321, 537
Foy, Renaud ∙ 239, 245
Franchini, Maria Grazia ∙ 319,
491
Franco, Francisco ∙ 474
Fransson, Claes ∙ 161, 162, 452,
493
Franx, Marijn ∙ 422
Franza, Francis ∙ 65, 69, 333
Freeman, Ken ∙ 452
Frei Montalva, Eduardo ∙ 52,
345, 530
Frei Ruiz-Tagle, Eduardo ∙ 345,
346, 448
Fresnel, Augustin ∙ 243
Freymond, Bernard ∙ 301, 304
Freytag, Arno ∙ 314, 469, 477, 536
Fricke, Klaus ∙ 218
Fried, David ∙ 181
Friedman, Alexander ∙ 22
Fritsch, Hilde ∙ 86
Fukui, Yasuo ∙ 395
Funke, Gösta ∙ 32, 35, 63, 535

G
Gago, José Mariano ∙ 345, 462,
464, 465, 495, 501
Gahm, Gösta ∙ 96
Gaillard, Michel ∙ 233
Gallart, Carme ∙ 475
Gamow, George ∙ 23
Garay, Guido ∙ 371
Geimer, Christoph ∙ 404
Geiss, Johannes ∙ 452
Genzel, Reinhard ∙ 193, 228,
245, 307, 420, 422, 436, 437
Geyl, Roland ∙ 254, 537
Giacconi, Mirella ∙ 346
Giacconi, Riccardo ∙ 105, 137,
145, 201, 211–213, 248, 256,
260, 261, 286, 288–290,
295, 297, 301, 302, 305–310,
314, 317, 318, 333, 337, 341,
345–347, 352, 364, 375, 376,
396, 412, 413, 427, 442, 452,
460, 464, 467, 476, 477, 493,
505, 532, 535, 537

Gilliotte, Alain ∙ 281, 282, 537
Gilmore, Gerry ∙ 416, 457, 469,
470, 478, 493
Gilmozzi, Roberto ∙ 135, 238,
338, 356, 411–414, 416, 419,
420, 423, 425, 537
Giménez Cañete, Alvaro ∙ 473,
475
Giordano, Paul ∙ 121, 333
Giorgio, Vincenzo ∙ 385
Gitton, Philippe ∙ 356
Glass, Ian ∙ 96
Glaves, Percy ∙ 288
Glindemann, Andreas ∙ 355,
356, 537
Gogel, Daniel ∙ 97, 101
Gojak, Domingo ∙ 288
Golay, Marcel ∙ 99, 170
Gomez Campiano,
Francisco ∙ 178
Gomez Campiano, Italo ∙ 178
Gomez Cerda, Francisco ∙ 178,
179
Gouguenheim, Lucienne ∙ 507
Govender, Kevindran ∙ 510
Grage, Henrik ∙ 12, 170–172,
290, 297, 304, 345, 346, 535,
537
Gray, Peter ∙ 16, 221, 225, 326,
330, 331, 334, 338, 339, 345,
350, 365, 537
Grebel, Eva ∙ 506
Gredel, Roland ∙ 288, 422
Greenstein, Jesse ∙ 112
Grenon, Michel ∙ 184
Greve, Thomas ∙ 506
Grewe, Albert ∙ 166
Grewing, Michael ∙ 373, 376,
477, 537
Griccioli, Marcello ∙ 170, 173
Grosbøl, Preben ∙ 105, 321, 323,
537
Grothe, Rainer ∙ 188
Grothkopf, Uta ∙ 12, 282, 441
Guilloteau, Stephane ∙ 373, 376,
377
Guisard, Stéphane ∙ 511
Gurwell, Mark ∙ 395
Gustafsson, Bengt ∙ 308, 314,
422
Güsten, Rolf ∙ 391
Gutierrez, Flavio ∙ 364, 537
Gutierrez, Paula ∙ 364

545

H
Haatainen, Tuula ∙ 474
Hackenberg, Wolfgang ∙ 240
Häffner, Reinhold ∙ 146
Hahn, Johannes ∙ 484
Hainaut, Olivier ∙ 149, 537
Hall, Donald ∙ 110, 111, 254,
468
Halley, Edmund ∙ 21, 147, 149
Halliday, Ian ∙ 468, 469
Hanbury-Brown, Robert ∙ 244,
372, 376, 377, 395, 537
Haniff, Chris ∙ 245
Happer, William ∙ 240
Hardy, Eduardo ∙ 232, 239, 396
Haro, Guillermo ∙ 27, 284
Harwit, Martin ∙ 411
Haugen, Niels Erland ∙ 506
Haug, Ulrich ∙ 33
Heckmann, Otto ∙ 9, 22, 24, 27,
28, 31–33, 36–40, 53–55,
62, 77, 78, 304, 445, 513,
529, 535
Heinrich, Hansjörg ∙ 342
Heisig, Michaela ∙ 398
Henning, Thomas ∙ 493
Herbig, George ∙ 284
Herczeg, Tibor ∙ 33
Hernando Pérez, Marcela ∙ 397
Herschel, John ∙ 27, 28, 125, 145,
380
Herschel, William ∙ 28
Hess, Matthias ∙ 255, 329
Heyer, Hans Hermann ∙ 12, 121,
131, 142, 143, 194, 221, 247,
250, 254, 256, 268, 306, 314,
342, 386, 391, 392, 399, 404,
409, 420, 425, 429, 444, 486,
500, 507
Heyvaerts, Jean ∙ 462
Hjorth, Jens ∙ 435
Hladík, Lubomir ∙ 480, 482
Hofstadt, Daniel ∙ 180, 279,
298–302, 304, 364, 374,
396, 397, 447, 537
Høg, Erik ∙ 33, 537
Holmberg, Erik ∙ 82
Honohan, Theo ∙ 506
Hooghout, Benjamin ∙ 57
Hook, Richard ∙ 140
Howard, John ∙ 461
Hoyle, Fred ∙ 21, 23, 465, 504

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Hubble, Edwin P. ∙ 22, 137, 275
Huber, Martin ∙ 170
Hubin, Norbert ∙ 236, 241, 414,
537
Huchra, John ∙ 452
Hüdepohl, Gerd ∙ 3, 204, 241,
326, 330, 346, 360, 364,
400, 425
Humby, Karen ∙ 49
Hunger, Kurt ∙ 170, 173, 483, 535

I
Ihle, Gerardo ∙ 116, 149, 281,
537
Illanes, Esteban ∙ 397
Illnerová, Helena ∙ 480
Infante Alfonso, Patricio ∙ 306
Insulza, José Miguel ∙ 298, 301,
302, 304, 305, 396
Ishiguro, Masato ∙ 537
Israel, Frank ∙ 371
Iwert, Olaf ∙ 404

J
Jahn, Martin ∙ 481
Janssen, Edmund ∙ 259
Jansky, Karl ∙ 433
Jefferies, John ∙ 245
Jessen, Niels ∙ 379
Jimenez, Javier ∙ 299
Johansson, Lars ∙ 371
Jørgensen, Henning ∙ 159, 170,
307, 537
Jospin, Lionel ∙ 308
Juica, Cristian ∙ 331

K
Kafatos, Fotis ∙ 308, 495
Kahanpää, Jere Veikko ∙ 506
Käufl, Hans Ullrich ∙ 133, 134,
228, 269
Kawara, Kimiaki ∙ 373
Keating, Paul ∙ 461
Kegel, Wilhelm ∙ 161
Kepler, Johannes ∙ 21, 157
Kervella, Pierre ∙ 356
Keusch, Jean-Pierre ∙ 3, 195

Kienzle, Werner ∙ 464
Kirshner, Bob ∙ 161
Kjär, Kurt ∙ 501
Koch, Franz ∙ 379, 414
Koechlin, Laurent ∙ 245
Koehler, Bertrand ∙ 246, 354,
356, 537
Kohoutek, Luboš ∙ 48, 49, 537
König, Nobert ∙ 467, 477
Kopicová, Miroslava ∙ 482
Koshiba, Masatoshi ∙ 159
Kourganoff, Vladimir ∙ 27
Kourtis, Lambros ∙ 506
Kowalski, Peter ∙ 484
Kraus, Max ∙ 330, 537
Krautter, Joachim ∙ 96, 314, 452,
537
Kretschmer, Gerhard ∙ 326
Kudritzki, Rolf-Peter ∙ 16, 142,
218, 452
Kühne, Christoph ∙ 190
Kukarkin, Boris Vasilevich ∙ 27
Kulikovsky, Petr
Grigorevich ∙ 27
Kulkarni, Shri ∙ 245
Kunkel, William ∙ 156
Kunth, Daniel ∙ 95
Kunz-Hallstein, Hans
Peter ∙ 289
Kuperus, Max ∙ 33
Kurz, Richard ∙ 377, 395, 467,
537
Kutner, Marc ∙ 371

L
Labeyrie, Antoine ∙ 181, 239,
244, 245
Labhardt, Lukas ∙ 144
Lagerkvist, Claes-Ingvar ∙ 83
Lago, Teresa ∙ 462, 463, 465, 537
Lagrange, Anne-Marie ∙ 237,
272, 438
Lallemand, André ∙ 122, 125
Latorre Benavente, Juan
José ∙ 296
Lauberts, Andris ∙ 81, 82
Lausten, Susanne ∙ 68
Laustsen, Kirsten ∙ 68
Laustsen, Svend ∙ 48, 60, 64–71,
126, 150, 168, 537
Lawrence, Andrew ∙ 406

546

Leclercq, Jean ∙ 200
Ledoux, Paul ∙ 535
Leibundgut, Bruno ∙ 161, 274,
276, 321, 493, 537
Lelievre, Gerard ∙ 184
Le Luyer, Maurice ∙ 65, 69, 129
Le Moli, Nella ∙ 510
Léna, Pierre ∙ 133, 169, 170, 172,
173, 183, 232, 233, 243–245,
248, 290, 347, 537
León Serrano, Gonzalo ∙ 476
Lequeux, James ∙ 33, 371, 489
Leroy, Emile ∙ 48, 64, 66
Le Saux, Paul ∙ 288
Leterrier, Nicolas ∙ 506
Levi, Jean-Daniel ∙ 169
Levy, David ∙ 264, 265, 298, 508,
532, 534
Lilly, Simon ∙ 493
Lindblad, Bertil ∙ 27, 32, 55, 96,
535
Lindblad, Per-Olof ∙ 96, 170,
290, 479, 535
Lindgren, Harri ∙ 178
Lizon, Jean-Louis ∙ 221
Lopriore, Sergio ∙ 188
Lorenzen, Dirk ∙ 36
Lucy, Leon ∙ 139, 140, 308
Lüst, Reimar ∙ 102

M
Mackay, Simon Brooke ∙ 468
Madariaga, Raul ∙ 184
Madore, Barry ∙ 156
Madsen, Claus ∙ 9–12, 16, 50,
56, 77, 79, 89, 94, 96, 98,
102–104, 115, 128, 155, 158,
160, 162–163, 166, 170, 176,
182, 186, 188, 206–207, 230,
245, 254, 269, 278, 285, 313,
338–339, 344, 348, 448,
460, 464, 466, 473, 475, 481,
482, 488, 492, 497, 498, 503,
506, 507, 510
Maitzen, Hans-Michael ∙ 483,
537
Malm, Bernth ∙ 61
Mancini, Dario ∙ 402
Marcaide, Jon ∙ 475, 476, 537
Marchetti, Enrico ∙ 38, 237, 238
Marchiori, Gianpietro ∙ 385

Appendix 5 ∙ Index of Names

Marco, Sergio ∙ 506
Marimón, Ramón ∙ 478
Mariotti, Jean-Marie ∙ 245, 353,
355
Marsden, Brian ∙ 266
Martín, Eduardo ∙ 475
Martins, Mafalda ∙ 12, 385
Masegosa, Josefa ∙ 475
Materne, Jürgen ∙ 95
Mathys, Gautier ∙ 288
Mattaj, Iain ∙ 496
Mattila, Kalevi ∙ 470, 472, 537
Maurice, Eric ∙ 48, 51, 307
Mauté, Patrick ∙ 385
Mayall, Nicholas ∙ 37
Mayor, Michel ∙ 271–273, 308,
438
McCaughrean, Mark ∙ 426
McMullan, Dennis ∙ 125, 148
McPherson, Alistair ∙ 408, 537
McSharry, Paul ∙ 30, 37
Mellier, Yannick ∙ 144, 320
Melnick, Jorge ∙ 95, 191, 279,
280, 286, 391, 466, 537
Melnikov, Oleg ∙ 27
Menardi, Serge ∙ 357
Menten, Karl ∙ 376, 377, 379,
389
Merkelijn-Katgert, Jet ∙ 27, 33,
537
Merkle, Fritz ∙ 231, 232, 246–248
Messerlian, Suzanne ∙ 537
Metzger, Maximilian ∙ 537
Meyer, Manfred ∙ 223
Meylan, George ∙ 489, 490
Middelburg, Frank ∙ 104
Miley, George ∙ 12, 142, 452
Miller, Christian ∙ 501, 506
Minkowski, Rudolf ∙ 78
Mirabel, Igor Felix ∙ 397, 446,
447
Mitterand, François ∙ 169
Monnet, Guy ∙ 225, 414, 416,
422, 452, 493
Monnet, Jean ∙ 32
Moore, Patrick ∙ 411, 466
Moorwood, Alan ∙ 95, 134, 216,
220, 225, 228, 308, 359, 408
Morgan, William ∙ 27
Morian, Hans ∙ 205, 537
Morpurgo, Pieter ∙ 466
Moska, Tyberiusz ∙ 506

Mould, Jeremy ∙ 460, 537
Mountain, Matt ∙ 6, 412, 422
Muller, André ∙ 30, 33, 34, 37,
38, 40, 78, 92
Murdin, Paul ∙ 161, 467, 537
Murinowski, Richard ∙ 394
Murtagh, Fionn ∙ 269

N
Nakai, Naomasa ∙ 373, 395
Nassau, Jason ∙ 27
Nassau, Laura ∙ 27
Navarrete, Julio ∙ 178, 179
Nicollier, Claude ∙ 141, 142
Nilson, Peter ∙ 82
Nissen, Poul Erik ∙ 308, 314
Nöbel, Walther ∙ 97
Noethe, Lothar ∙ 121, 191, 331,
537
Noordam, Jan ∙ 245
Nordström, Birgitta ∙ 283, 286,
537
Novoa, Laura ∙ 290, 397
Nuñez, Herman ∙ 280, 349
Nyman, Lars-Åke ∙ 371, 374,
375, 391, 537

O
Ochsenbein, François ∙ 105
Ohashi, Nagayoshi ∙ 373
Olberg, Michael ∙ 537
Oort, Jan Hendrick ∙ 21, 26, 27,
32, 33, 37, 38, 54, 55, 103,
479, 503, 529, 535
Oosterhoff, Pieter ∙ 27
Ortolani, Sergio ∙ 184, 286
Osorio, Juan ∙ 326
Otárola, Angel ∙ 373–375, 537
Ottosson, Mats Ola ∙ 170
Otzen Petersen, Jørgen ∙ 33, 537
Ounnas, Charlie ∙ 105

P
Pačes, Václav ∙ 481, 482
Pacini, Franco ∙ 96, 290, 314,
493, 510, 535, 537

547

Palme, Olof ∙ 52, 59, 345
Palouš, Jan ∙ 479, 480–482, 537
Pamela, Jerôme ∙ 496
Pangalos, Dimitris ∙ 327, 339
Paranago, Pavel Petrovich ∙ 27
Paresce, Francesco ∙ 246, 271
Parra, Riccardo ∙ 288
Parsons, William ∙ 72, 411
Paseri, Jacques ∙ 256
Patat, Ferdinando ∙ 12
Patermann, Christian ∙ 169–171,
173, 537
Patkós, Enikő ∙ 510
Pedersen, Holger ∙ 129, 148, 151,
178, 181, 285
Peletier, Reynier ∙ 144
Pellinen, Risto ∙ 472
Pepe, Franceso ∙ 274
Pereyra, Zenón ∙ 149
Perez, Jorge ∙ 350
Perlmutter, Saul ∙ 276
Péron, Michèle ∙ 105, 320, 323
Peterson, Bruce ∙ 194
Petitjean, Patrick ∙ 430
Pettini, Max ∙ 144
Pfleiderer, Jörg ∙ 33
Phillips, Mark ∙ 156
Pilleux, Mauricio ∙ 326
Pinay, Antoine ∙ 32
Pinochet, Augusto ∙ 88, 289
Pizzaro, Guido ∙ 79
Plathner, Dietmar ∙ 68, 376, 379
Plaut, Lukas ∙ 27
Ponz, Daniel ∙ 105, 476
Pottasch, Stuart ∙ 57
Pounds, Ken ∙ 468
Powell, Ralph ∙ 125
Praderie, Françoise ∙ 462
Puget, Jean-Loup ∙ 422, 493
Pulkkinen, Pentti ∙ 473

Q
Quattri, Marco ∙ 362, 414
Queloz, Didier ∙ 271, 272, 308,
438
Quentin, Jutta ∙ 537
Quinn, Peter ∙ 321–323, 325,
493, 496, 537
Quintana, Hernán ∙ 95
Quistgaard, Erik ∙ 137

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

R

S

Rabi, Isidor ∙ 26
Raffi, Gianni ∙ 117
Ragazzoni, Roberto ∙ 237, 420
Raimond, Ernst ∙ 33
Ramberg, Jöran ∙ 27, 54, 64
Ramondt, Steven ∙ 301
Ramsey, Larry ∙ 420
Reagan, Ronald ∙ 232
Rebolo, Rafael ∙ 416
Reddish, Vincent ∙ 79
Redman, Roderick ∙ 465
Reichenbaum, Werner ∙ 301
Reimers, Dieter ∙ 83, 314, 342
Reipurth, Bo ∙ 156, 158, 284,
285, 446, 447, 537
Reiz, Anders ∙ 57, 64
Renzini, Alvio ∙ 402
Richer, John ∙ 395
Richichi, Andrea ∙ 359
Richter, Wolfgang ∙ 64, 71, 72,
111, 112, 187, 188, 312, 313,
449
Rickard, James ∙ 48
Riesenhuber, Heinz ∙ 169, 195
Riess, Adam ∙ 275, 276
Rigaut, François ∙ 236, 238, 414
Ritchey, George ∙ 61, 190
Rivera, Alicia ∙ 476
Rivera Maita, Roberto ∙ 375
Roche, Patrick ∙ 469
Roddier, Claude ∙ 181
Roddier, François ∙ 181, 182, 237
Rodriguez Espinosa,
José-Miguel ∙ 416
Rodriguez, Valentina ∙ 537
Rohlfs, Kristen ∙ 33
Rojo Alaminos, Juan ∙ 475
Rosa, Michael ∙ 143
Rosenthal-Schneider, Use ∙ 429
Rouel, Jacques ∙ 48, 64
Rougoor, Wim ∙ 33
Rousset, Gérard ∙ 223, 422
Rubbia, Carlo ∙ 345
Ruberti, Antonio ∙ 169, 195, 491,
505
Rubio, Monica ∙ 371
Rule, Bruce ∙ 76
Rupprecht, Gero ∙ 218, 219, 537
Russell, Adrian ∙ 406
Rykaczewski, Hans ∙ 537

Sachs-Kohoutek, Christine ∙ 537
Sainsbury, Lord ∙ 468, 469
Salinari, Pierre ∙ 241
Salvador-Solé, Eduard ∙ 476
Samouilov, Anatoly ∙ 404
Sánchez Martínez,
Francisco ∙ 475
San Segundo, María Jesús ∙ 479
Santa Cruz, Andrés ∙ 295, 303
Sarazin, Marc ∙ 178–183, 185,
280, 320, 537
Saxby, Roy ∙ 73
Sbaihi, Marc ∙ 326, 330
Schacht, Christopher
Cleland ∙ 460
Schäfer, Hans ∙ 39
Schalén, Carl ∙ 27
Schenkirz, Dominik ∙ 362, 363,
537
Schild, Hans ∙ 286
Schmidt, Bernhard ∙ 75, 76
Schmidt, Brian ∙ 276
Schmidt-Kaler, Theodor ∙ 33
Schnabel, Ulrich ∙ 342
Schneermann, Michael ∙ 262,
332, 537
Schnur, Gerhard ∙ 127, 470
Schöller, Markus ∙ 356
Schramm, Johan ∙ 54
Schuh, Sonja ∙ 506
Schuster, Hans-Emil ∙ 40, 67, 78,
79, 87, 179, 537
Schwarz, Joe ∙ 322
Schwarz, Ulrich ∙ 33, 537
Sciama, Dennis ∙ 103
Seifert, Walter ∙ 218
Seitter, Waltraut ∙ 33, 39
Setti, Giancarlo ∙ 170, 416, 462,
489
Shane, Donald ∙ 33, 37, 59
Shaver, Peter ∙ 95, 165, 318, 372,
374, 376, 377, 395, 460, 463,
467, 480
Shelton, Ian ∙ 156
Shimron, Uri Naftali ∙ 506
Shoemaker, Carolyn ∙ 265
Shoemaker, Eugene ∙ 265
Shustov, Boris ∙ 488, 537
Sibille, François ∙ 133
Siedentopf, Heinrich ∙ 37, 38

548

Silber, Armin ∙ 226
Silva, David ∙ 323, 463
Soledad Alvear, María ∙ 397
Sol, Helène ∙ 96
Sorger, Hans-Joachim ∙ 485
Spencer-Jones, Harold ∙ 27
Špidly, Vladimir ∙ 480
Spyromilio, Jason ∙ 15, 275, 288,
321, 322, 331, 338, 339, 346,
405, 407, 421, 423, 444, 537
Srianand, Raghunathan ∙ 430,
433
Stanghellini, Stefano ∙ 259, 405,
407, 408
Starischka, Bernhard ∙ 39
Stefl, Stanislav ∙ 482, 483
Steinberg, Jean-Louis ∙ 57
Steininger, Hans ∙ 385
Steinitz, Raphael ∙ 33
Stephan, Edouard ∙ 243
Stepp, Larry ∙ 420
Sterken, Christiaan ∙ 86, 537
Stirling, Bill ∙ 496
Stock, Jürgen ∙ 36, 37, 178, 450
Stoy, Richard ∙ 27
Strasser, Josef ∙ 537
Strauss, Franz-Josef ∙ 102
Strewinski, Walter ∙ 60–62, 65,
75, 76, 78
Strittmatter, Peter ∙ 173
Strömgren, Bengt ∙ 21, 55, 62,
94, 535
Stuit, Trientjes ∙ 33
Stuyck-Taillandier, JeanFrançois ∙ 169
Sucena Paiva, José Pedro ∙ 462,
463
Surdej, Jean ∙ 164, 197, 307
Sutherland, William ∙ 110, 267,
537
Swings, Jean-Pierre ∙ 47, 113–115,
183, 184, 307, 314, 420, 477,
489, 537
Swings, Pol ∙ 47

T
Tamai, Roberto ∙ 405
Tammann, Gustav ∙ 29, 147, 161,
314, 347
Tanlaw, Lord ∙ 468

Appendix 5 ∙ Index of Names

Tapissier, Frédéric ∙ 511
Tarenghi, Massimo ∙ 15, 16, 71,
95, 116, 117, 170, 188, 194,
203, 247, 251, 256, 312, 321,
330, 331, 333, 334, 337–339,
342, 344, 346, 356, 364, 382,
387, 394, 407, 448, 472, 537
Tauriainem, Teppo ∙ 301
Taylor, John ∙ 468, 469
Teitelboim, Claudio ∙ 301, 302,
304
Tobback, Louis ∙ 195
Tornikoski, Merja ∙ 472
Tosi, Monica ∙ 422
Tucholke, Hans-Joachim ∙ 149

U
Ulrich (Demoulin), MarieHelène ∙ 95, 462, 537
Urrutia, Antonio ∙ 290

V
Vakilii, Farrokh ∙ 246
Valdés Subercaseaux,
Gabriel ∙ 52
Valente, Gianpaolo ∙ 237
Valentijn, Edwin ∙ 82
Valenzuela, Edith ∙ 506
Valtonen, Mauro ∙ 472
van Albada, Gale Bruno ∙ 33
VanCitters, Wayne ∙ 387
Vanden Bout, Paul ∙ 372, 374,
376, 394, 477, 537
van der Kruit, Piet ∙ 307, 383,
387, 536, 537
van der Laan, Harry ∙ 9, 92, 112,
142, 170, 173, 181, 183, 191,
192, 194, 196, 201–203, 209,
211, 212, 244, 247, 289, 290,
372, 462, 463, 466, 479, 480,
492, 502, 503, 531, 535, 537
van der Lans, Jan ∙ 78
van der Ven, Jan ∙ 78
van Dessel, Edwin ∙ 314
van Dishoeck, Ewine ∙ 395, 537
van Hove, Léon ∙ 103
van Kesteren, Arno ∙ 449
van Paradijs, Jan ∙ 434

van Rhijn, Pieter ∙ 27
van Woerden, Huug ∙ 537
Vargas, Alfonso ∙ 179
Vattani, Umberto ∙ 169
Ventura, Laura ∙ 537
Vercruysse, Noel ∙ 170
Vergara, Pablo ∙ 350
Vernin, Jean ∙ 181
Véron, Marie ∙ 95
Véron, Philippe ∙ 95, 102, 147
Viallefond, François ∙ 376
Vigroux, Laurent ∙ 225, 307, 536
Villard, Ray ∙ 343
Villar Martín, Montserrat ∙ 475
Villena, Raul ∙ 48
Völk, Elisabeth ∙ 12
von der Lühe, Oskar ∙ 238,
246–248, 351, 537

Winter, Luis ∙ 447
Wirenstrand, Krister ∙ 326, 333,
338, 339
Wisotzki, Lutz ∙ 83
Wøhlers, Ole ∙ 301
Woltjer, Lodewijk ∙ 11, 51, 55,
89, 90, 93–97, 102, 103, 106,
109, 112, 113, 116, 122, 127,
137, 159, 160, 165, 166, 168,
170, 178, 180, 191, 201, 203,
212, 232, 243–245, 293, 347,
358, 459, 462, 466, 530, 535,
537
Woody, David ∙ 379
Wootten, Alwyn ∙ 395

Y
Yeomans, Don ∙ 266
Young, Thomas ∙ 243

W
Wade, Richard ∙ 484, 487, 536
Wallander, Anders ∙ 288, 338,
356
Wampler, Joseph ∙ 321
Warmels, Rein ∙ 105
Warner, John ∙ 178
Webb, John ∙ 144, 262, 412, 430
Weber, Jean ∙ 61, 362
Weigelt, Gerd ∙ 181, 245, 246
Welch, Jack ∙ 395
Weselka, Daniel ∙ 484, 485
Westerlund, Bengt ∙ 48, 49, 78,
86–88, 170
West, Michael ∙ 446
West, Richard ∙ 9, 12, 33, 47, 49,
70, 80, 85, 148, 149, 158, 160,
168, 170, 192, 256, 268, 270,
327, 340, 411, 463, 464, 473,
489, 490, 495–497, 502, 537
Whipple, Fred ∙ 440
Whyborn, Nick ∙ 373
Wild, Peter ∙ 33
Wild, Wolfgang ∙ 373
Williams, Bob ∙ 422, 442, 510
Wilson, Christine ∙ 395
Wilson, Raymond ∙ 65, 69, 70,
111, 113, 119–122, 125, 128,
139, 140, 141, 188–192, 194,
203, 251, 255, 261, 331, 537
Wilson, Thomas ∙ 371, 482, 537

549

Z
Zago, Lorenzo ∙ 205, 362
Zamorani, Giovanni ∙ 144
Zapatero Osorio, María
Rosa ∙ 475
Zavadsky, Miroslava ∙ 506
Ziebell, Manfred ∙ 194
Zilverschoon, Kees ∙ 487
Zimmerer, Thomas ∙ 385
Zodet, Herbert ∙ 12, 15, 16, 161,
210, 235, 253, 260, 274, 338,
339, 355, 363, 368, 419
Zwaan, Kees ∙ 33, 307
Zwicky, Fritz ∙ 157, 275

Appendix 6

Subject Index
Symbols

ALMA ∙ See Atacama Large Millimeter/
submillimeter Array
ALMA Regional Centre ∙ 388
ALMA Test Facility ∙ 382–384
alt-az ∙ See altitude-azimuth mount
altitude-azimuth mount ∙ 130, 187
AMBER ∙ See Astronomical Multiple BEam
Recombiner
American Association for the Advancement of
Science ∙ 502
American Astronomical Society ∙ 343, 489
American Institute of Physics ∙ 21
American Southern Observatory ∙ 36
AMOS ∙ See Advanced Mechanical and Optical
Systems
Anglo-Australian Observatory ∙ 79
Anglo Australian Telescope ∙ 106, 459
Antu ∙ 15, 228, 345, 349, 356, 434, 435, 532
AO ∙ See adaptive optics
AOF ∙ See Adaptive Optics Facility
AOS ∙ See Array Operations Site
aperture synthesis ∙ 243, 244
APEX ∙ See Atacama Pathfinder Experiment
ARC ∙ See ALMA regional centre
Array Operations Site ∙ 396
Asea-Brown Boveri ∙ 208
ASPERA ∙ See European Strategy for Astroparticle
Physics
Assembly, Integration and Verification Team ∙ 326,
330, 331
Associated Universities Inc. ∙ 381
Association of Universities for Research in
Astronomy ∙ 37, 38, 41, 52, 178, 292, 310, 395,
396, 407
ASTE ∙ See Atacama Submillimeter Telescope
Experiment
ASTEC ∙ See Australian Science and Technology
Council
AstroGrid ∙ 325, 474
ASTRON ∙ 230, 380
ASTRONET ∙ 212, 310, 495
Astronomical Institute of the Academy of Sciences of
the Czech Republic (Astronomický ústav
Akademie věd České republiky) ∙ 509

0.5-metre telescope ∙ See ESO 0.5-metre telescope
1.5-metre telescope ∙ See ESO 1.52-metre telescope
1.52-metre telescope ∙ See ESO 1.52-metre telescope
1-metre Schmidt telescope ∙ See ESO 1-metre
Schmidt telescope
1-metre telescope ∙ See ESO 1-metre telescope
2M1207 ∙ 223, 438, 439
2MASS ∙ See Two Micron All Sky Survey
3.6-metre telescope ∙ See ESO 3.6-metre telescope

A
A&A ∙ See Astronomy and Astrophysics
AAAS ∙ See American Association for the
Advancement of Science
AAS ∙ See American Astronomical Society
AAT ∙ See Anglo Australian Telescope
Abastumani Astrophysical Observatory ∙ 488, 489
ABB ∙ See Asea-Brown Boveri
Abell 370 ∙ 163, 164
Academia Sinica Institute of Astronomy and
Astrophysics ∙ 374
Achernar ∙ 356
ACS ∙ See Advanced Camera for Surveys (HST)
active optics ∙ 120–122, 188, 190, 233, 235, 260,
261, 331, 333, 346, 403, 405, 407
adaptive optics ∙ 110, 112, 167, 202, 223, 225,
227–230, 232–239, 241, 242, 245, 248, 272,
357, 414, 417, 419, 421, 423, 424, 436, 439
Adaptive Optics Facility ∙ 241, 242
Adaptive optics with Laser guide star For
Astronomy ∙ 240
ADONIS ∙ 236, 545
Advanced Camera for Surveys (HST) ∙ 140, 142
Advanced Mechanical and Optical Systems ∙ 181,
353, 354, 408, 428
AEM ∙ 385, 389
Alcatel Space Industries ∙ 382
ALFA ∙ See Adaptive optics with Laser guide star
For Astronomy

550

Appendix 6 ∙ Subject Index

CAUP ∙ See Centro de Astrofisica
CDD ∙ See charge-coupled device
CDFS ∙ See Chandra Deep Field South
CDS ∙ See Centre de Données Astronomiques de
Strasbourg
CEA ∙ See Commissariat à l’Energie Atomique
Centre de Données Astronomiques de
Strasbourg ∙ 323
Centre d’Etudes et de Recherches Géodynamiques et
Astronomiques ∙ 239, 246
Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique ∙ 164,
230, 247, 352, 372, 439
Centre National de Recherches Météorologiques ∙ 181
Centro Astronómico Hispano–Alemán ∙ 475
Centro de Astrofisica ∙ 462
Centro de Estudios Científicos ∙ 301
CEPAL ∙ See United Nations Economic
Commission for Latin America
CERGA ∙ See Centre d’Etudes et de Recherches
Géodynamiques et Astronomiques
CERN ∙ See European Organization for Nuclear
Research
Cerro Armazones ∙ 41, 183, 446, 447
Cerro Calán Observatory ∙ 36, 41, 446
Cerro Tololo Inter-American Observatory ∙ 36, 41,
156, 395, 407
CES ∙ See Coudé Echelle Spectrograph
CfA ∙ See Harvard Smithsonian Center for
Astrophysics
CFHT ∙ See Canada France Hawaii Telescope
Chandra Deep Field South ∙ 392, 442
charge-coupled device ∙ 84, 95, 116, 122, 125, 129,
130, 132, 140, 151, 181, 182, 236, 281, 321, 403,
489
CMB ∙ See cosmic microwave background
CMB anisotropy ∙ 432
CNAA ∙ See Consorzio Nazionale per l’Astronomia
e l’Astrofisica
CNRS ∙ See Centre National de la Recherche
Scientifique
COBE ∙ See Cosmic Background Explorer
Columbia University ∙ 93
Come-On ∙ 233–236, 531, 532, 547
Come-On+ ∙ 235, 236, 532
comets:
– Hale-Bopp ∙ 152, 440
– Halley’s ∙ 146, 147, 150–152, 266, 502
– Hyakutake ∙ 152, 440
– Ikeya-Seki ∙ 49, 152
– Kohoutek ∙ 152
– McNaught ∙ 440
– Shoemaker-Levy 9 ∙ 264, 265, 269, 270, 298,
508, 532, 534

Astronomical Multiple BEam Recombiner ∙ 357, 533
Astronomisches Institut der Ruhr-Universität
Bochum ∙ 389
Astronomy and Astrophysics ∙ 57, 307, 308, 391,
446, 495, 530
Astrophysical Virtual Observatory ∙ 325, 474
AT ∙ See VLT Auxiliary Telescopes
Atacama Large Millimeter/submillimeter Array ∙ 8,
145, 166, 209, 330, 347, 348, 368–370, 375–390,
392–399, 413–415, 417, 418, 424, 425, 445, 453,
455, 457, 467–469, 477, 478, 480, 487, 493, 499,
513, 515, 532–534
Atacama Pathfinder Experiment ∙ 390–392, 534
Atacama Submillimeter Telescope Experiment ∙ 389
ATC ∙ See UK Astronomy Technology Centre
ATF ∙ See ALMA Test Facility
AUI ∙ See Associated Universities Inc.
AURA ∙ See Association of Universities for Research
in Astronomy
Australian Astronomical Observatory ∙ 459
Australian National University ∙ 224
Australian Science and Technology Council ∙ 460
AUSTRALIS ∙ 224
AVO ∙ See Astrophysical Virtual Observatory

B
Baksan Neutrino Observatory ∙ 159
Beta Pictoris ∙ 236, 272, 439
Bochum 0.6-metre telescope ∙ 278, 529
Boller & Chivens spectrograph ∙ 116, 128
Bolshoi Teleskop Alt-azimutalnyi ∙ 130
Boyden Observatory ∙ 37
BTA ∙ See Bolshoi Teleskop Alt-azimutalnyi
Byurakan Astrophysical Observatory ∙ 488

C
California Institute of Technology (Caltech) ∙ 80,
83, 112, 245, 321, 379
CAMCAO ∙ See Camera for Multiconjugated
Adaptive Optics (VLT)
Camera for Multiconjugated Adaptive
Optics (VLT) ∙ 238
Campo Pelícano ∙ 45
Canada France Hawaii Telescope ∙ 106, 196, 225, 237
Carnegie Institution for Science ∙ 41, 52
CASPEC ∙ 129, 531, 547
CAT ∙ See Coudé Auxiliary Telescope
Católica del Norte University ∙ 348, 446

551

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

DIMM ∙ See Differential Image Motion Monitor
Direction des Sciences de la Matière ∙ 347
DLR ∙ See Deutsche Luft- und Raumfahrtforschung
Dominion Astrophysical Observatory ∙ 127
Dornier Satellitensysteme ∙ 261
DSM ∙ See Direction des Sciences de la Matière
Durham University ∙ 408
Dutch 0.9-metre telescope ∙ 50, 51, 278, 505, 506, 530

– West ∙ 49, 152, 440
– Wirtanen ∙ 440
Comisión Nacional de Investigación Científica y
Tecnológica ∙ 397, 399
Comité Mixto ∙ 445, 446
Commissariat à l’Energie Atomique ∙ 133, 134, 226,
230, 347
Commonwealth Scientific and Industrial Research
Organisation ∙ 460
CONICA ∙ See Coudé Near-Infrared Camera
CONICYT ∙ See Comisión Nacional de
Investigación Científica y Tecnológica
Consejo Superior de Investigaciones Cientificas ∙ 478
Consiglio Nazionale delle Ricerche ∙ 121, 227
Consorzio Nazionale per l’Astronomia e
l’Astrofisica ∙ 404
CORALIE ∙ 273, 548
CORAVEL ∙ 272, 283, 548
Corning Inc. ∙ 61, 62, 205
Corrective Optics Space Telescope Axial
Replacement ∙ 141
Cosmic Background Explorer ∙ 432
cosmic microwave background ∙ 389, 432, 433
COSTAR ∙ See Corrective Optics Space Telescope
Axial Replacement
Coudé Auxiliary Telescope ∙ 58, 70–73, 116, 128,
161, 278, 319, 371, 414, 530
Coudé Echelle Spectrograph ∙ 128, 129, 161, 530
Coudé Near-Infrared Camera ∙ 217, 218, 223, 227,
230, 233, 236, 237, 533
Creusot-Loire ∙ 66
CRIRES ∙ See CRyogenic high-resolution InfraRed
Echelle Spectrograph
CRyogenic high-resolution InfraRed Echelle
Spectrograph ∙ 217, 227, 228, 534
CSIRO ∙ See Commonwealth Scientific and
Industrial Research Organisation
CTIO ∙ See Cerro Tololo Inter-American
Observatory

E
EAAE ∙ See European Association for Astronomy
Education
EAS ∙ See European Astronomical Society
EBU ∙ See European Broadcasting Union
EC ∙ See European Commission
Echelle SPectrograph for Rocky Exoplanet- and
Stable Spectroscopic Observations ∙ 167, 230
Ecole Polytechnique Fédérale de Lausanne ∙ 358
EEAB ∙ See ELT External Advisory Board
E-ELT ∙ See European Extremely Large Telescope
EFDA ∙ See European Fusion Development
Agreement
EFOSC ∙ See ESO Faint Object Spectroscopic
Camera (3.6 metre)
EIE ∙ See European Industrial Engineering S.r.l.
Einstein Observatory ∙ 212
Einstein ring ∙ 164
EIROforum ∙ 496, 497, 507, 509
EIROforum Science Teachers’ Initiative ∙ 507
ELDO ∙ See European Launcher Development
Organisation
ELODIE ∙ 272, 549
ELT External Advisory Board ∙ 421
ELT Science and Engineering working group ∙ 421,
422
ELT Standing Review Committee ∙ 422
EMBL ∙ See European Molecular Biology
Laboratory
EMMI ∙ See ESO Multi-Mode Instrument
ENO ∙ See European Northern Observatory
ERA ∙ See European Research Area
ERC ∙ See European Research Council
ESA ∙ See European Space Agency
ESE ∙ See ELT Science and Engineering working
group
ESFRI ∙ See European Strategy Forum for Research
Infrastructures
ESO 0.5-metre telescope ∙ 50, 278, 530
ESO 1.52-metre telescope ∙ 44, 47, 60, 116, 181, 278,
286, 353, 402, 529, 532

D
Danish 0.5-metre telescope ∙ 278, 475, 530
Danish 1.54-metre telescope ∙ 51, 66, 68, 129, 148,
158, 197, 266, 278, 280, 282, 283, 286, 435, 471,
530
DARPA ∙ See Defense Advanced Research Projects
Agency
Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency ∙ 239
Deutsche Luft- und Raumfahrtforschung ∙ 83
Differential Image Motion Monitor ∙ 181, 182, 280

552

Appendix 6 ∙ Subject Index

ESO 1-metre Schmidt telescope ∙ 9, 70, 74, 78, 278,
530
ESO 1-metre telescope ∙ 46, 278
ESO 3.6-metre telescope ∙ 71, 120, 130, 164, 186,
197, 234, 272, 278, 459, 530–533
ESO Bulletin ∙ 46, 59, 80, 90, 178
ESO Committees ∙ 37–39, 55, 465
ESO Echo ∙ 92
ESO Faint Object Spectroscopic Camera
(3.6 metre) ∙ 129, 134, 167, 286
ESO Messenger ∙ 9, 10, 31, 36, 49, 53, 64, 69, 71,
90–92, 113, 114, 120, 140, 148, 159, 160, 168,
178, 189, 191, 194, 247, 251, 269, 279, 281, 288,
319, 331, 332, 351, 371, 401, 490, 492, 501
ESO Multi-Mode Instrument ∙ 125, 131, 167, 220,
276, 319
ESPRESSO ∙ See Echelle SPectrograph for Rocky
Exoplanet- and Stable Spectroscopic Observations
ESRC ∙ See ELT Standing Review Committee
ESRF ∙ See European Synchrotron Radiation
Facility
ESRO ∙ See European Space Research Organisation
ESTI ∙ See EIROforum Science Teachers’ Initiative
Eta Carinae ∙ 357
EU ∙ See European Union
EURAB ∙ See European Research Advisory Board
EUREKA ∙ 205, 483, 491
European Association for Astronomy
Education ∙ 477, 507–509
European Astronomical Society ∙ 123, 489, 495
European Broadcasting Union ∙ 340
European Commission ∙ 325, 380, 416–418, 491,
496, 497, 505, 509
European Extremely Large Telescope ∙ 183, 242, 415,
421, 423–425, 447, 487, 493, 515, 516, 534
European Fusion Development Agreement ∙ 496
European Industrial Engineering S.r.l. ∙ 208, 263,
379, 382, 384, 385, 408
European Launcher Development Organisation ∙ 62
European Molecular Biology Laboratory ∙ 99,
494–496
European Northern Observatory ∙ 478
European Organization for Nuclear Research ∙ 26,
35, 62–64, 69, 72, 73, 80, 96, 99, 103, 109, 111,
127, 142, 169, 244, 308, 351, 451, 463–465, 474,
476, 479, 487, 493, 494, 496, 497, 509, 516, 530
European Research Advisory Board ∙ 480
European Research Area ∙ 11, 56, 458, 465, 488,
494, 495, 497, 499, 513
European Research Council ∙ 56, 455, 499
European Science Advisory Committee
(ALMA) ∙ 377

European Science Week ∙ 505, 506
European Space Agency ∙ 62, 134, 137–139, 142,
144, 145, 151, 152, 266, 308, 310, 318, 325, 380,
432, 440, 441, 443, 451, 468, 472, 474, 475,
494–497, 509, 510, 531
European Space Astronomy Centre ∙ 475
European Space Research Organisation ∙ 62, 63, 474
European Strategy for Astroparticle Physics ∙ 495
European Strategy Forum for Research
Infrastructures ∙ 418
European Synchrotron Radiation Facility ∙ 169, 496
European Union ∙ 25, 219, 238, 308, 309, 348, 402,
408, 417, 418, 458, 465, 472, 483, 494–498, 505
European X-ray Free Electron Laser ∙ 496
exoplanets ∙ 272

F
Faint Object Camera ∙ 138, 141
Faint Object Spectroscopic Camera ∙ 129
FC ∙ See Finance Committee
FEIC ∙ See Front-End Integration Centre
FEROS ∙ See Fibrefed Extended Range Optical
Spectrograph
Fibrefed Extended Range Optical Spectrograph ∙ 116,
532
FIERA ∙ 223
Finance Committee ∙ 35, 65, 208, 247, 385, 451,
454, 455
FINITO ∙ See Fringe-tracking Instrument of NIce
and Torino
Finnish Agency for Technology and Innovation ∙ 472
FLAMES ∙ 224, 225, 227, 533, 550
FOC ∙ See Faint Object Camera
FOcal Reducer and low dispersion Spectrograph ∙ 163,
215, 217
FOcal Reducer and low dispersion
Spectrograph 2 ∙ 204, 217, 219, 434, 435, 440,
441, 533
Fokker Space ∙ 353
Ford Foundation ∙ 32, 61
FORS1 ∙ See FOcal Reducer and low dispersion
Spectrograph
FORSE2 ∙ See FOcal Reducer and low dispersion
Spectrograph 2
FOSC ∙ See Faint Object Spectroscopic Camera
Friedrich-Schiller-Universität Jena ∙ 134, 390, 439
Fringe-tracking Instrument of NIce and Torino ∙ 357
Front-End Integration Centre ∙ 387
FSU ∙ See Friedrich-Schiller-Universität Jena
FUEGOS ∙ 217, 224, 550

553

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

G

Herbig-Haro objects ∙ 284
HES ∙ See Hamburg/ESO Survey
HH ∙ See Herbig-Haro objects
HH-111 ∙ 284
High Accuracy Radial Velocity Planetary
Searcher ∙ 31, 273, 274, 281, 282, 286, 533
High Acuity Wide field K-band Imager ∙ 227, 229,
230, 534
High Resolution Spectrograph ∙ 141
HIRES ∙ 220, 221
HRS ∙ See High Resolution Spectrograph
HST ∙ See Hubble Space Telescope
Hubble Deep Field ∙ 412, 442
Hubble Space Telescope ∙ 109, 133, 137, 139–143,
190, 266, 272, 282, 318, 324, 335, 340, 343,
354, 439, 442, 443, 510
hypernovae ∙ 434, 435

gamma-ray burst ∙ 434
Gemini telescope ∙ 257, 323, 377, 407, 428, 443,
460, 461, 467, 468
General Relativity Analysis via Vlt
InTerferometrY ∙ 358
Georg-August-Universität Göttingen ∙ 50
Giant Magellan Telescope ∙ 419
GigagalaxyZoom project ∙ 511
GIRAFFE ∙ 224, 550
GMS ∙ See GRB Monitoring System
GMT ∙ See Giant Magellan Telescope
GOODS ∙ See Great Observatories Origins Deep
Survey
GPO ∙ See Grand Prism Objectif
GQ Lupi ∙ 439
Grand Prism Objectif ∙ 30, 31, 44, 47, 149, 150, 158,
278, 529
Gran Telescopio Canarias ∙ 424, 428, 467, 472, 478,
479
Gravitational Wave Detector at the European
Gravitational Observatory ∙ 422
GRAVITY ∙ See General Relativity Analysis via Vlt
InTerferometrY
GRB 030329 ∙ 434, 435
GRB 050509B ∙ 435
GRB 970228 ∙ 434
GRB Monitoring System ∙ 285
Great Karoo semi-desert ∙ 29
Great Observatories Origins Deep Survey ∙ 442, 443
GSCII ∙ See Guide Star Catalog II
GTC ∙ See Gran Telescopio Canarias
guesthouse (ESO) ∙ 52, 86, 529
Guide Star Catalog II ∙ 142

I
IAA ∙ See Institute of Astrophysics of Andalucía
IAC ∙ See Instituto de Astrofísica de Canarias
IAP ∙ See Institut d’Astrophysique de Paris
IAU ∙ See International Astronomical Union
IC ∙ See Index Catalogue
ICSU ∙ See International Council of Scientific
Unions
IGN ∙ See Instituto Geográfico Nacional
IHAP ∙ See Image Handling and Processing System
ILIAS ∙ See Intergrated Large Infrastructures for
Astroparticle Science
ILL ∙ See Institut Laue-Langevin
Image Handling and Processing System ∙ 105, 470
Image Reduction and Analysis Facility ∙ 105
IMCCE ∙ See Institut de Mecanique Celeste et de
Calcul des Ephemerides
INAF ∙ See Istituto Nazionale di Astrofisica
Index Catalogue ∙ 82
Indiana University ∙ 84
InfraRed Array Camera ∙ 133, 531
Infrared Detector High Speed Array Control and
Processing Electronics ∙ 223
Infrared Space Observatory ∙ 134, 347
Infrared Spectrometer And Array Camera ∙ 134,
162, 217, 220, 221, 426, 532
Innocenti-Santeustacchio ∙ 188
INNSE ∙ See Innocenti-Santeustacchio
Institut d’Astrophysique de Paris ∙ 320
Institut d’Astrophysique Spatiale ∙ 226
Institut de Mecanique Celeste et de Calcul des
Ephemerides ∙ 509

H
Hamburger Sternwarte ∙ 26, 44, 48, 53, 54, 75, 76,
529
Hamburg/ESO Survey ∙ 83
HARPS ∙ See High Accuracy Radial Velocity
Planetary Searcher
Harvard Smithsonian Center for Astrophysics ∙ 374,
452
HAWK-I ∙ See High Acuity Wide field K-band
Imager
HDF ∙ See Hubble Deep Field
Helsinki Observatory (Helsingin yliopiston
Observatorio) ∙ 470
Helwan Observatory ∙ 148

554

Appendix 6 ∙ Subject Index

JNICT ∙ See Portugal National Board for Science
and Technology
Jodrell Bank Observatory ∙ 325
Johns Hopkins University ∙ 137
Joint European Torus ∙ 496
Joint Infrastructure Fund ∙ 468
JPL ∙ See Jet Propulsion Laboratory

Institut de Physique du Globe ∙ 184
Institut de Radioastronomie Millimétrique ∙ 164,
165, 353, 372, 377, 379, 380, 393, 475, 477
Institute of Astrophysics of Andalucía ∙ 475
Institute of Microtechnology of Neuchâtel ∙ 358
Institute of Space Astrophysics at Frascati ∙ 137
Institut Laue-Langevin ∙ 496
Instituto de Astrofísica de Andalucía ∙ See Institute
of Astrophysics of Andalucía
Instituto de Astrofísica de Canarias ∙ 415, 475
Instituto Geográfico Nacional ∙ 164, 372, 475
Instrumentation Committee ∙ 55, 60
INTAS ∙ 490
Interbeton ∙ 66, 208
interferometry ∙ 110, 243, 245, 351, 355, 447
Intergrated Large Infrastructures for Astroparticle
Science ∙ 495
International Astronomical Union ∙ 27, 156, 159,
160, 165, 266, 270, 469, 480, 481, 489, 506, 509,
510, 529, 534
International Council of Scientific Unions ∙ 25, 293
International society for optics and photonics ∙ 314,
413, 414
International Ultraviolet Explorer ∙ 137, 144, 412,
475
International Year of Astronomy ∙ 270, 509–511,
534
IRAC ∙ See InfraRed Array Camera
IRACE ∙ See Infrared Detector High Speed Array
Control and Processing Electronics
IRAF ∙ See Image Reduction and Analysis Facility
IRAM ∙ See Institut de Radioastronomie
Millimétrique
IRSPEC ∙ 131, 132, 134, 267, 531, 552
ISAAC ∙ See Infrared Spectrometer And Array
Camera
ISO ∙ See Infrared Space Observatory
ISOCAM ∙ 133, 347
Istituto di Fisica Cosmica del CNR ∙ 227
Istituto di Radioastronomia del CNR ∙ 227
Istituto Nazionale di Astrofisica ∙ 404
IUE ∙ See International Ultraviolet Explorer
IYA2009 ∙ See International Year of Astronomy

K
Kamiokande observatory ∙ 159
Kapteyn Institute (Kapteyn Instituut) ∙ 404
Kapteyn Laboratory in Groningen ∙ 44, 57
K-band Multi-Object Spectrograph ∙ 229, 230
Keck telescopes ∙ 174, 211, 220, 248, 249, 261, 282,
411, 430, 436, 443, 479
Kitt Peak National Observatory ∙ 110, 232
Klawervlei site ∙ 29
Kléber Centre des Conférences Internationales ∙ 168
KMOS ∙ See K-band Multi-Object Spectrograph
KPNO ∙ See Kitt Peak National Observatory
Krupp Antennentechnik ∙ 379
Kueyen ∙ 222, 345, 430, 431, 434, 435, 441, 533

L
LABOCA ∙ See Large APEX BOlometer CAmera
LABOCA Survey of the Extended Chandra Deep
Field South ∙ 392
Laboratoire d’Astronomie Spatiale Marseille ∙ 227
Laboratoire d’Astrophysique de l’Observatoire de
Grenoble ∙ 237, 358
Laboratoire d’Astrophysique de Toulouse ∙ 224
Laboratoire d’électronique et de technologie de
l’information ∙ 133
Laboratorio di Fisica Cosmica e Tecnologie
Relative ∙ 121, 227
LAM ∙ See L’Observatoire Astronomique MarseilleProvence
LAMA ∙ See Large Active Mirrors in Aluminum
LAMOST ∙ See Large Sky Area Multi-Object Fibre
Spectroscopic Telescope
Landessternwarte Heidelberg ∙ 218, 358
LAOG ∙ See Laboratoire d’Astrophysique de
l’Observatoire de Grenoble
Large Active Mirrors in Aluminum ∙ 205
Large APEX BOlometer CAmera ∙ 390
Large Binocular Telescope ∙ 241, 330, 415
Large Sky Area Multi-Object Fibre Spectroscopic
Telescope ∙ 428

J
James Clerk Maxwell Telescope ∙ 165, 377
JCMT ∙ See James Clerk Maxwell Telescope
JET ∙ See Joint European Torus
Jet Propulsion Laboratory ∙ 147
JIF ∙ See Joint Infrastructure Fund

555

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

Microgate ∙ 242
MIDAS ∙ See Munich Image Data Analysis System
MIDI ∙ See MID-infrared Interferometric
instrument
MID-infrared Interferometric instrument ∙ 356,
358, 533
millimetre array ∙ 372, 376–378, 467, 472
Mirror Maintenance Building ∙ 334, 363
MIT ∙ See Massachusetts Institute of Technology
MMA ∙ See millimetre array
MMB ∙ See Mirror Maintenance Building
MMT ∙ See Multi-Mirror Telescope
MPA ∙ See Max-Planck-Institut für Astrophysik
MPE ∙ See Max-Planck-Institut für
Extraterrestrische Physik
MPG ∙ See Max-Planck-Gesellschaft
MPG/ESO 2.2-metre telescope ∙ 133, 164, 181, 197,
268, 272, 278, 280, 282, 286, 319, 402, 403,
434, 442, 511, 531, 532
MPIfR ∙ See Max-Planck-Institut für
Radioastronomie
MPP ∙ See Max-Planck-Institut für Plasmaphysik
MPQ ∙ See Max-Planck-Institut für Quantenoptik
Multi AperTure mid-Infrared SpectroScopic
Experiment ∙ 358
Multi-conjugate Adaptive optics Demonstrator ∙ 238,
534
Multi-Mirror Telescope ∙ 110, 242, 330
Multi Unit Spectroscopic Explorer ∙ 229, 230
Munich Image Data Analysis System ∙ 105
MUSE ∙ See Multi Unit Spectroscopic Explorer

Large Southern Array ∙ 372, 376–378, 467, 472, 515
Large Synoptic Survey Telescope ∙ 185
Las Campanas Observatory ∙ 155, 156, 395
LASERDOT ∙ 233
laser guide star ∙ 228, 237–242, 534
Laser Guide Star Facility ∙ 240
La Silla Seeing Campaign ∙ 181, 183
La Silla University ∙ 287
LASSCA ∙ See La Silla Seeing Campaign
LBT ∙ See Large Binocular Telescope
Leiden Observatory (Sterrewacht Leiden) ∙ 26, 201,
227, 404
Leiden University (Universiteit Leiden) ∙ 358
LESS ∙ See LABOCA Survey of the Extended
Chandra Deep Field South
LETI ∙ See Laboratoire d’électronique et de
technologie de l’information
LGS ∙ See laser guide star
Lick Observatory ∙ 59, 239, 284
L’Observatoire Astronomique MarseilleProvence ∙ 420
Loral American Beryllium ∙ 262
LSA ∙ See Large Southern Array
LS-Quest ∙ 84
LSST ∙ See Large Synoptic Survey Telescope
Lund Observatory ∙ 72
Lund University (Lunds Universitet) ∙ 414, 415
Lytkarino Optical Glass Factory ∙ 403, 404, 408
LZOS ∙ See Lytkarino Optical Glass Factory

M

N

MACHO project ∙ 321
MAD ∙ See Multi-conjugate Adaptive optics
Demonstrator
Magellanic Cloud, Large (LMC) ∙ 156, 158, 159, 531
MAN ∙ 72, 260, 261
Massachusetts Institute of Technology ∙ 475
MATISSE ∙ See Multi AperTure mid-Infrared
SpectroScopic Experiment
MATRA ∙ 113, 236, 261
Max-Planck-Gesellschaft ∙ 97, 101, 102, 106, 116,
164, 247, 286, 352, 372
Max-Planck-Institut für Astronomie ∙ 115, 116, 223,
227, 240, 358
Max-Planck-Institut für Astrophysik ∙ 100, 101, 476
Max-Planck-Institut für Extraterrestrische
Physik ∙ 100, 236, 239, 240, 358, 420, 436
Max-Planck-Institut für Plasmaphysik ∙ 100, 325
Max-Planck-Institut für Quantenoptik ∙ 100
Max-Planck-Institut für Radioastronomie ∙ 246,
379, 389–391, 475

NACO ∙ See NAOS/CONICA
NAOS ∙ See Nasmyth Adaptive Optics System
NAOS/CONICA ∙ 237, 272, 436, 439, 533
Naples Observatory ∙ See Osservatorio Astronomico
di Capodimonte
NASA ∙ 137–139, 141, 143, 147, 249, 266, 318, 325,
343, 344, 412, 428, 432, 434, 435, 443, 494
Nasmyth Adaptive Optics System ∙ 223, 227, 230,
233, 236, 237, 533
National Geographic Society/Palomar Observatory
Sky Survey ∙ 78
National Institutes of Natural Sciences ∙ 534
National New Technology Telescope ∙ 245
National Optical Astronomy Observatory ∙ 245,
406
National Physical Laboratory ∙ 415
National Radio Astronomy Observatory ∙ 245, 374,
376, 377, 381, 477, 487, 515, 532

556

Appendix 6 ∙ Subject Index

NIRMOS ∙ See Near-InfraRed Multi-Object
Spectrograph
NNTT ∙ See National New Technology Telescope
NOAO ∙ See National Optical Astronomy
Observatory
Nordic Optical Telescope ∙ 171, 414, 471
NOT ∙ See Nordic Optical Telescope
NRAO ∙ See National Radio Astronomy
Observatory
NSF ∙ See National Science Foundation
NTT ∙ See New Technology Telescope
NTT Big Bang ∙ 288, 331
NTT Deep Field ∙ 193, 194, 442

National Science Foundation ∙ 325, 381, 487, 533,
534
National University of Ireland ∙ 415
NATO ∙ 96
Near Infrared Camera and Multi-Object
Spectrometer ∙ 133, 142
Near-InfraRed Multi-Object Spectrograph ∙ 225,
227, 229
nebula:
– Bug ∙ 16, 341
– Crab ∙ 159
– Eagle ∙ 426
– Lagoon ∙ 511
– Tarantula ∙ 154, 158
NEON ∙ See Network of European Observatories in
the North
Netherlands Foundation for Space Research ∙ 226,
380, 390
­Netherlands Foundation for Research in
Astronomy ∙ 227, 372, 380, 390
Netherlands Institute of Applied Physics ∙ 353
Netherlands Organisation for Applied Scientific
Research (Nederlandse Organisatie
voor toegepast-natuurwetenschappelijk
onderzoek) ∙ 353, 358
Network of European Observatories in the
North ∙ 491
New General Catalogue ∙ 16, 82, 138, 218, 219, 234,
307, 341, 426, 432, 511
New Technology Telescope ∙ 3, 7, 51, 65, 83, 88,
115–117, 122, 131, 132, 134, 139, 140, 162, 167,
180, 183, 186–195, 197, 203, 205, 245, 262, 266,
267, 276, 278, 281, 283–288, 319, 321, 322, 324,
331, 336, 340, 342, 379, 401, 407, 411, 436, 441,
442, 451, 458, 504, 505, 514, 531, 532
Next Generation Space Telescope ∙ 144, 412
NFR ∙ See Swedish Natural Science Research
Council (Naturvetenskapliga forskningsrådet,
NFR)
NFRA ∙ See Netherlands Foundation for Research
in Astronomy
NGC ∙ See New General Catalogue
NGC 1232 ∙ 218, 219
NGC 3532 ∙ 138
NGC 6302 ∙ 16, 341
NGC 6397 ∙ 432
NGC 6475 ∙ 234
NGC 6523 ∙ 511
NGC 6611 ∙ 426
NGST ∙ See Next Generation Space Telescope
NICMOS ∙ See Near Infrared Camera and MultiObject Spectrometer
NINS ∙ See National Institutes of Natural Sciences

O
Observatoire de Genève ∙ 99, 184, 224, 273, 274, 358
Observatoire de Haute-Provence ∙ 44, 72, 227, 233,
272, 283, 309, 491
Observatoire de Lyon ∙ 452
Observatoire de Marseille ∙ 30, 46, 127, 243
Observatoire de Paris ∙ 230, 233, 236, 237, 239, 509
Observatoire de Paris-Meudon ∙ 224, 236, 354
Observatoire Midi-Pyrénées ∙ 227
Observatório Astronómico de Lisboa ∙ 462
Observatorio de Calar Alto ∙ 474, 491
Observatorium Hoher List ∙ 39
Observing Programmes Committee ∙ 55, 104, 159,
293, 302, 451
OECD ∙ See Organisation for Economic
Co-operation and Development
Office National D’Etudes et de Recherche
Aerospatiale ∙ 233, 237
OHP ∙ See Observatoire de Haute-Provence
OmegaCAM ∙ 404, 405
Omega Centauri ∙ 69, 192, 336, 470
ONERA ∙ See Office National D’Etudes et de
Recherche Aerospatiale
Onsala Space Observatory ∙ 165, 372, 389
OPC ∙ See Observing Programmes Committee
Operations Support Facility (ALMA) ∙ 381, 388,
392, 396
OPTICON ∙ 416, 494, 495, 556
Organisation for Economic Co-operation and
Development ∙ 417, 472, 493
OSF ∙ See Operations Support Facility (ALMA)
OSO ∙ See Onsala Space Observatory
Osservatorio Astrofisico di Arcetri ∙ 237, 238, 241,
242
Osservatorio Astrofisico di Asiago ∙ 402, 491
Osservatorio Astronomico di Bologna ∙ 227
Osservatorio Astronomico di Brera ∙ 227

557

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

S

Osservatorio Astronomico di Capodimonte (Naples
Observatory ) ∙ 227, 402–404, 554, 556
Osservatorio Astronomico di Padova ∙ 216
Osservatorio Astronomico di Torino ∙ 223
Österreichische Gesellschaft für Astronomie und
Astrophysik ∙ 484
OverWhelmingly Large Telescope ∙ 167, 413, 415,
417–421, 423, 424
OWL ∙ See OverWhelmingly Large Telescope
OzPoz ∙ 224, 461

SAG ∙ 226
SALT ∙ See Southern African Large Telescope
Samuel Oschin Telescope ∙ 76
Schott Glassworks ∙ 188, 205, 251, 429
Science Research Council (UK) ∙ 9, 79, 80, 116, 127,
158, 372, 412
Science Strategy Working Group ∙ 421, 493, 494
Scientific Policy Committee ∙ 55
Scientific Technical Committee ∙ 55, 113, 207, 248,
286, 310, 314, 372, 417, 421, 451, 455, 493
SEA ∙ See Sociedad Española de Astronomía
SEBIS ∙ 263
SEST ∙ See Swedish–ESO Submillimetre Telescope
SHARP ∙ 193, 236, 436
SINFONI ∙ See Spectrograph for INtegral Field
Observations in the Near Infrared
Sirius ∙ 70, 355
SKA ∙ See Square Kilometre Array
SN1987A ∙ 162, 193, 434
Sociedad Española de Astronomía ∙ 476, 478
Società Impianti Industriali ∙ 208, 263, 314
SODAR ∙ See SOund Detection And Ranging
SOFI ∙ See Son OF ISAAC
SOFIA ∙ See Stratospheric Observatory for Infrared
Astronomy
SOIMI ∙ See Società Impianti Industriali
Son OF ISAAC ∙ 7, 125, 134, 286, 532
SOund Detection And Ranging ∙ 181, 183
Southern African Large Telescope ∙ 110, 510
Space Telescope European Coordinating
Facility ∙ 137–145, 310, 321, 323, 388, 531
Space Telescope Science Institute ∙ 137–139, 141,
145, 212, 272, 318, 321, 412, 442
Special Astrophysical Observatory ∙ 120, 130
Spectrograph for INtegral Field Observations in the
Near Infrared ∙ 162, 227, 228, 436, 533
Spectrometer for Infrared Faint Field Imaging ∙ 227
Spectro-Polarimetric High-contrast Exoplanet
REsearch ∙ 229, 230
SPHERE ∙ See Spectro-Polarimetric High-contrast
Exoplanet REsearch
SPIE ∙ See International society for optics and
photonics
SPIFFI ∙ See Spectrometer for Infrared Faint Field
Imaging
SPS ∙ See Super Proton Synchrotron
Square Kilometre Array ∙ 419
SRC ∙ See Science Research Council (UK)
SRON ∙ See Netherlands Foundation for Space
Research

P
Paranal Artificial Reference Source for Extended
Coverage ∙ 240
PARSCA 92 ∙ 183
Particle Physics and Astronomy Research
Council ∙ 372, 377, 406, 407, 435, 467–469
Phase Referenced Imaging and Microarcsecond
Astrometry facility ∙ 358, 534
planetary nebulae ∙ 48, 82, 193, 319
Pontificia Universidad Católica de Chile ∙ 293, 446
Portugal National Board for Science and
Technology ∙ 462
PPARC ∙ See Particle Physics and Astronomy
Research Council
PRIMA ∙ See Phase Referenced Imaging and
Microarcsecond Astrometry facility
ProChile ∙ 448

Q
QBS ∙ See Quick Blue Survey
quasars ∙ 23, 83, 196, 197, 222, 283, 430, 452
Quasi-stellar Object ∙ 164
Quick Blue Survey ∙ 81, 530

R
Radboud University Nijmegen (Radboud
Universiteit Nijmegen) ∙ 230
Radio Astronomy Network ∙ 416, 495
RadioNet ∙ See Radio Astronomy Network
Rapid Eye Mount telescope ∙ 285, 533
REM ∙ See Rapid Eye Mount telescope
REOSC ∙ 61, 62, 69, 206, 250–258, 261, 262, 311,
353, 428
Ruhr-Universität Bochum ∙ 49, 483
Rutherford Appleton Laboratory ∙ 380, 388, 408

558

Appendix 6 ∙ Subject Index

TPD ∙ See Netherlands Institute of Applied Physics
TRS ∙ See Technical Research Support
Two Micron All Sky Survey ∙ 409, 560

SSWG ∙ See Science Strategy Working Group
STC ∙ See Scientific Technical Committee
ST-ECF ∙ See Space Telescope European
Coordinating Facility
Steward Observatory ∙ 173, 330
Stockholm Observatory (Stockholms
Observatorium) ∙ 452
Stratospheric Observatory for Infrared
Astronomy ∙ 428
STScI ∙ See Space Telescope Science Institute
Subaru Telescope ∙ 174
The Submillimeter Array ∙ 374
SUperb Seeing Imager ∙ 125, 132, 276
supernova(e) ∙ 84, 154, 157–159, 275, 276, 432,
505, 531
Super Proton Synchrotron ∙ 62
SUSI ∙ See SUperb Seeing Imager
SUSI2 ∙ 532
Swedish–ESO Submillimetre Telescope ∙ 165, 166,
266, 267, 278, 286, 371, 373, 389–391, 471, 515,
531
Swedish Natural Science Research Council
(Naturvetenskapliga forskningsrådet,
NFR) ∙ 372
Swiss 0.4-metre telescope ∙ 187, 530
Swiss 1.2-metre Leonhard Euler telescope ∙ 67, 273,
532
Swiss T70 telescope ∙ 530

U
UCLA ∙ See University of California
UK Astronomy Technology Centre ∙ 380, 406
UKIDSS ∙ See UKIRT Infrared Deep Sky Survey
UKIRT ∙ See United Kingdom Infrared Telescope
UKIRT Infrared Deep Sky Survey ∙ 324
UK Schmidt Telescope ∙ 9, 84, 406
UKST ∙ See UK Schmidt Telescope
United Kingdom Infrared Telescope ∙ 324, 469
United Nations Economic Commission for Latin
America ∙ 52
Universidad de Chile ∙ 293, 447
Universidad de Concepción ∙ 293
Universidad de La Serena ∙ 178, 446
Universidade de Lisboa ∙ 238
Universität Bern ∙ 452
Universität Köln ∙ 227
Universitäts-Sternwarte Göttingen ∙ 218
Universitäts-Sternwarte München ∙ 218
Universität Wien ∙ 134
Université D. Diderot ∙ 230
Université de Bordeaux ∙ 380
Université Louis-Pasteur ∙ 325
University College London ∙ 415
University of Amsterdam (Universiteit van
Amsterdam) ∙ 230
University of Arizona ∙ 110, 173
University of California ∙ 174, 227, 240, 437, 439
University of Copenhagen (Københavns
Universitet) ∙ 50, 230
University of New South Wales ∙ 224
University of Uppsala (Uppsala Universitet) ∙ 82
Users Committee ∙ 144, 286, 451, 452
UT ∙ See VLT Unit Telescopes
UVES ∙ See UV-Visual Echelle Spectrograph
UV-Visual Echelle Spectrograph ∙ 144, 162, 217,
219, 220–222, 224, 225, 228, 412, 430,
431–434, 533

T
TAROT ∙ See Télescope à Action Rapide pour les
Objets Transitoires
Technical Research Support ∙ 279, 280
TEKES ∙ See Finnish Agency for Technology and
Innovation
Télescope à Action Rapide pour les Objets
Transitoires ∙ 285, 534
Telescope Project Division ∙ 63
Ten-Meter-Telescope ∙ 248
Thales Alenia Space Tinsley Inc. ∙ 358, 385
Thermal lnfrared Multimode Instrument ∙ 133, 134,
226, 267, 269, 532
Thirty Meter Telescope ∙ 248
TIMMI ∙ See Thermal lnfrared Multimode
Instrument
TNO ∙ See Netherlands Organisation for Applied
Scientific Research (Nederlandse Organisatie
voor toegepast-natuurwetenschappelijk
onderzoek)
TP ∙ See Telescope Project Division

V
Venus transit ∙ 483, 508
Vertex RSI ∙ 379, 384, 385
Very Large Array ∙ 196, 245, 381, 383, 443

559

The Jewel on the Mountaintop

W

Very Large Telescope ∙ 3, 7, 8, 10, 11, 15–17, 51,
65, 66, 93, 112–117, 131, 133–135, 144,
145, 152, 159, 161–164, 167–169, 171–173,
181–184, 189, 193, 195–197, 200–204, 206,
207, 209, 210, 212–220, 222, 223, 226–230,
232, 233, 235–238, 241–245, 247–251, 253,
255, 257–259, 262, 263, 272, 279, 280, 282,
283, 285–289, 293, 295, 297, 302, 303, 305,
306, 308, 310, 313, 314, 317–319, 321, 322,
324, 326, 327, 329–333, 335–337, 339, 340,
342–346, 348, 349, 351–353, 355, 356, 363,
376, 379, 390, 400–404, 406, 407, 411–415,
417–420, 422–424, 426–448, 452, 453, 455,
457, 461, 463, 464, 467, 468, 470, 477, 487,
492, 493, 497, 502–505, 514, 516, 530–534
Very Large Telescope Interferometer ∙ 11, 213, 236,
237, 245–248, 303, 348–359, 378, 381, 417, 418,
427, 455, 460, 487, 533, 534
VIMOS ∙ See VIsible MultiObject Spectrograph
VINCI ∙ See VLT INterferometer Commissioning
Instrument
VIRCAM ∙ See VISTA IR Camera
VIRGO ∙ See Gravitational Wave Detector at the
European Gravitational Observatory
VISA ∙ See VLT Subarray
Visible and Infrared Survey Telescope for
Astronomy ∙ 84, 180, 230, 325, 400, 402,
407–410, 468, 469
VIsible MultiObject Spectrograph ∙ 225, 227, 230,
533
VISIR ∙ See VLT Imager and Spectrometer for the
mid InfraRed
VISTA ∙ See Visible and Infrared Survey Telescope
for Astronomy
VISTA IR Camera ∙ 408, 409
VLA ∙ See Very Large Array
VLT ∙ See Very Large Telescope
VLT Auxiliary Telescopes ∙ 181, 204, 245, 249, 330,
352–354, 356, 381, 427
VLTI ∙ See Very Large Telescope Interferometer
VLT Imager and Spectrometer for the mid
InfraRed ∙ 225, 226, 533
VLT INterferometer Commissioning
Instrument ∙ 354, 355
VLT Subarray ∙ 248
VLT Survey Telescope ∙ 400, 402–405, 408
VLT Unit Telescopes ∙ 15, 210, 216, 218, 220,
222–224, 227, 228, 236, 238, 240, 242, 305,
306, 313, 330, 335, 345, 356, 357, 403, 407, 427,
431, 439, 441, 477, 532–534
VST ∙ See VLT Survey Telescope

WDR ∙ See Westdeutscher Rundfunk
Westdeutscher Rundfunk ∙ 15
WFC3 ∙ See Wide Field Camera 3
WFI ∙ See Wide-Field Imager
Wide Field Camera 3 ∙ 140
Wide-Field Imager ∙ 116, 282
Wide Terrestrial Telescope ∙ 413
Wilkinson Microwave Anisotropy Probe ∙ 432
WMAP ∙ See Wilkinson Microwave Anisotropy
Probe
W. M. Keck Observatory ∙ 239
WTT ∙ See Wide Terrestrial Telescope

X
XFEL ∙ See European X-ray Free Electron Laser
XMM-Newton satellite ∙ 443
X-shooter ∙ 204, 229, 230, 534, 560

Y
Yale University ∙ 84
Yepun ∙ 223, 228, 240–242, 345, 439, 441, 532–534

Z
Zeekoegat ∙ 29, 30
Zeiss ∙ 65, 76, 116, 120, 188–190, 260, 403
Zerodur ∙ 205, 252, 253, 404

560

